https://qz.com/1818606/alex-jones-ordered-to-stop-selling-fake-coronavirus-cures/,Fund next-gen business journalism with $10 a month Search Free Newsletters New York State attorney general Letitia James has ordered right-wing conspiracy theorist Alex Jones to stop making misleading claims about supposed coronavirus cures sold on his website, InfoWars. The attorney general’s office “is extremely concerned” about Jones hawking these products on his online show, it said in a cease-and-desist letter dated March 12. The products include a “nano-silver” toothpaste, which Jones said “kills the whole SARS-corona family at point-blank range.” There is no medical evidence behind these claims. In fact, the Federal Drug Administration and National Institutes of Health say colloidal silver is not safe to use and can even cause argyria, a bluish-gray skin discoloration that’s typically permanent. “As the coronavirus continues to pose serious risks to public health, Alex Jones has spewed outright lies and has profited off of New Yorkers’ anxieties,” said Attorney General James in a statement. Such misrepresentations are illegal, according to New York law. Jones opened his March 7 show by saying that the coronavirus is “synthetic and man-made” and “clearly a globalist ChiCom [Chinese Communist] plot.” In the past, he has also claimed that the Sandy Hook Elementary School shooting that left 26 dead was a staged hoax. InfoWars was not immediately available for comment. A product on the InfoWars page that contains SilverSol, one of the fake coronavirus cures, has a disclaimer on the purchase page, but it’s not clear when the note was added: “The products on this page are NOT treatments for any disease. They are not for use in the cure, treatment, prevention, or mitigation of any disease.” But one of the colloidal silver products is still advertised on the InfoWars website with a massive banner. InfoWars has long sold alternative medicine products, claiming miraculous health benefits. And many others are trying to cash in on the public health crisis by selling colloidal silver products and other fake cures. The state of Missouri sued televangelist Jim Bakker for peddling SilverSol products as a coronavirus medication, and the FDA sent warning letters last week to seven companies that were making similar claims. Misleading and false statements about the coronavirus have flooded social media in recent weeks, making it all the more crucial to only trust credible sources like the World Health Organization and country-specific public health departments like the US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. Our free, fast, and fun briefing on the global economy, delivered every weekday morning. ,
https://qz.com/1816973/amazon-is-selling-coronavirus-misinformation/,Fund next-gen business journalism with $10 a month Search Free Newsletters Amazon’s shopping site is presenting medically unverified advice and products to customers who search for coronavirus.  The platform displays different results depending on one’s search history; Quartz did 12 searches (one from an incognito account while logged out and 11 from different accounts), and was shown a variety of misleading information, including holistic cures, prayer healing, and incorrect medical advice.  On the first page of results, five people (all women) were shown a book, Holistic Help for the Coronavirus. After Quartz emailed Amazon for comment, that book and one other was not available as of Wednesday evening.  In the same holistic vein, the incognito search brought up an ad for a book on herbal antibiotics and four people were shown ads for essential oils. There’s no evidence that herbal remedies or vitamin boosters can prevent or cure coronavirus. In February, the World Health Organization said it was concerned that Amazon search results for “coronavirus” showed vitamin C boosters. In response, Amazon said it removed more than one million products that falsely claimed to prevent coronavirus. Of the twelve searches seen by Quartz, five also featured a book, Warfare Prayers Against The Coronavirus, which states that prayer will end coronavirus, on the first page of results. The summary reads: “Prayers when prayed with FAITH and TENACITY will prevent you from contracting the Coronavirus and prayers that will manifest healing in the bodies of those that have already contracted the Coronavirus.” Nine searches included a book by Tom Kawczynski, who was fired as a town manager for white-separatist remarks. A free excerpt stated the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the World Health Organization will “continuously and deliberately present the most conservative estimations about the impact of the disease.” Kawczynski’s book is also no longer available. Among the many self-published books on the coronavirus, several contained questionable on the value of masks. Both Wuhan Coronavirus: A Concise & Rational Guide to the 2020 Outbreak (featured near the top of our search results) and DIY Coronavirus Mask: How to find true virus-filtering material from your local Wal-Mart when all the masks are gone, Kindle Edition (featured on seven search results) claimed that healthy people should wear face masks to prevent catching coronavirus. Currently, masks are recommended for infected patients to help prevent the spread of germs; “No recommendation can be made at this time for mask use in the community by asymptomatic persons, including those at high risk for complications, to prevent exposure to influenza viruses,” advises the CDC. Dr. Jenny Harris, deputy chief medical officer in the UK, warned UK Prime Minister Boris Johnson that people tend to contaminate masks and then wipe it over surfaces, which spreads contagion. “It’s not a good idea and doesn’t help,” she said.  The WHO has labelled the spread of false information online an “infodemic” and warned that misinformation was spreading faster than the virus. Amazon said it had removed several books that did not comply with its guidelines. “Amazon maintains content guidelines for the books it sells, and we continue to evaluate our catalog, listening to customer feedback. We have always required sellers, authors, and publishers to provide accurate information on product detail pages, and we remove those that violate our policies,” said an Amazon spokesperson. “In addition, at the top of relevant search results pages we are linking to CDC advice where customers can learn more about the virus and protective measures.” Our free, fast, and fun briefing on the global economy, delivered every weekday morning. ,
https://www.newsweek.com/conservative-pastor-claims-he-healed-viewers-coronavirus-through-their-tv-screens-1492044,Conservative televangelist Kenneth Copeland told viewers of his ministry's program that they were "healed" of the coronavirus disease as he prayed while asking them to touch their televisions screens to receive the spiritual healing. Copeland's bizarre message to his followers during a "special report" on his Victory channel, titled "Standing Against Coronavirus," was first reported by Right Wing Watch on Thursday. In a clip of his prayer, the Christian pastor reaches his outstretched hand toward the camera, asking viewers to draw close and touch their screens. "Thank you, Lord Jesus. He received your healing," the religious leader said in the video, bowing his head. "Now say it: I take it. I have it. It's mine. I thank you and praise you for it." He went on: "According to the word of God, I'm healed. And I consider not my own body. I consider not symptoms in my body. But only that which God has promised." Kenneth Copeland healed viewers of the coronavirus through their televisions last night. pic.twitter.com/8lwHufTIy4 At the end of his prayer, Copeland proclaimed, "Healed and well." The televangelist isn't the first Christian leader to offer an unusual cure for coronavirus to his Christian followers. Pastor Jim Bakker, who hosts The Jim Bakker Show, told his viewers on February 12 that they could purchase a product called Silver Solution from a so-called natural health expert he was interviewing. "This influenza that is now circling the globe, you're saying that Silver Solution would be effective?" Bakker asked. The guest, Sherrill Sellman, claimed that it would. "Well, let's say it hasn't been tested on this strain of the coronavirus, but it has been tested on other strains of the coronavirus and has been able to eliminate it within 12 hours," Sellman falsely claimed. "Totally eliminate it. Kills it. Deactivates it." She went on to say that the solution "has been proven by the government that it has the ability to kill every pathogen it has ever been tested on, including SARS and HIV." There is no scientific evidence to back up Sellman's claims. A message on the screen told viewers they could buy four 4-ounce bottles of Silver Solution for $80. The state of Missouri considers the false advertisement on Bakker's program to be illegal, NPR reported on Wednesday. The state filed a lawsuit this week to block Bakker and his ministry from promoting and selling the fake coronavirus treatment. Missouri's attorney general said Bakker and his ministry were "falsely promising to consumers that Silver Solution can cure, eliminate, kill or deactivate coronavirus and/or boost elderly consumers' immune system and help keep them healthy when there is, in fact, no vaccine, pill, potion or other product available to treat or cure coronavirus." The New York Attorney General's Office sent a letter to Bakker on March 3, warning him to stop peddling the fake cure. Globally, more than 127,000 people have been infected by coronavirus, according to a tracker by Johns Hopkins University. There have been more than 4,700 deaths, but more than 68,000 people have already recovered from the infection. Newsweek is committed to challenging conventional wisdom and finding connections in the search for common ground. Newsweek is committed to challenging conventional wisdom and finding connections in the search for common ground. Jason Lemon is a Weekend Editor at Newsweek based in Brooklyn, New York. Prior to taking on the editor role, Jason's reporting focused on U.S. politics and international affairs. He joined Newsweek in 2018, and had previously worked as a founding editor at a Middle Eastern media startup called StepFeed. He also worked a year as a contributor to The Atlanta Journal-Constitution and has bylines in The Christian Science Monitor, The Palm Beach Post, Al Fanar Media and A Magazine. He is a graduate of the American University of Beirut in Lebanon and Andrews University in Michigan. You can get in touch with Jason by emailing j.lemon@newsweek.com. Languages: English, Spanish, French and Levantine Arabic Jason Lemon is a Weekend Editor at Newsweek based in Brooklyn, New York. Prior to taking on the editor role, Jason's reporting focused on                                    ...
Read more
 To read how Newsweek uses AI as a newsroom tool, Click here. Newsletters in your inbox See all Company Editions: Contact Terms of Use © 2024 NEWSWEEK DIGITAL LLC,
https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/drinking-water-prevent-coronavirus/,About this rating  Inaccurate messages about the new coronavirus are spreading and mutating online. One frequently copied and pasted bit of text that has gone viral on Facebook, Twitter, and WhatsApp purports to impart "serious excellent advice" from "Japanese doctors treating COVID-19 cases." That "advice" asserts regular sips of water can prevent the coronavirus, which causes the COVID-19 disease, from entering the respiratory system: SERIOUS EXCELLENT ADVICE by Japanese doctors treating COVID-19 cases.  Everyone should ensure your mouth & throat is moist, never DRY. Take a few sips of water every 15 mins at least. WHY?  Even if the virus gets into your mouth … drinking water or other liquids will WASH them down through your oesophagus and into the stomach. Once there in tummy … your stomach ACID will kill all the virus. If you don’t drink enough water more regularly … the virus can enter your windpipes and into the LUNGS. That’s very dangerous. The "serious excellent advice by Japanese doctors" text is often combined with other viral coronavirus claims including a paragraph about a "self-check" attributed to “Taiwan experts,” and a set of recommendations that begins with a claim about differentiating between a cold and COVID-19. Snopes addressed the “Taiwan experts self-check” claim here and addressed the list of tips that begins with a dubious method of distinguishing a cold from COVID-19 here. This article deals only with the claim regarding sipping water every 15 minutes. It is true that COVID-19 infects the respiratory system by directly entering the body through the mouth or nose. This fact is central to both the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) and World Health Organization (WHO) recommendations to wash hands frequently and avoid touching your face. The assertion in this viral "advice," however, is that if the virus were already in your mouth, water would help wash it away. Though medical officials recommend drinking water during any infection, no evidence exists to support the notion that sipping water prevents a virus from infecting the respiratory system. Drinking more water, while good for your overall health, will not keep anyone from catching the coronavirus, according to Dr. William Schaffner, an infectious diseases expert at Vanderbilt University. Schaffner told The Associated Press, "We always caution anyone healthy and people who are sick to keep up fluid intake and keep mucus membranes moist." He also said: "It makes you feel better; there is no clear indication that it directly protects you against complications." Dr. Susan Wootton, an infectious disease expert at McGovern Medical School at UTHealth, agreed with that assessment, telling KHOU that no data exist to support the claim that sipping water will prevent infection by transporting it to the stomach. Because no evidence supports the claim, we rank the notion that sipping water regularly prevents COVID-19 infection as "False." Bollyy.com.   "Taiwan Experts Provide A Simple Self-Check That We Can Do Every Morning."
    4 March 2020. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.   "Basic Protective Measures Against the New Coronavirus."
    Accessed 11 March 2020. Dupuy, Beatrice.   "Drinking Water Won’t Prevent the Coronavirus."
    The Associated Press.   28 February 2020. Whitfield, Stephanie.   "VERIFY: Does Drinking Water Prevent the Spread of COVID-19?"
    KHOU.com.   10 March 2020. Alex Kasprak is an investigative journalist and science writer reporting on scientific misinformation, online fraud, and financial crime.  Company Navigate Sections Account © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc. This material may not be reproduced without permission. Snopes and the Snopes.com logo are registered service marks of Snopes.com,
https://www.npr.org/2020/03/11/814550474/missouri-sues-televangelist-jim-bakker-for-selling-fake-coronavirus-cure,Error fetching data,
https://qz.com/india/1813845/coronavirus-fake-news-rife-on-indian-facebook-whatsapp-twitter/,Fund next-gen business journalism with $10 a month Search Free Newsletters India has confirmed nearly 40 cases of the novel coronavirus till now. What’s fuelling a wave of fear across the country, though, is the usual avalanche of fake news on WhatsApp, Facebook and Twitter. So much so that prime minister Narendra Modi had to publicly appeal last weekend to stay away from rumours and follow doctors’ advice. Quartz looked at some of the most widespread claims shared on social media and spoke to experts to verify them. “The most common symptoms of Covid-19 are fever, tiredness, and dry cough. Some patients may have aches and pains, nasal congestion, runny nose, sore throat or diarrhoea,” explained Dr Basavaraj Kuntoji of Manipal Hospitals in Bengaluru. “These symptoms are usually mild and begin gradually. Some people become infected but don’t develop any of these symptoms.” Now, let’s talk about the rumours that are going viral. Garlic/hot water are effective protectors: No. While garlic possesses antimicrobial properties, there isn’t any scientific evidence to show that it prevents coronavirus. Same with hot water. “Our normal body temperature remains around 36.5°C to 37°C, regardless of the temperature of the hot water intake, bath or shower,” Dr Kuntoji said. Pneumonia vaccines/antibiotics help: No. “Vaccines against pneumonia, such as pneumococcal vaccine and Haemophilus influenza type B (Hib) vaccine do not provide protection against the coronavirus,” said Dr Anup Dhir, senior consultant at Delhi-based Apollo Hospital. Besides, antibiotics only work against bacterial infections. Affects only older people, kids are immune: No. Novel coronavirus can infect everyone, but the sick and elderly are more prone to developing complications due to their weaker immune systems. Masks help: They are effective only when combined with frequent hand-cleaning with alcohol-based hand rub or soap and water, doctors say. It must be noted that disposable face masks are not reusable. Heat kills the virus: Nobody is sure of that. “Coronavirus outbreak is largely reported from countries where the temperature is lower, but countries like India and Pakistan have also detected the Covid-19 cases,” said Dr Kuntoji. “Hence it is difficult to predict how this new virus is going to behave in the upcoming summer season in India.” Can it be cured? “Most people (about 80%) recover or get cured without special treatment. Around one out of every six who contract Covid-19 become seriously ill and develop difficulty breathing,” Dr Kuntoji said. “Older people, and those with underlying medical problems like high blood pressure, heart problems or diabetes are more likely to develop serious illnesses. People with fever, cough, and difficulty in breathing should seek medical attention immediately.” Our free, fast, and fun briefing on the global economy, delivered every weekday morning. ,
https://www.deccanherald.com/national/fact-check-weed-kills-coronavirus-vivek-agnihotri-shares-scientific-misinformation-via-meme-803236.html,Follow Us : On February 8, 2020, filmmaker Vivek Agnihotri tweeted a screenshot which says, ‘Breaking News: Weed kills coronavirus.’ Posting the image, which looks like a ‘news’ broadcast, Agnihotri made a case for legalising cannabis in India. “Cannabis is a magic plant. Till mid-80s it was sold by Govt. Because of Rajiv Gandhi and western Pharma companies it got bad name,” he wrote, ending his tweet with the following appeal: “Make cannabis legal.” A few others also claimed that cannabis kills coronavirus after Agnihotri’s tweet. Solution to a lot of world's problems lie in India. But you can't find them as long as you ridicule our ancient wisdom.Cannabis is a magic plant. Till 1980 it was sold by Govt. Becoz of Rajiv Gandhi & West Pharma Companies it got bad name.Make #Cannabis legal !!#CoronaVirus pic.twitter.com/ciDsFIwM9x Vivek Agnihotri shares meme as ‘news’ A simple reverse-image search revealed that the screenshot shared by Agnihotri does not correspond to a news broadcast but is a meme. It was created on the website en.dopl3r.com. The website gives users the option to select a meme temple, a category and add images and text. “No scientific evidence that cannabis kills coronavirus” Alt News Science editor Dr Sumaiya Sheikh weighed in on the claim that cannabis, commonly termed as ‘weed’ has antibiotic properties: “There is some ongoing research with natural fibre hemp plants (cannabis plant) to have cannabinoids that show some anti-bacterial activity. The research is ongoing for various biomedical applications. However, unlike bacteria which is a single-celled pathogen, viruses are even smaller pathogens that can have bacteria or other live cells such as human, animal and plant cells for growth and reproduction. There is no evidence that cannabis (hemp plants) can have any effect on coronavirus infections.” Hence, not only did Vivek Agnihotri share a meme as ‘news’, but he also circulated potentially dangerous misinformation that cannabis can kill coronavirus. Alt News Science has been dunking both scientific and generic misinformation surrounding the outbreak of coronavirus. You can read our reports here. (This article was first published on AltNews website and was reproduced here through special arrangement.) Deccan Herald is on WhatsApp Channels| Join now for Breaking News & Editor's Picks #Elections2024,
https://homeopathyonlinemd.com/homeopathic-treatment-of-coronavirus/,Novel Corona virus Wuhan Sea Food Market Pneumonia Virus is an enveloped positive sense, single strand, RNA Corona virus with a nucleoside of helical symmetry.HOMEOPATHIC TREATMENT OF CORONAVIRUS  Novel Corona Virus belongs to Realm Riboviria, Phylum Incertia Sedis, Order Nidoviralis, Family Corona Viridae, Genus Beta Corona virus, Sub genus Serbeco virus, Virus Wuhan Corona virus 2019.  It shows symptoms that of severe respiratory tract infection giving rise to pneumonia with some gastrointestinal symptoms like other virus infection, Its symptoms are much related to 2003 SARS Virus Epidemic . The group of medical experts recommended that the homeopathy drug Arsenicum Album 30 be recognized as a preventive drug against coronavirus infection. It recommended a dose of Arsenicum Album 30, which can be used 2 drops daily on an empty stomach for some days.  Read Also:Homeopathy Treatment of back pain News:The Indian AYUSH ministry on Wednesday issued a health advisory that Homeopathy medicine could be effective in prevention of novel coronavirus infection.  Why can’t nosodes such as Influenzinum, Oscillococcinum, or Chininum Arsenicum , Chinchona Officinalis be used as prophylactic? This website is for educational purpose only because every treatment should be under a qualified person .Homeopathy is totally based on sign and symptoms so remedies may differ in every person for the same disease.,
https://www.miaminewtimes.com/news/coronavirus-norwegian-cruise-line-leaked-emails-show-booking-strategy-11590056,By Alex DeLuca By Izzy Kapnick By Tom Finkel By Ryan Yousefi,
https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/hair-dryer-coronavirus/,About this rating   Viral misinformation about the COVID-19 coronavirus disease pandemic was rampant in mid-March 2020. One example was a video created by "futurologist" Dän Lee Dimke who claimed that sticking a blow dryer in your face or sitting in a sauna and breathing in hot air would kill the coronavirus. The information given by Dimke in the video is not just false, but potentially dangerous. If you believe you're infected with the virus, you should isolate yourself from other people and contact a medical professional. We asked Google, which owns YouTube, what measures are being taken to prevent the spread of misinformation during the ongoing pandemic. We received no response in time for publication, but the link to the video we sent was removed. That said, copies of the video, or videos that repeat the false claim, remain live on the platform as of this writing. Many of the videos contain the logo of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), potentially giving the false impression that the information was sourced from the government agency on the front lines of battling the disease.  No reputable medical professionals or institutions recommend people breathe hot air to kill the coronavirus. Contrary to what the video states, viruses don’t make you sick by congregating in your nasal cavities. They make you sick on a cellular level via mechanisms not easily stopped by something as simple as hot air. Because COVID-19 is caused by a new type of coronavirus, its danger is exacerbated by the fact that no therapeutic treatment has yet been developed, and no vaccine is yet available to prevent it. The CDC recommends that to protect yourself from infection, you should wash your hands frequently, avoid touching your face, and practice social distancing. Although Dimke describes himself as "Dr. Dan Lee Dimpke" in the viral video, Dimke is not a medical doctor. In a biography on his website, he claims to have a doctoral degree in education from Southwest University and a master's degree in business administration. His biography lists a number of unusual skills (jet helicopter pilot, for one) but doesn't describe any educational or professional experience that would qualify him to provide medical advice. Sharing misinformation during a pandemic could potentially have lethal consequences. COVID-19 is deadlier than the seasonal flu and in a matter of three months has spread globally. As residents of major U.S. cities were instructed to practice social distancing or in some situations shelter in place to help slow the spread of the coronavirus, COVID-19 has sickened and killed thousands worldwide. MedLinePlus.gov. "Viral Infections." Fink, Sheri. "Worst-Case Estimates for U.S. Coronavirus Deaths."
  The New York Times. 13 March 2020. CBS News. "Coronavirus Updates: Americans Told to Hunker Down as Death Toll Tops 100."
  17 March 2020. Bethania Palma is a journalist from the Los Angeles area who started her career as a daily newspaper reporter and has covered everything from crime to government to national politics. She has written for  ... read more Company Navigate Sections Account © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc. This material may not be reproduced without permission. Snopes and the Snopes.com logo are registered service marks of Snopes.com,
https://www.click2houston.com/health/2020/03/18/businesses-offering-coronavirus-services-popping-up-in-houston-but-consumers-need-to-be-careful/,WEATHER ALERT Mario Díaz, Reporter Published: March 17, 2020, 11:56 PM Updated: March 18, 2020, 6:02 AM Mario Díaz, Reporter HOUSTON – One of the financial impacts of the coronavirus according to Kevin Loria at Consumer Reports is scam companies and services. “It’s causing people to spend money on things they shouldn’t and in some cases it could be dangerous," Loria said. As for the "infodemic" that now exists regarding what can kill the virus? “Any time that you have a public health emergency like this, there are going to be scammers out there and certain product makers that are going to try to take advantage of the situation,” he said. Since the outbreak, the tech sector has taken action to remove misinformation and false advertising. Companies like Amazon, Google, Twitter and Facebook have gone on the offensive. “We’ve formed partnerships with organizations like the who, the world health organization,” Mark Zuckerberg said. But what actually works and what doesn't? Some local companies are pushing expensive approaches in the neighborhood of $6,000 to $8,000 for a 3,000 square-foot home. Protected Catastrophe Management and O2 Wizard of Texas are two companies that say they can eliminate coronavirus through ozone, created by their generators. PCM says they will professionally eradicate all pathogens including COVID-19. But the website also has an important disclaimer stating, “it is believed that the oxygenation process will be able to kill COVID-19." "I cannot say that this will kill COVID-19 because there haven’t been enough studies for them to even figure out the vaccine,” says Scott Moore, an operator with both companies. When KPRC 2 asked Moore why they are offering it if they can’t guarantee killing coronavirus, Moore said, “because I think it’s a better process for people to come into their homes and to know that before anybody comes inside and starts wiping down and cleaning, that we have done the very best thing that we think we can do to clear the environment.” When reminded it is what he thinks, not what is actually known, Moore said, “I completely agree with what you're saying." Dr. Jill Weatherhead, an Assistant Professor of tropical medicine and infectious diseases at Baylor College of Medicine, advises that people should go to EPA.gov for the products they say meet the criteria to fight coronavirus. “I want my patients to know that there is credible information out there and we should be looking to those experts,” Weatherhead said. The Federal Trade Commission has several suggestions to avoid being scammed. Copyright 2020 by KPRC Click2Houston - All rights reserved. Journalistic bulldog focused on accountability and how government is spending your dollars. Husband to Wonder Woman, father to a pitcher and two Cavapoos. Prefers queso over salsa.   email facebook twitter instagram Recommended Videos Cookie Preferences If you need help with the Public File, call (713) 778-4745. At KPRC, we are committed to informing and delighting our audience. In our commitment to covering our communities with innovation and excellence, we incorporate Artificial Intelligence (AI) technologies to enhance our news gathering, reporting, and presentation processes. Read our article to see how we are using Artificial Intelligence. Copyright © 2024 Click2Houston.com is managed by Graham Digital and published by Graham Media Group, a division of Graham Holdings.,
https://www.bbc.com/news/51929628,,
https://www.bbc.com/news/world-51735367,,
https://www.thedailybeast.com/a-white-nationalist-has-rebranded-himself-as-coronavirus-expert-and-people-are-flocking-to-him,SEARCH Tom Kawcyznski has one of the most popular podcasts on the Apple “Health & Fitness” charts right now. He also has advocated for a nearly all-white monarchy in New England. Politics Reporter At first glance, Maine resident Tom Kawcyznski seems like just another person talking about the coronavirus pandemic. His daily “Coronavirus Central” podcast has consistently been in the top 20 podcasts on the Apple charts for “Health & Fitness,” and at one point earlier this month it hit the fifth spot in the category.  But anxious listeners flocking to Kawcyznski’s podcast for more information about the disease’s spread may not be aware of his background. Before he rebranded himself as a coronavirus expert, Kawcyznski was a notorious white nationalist advocating for a nearly all-white monarchy in New England—with himself as its king.  Kawcyznski’s surprising reinvention and his success on podcast apps demonstrate the degrees to which concerned Americans are turning to anyone on the internet for coronavirus information, without much consideration of the source. As rumors about coronavirus and the government’s response circulate via text message and hoax cures proliferate online, extremist figures like Kawcyznski have seen an opening of their own.   “I think the coronavirus is creating a brand new world,” Kawcyznski told The Daily Beast, when asked about his new role as a would-be coronavirus expert.  Kawcyznski advocates for the creation of the “Arboreal Kingdom of New Albion,” a currently fictional, 95-percent white monarchy he imagines cobbling out of parts of Canada and New England after social collapse. The Southern Poverty Law Center lists his New Albion group as a white nationalist hate group.  In 2018, Kawcyznski was fired from his job as the town manager of Jackman, Maine, after the discovery of his posts on fringe social network Gab. In the posts on his now-private account, Kawcyznski wrote that “the average black in America has less intellectual aptitude” and advised white supremacists on how to recast their message in more appealing terms.  “I’m putting a happy face on #AltRight thinking that brings normies in,” Kawcyznski wrote in 2017. Now Kawcyznski has brought the same apocalyptic thinking that turned him into a figure on the racist right to worried coronavirus podcast listeners. He’s built an entire coronavirus media empire in the space of two months, including a coronavirus prep book he’s selling on Amazon that promises to help people prepare for the disease “on any budget.”  By publishing a hastily written book on Amazon about the coronavirus, Kawcyznski joined a flood of dubious experts self-publishing coronavirus books on the internet retail giant. In Kawcyznski’s book, which he initially published under a pseudonym, he doesn’t discuss his background in the white nationalist movement. He also promotes conspiracy theorists like frequent InfoWars guest Mike Adams as reliable sources of information on the disease and envisions a world of societal collapse brought on by the coronavirus, writing that  “toilet paper will be more valuable than dollars.” Kawcyznski’s podcast has drawn more people to him since he started it in February, as cases started to appear in the United States. A Vulture review of coronavirus-related podcasts called the show a “spitting image of caricatures about crackpots and charlatans who vie for attention during crises.” But it also noted that his podcast ranks highly in searches on podcast apps for “coronavirus.” Kawcyznski claims his daily podcasts, which range from between an hour to two-and-a-half hours, each receive roughly 20,000 listens. It’s impossible to independently verify podcast listenership. In his episodes, Kawcyznski positions himself as a sort of guru of the coronavirus era, urging in a Tuesday episode to “refocus your life around the virus.”  “Stop worrying about what comes after the virus so much, and worry about how you’re going to survive it,” Kawcyznski said in one.  Kawcyznski has also used the coronavirus to gather a community of adherents around himself online. In a chat group on Telegram, an encrypted messaging app popular with extremist right-wing personalities, Coronavirus Central has amassed more than 1,400 members.  Kawcyznski claims it’s not fair to describe him as a white nationalist, even as he advocates for the creation of a majority-white splinter nation. But as recently as January, Kawcyznski went on a podcast hosted by Chris Cantwell, the neo-Nazi who became infamous in the 2017 Charlottesville “Unite the Right” white supremacist rally as the “crying Nazi.” Kawcyznski presented Cantwell with a fictional flag for New Albion, describing it as a “blood flag”—a reference to a swastika flag used by Adolf Hitler. “It’s a sign of my respect to you,” Kawcyznski said, as he handed Cantwell the flag. Later that month, Cantwell was arrested on federal interstate threat charges. Kawcyznski, who says he maxed out his credit cards in an attempt to prepare for the coronavirus, has positioned himself for a rebranding in the coronavirus era. In an apparent attempt to distance himself from his white nationalist comments, Kawcyznski said he doesn’t “really get into politics” when discussing the coronavirus. “I hope people take their opportunities to approach this world with open minds and open hearts,” he said.  Politics Reporter Got a tip? Send it to The Daily Beast here.,
https://nccih.nih.gov/health/in-the-news-in-the-news-coronavirus-and-alternative-treatments,An official website of the United States government Here’s how you know Last Updated: June 2022 Coronaviruses are a large family of viruses that usually cause mild to moderate upper-respiratory tract illnesses in people. However, three coronaviruses have caused more serious human disease. One causes severe acute respiratory syndrome (SARS); another causes Middle East respiratory syndrome (MERS); and the third causes COVID-19. The virus that causes COVID-19 is called SARS-CoV-2. Some people have sought “alternative” remedies to prevent or to treat COVID-19. Some of these purported remedies include teas, essential oils, tinctures, herbal therapies such as oleander/oleandrin, and silver products such as colloidal silver. The Office of Dietary Supplements at the National Institutes of Health (NIH) has detailed fact sheets for consumers (in English and Spanish) and health professionals about specific dietary supplements and COVID-19. But there is no scientific evidence that any of these alternative remedies can prevent or cure COVID-19. In fact, some of them may not be safe to consume. It’s important to understand that although many herbal or dietary supplements (and some prescription drugs) come from natural sources, “natural” does not always mean that a product is a safer or better option for your health. For tips on how to find accurate, reliable information about health, visit our Know the Science resources. Most people with COVID-19 have mild illness and can recover at home. If you are worried about your symptoms, the Coronavirus Self-Checker can assist in the decision to seek care. COVID-19 vaccination helps protect people from getting sick or severely ill with COVID-19, but some people who are fully vaccinated still get COVID-19, and some have been hospitalized with COVID-19. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) and the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) have information on the vaccines that are approved and authorized in the United States to prevent COVID-19. Visit the CDC website for more information on vaccination and other steps you can take to protect yourself and others from COVID-19.  For people who are more likely to get very sick from COVID-19 infection, treatments are available that can reduce the chances of being hospitalized or dying from the disease.  Medications to treat COVID-19 must be prescribed by a health care provider and started as soon as possible after diagnosis to be effective. For people at high risk of getting very sick from COVID-19, contact a health care provider right away to determine if you are eligible for treatment, even if your symptoms are mild.   Researchers are studying additional drugs as possible treatments for COVID-19. NIH is supporting many clinical trials to test possible treatments. The FDA has also authorized emergency use of a preventive medicine to help prevent COVID-19 infection in certain adults and children 12 years of age and older (such as those who are severely immunocompromised or allergic to COVID-19 vaccines). More Resources For more information about what everyone can do to prevent the spread of COVID-19 in the United States, visit CDC’s COVID-19 webpage. For more information on NIH research on COVID-19, visit NIH’s COVID-19 webpage. You can find SARS-CoV-2 literature, sequence, and clinical content from the National Center for Biotechnology Information, National Library of Medicine. You can also subscribe to receive coronavirus updates from NIH. En Español Director’s Message on COVID-19 Dietary Supplements in the Time of COVID-19 (ODS) Colloidal Silver Follow NCCIH: Contact Us NCCIH Home National Institutes of Health U.S. Department of Health & Human Services USA.gov 9000 Rockville Pike Bethesda, Maryland 20892 Privacy and Policies Accessibility FOIA Vulnerability Disclosure en Español Site Map Archive NIH...Turning Discovery Into Health® Site Last Updated: May 7, 2024 Follow NCCIH: Contact Us Privacy and Policies Accessibility FOIA Vulnerability Disclosure en Español Site Map Archive NCCIH Home National Institutes of Health U.S. Department of Health & Human Services USA.gov 9000 Rockville Pike Bethesda, Maryland 20892 NIH...Turning Discovery Into Health® Site Last Updated: ,
https://sundiatapost.com/facebook-has-a-coronavirus-problem-its-whatsapp/,Governments and medical officials are scrambling to provide the public with accurate and timely information about the novel coronavirus. But those efforts are being undermined by the spread of medical misinformation and fake cures on one of the world’s most popular messaging platforms. WhatsApp, which is owned by Facebook (FB), is coming under renewed scrutiny over how it handles misinformation as the coronavirus pandemic rampages across the globe, infecting more than 200,000 people and killing over 8,000, according to figures compiled by Johns Hopkins University. The platform is being used to spread messages that often contain a mixture of accurate and misleading claims that have been debunked by medical experts. The problem is now so acute that world leaders are urging people to stop sharing unverified information using the app. “I am urging everyone to please stop sharing unverified info on WhatsApp groups,” Irish Prime Minister Leo Varadkar said Monday on Twitter. “These messages are scaring and confusing people and causing real damage. Please get your info from official, trusted sources.” The misinformation often arrives on smartphones in messages that have been forwarded by a friend or relative, and includes information purportedly from a prominent doctor or a friend of a friend who works in government. Many of the messages mix sound advice, such as how to wash your hands properly, with misinformation. One false claim that is circulating: drinking warm water every 15 minutes will neutralize the coronavirus. Because WhatsApp messages are encrypted in a way that allows them to be seen only by the sender and recipient, public health officials and watchdog groups are struggling to track the spread of coronavirus misinformation. WhatsApp itself does not monitor the flow of messages on the platform. “It is clear … that a lot of false information continues to appear in the public sphere. In particular, we need to understand better the risks related to communication on end-to-end encryption services,” European Commission Vice President Věra Jourová, who oversees the bloc’s efforts to fight disinformation, said in a statement Tuesday. WhatsApp says it has taken steps to curb misinformation, it is donating to fact checking groups and users can forward messages to special accounts that can verify information. “There are over a dozen [local fact checkers] so far, and we want more to be able to do their important work so rumors are identified and countered,” Will Cathcart, the head of WhatsApp, said Wednesday on Twitter. WhatsApp is promoting the fact checking organizations and health ministries on Facebook, with free and special clickable ads that pull up a new WhatsApp chat with the corresponding organization. Jourová welcomed the new measures but suggested more needs to be done to address the issue of misinformation. “WhatsApp has informed the Commission about some measures it put in place to limit the spread of disinformation, but most of the problematic content seems to be the so-called organic content, i.e. generated by users themselves,” she said. Misinformation spreads In recent days, CNN Business has seen multiple versions of a message with information purportedly from medical professionals concerning four young people infected with coronavirus who had been taking anti inflammatory drugs. In one version, written in English, the young people are hospitalized in Cork, Ireland. In another, written in Hebrew, they are in Toulouse, France. Medical officials in both cities have dismissed the story of the four young people as fake. (For more on anti inflammatory drugs and coronavirus, click here.) One popular — but incorrect — theme is that “hot fluids neutralize the virus, so avoid drinking ice water,” or that drinking water every 15 to 20 minutes will flush the virus to your stomach where it will be killed by acid. An image spread on WhatsApp and other platforms shows an illustration of a human head and throat. The accompanying message, written in Spanish, claims that drinking a lot of water and gargling with salt or vinegar will eliminate the virus. “Spread this information because you could save someone,” it says. Medical experts and the World Health Organization say that while staying hydrated is important, drinking hot or cold water, or gargling, does not prevent the coronavirus infection. Other messages sent on WhatsApp have warned that countries will go on lockdown and that people need to stock up on supplies. In the United States, the messages claim the lockdown is part of the “Stafford Act” and that people should “stock up on whatever you guys need to make sure you have a two week supply of everything.” The US National Security Council tweeted that this message is fake. While similar messages are being shared via text and on other social media, their proliferation on WhatsApp and the difficulty in stopping them makes the service an outlier compared to sister platforms Facebook and Instagram, which have taken more robust and direct efforts to combat coronavirus misinformation. (All three platforms are owned by Facebook.) How to stop the spread WhatsApp, which compares itself to traditional SMS text services instead of social media platforms, encrypts conversations, meaning they only live on users’ phones. Though encryption is seen as a plus for security, WhatsApp is blind to what’s being said in messages — and that makes it difficult to police or moderate content. On Facebook, third party fact checkers hunt down misinformation, and when they mark something as false, users are shown a message that directs them to a correcting or clarifying post before they are permitted to share the misinformation. Cristina Tardáguila, associate director of the International Fact-Checking Network (IFCN), suggested last week that WhatsApp could include a message asking people “are you sure this is true?” before they send a message related to coronavirus. But Carl Woog, a WhatsApp spokesperson, told CNN Business that it’s not something the platform would be able to do because WhatsApp is encrypted, and that “passing remote judgment on deciding what can be sent and not be sent in a real time message would be unprecedented” for a text or SMS service. Aviv Ovadya, founder of the Thoughtful Technology Project, pointed out on Twitter that WhatsApp has developed prompts for when users are sent suspicious website links. But the misinformation about the coronavirus shared on WhatsApp is often in plain text form. WhatsApp has made efforts to assist health officials in getting accurate information to the public. On Wednesday, the company announced it had donated $1 million to the IFCN, launched a coronavirus information page and said it would help organizations like the WHO and UNICEF provide messaging hotlines for people around the world. Health ministries in countries such as Israel, Singapore, South Africa and Indonesia are already providing updates directly on WhatsApp, through automated accounts. Last year, WhatsApp imposed limits on how many times a message could be forwarded, after viral hoax messages in India contributed to more than a dozen lynchings in 2018. Users can now only forward one message to five chats, and group sizes are limited to 256 members. Woog said these measures have decreased forwards on the service by 25%. Ultimately experts say some of the best ways to counter misinformation are public education, teaching people about the coronavirus and how to be smart consumers of information. But when asked whether WhatsApp would consider sending a mass message to all users, urging them to seek accurate information from official sources, Woog said it’s not something they’re technically able or planning to do. “We believe the most important thing we can do is to empower health ministries and doctors to engage with citizens and patients right on WhatsApp,” said Woog. CNN Business           
             
                Powered by AMPforWP
            ,
https://www.cbc.ca/news/canada/sudbury/timmins-scammers-debunked-1.5504514,Reports of door-to-door salesmen selling coronavirus testing services are untrue, Timmins police say. The reports started circulating through social media, Marc Depatie, communications coordinator with Timmins Police Service said.  These posts claimed that scammers were going door-to-door posing as technicians testing for the presence of coronavirus. "These reports are fictitious and baseless as no such reports have been made to the Timmins Police Service," Depatie said in a release. The people who allegedly began circulating the posts were contacted by police, Depatie said, who found that "no such contact for the purpose described" actually occurred. Police are cautioning people to carefully scrutinize stories circulating on social media.  "On occasion, social media posts can be rife with misinformation meant to mislead the recipient and entertain the author," Depatie said Timmins police would have put out a warning to the public if the stories were valid, police added. Audience Relations, CBC P.O. Box 500 Station A Toronto, ON  Canada, M5W 1E6  Toll-free (Canada only):  1-866-306-4636 It is a priority for CBC to create products that are accessible to all in Canada including people with visual, hearing, motor and cognitive challenges. Closed Captioning and Described Video is available for many CBC shows offered on CBC Gem. ,
https://www.brisbanetimes.com.au/business/companies/the-other-viral-problem-in-the-covid-19-pandemic-online-misinformation-20200318-p54bd3.html,We’re sorry, this feature is currently unavailable. We’re working to restore it. Please try again later. This was published 4 years ago By Zoe Samios Add articles to your saved list and come back to them any time. Ensure your mouth and throat are always moist. Stomach acid can kill coronavirus. It's just the flu. China created COVID-19 as a biological weapon. At least 60 per cent of the population needs to be exposed to build up "necessary resistance" to the virus. All of these claims are inaccurate or unfounded but have quickly spread across the modern information landscape. They've been shared on social media, in some cases by well-known media personalities and politicians, and forwarded in WhatsApp messages to countless Australians. As the coronavirus pandemic spreads, so does viral misinformation. As personal hygiene becomes an imperative, experts warn information hygiene is almost as important. The world may be battling two outbreaks; one of viral disease and one of viral misinformation.Credit: Bloomberg The public is facing information overload, making it hard to distinguish between what is fact and what isn't. Social media users will often hit post or retweet a lot of what they see and agree with, without fact checking it. Fake news is not new. But in the midst of a pandemic, it is particularly dangerous. A 2019 study by Caroline Fisher, the deputy director of the University of Canberra's News & Media Research Centre, which surveyed 2010 Australians, found only 36 per cent checked information they found online against other sources. "The problem is we have a really bad record of checking things," Ms Fisher explains. "Last year, we asked people about whether or not they engaged in fact-checking behaviours ... most people share stories [even if they think they're dubious]. They don’t go and check with other sources of information. Very few people — only 30 per cent of people — check one story against other sources." Last Wednesday, Prime Minister Scott Morrison urged Australians to stop believing unverified content circulated on the internet and through text messages, after an online post that claimed to be based on information from an Australian government cabinet briefing said the country would be locked down by later this month. The post was a direct copy of a Malaysian government announcement. "There's a lot of ridiculous stuff that's circulating on text messages and the internet about lockdowns, and sadly, even cases of wilful fraud and fraudulent preparation of documents — even recordings alleging to represent cabinet meetings and things of this nature," Mr Morrison said. "Don't believe it — it's rubbish." The viral hoax message on coronavirus is a copy of Malaysia's announcement.  Australian academics warn that increased use of social media combined with higher volumes of news content are causing misinformation and panic to spread more rapidly. For example, a graph created by Andreas Backhaus, a research fellow at Brussels-based think tank CEPS to help explain why coronavirus-related deaths were so high in Italy, spread rapidly across the internet without attribution last week. The graph was quickly contested with some sceptics asking whether it was from an authoritative source. Others pointed out that commentary in tweets accompanying the graph was incorrect such as the false claim Italy is solely testing people with symptoms (high-profile ABC medical commentator Norman Swan was among those who retweeted this misinformation). Monash University's Dr Carlo Kopp, who has been researching fake news since the 1990s, says the pandemic has created ideal conditions for the spread of misinformation, a problem amplified by more people working from home or being isolated. "We are seeing several nation state actors spreading conspiracy theories about the origin of the virus, we are seeing speculation being presented as fact by parties in parts of the mass media and social media, there has been a deluge of de facto and actual scams promoting false cures for the disease, sometimes intended to sell useless products, or promote dubious agendas, and in some nations, to distract the public from government bungling," Mr Kopp says. "The problem is compounded by increasing numbers of nations going into lockdown, with anxious citizens sitting at home spending time browsing the web or engaging on social media while off work. This has potential to become the proverbial 'perfect storm' of fake news propagation." Misinformation related to the coronavirus pandemic has been circulating social media since January. Earlier this year, Communications Minister Paul Fletcher urged Australians to remain sceptical of what they read online, after NSW Health issued a public statement about a false post that urged people not to consume certain foods or visit locations in Sydney. There's also conspiracy theories — the US and China have separately been accused of creating COVID-19 as a bio-weapon. And then there's countless emails and WhatsApp messages which are not based in fact. Ms Fisher says the spread is being caused by the "reflexive" nature of social media. "The reason why it is being spread so quickly is because it is an emotional response, people are not thinking," she says. "Everyone is scared, so there’s that panic. The virality of social media amplifies and facilitates that.” "At the moment, there is no break between your adrenaline kicking in and you pressing share. It's this immediate reflex." A lack of clarity from authoritative sources like the federal government can also generate more confusion and panic. ABC chair Ita Buttrose recently complained mixed messaging from the Morrison government and state leaders over the dangers of coronavirus had confused the public. She's not the only person to make this point. But it's not just the government causing confusion. Two weeks ago, Dr Swan, who has accumulated a large following because of his prominent role at the public broadcaster, argued the government should shut down schools. But on his new podcast, Coronacast, last week, he was urging children to be in school. 2GB's Alan Jones, one of the most powerful radio broadcasters in the country, insisted most people would get a "mild illness". And on Fox Footy, Eddie McGuire suggested the warmer weather could slow the virus' spread and that it is "just the flu". Australia's Chief Medical Officer, Professor Brendan Murphy, said it was important non-medical experts did not give medical advice to the public. It is a call backed by peak bodies such as the Public Health Association Australia which wrote to members last Wednesday asking them to reinforce the advice of Professor Murphy and his state-based colleagues. Ms Fisher warns the media industry can play a part in misleading the public and causing panic. "This type of event ... it is the perfect news story. It ticks all of the boxes of prominent news values on conflict, fear, drama," Ms Fisher says. "What we need at a time like this is for journalism to be constructive, service journalism and not sensational clickbait. We need the news media to be providing accurate news information that is not increasing alarm in the community." Social media platforms like Facebook and Twitter are working to fact-check articles and posts on their platforms to improve the situation. A joint statement from Microsoft, Facebook, Google, LinkedIn, Reddit, Twitter and YouTube earlier this week said the companies were working together on responses to the pandemic. Facebook uses fact-checkers to help remove misleading content and is working with global and regional health organisations to push out authoritative content for consumers. But it faced a glitch last Wednesday when a bug in its software caused user posts of news and information to be blocked as spam. Twitter is similarly trying to direct people to more accurate information. If users search coronavirus or COVID-19, a prompt at the top of the screen urges them to "know the facts", directing them to authoritative sites such as the Australian Department of Health. But Mr Kopp says consumers will still cling to a false belief if they become convinced it is true, regardless of whether it is from an authoritative source. "Epidemiologists use the case study of 'Typhoid Mary' to explain infection spreading by an asymptomatic patient," he says. "A similar problem is seen in social and mass media, when an individual becomes convinced a falsehood is true, as they will usually cling to that false belief despite contrary evidence, and continue to spread it." Copyright © 2024,
https://www.indiatoday.in/fact-check/story/fact-check-no-clapping-together-at-5-pm-during-janta-curfew-will-not-kill-coronavirus-1658438-2020-03-22,Listen to Story There is no proven evidence that vibration created by collectively clapping can destroy coronavirus.

 Prime Minister Narendra Modi’s Janta Curfew initiative on Sunday and his appeal to everyone clap at 5 pm to show gratitude to the helpers and medical practitioners who are working relentlessly to fight coronavirus has now become the target of misinformation on social media. Claim Several people on social media have come out with various theories and claimed that clapping together at 5 pm would make such a "vibration" in the atmosphere that coronavirus will be destroyed. This message is being forwarded on WhatsApp and other social messaging apps. The viral message reads The 5 pm clapping Modi asked us to do is extremely interesting. At that time the moon is passing to a new 'nakshatra' called Revati. The playing of bells and clapping: The cumulative vibration will encourage blood circulation in the body. It's the reason they used to have huge, gong-like bells in old Shakti temples on the mountains. Someone very knowledgeable is guiding Modi about this. Hope it works. 22nd March is Amavasya, darkest day in a month. All virus, bacteria and evil forces have maximum potential and power on such days. 5 PM clapping, shankh nada etc by 130 crore people at the same time will create so many vibrations that virus will lose all potency. Must for everyone. Many users like Renuka Jain have forwarded this message believing that the collective clapping at 5 pm would destroy the coronavirus. The 5pm clapping modi asked us to do is extremely interesting.
At that time Moon is passing to a new 'nakshatra' called Revati.
The playing of bells and clapping: The cumulative vibration will encourage blood circulation in the body. .
 #RenukaJain (@RenukaJain6) March 21, 2020 Fact AFWA found this viral claim to be misleading. There is no proven scientific evidence that vibrations created by collectively clapping can destroy coronavirus. PIB Factcheck created for debunking misinformation related to government policies has tweeted saying that The vibration generated by clapping together will NOT destroy coronavirus infection. NO ! The vibration generated by clapping together will NOT destroy #Coronavirus infection#PIBFactCheck: The #JantaCurfew clapping initiative at 5pm is to express gratitude towards the Emergency staff working selflessly to counter #coronavirusinindia #Covid19India pic.twitter.com/WHfK4guxys
 PIB Fact Check (@PIBFactCheck) March 22, 2020 Prime Minister Modi has taken this initiative of clapping at 5 pm only to appreciate the emergency staff who are working selflessly to tackle coronavirus.,
https://www.theguardian.com/world/2020/jan/31/bat-soup-dodgy-cures-and-diseasology-the-spread-of-coronavirus-bunkum,From fake alerts over no-go suburbs to pro-Trump conspiracy theories, crackpot stories and dangerous advice have gone viral Fake news and conspiracy theories about the origin of the coronavirus have swiftly followed the outbreak around the world. The quick spread of the virus from its origins in China’s Hubei province, and the lack of early detail about where it comes from or how to treat it, has provided ample room for speculation. One week after the city of Wuhan was placed under effective lockdown, the tide of misinformation is so high that Twitter, Facebook, and Google are struggling to cope. On Friday, after the WHO declared the outbreak a global health emergency, Facebook said it would “remove content with false claims or conspiracy theories that have been flagged by leading global health organisations and local health authorities that could cause harm to people who believe them”. On Thursday, Twitter announced it would “adjust search prompt in key countries across the globe to feature authoritative health sources when you search for terms related to novel #coronavirus.” Here are some of the examples of misinformation spreading around the world. The biggest piece of misinformation about the cause of the virus is the widely circulated video of a woman eating a bat. It has been spread by the Daily Mail, RT and far-right YouTuber Paul Joseph Watson among others. The Chinese celebrity Wang Mengyun said she has received death threats since the video went viral this month. The origins of the coronavirus are believed to have been from illegally sold wildlife at a seafood market in Wuhan, and bats could potentially have been the source, but the video was not filmed in a Wuhan restaurant as some had claimed, but in Palau, Micronesia, for a travel video in 2016. Proponents of the QAnon conspiracy theory, such as Jordan Sather, have been spreading the idea that the outbreak of the coronavirus was timed to coincide with the start of Donald Trump’s impeachment trial. Sather claimed in a thread posted to his 100,000 followers that the disease was planned and manufactured. He pointed to a coronavirus patent granted to a firm with ties to the Bill & Melinda Gates foundation. The firm, Pirbright, had to issue a statement correcting misinformation. The firm said it researches infectious bronchitis virus, a coronavirus that infects poultry and pigs – not humans. The Washington Times claimed in a story that the coronavirus outbreak could be linked to the Wuhan Institute of Virology, quoting a former Israeli military intelligence officer who claimed a bioweapon was one possible option. Other conspiracy theories have suggested the virus was smuggled out of Canada into China. The Washington Post, however, spoke to a number of experts who said based on the virus genome there is no indication it was engineered. The MIT professor Vipin Narang said in a tweet that there is no evidence it is a bioweapon, and if it were, it would be a bad one, because a good bioweapon should be more deadly but not as easily spread. These days 5G is blamed for everything, from cancer to bushfires, so it is not surprising that conspiracy theories that 5G caused, or helped spread coronavirus have been shared into the anti-5G groups on Facebook. One post debunked on Facebook claimed Wuhan was where 5G was first rolled out, and 5G “wrecked immune systems and thereby boosted the virulency of the normal cold”. Wuhan was one of a few places where 5G was rolled out in China in 2020, along with other parts of the world. There is no evidence that 5G weakens immune systems or is harmful to humans. Prominent anti-vaxxers and natural medicine groups have been sharing posts suggesting oregano oil, vitamin C, and salt water are either good ways to prevent coronavirus or cure it. They will not. One of the more dangerous remedies again comes from prominent QAnon conspiracy followers, with Daily Beast reporting the pro-Trump conspiracy theorists have told people to buy their “miracle mineral solution” that is supposed to cure everything, including autism or HIV/AIDS. The Food and Drug Administration has said the solution is “a dangerous bleach”. There have been various viral posts on social media all trying to appear to be an official health-related update about what people should do to try to prevent them from getting in contact with the coronavirus. One of the most prominent spread in Australia, via childcare centres, is an apparent “urgent notice” from the “Department of Diseasology Parramatta”. and these child care centres in Wentworthville and Wiley Park pic.twitter.com/dJNdjj1Hw2 This non-existent department warned of food that could be contaminated including wuxhang rice, fortune cookies, migoreng noodles, Yakult, and Chinese Red Bull. The New South Wales health department was forced to issue a statement stating there was no such entity as the Department of Diseasology Parramatta. “NSW Health would like to assure the community that the locations mentioned in this post pose no risk to visitors, and there have been no ‘positive readings’ at train stations.” Another warning spread on social media claims to come from Queensland Health and warns people to stay away from certain suburbs in Brisbane and any populated areas that have a certain proportion of Chinese residents. The Brisbane MP Duncan Pegg tweeted that the warning was fake and designed to malign the community.,
https://www.thedailybeast.com/qanon-conspiracy-theorists-magic-cure-for-coronavirus-is-drinking-lethal-bleach,SEARCH Hucksters swarmed on a fresh opportunity to cash in from a crisis that speaks to paranoid fears on the fringe. Politics Reporter As the global death toll from an alarming new coronavirus surged this week, promoters of the pro-Trump QAnon conspiracy theory were urging their fans to ward off the illness by purchasing and drinking dangerous bleach. The substance—dubbed “Miracle Mineral Solution” or “MMS”—has long been promoted by fringe groups as a combination miracle cure and vaccine for everything from autism to cancer and HIV/AIDS. The Food and Drug Administration has repeatedly warned consumers not to drink MMS, last year calling it effectively a “dangerous bleach” that could cause “severe vomiting” and “acute liver failure.” But those warnings haven’t stopped QAnon devotees—who believe in a world where Donald Trump is at war with shadowy deep-state “cabal”—from promoting a lethal substance as a salve for a health crisis that speaks to the darkest recesses of fringe thought. “I’m going to have to get home, and MMS the whole state,” prominent QAnon promoter Jordan Sather told his audience in a recent video. “MMS the whole shit out of everything.”  “Chief Police 2,” a prominent anonymous QAnon account on Twitter, also pushed MMS as the coronavirus spread. On Friday, the account’s operator urged its nearly 18,000 followers to buy “20-20-20 spray,” an MMS concoction. “New followers protect yourself with the 20-20-20 spray,” the tweet read.  QAnon, a conspiracy theory reminiscent of Pizzagate that started with a series of online posts in October 2017 from an anonymous figure called “Q,” imagines a world where Donald Trump is engaged in a secret war with a cabal of pedophile-cannibals in the Democratic Party, the finance industry, Hollywood, and the “deep state.”  Despite or perhaps in part because of such outlandish ideas, the theory has taken root with a segment of Trump’s base, with QAnon believers regularly appearing at the president’s campaign rallies. Trump has also routinely retweeted QAnon content, even though apparent devotees have been charged with murder and linked to other violent incidents.  Coronavirus’ spread was a perfect fit for QAnon conspiracy theorists and others on the fringe right, who have already adopted the idea that the disease has been manufactured by shadowy forces. Sather, for example, has cited a 2015 patent for a potential avian coronavirus vaccine to suggest that the human form of the disease was deliberately created. Conspiracy-theory hub Infowars, meanwhile, has promoted the false idea that Microsoft billionaire Bill Gates’ philanthropic efforts are just a cover for a “depopulation agenda” centered on the virus.  “In the conspiracy-theory community, Bill Gates is seen as this sort of budding eugenicist,” Mike Rothschild, a journalist who tracks the QAnon movement, told The Daily Beast. While conspiracy theorists may disagree about what cabal is behind coronavirus, many of them agree on the “cure”: MMS. The substance, which becomes bleaching agent chlorine dioxide when combined with a citric acid like lime juice, has perhaps most prominently been promoted by a website linked to Jim Humble, a self-proclaimed archbishop who says he found MMS while on a gold-mining expedition in South America.  Through a Mexico-based church, the “Genesis II Church of Health and Healing,” MMS is offered for sale for $45. The church’s website claims it will eliminate coronavirus, among other ailments. “ALL KITS HAVE THE 20-20-20 ESSENTIALS THAT CAN KILL THE CORONAVIRUS, OR ANY OTHER VIRUS JUST SPRAY YOUR MOUTH TWICE A DAY,” the church’s website reads. Humble didn’t respond to a request for comment.  Despite the obvious dangers of consuming bleach, MMS has also been embraced by a wider non-QAnon fringe eager for various miracle cures. On Facebook, for example, mothers desperate for a cure for autism promote the baseless idea that MMS will cure the disorder.    Rothschild said QAnon personalities promote MMS in the same way that other right-wing figures sell vitamin supplements.  “It’s lucrative,” he said. “You can sell this stuff to people and make a mint off of it.” In August, the FDA said it was “not aware of any scientific evidence” that MMS has medical properties. In 2009, a woman who took MMS to avoid contracting malaria died almost immediately after swallowing it for the first time.  “Ingesting these products is the same as drinking bleach,” FDA Acting Commissioner Ned Sharpless said in an August 2019 statement.  Meanwhile, more than 2,700 cases of coronavirus had been confirmed as of Monday, while the United States told travelers to “reconsider” Chinese travel. Despite the dangers associated with MMS, and despite the IRL consequences of the coronavirus outbreak coming into sharper focus, new Twitter accounts continued to pop up pushing MMS as the disease spread. One tweet advocated a bizarre anti-coronavirus regimen of MMS bleach and colloidal silver, a substance known to give people who take it a bluish tint to their skin.  Coronavirus is just the latest disease to be used to sell MMS, according to Rothschild. There was no reason to believe it would be the last. “I don’t understand how people who promote this stuff can sleep at night,” he said. Politics Reporter Got a tip? Send it to The Daily Beast here.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/health-authorities-did-not-say-drinking-water-will-prevent-coronavirus,The posts have been shared thousands of times on Facebook -- we’ve archived some of them here, here and here. “DOH Health Bulletin to the Public”, reads one post, which claims to represent a medical laboratory in the Philippines, referring to the country’s Department of Health. “Canadian Department of Health Bulletin. Pls tell ur families, relatives and friends,” reads another post on a Facebook page called “Dr. Kiddy”, which offers “tips about kids health”. The posts go on to recommend drinking warm water to prevent coronavirus, which has killed hundreds of people and spread around the world since emerging in a Chinese market at the end of last year. “The prevention method now is to keep your throat moist, do not let your throat dry up”, read the posts, which all resemble each other almost word for word. “Drink 50-80cc warm water, 30-50cc for kids, according to age. Every time you feel your throat is dry, do not wait, keep water in hand”, they say. Similar advice has been circulating on WhatsApp and Facebook in India, purportedly issued by the country’s health ministry, India Today reported last week. Although drinking water is generally regarded as a good thing for health, AFP found no evidence that authorities have recommended it as a safeguard against coronavirus. Health Canada -- the country’s public health service -- told AFP they did not issue the advice in the Facebook posts. They offer tips on their website on preventing coronavirus infection, but they do not mention drinking water. AFP found no trace of the advice on the Philippines’ health department website, including on an information page on coronavirus. The website issues a warning urging the public to “source information only from official DOH channels and social media accounts”. The World Health Organization’s advice on limiting the risk of infection includes frequently washing hands, coughing and sneezing into a tissue and avoiding close contact with anyone who has fever and cough. As well as drinking water, the Facebook posts give other recommendations, such as staying away from crowded places “till end of March”. However, scientists have not been able to predict how long the epidemic will last. The SARS (Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome) epidemic -- which killed 774 after emerging in Guangdong in southern China in 2002 -- was stemmed after several months thanks to strict hygiene controls and a global mobilisation. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/health-experts-refute-false-claims-drinking-boiled-garlic-water-cures-novel-coronavirus,This Facebook post has been shared at least 107 times since it was published on January 31, 2020. The post’s caption reads: “Good News! Wuhan's CORONA VIRUS can be cured By one bowl of freshly boiled GARLIC water. "Old chinese doctor has proven its efficacy. Many patients has also proven this to be effective . 8 cloves of chopped GARLICs and add 7cups of water then bring to boil. "Eat and drink the boiled GARLIC water, overnight improvement and healing. Glad to share this? ctto "Please like or Follow this page for MORE HELPFULL post? Thank u!?.” The post also carries a text image that reads: “Tracking the Wuhan Coronavirus. Everything you need to read about the deadly pandemic; what it is. How it’s spreading, and how to stop it.” Below is a screenshot of the misleading post: The novel coronavirus has killed at least 490 and infected more than 24,000 people in China since its outbreak in Wuhan in early December 2019, AFP reported on February 5, 2020. Posts with a similar claim were also published on Facebook here, here, here and here; on YouTube here, here, here, here, here and here; and on Twitter here, here, here, here and here. The claim is false. “There is no scientific evidence to substantiate the claim that garlic boiled water cures the novel coronavirus nor is there any proper medical research available on the subject,” Dr. Wasim Khawaja of the Pakistani Institute of Medical Sciences told AFP by phone on February 4, 2020. “Such claims on social media that this vegetable or that herb cures the novel coronavirus are misleading and they may be harmful for people as they indulge in these homemade remedies and do not visit a hospital for testing and this may lead to the spread of the virus if anyone is actually infected by it,” he warned. Khawaja urged all people with flu symptoms to get tested at a medical facility.   The World Health Organisation (WHO) and the US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) have said they do not recommend any such cure or remedy to treat the novel coronavirus. The WHO specifically stated here that measures like drinking traditional herbal teas are not effective and can even be harmful. The CDC also noted here that there is “no specific antiviral treatment recommended” for the coronavirus infection. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/indian-health-ministry-said-it-did-not-issue-emergency-warning-text-message,The text post was published here on Facebook on January 28, 2020, alongside a photo of medical personnel wearing face masks.  It has been shared almost one thousand times.  Below is a screenshot of the misleading Facebook post: The text reads, in part: “Most Urgent,Very Serious, Important information. Ministry of health’s emergency notification to the public that the Coronavirus influenza outbreak this time is very very serious & fatal. There's no cure once you are infected.Its spreading from China to various countries* “Prevention method is to keep your throat moist, do not let your throat dry up. Thus do not hold your thirst because once your membrane in your throat is dried, the virus will invade into your body within 10 mins.* “Drink 50-80cc warm water, 30-50cc for kids, according to age.Everytime u feel your throat is dry, do not wait, keep water in hand.Do not drink plenty at one time as it doesn’t help, instead continue to keep throat moist.* “Till end of March 2020, do not go to crowded places, wear mask as needed especially in train or public transportation.Avoid fried or spicy food and load up vitamin C.” It is followed by a translation of the above in the Punjabi language. A new strain of the novel coronavirus originated in a wildlife market in the central Chinese city of Wuhan in December 2019. It has killed at least 560 people and infected more than 28,000 others in China alone, as reported here by AFP on February 6, 2020. The virus has spread to more than 24 other nations, including three confirmed cases India, as reported here by AFP on February 5. Copies of the purported text message were also shared here, here, here on Facebook, and here and here on Twitter.  The claim is false; the Indian government’s Press Information Bureau said it did not issue the purported emergency warning message. On January 20, 2020, the Press Information Bureau posted this tweet describing the message as a “fake emergency notification”. Fake emergency notification from @MoHFW_INDIA is doing rounds on social media
		No such notification has been issued !!!
		For prevention against #Coronavirus and travel advisory, pls see:https://t.co/ybsKk8c5tChttps://t.co/qnK1JCVhmI
		For Queries on #nCoV : Call +91-11-23978046 pic.twitter.com/UuRhm1ZiA8  It reads, in part: “Fake emergency notification from @MoHFW_INDIA is doing rounds on social media. “No such notification has been issued !!!” India’s Ministry of Health and Family Welfare has issued several guidelines on travel and reducing the risk of transmission of the novel coronavirus here on its website, but none match the wording of the purported text message warning. 
	  Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://www.hardenexpress.com.au/story/6708057/250-supermarket-voucher-too-good-to-be-true-scamwatch-warns/,Your digital subscription includes access to content from all our websites in your region.
Access unlimited content and the digital versions of our print editions - Today's Paper. IF you've just had a $250 shopping voucher for Coles or Woolworths land in your inbox, NSW Police have one word for you - delete. $0/ (min cost $0) Login or signup to continue reading This week scammers have been impersonating the two supermarket giants claiming the shopping voucher has been issued to support people during the coronavirus pandemic. "Coles is giving away free groceries worth $250 to support the nation during Corona pandemic," the scam voucher says. READ MORE: Tough rules help flatten Aust virus curve It also instructs people to "hurry up! Collect your free voucher" with a hyperlink leading people to the scam website. NSW Police across the Central West have taken to their social media sites to warn community members not to click. "The scammers impersonating Woolworths from earlier this week are now impersonating Coles; again claiming a $250 shopping voucher for #COVID19au," police posted. "Don't share and don't click the link." READ MORE: Work from homers saving big bucks Scamwatch said Australians should be aware that scammers are adapting existing technology to play on people's fears around coronavirus and selling products claiming to prevent or cure the virus. Since January 1, 2020, the Australian Competition and Consumer Commission's (ACCC) Scamwatch has received 94 reports of scams about coronavirus, but warns figures are starting to climb. It said phishing scams are being sent via email or text message that claim to be providing official information on coronavirus but are attempts to try and obtain personal data. "Unfortunately, scammers are using the uncertainty around COVID-19, or coronavirus, to take advantage of people," ACCC deputy chair Delia Rickard said. READ MORE: Commercial rent relief on the way: report Other scams include people receiving misinformation about cures for coronavirus and investment scams claiming coronavirus has created opportunities to make money. "We've had a wide variety of scams reported to us, including fake online stores selling products claiming to be a vaccine or cure for coronavirus, and stores selling products such as face masks and not providing the goods." Visit Scamwatch for more information. Nadine Morton covers emergency services and breaking news for the Illawarra Mercury. She takes pride in regional journalism which she believes is crucial to informing our towns and cities. Have a story? Email her at nadine.morton@austcommunitymedia.com.au Nadine Morton covers emergency services and breaking news for the Illawarra Mercury. She takes pride in regional journalism which she believes is crucial to informing our towns and cities. Have a story? Email her at nadine.morton@austcommunitymedia.com.au Advertisement Advertisement,
https://www.rappler.com/newsbreak/fact-check/256069-coronavirus-vaccine-ready-cure-within-hours,Already have Rappler+? Sign in to listen to groundbreaking journalism. SUMMARY This is AI generated summarization, which may have errors. For context, always refer to the full article.  Claim: A new vaccine that can cure COVID-19 patients in 3 hours is now ready. Facebook user Kit Salazar Cervantes shared a photo that said: “Great news! Carona virus vaccine ready. Able to cure patient within 3 hours after injection. Hats off to US scientists. Right now Trump announced that Roche Medical Company will launch the vaccine next Sunday, and millions of doses are ready from it!!!” The post also had an image of what looked like a medical product labeled “COVID-19 lgM/lgG.”  Cervantes posted the photo on Monday, March 23, and captioned it, “Sabi na nga ba eh! (I knew it!)” Facebook’s monitoring tool, Claim Check, flagged the post for fact checkers to verify. The post had over 1,300 shares, 209 reactions, and 127 comments as of writing. Rating: FALSE The facts: As of March 27, there is still no vaccine or drug approved by the World Health Organization (WHO) or any Food and Drug Administration (FDA) in the world to cure or prevent COVID-19. Moreover, the image used in the post is not a photo of vaccines from Roche Medical Company, but is a photo of rapid test kits from South Korean company Sugentech. WHO, the Department of Health (DOH), and the US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) all say there is no vaccine or cure for the disease yet. (READ: What you need to know: Coronavirus cures, vaccines being tested) Indian fact checker India Today, a verified signatory to the International Fact Checking Network, also debunked the claim that US President Donald Trump had announced a coronavirus vaccine from Roche Medical Company would be distributed “next Sunday.” It explained that the company was given emergency approval for coronavirus tests, not the vaccine. There are efforts from scientists all over the world to develop treatments and vaccines for the virus. However, experts say they won’t be released anytime soon. (READ: Coronavirus drugs: Who’s doing what, and when they might come) Rappler and other fact check organizations from around the world have already checked thousands of claims regarding vaccines, cures, and other information related to the coronavirus and the COVID-19 outbreak. Avoid sharing false information by checking against official and reliable sources. (LIST: Where to get official, reliable info on novel coronavirus) – Pauline Macaraeg/Rappler.com Keep us aware of suspicious Facebook pages, groups, accounts, websites, articles, or photos in your network by contacting us at factcheck@rappler.com. Let us battle disinformation one Fact Check at a time More fact checks on COVID-19: 
		Error.
		
	 
			Please abide by Rappler's commenting guidelines.
		 
		There are no comments yet. Add your comment to start the conversation.	 How does this make you feel? JOIN OUR NEWSLETTER Fearless reporting delivered to you follow us 
			Checking your Rappler+ subscription...		 
			 
			Upgrade to Rappler+ for exclusive content and unlimited access.		 
			Why is it important to subscribe? 			Learn more
		 
			You are subscribed to Rappler+		,
https://factcheck.afp.com/anti-malaria-drug-has-proven-effective-treating-coronavirus-has-not-cured-12552-patients,The news article, which has been shared hundreds of times on Facebook, alleges that chloroquine has been “found effective against coronavirus” and has cured “12,552 patients in China” alone. The article adds that “China’s National Health Commission, on Tuesday (February 18), says no fewer than 12,552 have recovered in Chinese mainland out of 72,528 confirmed cases of Coronavirus (COVID-19) in that country.” We've archived some of the shares here and here. As the leading country in the world for malaria cases, Nigeria accounted for 25 percent of global malaria cases in 2018. For this reason, the anti-malaria drug chloroquine phosphate -- although banned in 2005 and again in 2017 -- is a very popular drug in the country.  On Monday, when the Chinese authorities listed chloroquine as one of the drugs with “a certain curative effect” on COVID-19, the drug began to trend on Twitter in Nigeria. Lol. It has been revealed that Chloroquine cures Corona virus and now It all makes sense why no African died of the disease.
		Nigerian hospitals used to give us that drug like candy, growing up. If you search our systems, I'm sure you'd still find remnants of the drug inside. ?  After the outbreak began at the end of last year, Chinese scientists began to evaluate “the antiviral efficiency” of existing drugs on COVID-19. They tested several drugs, including chloroquine.  The scientists said in a paper published on February 4, 2020, that the drugs were tested against “a clinical isolate of 2019-nCoV in vitro” (outside the human body). “Our findings reveal that remdesivir and chloroquine are highly effective in the control of 2019-nCoV infection in vitro,” the scientists wrote. “We suggest that they should be assessed in human patients suffering from the novel coronavirus disease”, they added. The drug was eventually put to clinical trials, according to the Chinese state news agency, Xinhua. Xinhua reported on Monday that “Chinese experts, based on the result of clinical trials, have confirmed that Chloroquine Phosphate, an antimalarial drug, has a certain curative effect on the novel coronavirus disease (COVID-19)”. Xinhua added that Sun Yanrong, deputy head of the China National Center for Biotechnology Development under the Ministry of Science and Technology (MOST), said the experts “suggested the drug be included in the next version of the treatment guidelines”. Yanrong said “over 100 patients enrolled in the clinical trials” have shown no serious adverse reactions to the drug. The drug and two others -- Favilavir and Gilead’s experimental drug remdesivir -- are now being tested in clinical trials.  The outbreak of COVID-19 , which began in December 2019, has killed more than 2,200 people and infected more than 75,500 in China as of February 21, 2020. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/coronavirus-protection-masks-hawked-misleading-video-ad-facebook,“Protect your loved ones from the deadly Coronavirus!” reads the text accompanying the video, which warns about the dangers of the virus as ominous music plays, encouraging viewers to “safeguard your family” by ordering “while supplies last!” The use of face masks to protect against the novel coronavirus -- which has spread from China around the world, leaving thousands dead and wreaking havoc on the global economy -- goes against advice from US government health officials. “Seriously people- STOP BUYING MASKS! They are NOT effective in preventing general public from catching #Coronavirus, but if healthcare providers can’t get them to care for sick patients, it puts them and our communities at risk!” Surgeon General Jerome Adams tweeted, alluding to panic buying. Adams -- America’s leading public health spokesman -- has warned that wearing a face mask could actually increase the risk of infection. "Folks who don't know how to wear them properly tend to touch their faces a lot and actually can increase the spread of coronavirus," he told Fox News. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention also does not generally recommend them. The “CDC does not currently recommend the use of facemasks to help prevent novel #coronavirus. Take everyday preventive actions, like staying home when you are sick and washing hands with soap and water, to help slow the spread of respiratory illness,” it said on Twitter. There are specific scenarios in which the CDC does encourage the use of face masks. “Facemasks should be used by people who show symptoms of COVID-19 to help prevent the spread of the disease to others. The use of facemasks is also crucial for health workers and people who are taking care of someone in close settings (at home or in a health care facility),” according to the CDC’s website. The advertisement does not mention health care workers as potential customers, and it links to a site that makes clear the face masks are being marketed toward people who are not currently infected. “The Coronavirus Protection Mask helps prevent dangerous airborne cough and sneeze droplets from entering the nose and mouth,” the site says. There are also paid advertisements on Facebook -- some of which use a variation of the misleading video ad -- that link to a site where the mask can be purchased.  And while the site markets a "coronavirus protection mask," what appears to be an identical product is sold elsewhere online as an "anti-haze respirator." The video ad, which plays heavily on fears, includes footage of a doctor speaking along with text that claims the face masks are recommended by medical professionals. But the doctor is actually a radiologist who works at Vein Clinics of America, and the footage is from a video of him talking about his career and varicose vein treatment.  Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/us-disease-experts-did-not-issue-novel-coronavirus-related-facial-hair-guide,“When it comes to novel coronavirus safety, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention has some suggestions about facial hair,” CNN said in an article. “Side whiskers, soul patches, lampshades and handlebar moustaches are good to go, according to a CDC infographic,” said the article, which has since been corrected. Other media have carried the same claim here, here and here, linking the graphic -- which shows different facial hair styles and how well they work with a respirator -- to the novel coronavirus. But the graphic is from a November 2017 National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health (NIOSH) blog post -- more than two years before the discovery of the novel coronavirus, which has spread from China around the world, leaving thousands dead. The “CDC does not currently recommend the general public use facemasks or respirators for #COVID19,” it said on Twitter, referring to the novel coronavirus. “This 2017 @NIOSH graphic is intended for workers who wear tight-fitting respirators,” it added, retweeting a similar explanation from NIOSH, which is part of the CDC.  The blog post now includes a warning at the top: “This blog and infographic from 2017 are intended for workers who wear respirators at work.” The post was intended for people who want to grow facial hair for campaigns such as No-Shave November or Movember, but have to wear tight-fitting respirators. “Research tells us that the presence of facial hair under the sealing surface causes 20 to 1000 times more leakage compared to clean-shaven individuals,” it said, recommending styles that do not interfere with these respirators. While the CDC does not recommend face masks for people who are well, there are specific scenarios related to the novel coronavirus in which it does encourage their use. “Facemasks should be used by people who show symptoms of COVID-19 to help prevent the spread of the disease to others. The use of facemasks is also crucial for health workers and people who are taking care of someone in close settings (at home or in a health care facility),” according to the CDC’s website. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/hoax-circulates-uk-hospital-has-issued-special-advice-staff-prevent-covid-19-infection,This Facebook post was published on March 23, 2020. It has been shared almost 300 times. The post reads, in part: “At The Princess of Wales hospital. NHS staff have been sent this: "This is the advice given to hospital staff.
	"It explains the virus and hopefully, how to prevent getting it.
	"Please share with family, friends and work colleagues.” Below is a screenshot of the misleading post: The post was also published here, here, here, here, here, here, here, and here on Facebook. The claim is false.  Cwm Taf Morgannwg University Health Board, the health board which manages the Princess of Wales Hospital, issued a statement denying the claim. In this Facebook post dated March 23, 2020, it said: “We’ve been made aware of a post on social media that says advice about Coronavirus/ COVID19 has been issued to our staff at Princess of Wales Hospital. This advice has not been issued by us to our staff and the content is not official NHS advice.” 
	  Many of the claims in the purported guidelines are false or lacking evidence. Below are some that have previously been debunked by AFP Fact Check. 1. Holding your breath is not an effective test for COVID-19 Claim: “Experts suggest doing this simple verification every morning: Breathe in deeply and hold your breath for 10 seconds. If this can be done without coughing, without difficulty, this shows that there is no fibrosis in the lungs, indicating the absence of infection. It is recommended to do this control every morning to help detect infection.”  The World Health Organization stated that holding your breath for more than 10 seconds is not an effective test for the novel coronavirus. 2. No evidence that the virus ‘dies’ under heat Claim: “The virus hates heat and dies if it is exposed to temperatures greater than 80°F (27°C).” Research on the resilience of the novel coronavirus is still underway. The US-based Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) stated here that it is “not yet known whether weather and temperature impact the spread of COVID-19”.  3. Drinking hot water or cold water? It doesn’t matter Claim: “Therefore hot drinks such as infusions, broths or simply hot water should be consumed abundantly during the day. These hot liquids kill the virus and are easy to ingest. Avoid drinking ice water or drinks with ice cubes.”  Brandon Brown, a professor at the University of California Riverside’s Center for Healthy Communities, previously told AFP “there is no need to change the temperature of your drinking water” and that “drinking water is always important, not just for coronavirus prevention.”  4. Drinking water every 15 minutes does not prevent coronavirus Claim: “Ensure that your mouth and throat are always wet, never DRY. You should drink a sip of water at least every 15 minutes.” Health experts say drinking water every 15 minutes does not prevent coronavirus infection.  Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/health-experts-say-drinking-water-every-15-minutes-does-not-prevent-coronavirus-infection,The post was published here on Facebook on February 28, 2020.  It has been shared more than 400 times.  Below is a screenshot of the misleading Facebook post:  The post reads, in part: “SERIOUS EXCELLENT ADVICE by Japanese doctors treating COVID-19 cases. Everyone should ensure your mouth & throat is moist, never DRY. Take a few sips of water every 15 mins at least. WHY? Even if the virus gets into your mouth...drinking water or other liquids will WASH them down through your oesophagus and into the stomach. Once there in tummy...your stomach ACID will kill all the virus. If you don't drink enough water more regularly...the virus can enter your windpipes and into the LUNGS. That's very dangerous.” A similar claim was also shared here and here on Twitter. The claim is misleading.  This tweet on the WHO's official Twitter account states in part: “While staying hydrated by drinking water is important for overall health, it does not prevent coronavirus infection.” Below is a screenshot of the WHO's tweet: This video produced by the WHO gives advice on how to prevent coronavirus infection.  The Japanese Ministry of Health, Labour and Welfare, which oversees the country’s response to the novel coronavirus, has also not issued an advisory recommending frequent water intake.  In the “About Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19)” section of its website, the ministry lists washing hands frequently and covering mouth and nose when coughing or sneezing as “everyday preventive actions” to take.  Below is a screenshot of the relevant section of the website:  There is no mention of frequent water intake in any of the advisories it has issued. The advisories were published here, here, here and here on the ministry website.  AFP Fact Check has previously debunked a similar misleading claim that keeping your throat moist can prevent coronavirus infections. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/chloroquine-has-not-been-approved-treatment-covid-19,In the two-minute WhatsApp voice note, a man, speaking English in a Nigerian accent,  summarises what he says he learned from watching a French video.    He claims French and Chinese doctors “came out with a solution to coronavirus, and this solution is just our chloroquine — the normal chloroquine that we normally use in Africa to cure malaria and fever”. He says the doctors recommend taking 500 mg of chloroquine phosphate for eight days. The WhatsApp message features a picture of a box of chloroquine phosphate tablets. The speaker — who doesn’t reveal his identity — adds that “chloroquine has been proven to be a solution to the coronavirus. Chloroquine is able to counter and overpower the coronavirus.”. He urges people to “rush to any pharmacy and get chloroquine because nobody knows when anybody can get contaminated with coronavirus”. He adds that the “treatment should be eight days; you take 500 milligrams of chloroquine for eight days and then you would be completely cured of any infection of coronavirus”. Anti-malaria drug chloroquine has been banned in Nigeria since 2005 after a WHO recommendation warned of high treatment failures and drug resistance in some parts of the world. It is still being used in South Africa but is not recommended as primary treatment for malaria due to high resistance. Chinese state news agency Xinhua reported on February 17 that “Chinese experts, based on the result of clinical trials, have confirmed that chloroquine phosphate... has a certain curative effect on the novel coronavirus disease”. These trials were being conducted on “over 100 patients”, according to Sun Yanrong, deputy head of the China National Center for Biotechnology Development under the Ministry of Science and Technology. A brief overview of the findings published by the Japan-based journal BioScience Trends provided few details as to how the trials were carried out.  In a press conference on February 20, Janet Diaz, head of clinical care within the WHO Emergencies Programme, said that “for chloroquine, there is no proof that that is an effective treatment at this time.”  At the time of writing, the World Health Organization (WHO) states that “to date, there is no vaccine and no specific antiviral medicine to prevent or treat COVID-2019”. We've previously debunked a separate claim about the drug's ability to cure novel coronavirus.  Doctors in Lagos told AFP the Whatsapp message’s chloroquine usage recommendation was significantly more than was typically prescribed for malaria treatment before the drug was banned in Nigeria.  Goke Akinrogunde, clinical director at GTAK Health Clinic in Lagos, said that “500 mg for eight days is an overdose for malaria treatment”. He said treatment would only last up to three days when the drug was in use in Nigeria. Ajibola Anjorin, a public health doctor who works on the WHO-backed Saving One Million Lives initiative in northern Nigeria, said that before chloroquine was banned, “the usual dose for adults was two 200 mg tablets twice a day for five doses” in adults. The WHO lists the potential adverse effects of chloroquine here.  AFP ran a reverse image search of the picture sent in the WhatsApp message, which led to the discovery of a website, coronavirusmedication.co.uk. The site sells packs of 14 tablets of chloroquine phosphate (500 mg) for £79.99 (92 euros). It bills itself as belonging to an organisation called Viral Medications UK. However, AFP found no other online clues of any organisation by that name.  We traced the website’s history using site identity tool Whois.com and found that it was registered on February 28, 2020 — about the same time the WhatsApp broadcast began spreading in Nigeria. No name or contact address was used in the domain name purchase. AFP contacted the UK’s Medicines and Healthcare products Regulatory Agency (MHRA) to find out whether this new site could legally sell chloroquine online and market it as a coronavirus treatment. MHRA said drugs could only be sold by registered pharmacies online “if they have a physical location in the UK as well”. The agency added that the website did not have a physical location and was not accredited to sell chloroquine in the UK. “Patient safety is our highest priority and we will investigate and take action against those who act with no regard to public health,” MHRA told AFP in a written statement on March 9, 2020. The website "is now under investigation", it added. “Our message is clear: the illegal supply of medicines is a criminal offence. Websites offering to supply prescription medicines without a prescription are not only breaking the law but are putting the health of patients at risk.” The agency said it had a history of dealing with similar websites: “Over the past decade we have shut down more than 26,000 websites involved in the illegal sale of medicines”. Within hours of the MHRA making its statement, the website was no longer available. Have you received the same Whatsapp voice message, or others like it, promoting “cures” for coronavirus? Please contact us.  Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/us-president-donald-trump-did-not-announce-coronavirus-vaccine-was-ready,The video was published on Facebook here on March 19, 2020. The post has since been viewed more than 7,500 times. Below is a screenshot of the misleading Facebook post:
	  The caption reads: “Great news! Carona virus vaccine ready. Able to cure patient within 3 hours after injection. Hats off to US Scientists. Right now Trump announced that Roche Medical Company will launch the vaccine next Sunday, and millions of doses are ready from it !!!"  COVID-19 has killed more than 18,589 people and infected more than 416,686 others worldwide, according to data from the WHO on March 26, 2020. The video was also shared alongside the same claim on Facebook here; on Twitter here and here; and on YouTube here. The claim is false. Trump does not mention that a COVID-19 vaccine is ready to be administered in the clip or in the entire March 13 press conference, footage of which was published on the White House’s official YouTube channel here.   In the clip, Matt Sause, Roche’s North America CEO and president, thanks US regulators for approving his company’s COVID-19 tests and says he is working with federal agencies to deliver the tests to patients nationwide. The company claimed that the tests could provide results in three and a half hours.  In the full press conference, Trump makes reference to a vaccine only once, saying that experts are working on developing “a vaccine, which takes a little bit longer because of the test periods and a couple of other reasons.” While Roche and pharmaceutical companies worldwide are working to develop a COVID-19 vaccine, it has not yet been approved by national or international health bodies. The US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention states here that there “currently no vaccine to prevent coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19).” The WHO states the same here.  “To date, there is no vaccine and no specific antiviral medicine to prevent or treat COVID-2019,” the WHO states.  
	  Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/inhaling-steam-will-not-treat-or-cure-novel-coronavirus-infection,The video -- a more than 40-minute Facebook live from March 15, 2020 -- features a man whose page identifies him as a sound technician and songwriter. He urges people to boil water in a pot with sea salt and citrus peels, then inhale the steam from it for 15 to 20 minutes. “I’m here today to tell y’all that I have a cure for the coronavirus,” he says, before adding: “Well, I wouldn’t say a cure, but I, yeah, I have something that kills the coronavirus.” “I’m giving a coronavirus treatment today. I’m helping as many people as I can help. I want y’all to share this, I want y’all to make this go viral -- I’m trying to help some people live,” the speaker later says. The video is accompanied by a disclaimer: “THIS IS NOT MEDICAL ADVICE OR A PRESCRIPTION BUT SIMPLY A PERSONAL CLEANSE THAT I USED BASE ON MY CONCLUSION OF THE STUDIES THAT WERE PUBLISHED.” But the video has inspired other people to believe they can cure the disease via this method. A clip viewed tens of thousands of times, archived here and here, shows a woman inhaling steam from a pot that contains orange peels, onion, garlic and iodine salt. “She’s doing the steaming method for the coronavirus, and it is actually working,” a person says in the video, adding: “So this is the cure for the coronavirus.” The person says the treatment is based on another video playing on a phone -- the Facebook live mentioned above. But inhaling steam will not cure a novel coronavirus infection. “At the current time, the only way to ‘kill’ a virus is through antimicrobial cleaning solutions, which should NEVER be inhaled or introduced into the body in any way,” Dr. Jason McKnight, Assistant Clinical Professor in the Department of Primary Care and Population Health at Texas A&M University, told AFP by email. “In general, people may find that inhaling steam during any sort of respiratory illness helps with their symptoms, such as cough, nasal congestion and chest congestion. However, this is only symptomatic relief and it is not a treatment for any viral infection,” he said. And “you have the potential to cause real harm to yourself through burns from the heated water vapor to your eyes, face and airways, which if severe enough could cause serious and long-term complications,” McKnight said. Dr. Benjamin Neuman, an expert in coronaviruses who chairs the Biological Sciences department at Texas A&M University-Texarkana, agreed. “The lungs are delicate, and steam is very hot -- not a good mix. Hot steam can and does damage the lungs, and the idea that it could fight a virus that also damages the lungs is just really bad advice,” he said by email. And Dr. Karine Le Roch -- a professor of cell biology at the University of California, Riverside -- said: “I really don’t think that inhaling steam will treat or cure the infection.” “There is no miracle cure,” she said by email. “Researchers are doing their best to find something quickly but it will take time.” Steam inhalation does not appear on the World Health Organization’s page offering advice to the public about the virus, nor on the US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s page on how to protect against the virus, or its page about caring for yourself if you are sick. The speaker in the Facebook live video also says that heat kills the virus, and that “I’ll take a blow dryer and put it in my nose” to target it -- a method that AFP Fact Check previously found will not treat or cure the virus. “It’s really SARS -- they’re not telling y’all,” the man says at one point. Text accompanying the video refers to the temperature at which heat killed SARS-CoV, but that is another coronavirus that was first reported in 2003. The novel coronavirus originated in China in late 2019 but it has spread globally, killing 21,000 people, wreaking economic havoc from Asia to Europe and the United States in a public health crisis that governments are struggling to halt. AFP Fact Check has debunked more than 180 examples of false or misleading information about the novel coronavirus. A complete list of our fact checks on the topic in English can be found here. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/there-no-known-cure-novel-coronavirus-and-patient-has-not-yet-been-officially-cleared,The claim was made in this article from March 9, published on the Zimabwean blog iHarare. The headline reads: “South Africa Records It’s (sic) First Successful Cure Of Coronavirus Patient.” Social media analysis by CrowdTangle shows it has been shared more than 2,500 times. The story has also been posted multiple times on Facebook (see here, here and here), including this account here with more than 600,000 followers.  The report draws on local media coverage following the March 5 announcement that novel coronavirus had spread to South Africa, but appears to distort the original reporting. One misleading sentence claims “the patient recovered quite perfectly and is currently waiting to be discharged following medical clearance”. The story asserts this claim with a pull-quote below that was obtained from another publication. But Health Minister Dr Zweli Mkhize, who is being quoted, made it clear that while the patient was “asymptomatic” and in good spirits, he would have to be retested "to check his recovery progress". The use of the word “cure” is perplexing, since Mkhize is also quoted saying the patient (and his wife, who also became infected) could only be certified clear of the virus following a negative test result. The country has confirmed 13 positive cases of COVID-19 from 645 tests. Contacted by AFP, a spokesman for South Africa’s Department of Health declined to comment on patient recoveries.  But, “the right word to use would be recovered” as opposed to cured, government health spokesman Dr Lwazi Manzi told AFP. AFP turned to a data-tracking site hosted here by John Hopkins University. By combining regular updates, it provides a graphic analysis of global infections by country. As of March 11, no recoveries were listed for South Africa.  The World Health Organization (WHO) and other notable medical organisations are clear that there is no cure for the new coronavirus and that preventative measures are the best line of defence.   Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/experts-say-eating-garlic-does-not-prevent-covid-19-and-onions-are-no-cure-either,This video, shared thousands of times on Facebook, alleges that onions and garlic “kills virus and is protection” for those who take it. “Eat as many as possible, and at any time and any day. It’s working, please help me to share, save another,” the woman in the video said. She further asked people “to get as many as possible onions”, cut them open and place them at different corners of the house to keep the novel coronavirus away. The same video has been shared here, here and here.  Another video, seen thousands of times and archived here, claims garlic, onions and lemon could all cure the virus. The video, which shows a man giving advice on handling a flu, was shared with the caption: “This just came in today. Simple solution. No vaccine, just good old mother nature. Advice from China that has overcome the virus.” A recent poll by Gallup-backed NOIPolls also suggested 15 percent of Nigerians believe one way to avoid the novel coronavirus was by eating garlic and ginger.  According to the WHO, garlic is “a healthy food that may have some antimicrobial properties. However, there is no evidence from the current outbreak that eating garlic has protected people from the new coronavirus”. As of March 21, 2020, WHO had 48 candidate vaccines in preclinical evaluation and two in clinical evaluation as cure for COVID-19. None of the 50 candidates is onion, garlic or lemon.  The UN health agency is yet to find a definite cure for COVID-19.  Here is the WHO guide on preventing novel coronavirus.  Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://www.altnews.in/no-dr-ramesh-guptas-zoology-book-does-not-mention-a-cure-for-novel-coronavirus/,An image of a page from a zoology book authored by Dr Ramesh Gupta is massively viral on social media. Several users have shared it claiming that the book speaks of a cure for COVID-19. “#WHO you have not gone through the book of 12th standard written by Dr Ramesh Chand Gupta where he has mentioned about coronavirus so this is not a recent disease and he mentioned the cure too…who else is confused here #JantaCurfewMarch22 #pmoindia #NarendraModi #coronavirus,” reads a tweet by one Sunita Pradhan. #WHO you have not gone through the book of 12th standard written by Dr Ramesh Chand Gupta where he has mentioned about coronavirus so this is not a recent disease and he mentioned the cure too…who else is confused here #JantaCurfewMarch22 #pmoindia #NarendraModi#coronavirus pic.twitter.com/WWA8HzuskX — Sunita Pradhan (@SunitaP22163768) March 22, 2020 The same claim has also been promoted in Hindi – “Brother, the treatment for coronavirus was found with a lot of difficulties after searching for it in several books…the medicine is mentioned in zoology intermediate book…and this is not a new disease. भाइयों काफी किताबों में ढूंढने के बाद बड़ी मुश्किल से कोरोना वायरस की दवा मिली है…दवा इंटरमीडिएट की जन्तु विज्ञान की किताब में दी गई है…और यह कोई नई बीमारी नहीं है…”) The book mentions coronavirus in the ‘common cold’ section. It says that there are several kinds of common cold, 75% of which are caused by rhinovirus or coronavirus. In the end, the excerpt lists medicines that can be used to treat the infection – aspirin, antihistamines and nasal spray. As per Intermediate book of Jantu-science, written by Dr. Ramesh Gupta. Mentioned the medicine of #CoronaVirus on page 1072. We can help effective people by this. Doctors are requested to analysis the medicine and advise. Medicines are Aspirin, anti-histamines & Nasal spray. pic.twitter.com/kBhjG444kf — kapil khatter (@102_khatter) March 22, 2020 1. The novel coronavirus (nCoV) or COVID-19 is not a new disease. 2. The treatment for the disease has already been found. 3. Coronavirus can be cured with aspirin, antihistamines and nasal spray. False All three claims raised on social media are false. 1. The novel coronavirus (nCoV) is a new strain of coronavirus.  The novel coronavirus is a new strain of the coronavirus family. It has unique characteristics and has never been discovered before. “This #coronavirus is not SARS, it’s not MERS & it’s not influenza. It is a unique virus with unique characteristics. Both #COVID19 & influenza cause respiratory disease & spread the same way, via small droplets of fluid from the nose & mouth of someone who is sick”-@DrTedros — World Health Organization (WHO) (@WHO) March 3, 2020 Chinese health authorities say that nCoV is likely to have come from a seafood market in Wuhan where wildlife was also traded illegally. Chinese researchers said the virus could have spread from “an infected animal species to humans through illegally-trafficked pangolins”, which are prized in Asia for food and medicine. “Scientists have pointed to either bats or snakes as the source of the virus,” adds the report. The novel coronavirus is a new variety of coronavirus. The World Health Organisation (WHO) states, “Coronaviruses (CoV) are a large family of viruses that cause illness ranging from the common cold to more severe diseases such a MERS-CoV and SARS-CoV.” A novel coronavirus (nCoV) and its outbreak COVID-19 has not been previously identified in humans. Its symptoms include fever, tiredness and dry cough. In most severe cases it causes shortness of breath, aches and pains, sore throat or in rare cases – diarrhoea, nausea or a runny nose. According to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), human coronaviruses were first identified in the mid-1960s. “Sometimes coronaviruses that infect animals can evolve and make people sick and become a new human coronavirus. Three recent examples of this are 2019-nCoV, SARS-CoV, and MERS-CoV.” SARS-CoV is Severe Acute respiratory syndrome which was identified in 2002. It is thought to be an animal virus from an “as-yet-uncertain animal reservoir, perhaps bats, that spread to other animals (civet cats) and first infected humans in the Guangdong province of southern China in 2002,” per WHO. Middle East respiratory syndrome (MERS-CoV) is a viral respiratory disease caused by a coronavirus that was first identified in Saudi Arabia in 2012. Therefore, while different strains of coronavirus have been discovered before, the novel coronavirus also knows as nCoV or SARS-CoV-2 is new. 2. There is no cure for novel coronavirus yet.  “There is no vaccine and no specific antiviral medicine to prevent or treat COVID-2019,” states WHO. In fact, no vaccine has yet been found even for SARS-CoV and MERS-CoV. It usually takes 10 to 15 years to develop a new vaccine however, technological advancement has sped up the process. Recently, US president Donald Trump touted Chloroquine and Hydroxychloroquine as possible treatments for coronavirus following which the US Food and Drug Administration (FDA) approved clinical trials of Chloroquine. However, an Arizona man with nCoV died in an apparent attempt to self-medicate with Chloroquine. His wife is in critical condition. According to a Forbes Tracker, several drug companies, universities and biotech start-ups are researching treatment and cures for the disease. All medications are either in early stages of development or animal and human testing. 3. Coronavirus cannot be ‘cured’ with aspirin, antihistamines and nasal spray. When any of the coronaviruses (or rhinoviruses for that matter) cause the common cold, the physicians’ aim is to (a) stop the transmission of the infection to other people and (b) treat the symptoms. This is because the common cold is a self-limited disease – it cures by itself. It is for this reason, antivirals or antibiotics are not given for a common cold. In the usual clinical picture, it is also not required to find out which organism has caused the common cold since it has no bearing on its treatment. The mainstay of symptomatic treatment for the common cold is anti-inflammatory drugs like NSAIDs (aspirin is one of them), antihistamines, anticholinergic drugs and decongestants (which can be given as nasal spray). All of these can be bought at pharmaceutical stores without a doctor’s prescription. However, when coronaviruses like SARS, MERS and the novel coronavirus (COVID-19) cause severe disease with manifestations like pneumonia, acute respiratory distress syndrome, septic shock, the treatment involves intensive care and not over-the-counter medications. Therefore, it is inappropriate to extrapolate the treatment for the common cold as the treatment of all coronavirus infections. The textbook itself mentions inexact and inappropriate treatment. “Nasal spray” only implies the route through which the medicine is given – through the nose. There are many drugs given through the nasal route, decongestants for the common cold are only one of them. Thus an excerpt from a zoology textbook covering the basics of the common cold was taken out of context. The claims made rest on the misconception that there is only one coronavirus and that coronavirus only causes the common cold. In fact, there are many coronaviruses that infect different animals. Of those, from the mid-1960s till date, seven coronaviruses have been shown to infect humans including SARS, MERS and the novel COVID-19. These viruses cause a wide range of illnesses from common cold to acute respiratory distress syndrome. Hence these viral tweets are misleading people on the treatment available for coronavirus and fuel conspiracy theories that the current coronavirus pandemic is not new. Note: The number of positive cases of the novel coronavirus in India has exceeded 600. This has caused the government to impose a complete restriction on movement apart from essential services. Globally, more than 4 lakh confirmed cases and over 19,000 deaths have been reported. There is a growing sense of panic among citizens, causing them to fall for a variety of online misinformation – misleading images and videos rousing fear or medical misinformation promoting pseudoscience and invalid treatments. While your intentions may be pure, misinformation, spread especially during a global pandemic, can take lives. We request our readers to practice caution and not forward unverified messages on WhatsApp and other social media platforms. Donate Now A video of a ladder moving on its own, purportedly from Jharkhand, is viral on… In a 2-minute video, a man recommends a “technique” to prevent infection from Omicron, the… A video of a set of iron nails that appear to melt after being placed… Several social media users have shared an image that shows two columns — ‘Cepa/variante’ (Spanish… A 90-second video of a man dissecting a banana has been shared on the internet….,
https://factcheck.afp.com/fake-us-hospital-letter-says-alcohol-reduces-covid-19-risks,“After extensive research, our findings show that consuming alcoholic beverages may help reduce the risk of infection by the novel coronavirus; COVID-19. Vodka is the most recommended for drinking, cleaning, and sanitizing.” The message was displayed on what appears to be letterhead paper dated March 7, 2020, complete with the hospital’s logo in the top left corner, an official stamp and a scrawled signature.  The photo was posted on several Facebook pages in the Philippines, racking up 25,000 shares in less than 24 hours. Although most Facebook users took the recommendation as a joke, Saint Luke’s, in the midwestern state of Missouri, received enquiries regarding the letter, Lindsey Stitch, a hospital spokeswoman, told AFP. “The information circulating is definitely a fake letter. Vodka has no impact on the coronavirus,” Stitch told AFP by email. The hospital’s Facebook page published an official debunk of the claim on March 11. Stitch reiterated advice published on Saint Luke’s website, recommending that people wash hands with soap and water or “alcohol-based hand sanitizer.” The page does not recommend drinking alcoholic beverages. She also said people should not leave home if they are feeling unwell. The novel coronavirus has spread from China around the world, killing more than 4,500 people and wreaking havoc on the global economy. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/false-claims-drinking-water-lemon-can-prevent-covid-19-circulate-online,The claims have been shared more than 40,000 times on Facebook in countries including Australia, India and South Africa. “Corona virus (sic) arrives in any country, sooner or later...so please use as much as possible of natural vitamin C to strengthen your immune system,” the post reads. “Slices of lemon in a cup of lukewarm water can save your life”. Many Facebook users commented on the posts, expressing gratitude for the “life-saving advice”. More than 4,600 people have died from the novel coronavirus disease, or COVID-19, with most cases in China. Similar claims have been circulating in French, Spanish and Portuguese.  Contacted by AFP, Henry Chenal, director of the Integrated Bioclinical Research Centre (CIRBA) in Abidjan, Ivory Coast said that consuming a high amount of vitamin C “has never proved effective against coronavirus”. “Kiwis actually provide more vitamin C than lemons, so if this theory was correct, lemons wouldn’t be the fruit to consume,” the said. The World Health Organization’s recommendations include washing hands regularly and thoroughly, coughing and sneezing into a disposable tissue, and staying at home if you feel unwell. Some posts incorrectly claim that drinking water and lemon can fight not just COVID-19, but also cancer. “Hot lemon can kill cancer cells!” reads a post on the Facebook page of a “health coach” in Ghana with more than 60,000 followers. The post recommends drinking hot water with a lemon “cut into three parts” in order to “release the anticancer medicine”. Health organisations say there is little evidence to support alternative or herbal cancer treatments, and warn they can cause harmful side effects. Contacted by AFP, Nicolas Boisel, a hematologist at Saint-Louis hospital in Paris, said there was “no proof” that drinking hot water and lemon could cure cancer. “Derivatives of lemon, like many other plants, have been shown to exhibit anti-cancer activity. That probably explains the confusion,” he said. The posts attribute the false claims to “Laila Ahmadi from China, Faculty of Medical Sciences, Zanjan University”. While there is no such university in China, a Google search revealed a “Leila Ahmadi” working at the department of midwifery at Zanjan University of Medical Sciences in Iran. According to the university's website, Ahmadi is a lecturer and holds a master’s degree in midwifery. AFP contacted her but has not yet received a reply. Posts also mention a “Professor Chen Horin, CEO of the Beijing Military Hospital”, who says that that drinking lemon and warm water “can save your life”. AFP found no trace of the professor. The posts also claim that the coronavirus disease “appears to be caused by the fusion of the gene into a snake and a bat”. The novel coronavirus is thought to have come from bats, but researchers think it might have spread to humans via another animal. Chinese health officials have said the virus likely emerged from a market in the central city of Wuhan that sold wild animals as food. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/consuming-silver-particles-will-not-prevent-or-treat-novel-coronavirus,Posts circulating on Facebook claim that colloidal silver -- silver particles in liquid -- can prevent or treat the novel coronavirus. This is false; US regulators say it is not safe for use against any disease. “Colloidal Silver kills the Coronavirus! I take it every morning & give it to my pets,” says one post. “Colloidal silver beats the corona virus: clinical documentation,” says another post, which links to a website advertising colloidal silver products. The post also includes an image that says “colloidal silver kills over 650 pathogens including the coronavirus.” Other posts, such as this one, advertise a colloidal silver product and allege that it can be used as “a shield against the COVID-19 virus,” referring to the disease caused by the novel coronavirus, which has killed more than 5,000 people worldwide. But Dr Helene Langevin, director of the National Center for Complementary and Integrative Health, a US National Institutes of Health (NIH) division, said these claims are inaccurate. “There are no complementary products, such as colloidal silver or herbal remedies, that have been proven effective in preventing or treating this disease (COVID-19), and colloidal silver can have serious side effects,” Langevin said in an emailed statement. “If you believe you have been exposed to, or infected with, the coronavirus, immediately contact a medical professional.” The NIH website warns against taking the substance as a dietary supplement. “In fact, colloidal silver can be dangerous to your health,” the website says. Side effects can include a bluish-gray skin discoloration and poor absorption of some medicines, including antibiotics, according to the NIH.  On March 9, 2020, the US Food and Drug Administration and the Federal Trade Commission filed joint warning letters to seven companies for selling fraudulent products claiming to treat COVID-19, including a vendor peddling colloidal silver. The companies were given 48 hours to correct their violations and report back to the agencies. The toxic properties of silver are outlined on the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention website, which says that people who breathe or consume silver for long periods of time can be susceptible to skin discoloration. AFP Fact Check has investigated more than 100 false and misleading claims about the novel coronavirus. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/no-evidence-drinking-tea-can-cure-or-relieve-symptoms-covid-19-doctors-say,The post, that credits US-based news organisation CNN as the source, was shared widely on WhatsApp among Sri Lankan users. Below is a screenshot of the misleading WhatsApp message: The message reads in part: "Breaking news from CNN. Dr Li Wenliang, China's hero doctor who was punished for telling the truth about corona virus and later died due to the same disease, had documented casefiles for research purposes and had in casefiles proposed a cure that would significantly decrease the impact of the COVID-19 virus on the human body. "The chemical Methylxanthine, Theobromine and Theophylline stimulate compounds that will ward off the virus in a human with at least an average immune system. Whats more shocking is that these complex words that were difficult for people in China to understand is actually called tea in India." Dr Li Wenliang was an ophthalmologist working in the Chinese city of Wuhan who died in February, 2020 after contracting COVID-19. Before his death, he was one of a group of doctors in Wuhan who shared posts on social media warning of a SARS-like virus spreading in the city in December, as reported by AFP here. Methylxanthine, theobromine and theophylline are all stimulants and caffeine derivatives, commonly found in tea.   Similar posts were also shared on Facebook here, here, here, here and here.  A similar claim was also reported by Sri Lanka’s TNL television network during its evening news bulletin on March 24, 2020. The claim is false. A keyword search on both Google and the CNN website for the alleged report cited in the misleading posts yielded no results. Dr. Jayaruwan Bandara, director of the Sri Lanka Medical Research Institute, told AFP by phone on March 26, 2020 that while tea may strengthen immunity, there is “no research” on the benefits of drinking tea for COVID-19 patients.  He said: “While drinking tea can be beneficial for one’s health, it cannot be touted as a preventive measure or a treatment in the case of COVID-19. The only way to minimise infection as recognised by other international health agencies, is social distancing, following proper hand hygiene and refraining from touching one’s eyes, mouth and nose.”  A spokeswoman for Sri Lanka National Science Foundation also said there was no evidence to suggest tea can "alleviate or prevent COVID-19 infections". During a phone conversation with AFP on March 26, 2020, she said: “The three chemical compounds mentioned in the claim are mostly found in green tea due to the difference in the way it is processed. The antioxidants in green tea can be good sources to provide certain conditionings to the body in specific situations. But so far, there is no study done, clinically or microbiologically to ascertain if tea can alleviate or prevent COVID-19 infections.”  The WHO also states in the Q&A section of its website here, that “there is no evidence that current medicine can prevent or cure the disease”.   Dr. Ashan Pathirana, the registrar at Sri Lanka’s Health Promotion Bureau (HPB) told AFP on March 25, 2020 that “the circulation of false information relating to various COVID-19 ‘cures’ without a scientific basis, can have grave repercussions”.  “While there is no harm to health by consuming tea, these types of information circulated among vulnerable masses creates a sense of false security, which can be deadly in itself,” he said. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/police-dismissed-claims-hoax-which-were-based-old-story,The articles have been shared more than 10,000 times in recent weeks, including here, here and here. They claim followers of a prophet drank Dettol to protect themselves from the novel coronavirus and other diseases, leading to the death of 59 people. The claims are accompanied by an image of a man pouring what appears to be Dettol into a woman’s mouth. A reverse image search reveals the picture is genuine but is linked to news reports in South Africa (see here and here) from December 2016, three years before the new coronavirus emerged. Furthermore, none of the publications make any mention of fatalities. South African newspaper Daily Sun identified the man as Rufus Phala, a "prophet" who told his congregation that drinking the antiseptic liquid would heal them. It quotes Phala saying at the time: “I know Dettol is harmful, but God instructed me to use it. I was the first one to drink it.” The hoax articles repeat these words. Phala's actions were criticised as an "unnatural habit" by the health department, which called on church leaders to investigate.  Dettol South Africa also responded at the time, advising the product was for external use only, warning that ingestion could be dangerous. "We have been in contact with Prophet Rufus Phala and have asked him to stop this practice," the statement read.  AFP was unable to verify if the bottle Phala gave to his congregants genuinely contained Dettol. Responding to AFP, police spokesman Brigadier Vishnu Naidoo dismissed the claims as false and denied any investigations into the deaths of 59 people linked to the consumption of Dettol. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/hot-air-saunas-hair-dryers-wont-prevent-or-treat-covid-19,The video appears here, here and here on Facebook and was widely viewed here before YouTube removed it for violating its standards. But it still exists here and here on the site, asserting that people can kill the novel coronavirus by breathing in hot air in a sauna or desert environment. “Breathing deeply for just a few minutes in any of these hot locations will kill a high percentage of any coronavirus that happens to be invading the upper respiratory system. And a second or third exposure about an hour apart will kill the rest,” says the video’s narrator. “No desert or sauna available? No problem. The common, widely available hand-held blow dryer, used for drying hair, contains a heating element and a fan that instantly deliver forced hot air temperatures that will kill coronavirus even faster,” the speaker says. The video cites this World Health Organization (WHO) page and this article abstract for information about the temperature at which heat kills the novel coronavirus. But both are about the effect of heat on SARS-CoV -- another coronavirus that was first reported in 2003 -- in laboratory testing, not in a person who had been infected. The narrator in the video is identified as Dr. Dan Lee Dimke. This website says a person by that name has a PhD in education -- a description also repeated in an “About the Author” section on Amazon -- and that he is the CEO of Future World Corporation. This section of Future World’s website, which links to the video and provides a transcript, includes the disclaimer: “This procedure presented in this video is NOT a cure for coronavirus! It has not yet been endorsed by any health authority.” Dr. Benjamin Neuman, an expert in coronaviruses who chairs the Biological Sciences department at Texas A&M University-Texarkana, said the sauna, desert and hair dryer methods would not be effective. “Breathing from saunas or a hair dryer would not have any effect on preventing or treating coronavirus, and both are downright weird,” Neuman told AFP by email, adding that relying on desert air for that purpose is “equally insane.” “There isn't any strong evidence connecting environmental temperature to the transmission of coronavirus -- it's more about how long you spend in close proximity to an infected person,” he said. “I could think of as many reasons why it would potentially exacerbate an infection as reasons why it might help.” Dr. Karine Le Roch -- a professor of cell biology at the University of California, Riverside -- echoed Neuman’s analysis. “So far there is ABSOLUTELY no evidence that the COVID-19 virus can be treated via heat,” Le Roch told AFP by email. Regarding using a hair dryer, “there is ABSOLUTELY no scientific evidence that it can prevent you from catching COVID-19 or treating the novel coronavirus,” she added. The WHO says current evidence indicates that the novel coronavirus “can be transmitted in ALL AREAS, including areas with hot and humid weather.” None of the methods advocated in the video appear on the WHO’s page offering advice to the public about the virus.  The US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) says on its novel coronavirus frequently asked questions page: “It is not yet known whether weather and temperature impact the spread of COVID-19.” None of the methods suggested in the video appear on the CDC’s page on how to protect against the virus, nor this page about caring for yourself if you are sick. The novel coronavirus originated in China in late 2019 but it has spread globally, killing more than 9,000 people, wreaking economic havoc from Asia to Europe and the United States in a public health crisis that governments are struggling to halt. AFP Fact Check has debunked more than 130 instances of rumors, myths or misinformation about the novel coronavirus. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/scientists-israel-are-still-working-developing-vaccine-covid-19,The claim appears in this Facebook post that has been shared more than 750 times since it was published on March 16, 2020. The caption says: “Ma Isreal ???? No more corona viruse death. (sic)” The image comprises three different pictures. One is a vial labelled “Coronavirus Vaccine” and the other two feature scientists in a laboratory. The following text is superimposed: “NO MORE CORONA VIRUS DEATH: Finally they have discovered vaccine for Corona viruses. COVID-19.” Multiple versions of the post, like these here and here, have been shared more than a thousand times on Facebook.  However, as debunked previously by AFP's fact-checkers in Sri Lanka, the image of the vial in the misleading Facebook posts is a stock photo from Shutterstock. The caption on Shutterstock reads: "Coronavirus vaccine vial with injection syringe at the background." Regarding the claim itself,  a press release issued by Israel’s MIGAL institute on February 27, 2020, says it “has achieved a scientific breakthrough that will lead to the rapid creation of a vaccine against Coronavirus”.  “This possibility was identified as a by-product of MIGAL’s development of a vaccine against IBV (Infectious Bronchitis Virus), a disease affecting poultry, whose effectiveness has been proven in pre-clinical trials,” reads the statement. The institute says it has made the required genetic adjustments needed to adapt the vaccine to COVID-19 and is working to achieve safety approvals that will enable in-vivo testing. In a YouTube video posted on March 2, a lead researcher at the MIGAL Research Institute told CBN Israel that in a few weeks they would be able to start pre-clinical trials -- not that the vaccine had been discovered, as the misleading post claims. “In a matter of days we are going to begin the production here, we are going to set up all the production process for the human version of the vaccine and we believe that in a matter of a few weeks, up to three months, we are going to have enough vaccines to begin to initiate the pre-clinical and clinical trials,” said Itai Bloch, lead researcher in computational chemistry at MIGAL.  The World Health Organisation (WHO) says there is currently no vaccine and no specific antiviral medicine to prevent or treat COVID-19.  “However, those affected should receive care to relieve symptoms. People with serious illness should be hospitalised. Most patients recover thanks to supportive care”, is one piece of advice found on the WHO website. As of March 20, the novel coronavirus has claimed more than 10,000 lives. Pharmaceuticals and research labs across the world are racing to find vaccines and treatments for the new coronavirus, using a variety of different technologies, as reported by AFP. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/image-has-circulated-reports-about-china-testing-potential-covid-19-vaccine-has-not-been-approved,The image was published here on Facebook on March 7, 2020. It features one photo of an individual wearing a white gown administering an injection into the arm of another person dressed in military fatigues. It also features a second image of seven people dressed in military fatigues and masks.  Below is a screenshot of the misleading post on Facebook: The English and Chinese text in the image reads: “First shot of Covid-19 vaccine developed by China. The postgraduate research team leader took the first shot. The world’s first new coronavirus vaccine was injected into the left arm of the lead researcher, Dr Chen Wei, today. Seven medical volunteers, all members of the Communist Party also received the new Coronavirus vaccine. State Council Vice Premier Sun Chunlan visited Chen Wei and the expertise team members.” COVID-19 was first detected in the Chinese city of Wuhan in December 2019. It has since spread worldwide, killing at least 13,000 and infecting 300,000 others, according to this AFP report dated March 22, 2020.  The image was also shared here, here, here, here and here on Facebook, here, here, here and here on Twitter and here on Instagram, alongside a similar claim. The claim is misleading. Chinese state media organisation The People’s Daily published this tweet on March 5, 2020 which labels the claim “FAKENEWS”, alongside a link to this post on its Facebook page. Did Chinese PLA medics test a coronavirus vaccine on themselves? #FAKENEWS. Clinical trials remain underway and this is what the real story is: https://t.co/IxrdGlerZt pic.twitter.com/G9BwnEHsvD  The Facebook post reads, in part: “PLA medics are not testing #COVID19 vaccines on themselves, as some would have you believe.  “Photos of a female PLA medic getting a shot have gone viral on the Internet and have made many people wonder if the Chinese PLA is testing a coronavirus vaccine on themselves... the human clinical trial assumption is simply fake news.” The post was published alongside a photo identical to that seen in the misleading image. The People’s Daily states the photo shows Chen Wei, an academician at China’s People's Liberation Army, receiving a shot for “strengthening immunity” before her departure to Wuhan to join the aid effort. Below is a screenshot of the Facebook post: Below is screenshot comparison of the photo from the misleading Facebook post (L) and the photo from the People’s Daily Facebook post (R): This Global Times report dated March 4, 2020 states Chen was sent to Wuhan, and “achieved a major breakthrough in developing a vaccine to the novel coronavirus”. The report states, in part: “The military medical expert team has worked in Wuhan, the coronavirus epicenter, for more than a month, and the team led by Chen Wei, academician at the People's Liberation Army (PLA) Academy of Military Medical Sciences, is seizing every minute and second and focusing all efforts on this emergency scientific research”. China announced on March 17, 2020 that it will start human trials for a COVID-19 vaccine manufactured by Chen’s team. This Global Times report published on the same date reads in part: “The coronavirus vaccine developed by Chen's team passed the registration review of clinical research and was approved for clinical trial on Monday night.” “After arriving at Wuhan, Chen Wei, a Chinese military major general, and her team launched pharmacy, pharmaceutical and toxicological research on COVID-19 vaccine in cooperation with local companies, based on their previous successful experiences in developing Ebola vaccine.”  “Chen, the military scientist, was quoted as saying in the report that the vaccine has been tested on safety, effectiveness and quality control and is prepared for massive production. And the biotechnology firm has started to recruit volunteers for the vaccine.” The World Health Organization (WHO) has said there is currently no medicine that can prevent or treat COVID-19. The Q&A section of its website reads, in part: “To date, there is no vaccine and no specific antiviral medicine to prevent or treat COVID-2019… Possible vaccines and some specific drug treatments are under investigation. They are being tested through clinical trials. WHO is coordinating efforts to develop vaccines and medicines to prevent and treat COVID-19.” Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://www.boomlive.in/health/does-drinking-alcohol-prevent-coronavirus-6935,A newspaper clipping from Hindi daily Dopehar Ka Saamna suggesting that consumption of alcohol will keep the Coronavirus at bay is misleading. The headline of the article when translated from Hindi reads "Why cry now? Corona will be packed with one peg of alcohol" (Translated from: अब कैसा रोना! एक पेग में पैक होगा कोरोना! The Shiv Sena mouthpiece published this article on February 14, 2020 stating that the recent strain of Coronavirus is 'allergic to alcohol.'  The clipping is viral with the caption "People who consume alcohol will not be affected by Coronavirus" (Translated from "दारू पीने वालों को नही होगा कोरोना वायरस") Multiple users on Facebook also shared the clipping.  The article is on the front page of the February 14 edition.   Read the archived version of the story here.  BOOM also received this claim on its WhatsApp helpline for authenticating the veracity of the news.  Also Read: Can Avoiding Ice Creams And Cold Drinks For 90 Days Prevent Coronavirus? The article mentions that researchers have suggested alcohol for keeping the virus away. The headline and the first paragraph of the article indicate that consuming alcohol will also keep the Coronavirus away. It is not clear whether this article is satirical as the lede and the headline mention drinking of alcohol while further in the story the article mentions disinfectants.  The article also mentions that the virus is transmitted within 15 seconds. No such theory about the time taken for transmission of the virus exists currently.   The World Health Organization (WHO) has published a list of myth busters around COVID-19 along with listing a few hygienic practices to prevent the transmission of the virus.  The WHO does mention the role of alcohol in tackling the Coronavirus but only when it is found in handwashes and hand rubs but does not mention the consumption alcohol to fight COVID-19.  The 2019-novel Coronavirus which has caused the COVID-19 has so far claimed 2012 lives across mainland China, France, Hong Kong, Japan, Philippines, and Taiwan and has been positively confirmed in over 75,000 people across the world.  There has been multiple misinformation around the ongoing Coronavirus. Misinformation around the sources, prevention and cure of the 2019-nCoV is rampantly circulated on social media.  BOOM has been actively debunking all the misinformation surrounding the recent outbreak of the Coronavirus.  #Thread🚨: Since the outbreak of #CoronaVirus, we have debunked #FakeNews around the novel Coronavirus. A WhatsApp forward is viral falsely claiming @MoHFW_INDIA has issued an emergency notification. (1/n) #CoronaVirusFacts @WHO https://t.co/0lbBu7FIfO Also Read: Were Chinese Non-Muslims Offering Friday Prayers To Prevent Coronavirus?     ,
https://www.boomlive.in/tiktok-video-on-coronavirus-goes-viral-as-doctor,A video clip of a man sharing false information on Coronavirus has gone viral on social media. The viral clip, made on video-sharing social media app TikTok, is accompanied by a message that reads 'Some important information from Kasturba Hospital corona chief Doctor. Please listen carefully and follow if you have any symptoms. Please Share maximum'. BOOM found that, both, the information shared in the video and caption accompanying it are false.  The 30-second-long video shows a man, with a face mask on, saying 'According to information till now, Coronavirus stays in the throat for four days before infecting the lungs. This leads to coughing, throat infection and pain. If the infected person drinks a lot of water, gargles with salt-and-vinegar hot water, Coronavirus can be cured. Please share this widely. Help save someone's life'. Also read False: Salt Or Vinegar Warm Water Gargle Eliminates The Coronavirus     Watch the video below and check its archived version here. Some important information fromKasturba Hospital corona chief Doctor☝Please listen carefully and follow if you have any symptoms.Please Share maximum.#AsimRiaz#COVIDー19 #KallaSohnaNai pic.twitter.com/MvmdYUHzco     Also read Message Claiming Coronavirus Can Last Up To 8 Hours In Air Is Misleading Similar claims have also been shared from several Twitter handles earlier too.  Another simple way to combat #CoronaVirus pic.twitter.com/BspNMrFFHp    Just a friendly reminder. In addition to washing hands, keeping distance to wearing mask:1. Drink warm water often2. Gargle with warm salted water a few times a day.#CoronaVirus #XRPcommunity #XRPtheStandard pic.twitter.com/bpLbZs9ucK  Also read Coronavirus LIVE Update: India's Cases Rise To 492 Fact Check The viral claim that gargling with hot salt-vinegar water helps cure Coronavirus has been debunked earlier too.  BOOM checked the official recommendations of World Health Organization (WHO) under 'Protection Measures for Everyone' and did not find 'gargling' or 'drinking hot water' in the list. Further, an AFP Fact Check mentions that gargling with hot water is not a remedy for novel coronavirus, a dreaded disease that has killed 17,156 worldwide and 9 in India till now. The viral clip meanwhile led BOOM to the original TikTok account - that of Subhasha Yadav - where the video was first shared. Yadav has made several TikTok videos related to Coronavirus, as can be seen from his feed.     Watch the original video here. Subhasha Yadav had lip-synced a pre-recorded message for this viral clip. When we traced the source of the pre-recorded audio clip, BOOM found a total of 6,165 videos with the same message. The videos can be viewed here. BOOM also contacted Dr Chandrakant Pawar, Public Relations Officer at Kasturba hospital to get more information on the video. We could not reach him. We will update this report as soon as we hear from him.      ,
https://factcheck.afp.com/gargling-warm-salt-water-or-vinegar-does-not-prevent-coronavirus-infection-health-experts-say,The claim was published in this Facebook post on March 14, 2020. The post features a graphic image and texts that reads: “Corona virus before it reaches the lungs it remains in the throat for four days and at this time the person begins to cough and have throat pains. If he drinks water a lot and gargling with warm water & salt or vinegar eliminates the virus. Spread this information because you can save someone with this information.” Below is a screenshot of the misleading post: The same graphic can be found on Facebook here, here, here, here, here, here, here, here, here, here, here, here, here, here, here, here, and here alongside a similar claim. The claim is false; while gargling is a common treatment for a sore throat, there is no evidence to suggest that it would eliminate or prevent infection from COVID-19. The official recommendations of the World Health Organization (WHO), as well as those of the health authorities of the United States, Canada, UK and Australia, do not list gargling as an effective treatment for COVID-19. “While some western, traditional or home remedies may provide comfort and alleviate symptoms of COVID-19, there is no evidence that current medicine can prevent or cure the disease,” reads WHO’s website. There is also no evidence to support the claim that the coronavirus “remains in the throat for four days” before reaching the lungs. WHO states the COVID-19 incubation period, which is the time between catching the virus and showing symptoms of the disease, ranges from 1 to 14 days, but is most commonly around five days. Brandon Brown, a professor at the University of California Riverside’s Center for Healthy Communities, also told AFP by email that gargling with warm water is a common remedy for sore throat in general, not for the novel coronavirus in particular. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/health-authorities-warn-false-covid-19-prevention-tips-online,Error fetching data,
https://factcheck.afp.com/new-misinformation-circulates-online-asia-about-creation-vaccine-and-drug-covid-19?fbclid=IwAR3ZkV_A-JcfvQjdu8rDDxfD6Bsyd9zHJdMMk3dC9BnHzIa43J5XrtJoUv8,Error fetching data,
https://factcheck.afp.com/chinese-donation-consisted-general-medical-supplies-help-fight-covid-19,Error fetching data,
https://factcheck.afp.com/these-10-tips-preventing-covid-19-contain-false-information,Error fetching data,
https://factcheck.afp.com/misleading-coronavirus-information-falsely-attributed-johns-hopkins,Error fetching data,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/no-palm-oil-not-a-simple-solution-to-coronavirus/,We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://www.factcheck.org/2020/04/facebook-users-wrongly-tie-dog-vaccine-to-novel-coronavirus/, By Angelo Fichera Posted on April 22, 2020 A viral image on Facebook falsely suggests a vaccine exists for the novel coronavirus by referencing a photo of a vaccine for a coronavirus that infects dogs. The two viruses are not the same.  Facebook users are spreading a photo of a vaccine for canine coronavirus to wrongly suggest that a vaccine exists for the novel coronavirus now infecting humans around the world. “Now this was 2001 tell me why 19 years later they say there is no vaccine,” text in the viral image reads. The image was shared in various corners of Facebook, including in a group dedicated to the QAnon conspiracy theory. One user’s popular post claimed that a “CORONA VIRUS VACCINE EXIST SINCE 2001″ and “WE ARE BEING PLAYED BY THOSE ON THE TOP.”  But the vaccine label in the photo clearly states “Canine Coronavirus Vaccine.” Like other instances of misinformation that have appeared since the outbreak began, the posts advance a false claim that centers on the term “coronavirus.” The term refers to a family of viruses, but they’re not all the same. The novel coronavirus, or SARS-CoV-2 — which causes COVID-19 — was first reported in China in late 2019. The product in the viral photo is Nobivac 1-Cv, a vaccine sold by a subsidiary of Merck & Co. It protects dogs from the canine coronavirus, or CCV, a virus that typically causes a mild gastroenteritis, or inflammation in the intestines, in infected dogs. It was first identified in 1971. As we wrote when debunking similar posts dealing with a vaccine for cows, experts say it is not safe for humans to attempt to vaccinate themselves with animal vaccines. Editor’s note: FactCheck.org is one of several organizations working with Facebook to debunk misinformation shared on social media. Our previous stories can be found here. Fenner’s Veterinary Virology (Fifth Edition). “Chapter 24 – Coronaviridae.” Academic Press. 2017. “Nobivac Canine 1-Cv.” Merck Animal Health. Accessed 22 Apr 2020. “Q&A on the Coronavirus Pandemic.” FactCheck.org. 18 Mar 2020. Q: Is one day isolation sufficient to stop forward transmission of COVID-19?  A: People with COVID-19 could potentially transmit it to others well beyond a day after developing symptoms or testing positive. New guidance from the CDC advises people to isolate until they have been fever-free and with symptoms improving for at least 24 hours, and then take precautions for five days, which covers the period when “most people are still infectious.”,
https://leadstories.com/hoax-alert/2020/04/fact-check-doctors-say-not-true-that-woman-found-the-missing-link-for-coronavirus-treatment.html,Can the drug Diamox, often used as treatment for high-altitude sickness, cure coronavirus? No, that's not true: COVID-19 cannot be cured using the same drug that is often used to treat high-altitude sickness. A viral video raked up more than 4 million views with a woman making the claim that the drug acetazolamide (Diamox) can cure coronavirus. Doctors and experts in the field of high-altitude pulmonary edema (HAPE) have spoken out since the video went viral to shoot down the claim. It appeared as a video (archived here) put on YouTube on April 14, 2020, titled "Did she find the missing link for a Cornonavirus treatment? Her brain fluid leak led her right to it!" Click below to watch the video on YouTube: 

 The video has 4,184,649 views as of April 24, 2020, and she told her almost 10,000 YouTube subscribers "this video is in regards to a treatment for the coronavirus." Ava Green claimed that an injury she had suffered -- a brain fluid leak -- led her to think about the medication with which she was treated. Green said she had been prescribed acetazolamide, or Diamox, and said she "realized" it could be used to treat coronavirus patients. She said on the video that she previously had been treated for the brain-fluid leak, which caused low- and high-pressure headaches. For the high-pressure headaches, she said, Green was treated with Diamox. She said in the video that a light then went off, and she began to use Google to research what she believed would be a connection between Diamox and treating the coronavirus after learning about an interview with Dr. Cameron Kyle-Sidell. In the interview, Kyle-Sidell -- a physician trained in emergency medicine and critical care at Maimonides Medical Center in Brooklyn -- spoke about the parallels being similar between high-altitude sickness and coronavirus. He was interviewed by John Whyte, MD, MPH, the chief medical officer for WebMD on April 6, 2020. Here is that interview: 
 In this video, the two doctors discussed the intracacies of treating coronavirus patients, and Kyle-Sidell expressed his concern that ventilators were not effectively helping people diagnosed with COVID-19. Whyte asked Kyle-Sidell, "This is more like a high-altitude sickness. Is that right?" Kyle-Sidell replied "Yes." Green, in her video, said she needed "some type of medical something" to prove her hunch about Diamox, and then she cited an article published on Cureus.com referencing Acetazolamide. The article is titled: Acetazolamide, Nifedipine and Phosphodiesterase Inhibitors: Rationale for Their Utilization as Adjunctive Countermeasures in the Treatment of Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19). It reads, in part: Effective treatments for Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19) outbreak are urgently needed. While anti-viral approaches and vaccines are being considered immediate countermeasures are unavailable. The aim of this article is to outline a perspective on the pathophysiology of COVID-19 in the context of the currently available clinical data published in the literature. This article appreciates clinical data published on COVID-19 in the context of another respiratory illness - high altitude pulmonary edema (HAPE). Both conditions have significant similarities that portend pathophysiologic trajectories. Following this potential treatment options emerge. "Can we just do something with this information and share it?" Green asked on the video. As Green's claim went viral, doctors started warning that this is not a valid treatment for the coronavirus and explained why the HAPE treatment was not suitable for COVID-19. MDedge.com, for example, published an article on April 21, 2020, with the headline "Doctors push back on treating COVID-19 as HAPE." Dr. Luanne Freer -- an expert in high-altitude pulmonary edema (HAPE) and founder and director of Everest ER, a nonprofit seasonal clinic at the Mt. Everest base camp in Nepal -- directly knocked down any "similarities" between HAPE and the coronavirus. My goodness, they are so completely different." Freer then added: With COVID, we don't understand everything that's going on, but we know for sure it's an inflammatory process - not a pressure-related problem. I thought ... this could be so dangerous to load the medicines that we use when we're treating HAPE onto patients with COVID-19." Freer reached out to pulmonary intensivists with experience treating both HAPE and COVID-19 their reactions were published in High Altitude Medicine & Biology on April 13, 2020, even as the YouTube video continued to gain viewers. "COVID-19 Lung Injury is Not High Altitude Pulmonary Edema," by doctors Andrew M. Luks, Luanne Freer, Colin K. Grissom, Scott E. McIntosh, Robert B. Schoene, Erik R. Swenson, and Peter H. Hackett addressed the claims. The doctors wrote, "we feel it important to correct this misconception." As a group of physicians who have in some cases cared for patients with COVID-19 and in all cases cared for patients with HAPE and studied its pathophysiology and management, we feel it important to correct this misconception, as continued amplification of this message could have adverse effects on management of these patients," they wrote. Understanding the distinction between the pathophysiological mechanisms of these entities is critical for patient management. In most patients, HAPE can be treated with supplemental oxygen alone or descent to lower elevation when supplemental oxygen is not available. Raising the alveolar PO2 decreases pulmonary artery pressure, leading to resolution of the alveolar and interstitial edema and complete recovery within hours to a few days. In contrast, supplemental oxygen may improve hypoxemia in COVID-19 but will not resolve the underlying inflammation or lung injury. Only good supportive care including mechanical ventilation, quite often for long periods of time, allows some patients to survive until their disease resolves. HAPE, is a "fundamentally different phenomenon than what is seen in COVID-19-related ARDS, which involves viral-mediated inflammatory responses as the primary pathophysiological mechanism," the article insisted. According to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, there is not now a cure for the coronavirus, and there is currently no vaccine to prevent the disease, COVID-19. 
      See who is sharing it (it might even be your friends...) and leave the link in the comments.:
     Lead Stories is working with the CoronaVirusFacts/DatosCoronaVirus Alliance, a coalition of more than 100 fact-checkers who are fighting misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic. Learn more about the alliance here. Alexis Tereszcuk is a writer and fact checker at Lead Stories and an award-winning journalist who spent over a decade breaking hard news and celebrity scoop with RadarOnline and Us Weekly.As the Entertainment Editor, she investigated Hollywood stories and conducted interviews with A-list celebrities and reality stars.  Alexis’ crime reporting earned her spots as a contributor on the Nancy Grace show, CNN, Fox News and Entertainment Tonight, among others. 
    Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
      
    Spotted something? Let us know!.
     Please select all the ways you would like to hear from Lead Stories LLC: You can unsubscribe at any time by clicking the link in the footer of our emails. For information about our privacy practices, please visit our website. We use Mailchimp as our marketing platform. By clicking below to subscribe, you acknowledge that your information will be transferred to Mailchimp for processing. Learn more about Mailchimp's privacy practices here. 
       Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
        
        Spotted something?  Let us know!.
      ,
https://www.factcheck.org/2020/04/no-evidence-that-flu-shot-increases-risk-of-covid-19/, By Angelo Fichera Posted on April 27, 2020 | Updated on April 27, 2020 A claim being pushed on social media and by an organization skeptical of vaccines is using a military study to falsely suggest that the flu vaccine increases someone’s risk of contracting COVID-19. The study does not say that, and the Military Health System advises people to get the flu shot. Federal health officials are warning that the novel coronavirus outbreak could resurge in the fall, presenting a significant public health quandary: fighting both COVID-19 and the flu at the same time. Robert Redfield, director of the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, noted the importance of the flu vaccine in controlling the spread of influenza in a recent interview with the Washington Post. He said the flu shot “may allow there to be a hospital bed available for your mother or grandmother that may get coronavirus.” But social media posts are singing a different tune, cautioning against the flu shot by falsely suggesting that the vaccine increases the chances of getting COVID-19 by “36%.” The argument is being pushed in a post by Children’s Health Defense — an organization founded by Robert F. Kennedy Jr., known for his vaccine skepticism — headlined “Pentagon Study: Flu Shot Raises Risk of Coronavirus by 36% (and Other Supporting Studies).” The post, republished elsewhere, pointed to “peer-reviewed, published studies” to “prove” that advice offered by CNN anchor Anderson Cooper in March for people to get the flu shot “may have been the worst advice he could have given the public.” That’s wrong. First of all, experts say there has been no study connecting the flu shot with an increased risk of SARS-CoV-2, the novel coronavirus that causes COVID-19. The central study cited by the Children’s Health Defense is a 2019 Armed Forces Health Surveillance Branch study that probed the theory that “influenza vaccination may increase the risk of other respiratory viruses” — a concept known as “virus interference.” Edward Belongia, an infectious disease epidemiologist at the Marshfield Clinic Research Institute, told us that the theory rests on the idea that “if you get a flu infection, for example, maybe for some period of time your immune response to that flu infection reduces your risk of getting infected by some other virus.”  Belongia said virus interference has been the subject of speculation and some studies with mixed results, but there is ultimately little data to support it. A 2013 study he worked on, cited in the AFHSB study, found that “influenza vaccination was not associated with detection of noninfluenza respiratory viruses.” In fact, the AFHSB study concluded that its “overall results … showed little to no evidence supporting the association of virus interference and influenza vaccination.” The erroneous claim that the study shows a heightened risk for COVID-19 for those vaccinated for the flu hinges on the study’s suggestion that vaccinated individuals appeared more likely to get “coronavirus.” But the study looked at four types of seasonal coronaviruses that cause common colds, not SARS-CoV-2. What’s more, Belongia said, the results in the study that indicate a flu-vaccinated person has an increased likelihood of testing positive for a seasonal coronavirus do not appear to be adjusted for age groups or seasons. Those factors could affect someone’s chances of getting a specific virus, regardless of whether or not they’ve been vaccinated for the flu. Different viruses affect different age groups and circulate at different times, he said. “It can be easily explained just by random variation and the fact that they didn’t adjust for confounding variables.” The Military Health System, of which the AFHSB is a part, noted in a statement to FactCheck.org that the study used data collected two years before the emergence of COVID-19 and looked at the seasonal coronaviruses — “impacting children and adults with no serious complications” — which “do not have the potential for epidemic or pandemic spread.” “The study does not show or suggest that influenza vaccination predisposes in any way, the potential for infection with the more severe forms of coronavirus, such as COVID-19,” the MHS said. Furthermore, the statement said, “it’s also important to note the study found evidence of significant protection by influenza vaccination against not only multiple forms of the flu, but other, very serious non-influenza viruses, such as parainfluenza, Respiratory Syncytial Virus (RSV), and non-influenza virus coinfections. It remains essential for people to obtain the seasonal flu shot each year as it becomes available.” There have been some results suggestive of virus interference, which the Children’s Health Defense cites in its post. But none of the studies referenced assessed risks of the flu shot when it comes to COVID-19. For example, Sharon Rikin, an assistant professor of medicine at Albert Einstein College of Medicine and Montefiore Medical Center, said in an email that a 2018 study she worked on “showed an association with flu vaccination and a slightly higher risk of non-flu acute respiratory infections (such as the common cold) in children. However, this association was not seen in adults.” “In medicine, we are always weighing the risks and benefits of treatments. In this case, we know that the flu vaccine is safe and effective to reduce illness and death among children and adults every year,” Rikin added. “We have not studied the association between flu vaccination and risk of COVID-19. Fortunately, COVID-19 is typically not causing significant illness in children. However, preventing illness and death from flu still remains extremely important for children.” Rikin said “just because we found an association between flu vaccines and acute respiratory infections does not mean that the flu vaccine actually caused there to be a higher risk of infections.” She said the group struggled to find a “biologically plausible explanation” and that while “there is a small body of literature that hypothesizes that the phenomenon of shifts in viral prevalence could be caused by viral interference,” there is not “strong empirical evidence of this occurring.” Belongia told us that, ultimately, the evidence of virus interference through such studies “is weak and inconclusive.” “Overall, we do not see evidence of virus interference that is sufficient to raise concerns about flu vaccination and COVID-19 risk,” he said. “Serious COVID-19 disease occurs primarily in adults, and we do not have evidence of flu vaccine causing virus interference in adult age groups.” He said that getting the flu shot, if anything, is especially important because of potential problems posed by the combination of the flu and COVID-19, both for the health care system and individuals. Likewise, Richard Ellison, a professor of medicine at the University of Massachusetts Medical School and hospital epidemiologist at UMass Memorial Medical Center, told us in an email that “getting the flu itself carries very significant morbidity and potentially mortality — so we don’t want someone to get the flu in the first place.” “In addition, while having the flu may boost the immune system, it can significantly weaken someone’s overall health status, and make them more susceptible to complications should they be unfortunate enough to have both influenza and COVID-19 in the same year.” Update, April 27: We removed a reference to a 2017 study, which was cited by the Children’s Health Defense, and a quote from one of its authors, because the study’s methodology and veracity have been disputed. Editor’s note: FactCheck.org is one of several organizations working with Facebook to debunk misinformation shared on social media. Our previous stories can be found here. Belongia, Edward. Director, Center for Clinical Epidemiology & Population Health, Marshfield Clinic Research Institute. Email and phone interview with FactCheck.org. 24 Apr 2020. Ellison, Richard. Hospital epidemiologist, UMass Memorial Medical Center. Email to FactCheck.org. 23 Apr 2020. Military Health System. Email statement to FactCheck.org. 24 Apr 2020. “Remarks by President Trump, Vice President Pence, and Members of the Coronavirus Task Force in Press Briefing.” White House. 22 Apr 2020. Rikin, Sharon. Assistant professor of medicine, Albert Einstein College of Medicine and Montefiore Medical Center. Email to FactCheck.org. 24 Apr 2020. Sun, Lena H. “CDC director warns second wave of coronavirus is likely to be even more devastating.” Washington Post. 21 Apr 2020. Wolff, Greg G. “Influenza vaccination and respiratory virus interference among Department of Defense personnel during the 2017–2018 influenza season.” Vaccine. Vol. 38, Issue 2. 10 Jan 2020. Q: Is one day isolation sufficient to stop forward transmission of COVID-19?  A: People with COVID-19 could potentially transmit it to others well beyond a day after developing symptoms or testing positive. New guidance from the CDC advises people to isolate until they have been fever-free and with symptoms improving for at least 24 hours, and then take precautions for five days, which covers the period when “most people are still infectious.”,
https://www.factcheck.org/2020/04/conspiracy-theory-misinterprets-goals-of-gates-foundation/, By Saranac Hale Spencer Posted on April 14, 2020 A conspiracy theory falsely claims Bill Gates is plotting to use COVID-19 testing and a future vaccine to track people with microchips. The Gates Foundation has advocated for expanded testing and has funded vaccine research, but neither of those involves implanted microchips. The Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation has committed millions of dollars to research treatments and vaccines for COVID-19 as the pandemic continues to spread across the globe. Those endeavors are now fueling a conspiracy theory that falsely claims Bill Gates has plans to use the eventual vaccine to “track people.” That claim has circulated in conspiracy theory groups online over the last few weeks, but it recently graduated to a more mainstream audience. On April 6, Emerald Robinson, White House correspondent for the conservative website Newsmax, tweeted about Gates with a reference to another debunked conspiracy theory and concluded, “He basically controls global health policy. What’s the plan? Using vaccines to track people.” Two days later, Fox News host Laura Ingraham asked U.S. Attorney General William Barr about Gates favoring “what some would say, tracking mechanisms.” The claim appears to have developed after Gates participated in a March 18 forum on Reddit. There, he answered a question about maintaining businesses during the pandemic. Bill Gates, March 18: Eventually we will have some digital certificates to show who has recovered or been tested recently or when we have a vaccine who has received it. The following day, a website called Biohackinfo.com posted a story with the headline: “Bill Gates will use microchip implants to fight coronavirus.” It’s been shared more than 13,000 times on Facebook, according to data from CrowdTangle, and a YouTube video based on the story has been viewed more than 1.8 million times. The story cited Gates’ answer in the forum and then declared, “The ‘digital certificates’ Gates was referring to are human-implantable ‘QUANTUM-DOT TATTOOS.'” But that’s not true. It’s a mash-up of two unrelated things. First, digital certificates are used to send encrypted information over the internet, as in the common case of electronic signatures which are used to verify identity. They were officially defined by what is now called the Telecommunication Standardization Sector in 1988 and have always been virtual, not physical. When Gates mentioned their use in the forum, he was referring to digital certificates as part of an effort to create a digital platform that would expand home-based, self-administered testing for COVID-19, the Gates Foundation said in an email to FactCheck.org. He referred to the same effort to ramp up home testing at another point in the forum, saying, “The testing in the US is not organized yet. In the next few weeks I hope the Government fixes this by having a website you can go to to find out about home testing and kiosks… Whenever there is a positive test it should be seen to understand where the disease is and whether we need to strengthen the social distancing. South Korea did a great job on this including digital contact tracing.” South Korea, which has implemented an extensive testing system, created a website that showed information about where patients who tested positive for COVID-19 had been in order to alert others in the area. Although the information on the site is anonymous, there has been some criticism that it’s an invasion of privacy. Still, that’s a long way from “microchip implants.” The second part of the claim — and the one that likely led to the microchip assertion — is a reference to unrelated research that was funded by the Gates Foundation and published in December. In an effort to address the problem of poor record-keeping in “low-resource settings,” such as developing countries, that research proposed keeping a record of vaccination on a patient’s skin. It tested an invisible dye that could last up to five years and be read with a specially adapted smartphone. Kevin McHugh, a bioengineering professor at Rice University who worked on the study, told us by email that the ink couldn’t be used as a tracking device. “These markings were developed to provide a vaccination record and there is no ability to track anyone’s movements,” McHugh said. “This technology is only able to provide very limited (e.g. non-personalized) data locally. These markings require direct line-of-sight imaging from a distance of less than 1 foot. Remote or continuous tracking is simply not possible for a variety of technical reasons.” The Gates Foundation confirmed to us by email that this research is unrelated to any measures related to COVID-19 vaccines. So, this claim can be added to the heap of bogus conspiracy theories about microchip tracking and Bill Gates. Editor’s note: FactCheck.org is one of several organizations working with Facebook to debunk misinformation shared on social media. Our previous stories can be found here. Robinson, Emerald (@EmeraldRobinson). “The more you study this virus, the more you find the same name: Bill Gates. He’s the 2nd largest funder of WHO. He’s building 7 vaccine labs. Fauci. Tedros. Event 201. ID2020. He basically controls global health policy. What’s the plan? Using vaccines to track people.” Twitter. 6 Apr 2020. Ingraham Angle. Fox News. “Barr talks China’s global impact in exclusive ‘Ingraham Angle’ interview.” YouTube. 8 Apr 2020. Gates, Bill. “I’m Bill Gates, co-chair of the Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation. AMA about COVID-19.” Reddit. 18 Mar 2020. Wattendorf, Dan. Director of Innovative Technology Solutions, the Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation. “What it will take to make self-administered COVID-19 testing possible.” Gatesfoundation.org. 18 Mar 2020. McHugh, Kevin, et al. “Biocompatible near-infrared quantum dots delivered to the skin by microneedle patches record vaccination.” Science Translational Medicine. 18 Dec 2019. McHugh, Kevin. Bioengineering professor, Rice University. Email response to FactCheck.org. 8 Apr 2020. Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation representative. Email response to FactCheck.org. 9 Apr 2020. Fichera, Angelo. “New Coronavirus Wasn’t ‘Predicted’ In Simulation.” FactCheck.org. 29 Jan 2020. Q: Is one day isolation sufficient to stop forward transmission of COVID-19?  A: People with COVID-19 could potentially transmit it to others well beyond a day after developing symptoms or testing positive. New guidance from the CDC advises people to isolate until they have been fever-free and with symptoms improving for at least 24 hours, and then take precautions for five days, which covers the period when “most people are still infectious.”,
https://www.factcheck.org/2020/04/false-claim-of-deadly-coronavirus-vaccine-trial-in-africa/, By Angelo Fichera Posted on April 10, 2020 Posts across social media are falsely claiming that a vaccine trial for the novel coronavirus in Senegal resulted in the death of seven children. The video behind those claims does not show that. And there is no clinical trial for a potential vaccine currently taking place in Senegal.  There is no vaccine developed yet for the novel coronavirus, which causes COVID-19, though some clinical tests for potential vaccines are underway in the U.S. and China. But a falsehood circulating across social media platforms — spread through numerous posts, headlines and screenshots — is wrongly purporting that seven children in Senegal died after being given an experimental vaccine for the virus. “Mass vaccination for COVID-19 in Senegal was started yesterday (4/8) and the first 7 CHILDREN who received it DIED on the spot,” a Facebook post reads. An Instagram post from an account called “bye_bye_big_pharma” says that “CV vaccine tested in patients in Africa started yesterday. (4/8/2020) It was passed without any animal safety studies. 7 children died on the spot after injection.” That’s not true.  There is no clinical trial currently underway in that country, or anywhere in Africa, according to a list of vaccine candidates compiled for the scientific journal Nature Reviews Drug Discovery. As of April 8, there were 115 candidates worldwide — and while 78 were confirmed as active, only five are in the clinical trial phase. Those five trials are happening in the U.S. and China. The false claim appears to stem from a viral video that shows a crowd of people in a street near a police car. A French speaker in the video tells of a “serious scandal in Senegal.” Sharon Bell, an assistant professor of French translation at Kent State University, translated the video for FactCheck.org. The speaker claims that “a guy … went into a house to vaccinate children against the problem of Coronavirus, the COVID-19. He vaccinated seven people, children. Seven children. They immediately died. They dropped dead.” It further says the police are on the scene. But the speaker’s claims evidently were added to the original video, which told a very different story. AFP Senegal found the video in a late March news report in that country — and it didn’t say that anybody had died. Instead, the video appeared in a story about the alleged arrest of two individuals claiming they had vaccines. That video — which is in Wolof, a language spoken in Senegal — does not claim that any children died, according to Omar Ka, an associate professor of modern languages, linguistics and intercultural communication at the University of Maryland, Baltimore County. “The difference between the French version and the Wolof one is that the latter does not talk about children being killed,” Ka told us in an email. “It simply states that an individual was caught trying to vaccinate people for COVID-19 and he was chased away, finding refuge at the neighborhood leader’s (Chef de Quartier, in French) house.” Ka said that in the beginning of the French version, “you can clearly overhear the Wolof narrator, but he gets quickly overtaken by the French-speaking narrator.” The French version, he said, “definitely is not a translation of the Wolof version” — he said it adds more dramatic details, “talking about seven kids killed and the need in return to kill the individual.” Multiple government agencies told AFP Senegal that one Senegalese man (not two people) was briefly arrested on March 26 in Dalifort, an area in the country’s capital of Dakar, and that he was selling cosmetics and hadn’t actually tried to vaccinate anyone. An armed forces ministry spokesman said the mishap occurred because the man was wearing a health ministry T-shirt and jokingly said he had vaccines, causing a stir. Police found that he only had cosmetic products. One website in Ghana, ezone57.com, ran the video under the headline: “Coronavirus: COVID-19 Vaccine Killed 7 Children in Senegal(West Africa) [VIDEO].” That post garnered considerable attention, and its headline appeared in screenshots on Facebook, before the website took down the story and published another debunking the claim. The falsehood circulated amid news reports about controversial remarks made by two French doctors who suggested vaccine trials should be conducted in Africa. World Health Organization Director General Tedros Adhanom Ghebreyesus referred to those comments as “racist,” saying during an April 6 press conference that “Africa cannot and will not be a testing ground for any vaccine.” “We will follow all the rules to test any vaccines or therapeutics all over the world using exactly the same rule,” he said. “Whether it’s in Europe, Africa or wherever — we will use the same protocol.” “The hangover from a colonial mentality has to stop,” he said. Editor’s note: FactCheck.org is one of several organizations working with Facebook to debunk misinformation shared on social media. Our previous stories can be found here. Bell, Sharon. Assistant professor of French translation, Kent State University. Email to FactCheck.org. 9 Apr 2020. Le, Tung Than, et. al. “The COVID-19 vaccine development landscape.” Nature Reviews Drug Discovery. 9 Apr 2020. Faivre Le Cadre, Anne-Sophie. “Senegalese children did not die from a coronavirus vaccine (which does not yet exist).” AFP Fact Check. 10 Apr 2020.  Ka, Omar. Associate professor of modern languages, linguistics and intercultural communication, University of Maryland, Baltimore County. Email to FactCheck.org. 10 Apr 2020. “WATCH: The World Health Organization gives coronavirus update — April 6, 2020.” PBS NewsHour. YouTube. 6 Apr 2020. Q: Is one day isolation sufficient to stop forward transmission of COVID-19?  A: People with COVID-19 could potentially transmit it to others well beyond a day after developing symptoms or testing positive. New guidance from the CDC advises people to isolate until they have been fever-free and with symptoms improving for at least 24 hours, and then take precautions for five days, which covers the period when “most people are still infectious.”,
https://factcheck.afp.com/senegalese-children-did-not-die-coronavirus-vaccine-which-does-not-yet-exist,Error fetching data,
https://www.factcheck.org/2020/04/walmart-hasnt-adopted-staggered-shopping-based-on-age/, By Mitchell Aronoff Posted on April 7, 2020 A viral post circulating on Facebook falsely claims that Walmart, in response to the coronavirus pandemic, has instituted a “staggered shopping schedule” that allows only certain age groups on specific days. The store has started a weekly “senior shopping event,” but no other restrictions based on age. As the novel coronavirus spreads across the U.S., governments and public health experts are cautioning people to stay home, go out only when necessary, and keep a safe distance from other people to mitigate the impact of the pandemic. Some retail companies are adopting procedures to help deal with the crisis by limiting the number of shoppers in a store at one time and protecting at-risk patrons. But a viral post on Facebook falsely purports to be an announcement from Walmart, one of the largest retail chains, that a new policy has been instituted allowing only certain age groups to shop on specific days of the week. “Due to the COVID-19 pandemic, effective immediately Walmart is adopting a staggered shopping schedule as follows,” reads the post, which has been shared extensively on Facebook and bears the logos of Walmart and its members-only Sam’s Club. “We apologize for any inconeince: Monday Age 66+, Tuesday 56-65, Wednesday 46-55, Thursday 36-45, Friday 25-35, Saturday 24 and below, Sunday shopping emergency only” The misspelling of “inconvenience” is a hint that this announcement came from an unreliable source. Rebecca Thomason, a Walmart corporate communications senior manager, told us in an email that the information presented in the viral posts is “completely false.” Walmart has changed the hours at many of its stores, which are now open from 7 a.m. to 8:30 p.m. Some stores were previously open 24 hours or until midnight, although closing times vary by location. In a March 18 press release, the executive vice president and chief operating officer of Walmart U.S., Dacona Smith, said: “This will further help associates restock the shelves for customers while continuing to clean and sanitize the store.”  In addition, Smith said in the press release, “We know our older customers could be more vulnerable to the coronavirus and to better support them, Walmart is offering special shopping hours. From March 24 through April 28, Walmart stores will host an hour-long senior shopping event every Tuesday for customers aged 60 and older. This will start one hour before the store opens.” Walmart also has launched a policy that reduces crowding during the pandemic. In an April 3 press release, Smith announced: “[W]e will limit the number of customers who can be in a store at once. Stores will now allow no more than five customers for each 1,000 square feet at a given time, roughly 20 percent of a store’s capacity.”  Thomason, the Walmart communications senior manager, said the company is implementing other protocols to protect its customers and associates.  The company is encouraging people to socially distance while in stores, aided by signs and floor decals. It is installing sneeze guards at pharmacy lanes and checkout, and prohibiting employees with fever or other symptoms — determined by a temperature check and questionnaire — from working. Editor’s note: FactCheck.org is one of several organizations working with Facebook to debunk misinformation shared on social media. Our previous stories can be found here. “Social Distancing, Quarantine, and Isolation.” Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. Accessed April 6. Smith, Dacona. “Changes to Our Shopping Process to Encourage Social Distancing.” Walmart. 3 Apr 2020. Smith, Dacona. “Latest Walmart Store Changes to Support Associates and Customers.” Walmart. 18 Mar 2020. Thomason, Rebecca. Walmart corporate communications senior manager. Email to FactCheck.org. 6 Apr 2020.   Q: Is one day isolation sufficient to stop forward transmission of COVID-19?  A: People with COVID-19 could potentially transmit it to others well beyond a day after developing symptoms or testing positive. New guidance from the CDC advises people to isolate until they have been fever-free and with symptoms improving for at least 24 hours, and then take precautions for five days, which covers the period when “most people are still infectious.”,
https://factly.in/message-suggesting-that-alkaline-foods-can-kill-sars-cov-2-virus-is-fake/,A message is being widely shared on social media with a claim that, according to a research paper in the Journal of Virology (April 1991), eating alkaline foods, which have a pH level above 8.5, can kill the latest Coronavirus (SARS-CoV-2, which cause COVID-19). Let’s try to analyze the claim made in the post. Claim: Eating alkaline foods of pH level above 8.5 can kill the SARS-CoV-2 virus. Fact: The research paper published in 1991 talks about the MHV4 virus, not about the SARS-CoV-2 virus. Some of the pH levels given in the post are not correct. Also, there is no scientific evidence to prove that eating alkaline foods can kill the SARS-CoV-2 virus. Hence the claim made in the post is FALSE.    The 1991 research paper mentioned in the post can be found here. It can be read that it mentions about the ‘Mouse Hepatitis Virus type 4 (MHV4)’, not about the SARS-CoV-2 virus (which was first reported only in 2019). The pH scale ranges from 0 to 14. But, in the post, it can be seen that the pH levels of some foods are above 14. Also, the pH of lemon is around 2, not 9.9. Neither WHO nor the Government of India has suggested any alkaline-based diet to kill Coronavirus. In the Africa Check article, it can be read that Oyewale Tomori (Virology Professor with the WHO) said, “Coronavirus has nothing to do with the stomach, so how do these ‘alkaline foods’, like lemon, lime, avocado, and garlic, beat the virus? This claim should be ignored”. To sum it up, a message suggesting that ‘alkaline foods can kill SARS-CoV-2 virus’ is fake. Did you watch our new video?  Pingback: Alimentos alcalinos não ajudam a prevenir ou tratar a Covid-19 • Blog Potiguar Pingback: Alimentos alcalinos não ajudam a prevenir ou tratar a Covid-19 Pingback: Alimentos alcalinos não ajudam a prevenir ou tratar a Covid-19 – Jornal Periscópio – Mommies Organics FACTLY is one of the well known Data Journalism/Public Information portals in India. Each news story on FACTLY is backed by factual evidence/data from official sources that is either available in the public domain or that is collated/gathered/collected using tools such as the Right to Information (RTI).,
https://factcheck.afp.com/these-are-test-kits-made-south-korea-not-cure-covid-19,Error fetching data,
https://factcheck.afp.com/health-experts-say-there-no-evidence-eating-alkaline-foods-can-prevent-or-cure-covid-19,Error fetching data,
https://kathmandupost.com/columns/2020/03/18/stop-the-spread-of-fake-news,With over 180,000 confirmed cases worldwide, the World Health Organisation has already declared the novel coronavirus (SARS-CoV-2) outbreak as a pandemic. The virus has been rapidly spreading in 129 countries, causing a global crisis. Person to person transmission of the novel coronavirus occurs when we are in close contact with an infected person (within three feet distance, according to the WHO). The virus enters our body through respiratory droplets produced while coughing or sneezing. The virus may also remain on various surfaces and enter our body through our eyes, nose and mouth as we touch them with our contaminated hands. This is why public health experts have been emphasising the power of handwashing. At least twenty seconds of proper handwashing with soap and water can significantly minimise the risk of infection. Besides this, maintaining social distance and following good respiratory and personal hygiene are also necessary steps to protect yourself and others from getting infected. Our body's immune system is the shield that fights back against any infection and disease. When a pathogen enters our body, the immune system mobilises to combat the viral infection and produces antibodies. These antibodies are ultimately what provide immunity against various viruses. Prof Akiko Iwasaki, a virologist at Yale University, tweeted, 'Coronavirus is thirty times more deadly and almost two times more contagious than the flu and we do not have existing immunity to the coronavirus'. This is a unique virus with distinctive characteristics and it must be taken seriously. As the conversation about ways to prevent and treat coronavirus is ongoing, there are several myths and misconceptions making the rounds on the internet and propagated by self-proclaimed experts or trolls. A few days ago, there was a post on social media that spread misleading information that spicy noodles can prevent coronavirus. Another post claimed that drinking alcohol, and eating foods such as garlic, onion, and turmeric would prevent the viral infection. Hundreds of other social media users re-shared this information without validating if the information was coming from a reliable source.  Eating certain foods cannot prevent us from contracting Covid-19, but making simple diet and lifestyle modifications can certainly boost the immune system that helps us fight back against disease-causing pathogens.  Consuming a home-made and well-cooked nutritious balanced diet that includes a variety of carbohydrates, proteins, vitamin, minerals and fibre in your diet helps. So does drinking plenty of water. Similarly, loading up on fruits and vegetables rich in vitamin C, such as citrus fruits, tomatoes, amala, and broccoli helps boost the immune system. Vitamin C is a water-soluble vitamin and it is not produced or stored in the body, so it must be consumed regularly. This vitamin has numerous other benefits, like in iron absorption, healing of wounds, etc. Other foods such as spinach, garlic, ginger, turmeric, nuts and seeds, and yoghurt must also be included in the diet as they are rich in vitamins, minerals and antioxidants.  Although the virus can affect any age group, the severity of infection is greater among the elderly population and people with other chronic medical conditions such as diabetes, heart and lung diseases. So, their dietary needs must be highly prioritised and fulfilled to strengthen immunity. Regular exercise improves the body's overall physical and mental fitness, which helps in strengthening immunity. When a body does not get enough sleep, the production of antibodies and cells that fight infection is reduced. It is essential to get adequate rest every day. Smoking and consuming alcohol may reduce or disrupt normal immune system function, making one susceptible to several infections and diseases. Chronic smokers may also remain sick for a longer time than non-smokers. Therefore, it is best to avoid cigarette smoking and alcohol. One misinformation could be life-threating, while a single fact can be lifesaving. So, one must always ensure they are sharing evidence-based information and not hopping on the fake news bandwagon. Stay safe, hygienic, nutritious and healthy. Together we can protect each other and fight back against the spread of Covid-19. *** What do you think? Dear reader, we’d like to hear from you. We regularly publish letters to the editor on contemporary issues or direct responses to something the Post has recently published. Please send your letters to [email protected] with "Letter to the Editor" in the subject line. Please include your name, location, and a contact address so one of our editors can reach out to you. Sharma is a co-founder and CEO of Social Changemakers and Innovators (SOCHAI).,
https://factcheck.afp.com/trumps-idea-treat-covid-19-disinfectant-could-cause-deaths,Error fetching data,
https://factcheck.afp.com/philippine-authorities-warn-anti-viral-injection-has-not-yet-been-approved-treating-covid-19,Error fetching data,
https://www.factcheck.org/2020/04/lemon-juice-tea-does-not-cure-covid-19-in-israel-or-anywhere-else/, By Sydney Schaedel Posted on April 2, 2020 A post circulating on social media falsely claims that a blend of sodium bicarbonate and lemon juice will “eliminate” the novel coronavirus. The post also claims this “cure” has prevented any COVID-19 deaths in Israel — but more than 30 people have died of the disease there. As COVID-19, the disease caused by the novel coronavirus, spreads around the world, numerous false and misleading claims of “cures” for the virus are spreading on social media. A recent claim is from a post titled “In Israel No Death from COVID 19.”  It falsely states that the “cure” for COVID-19, “or the way to eliminate it,” has been discovered, and that it comes from Israel, where it says the virus “did not cause any death.” In reality, as of April 2, more than 6,800 people in Israel have tested positive for COVID-19, and 36 have died. Over 100 people were in serious condition and 83 were on life support. The post also claims that this “cure” is the reason that the “People of Israel is relaxed” about COVID-19. Actually, the Israeli government has issued emergency regulations that include reducing entry to the public space, imposing responsibility on employers, closing non-essential stores and imposing restrictions on public transport, as well as “home isolation” guidelines. The post’s “recipe” for the phony cure includes lemon and bicarbonate — short for sodium bicarbonate, or baking soda, which is commonly used as an antacid. “Mix and drink as hot tea every afternoon,” the post says. “The action of the lemon with hotter baking soda immediately kills the virus [and] completely eliminates it from the body.” This claim is baseless. According to the World Health Organization, “to date, there is no specific medicine recommended to prevent or treat the new coronavirus.” Krutika Kuppalli, an infectious diseases physician and fellow with the Johns Hopkins University Center for Health Security, confirmed this in an interview. “There’s no data that shows using lemon juice or hot tea or anything like that would kill a virus,” she said. Angela Rogers, assistant professor of medicine at the Stanford University Medical Center, noted in an email that “there is nothing that has been shown yet to kill or eliminate COVID-19 virus, and it’s still not clear whether any other therapies in the news (steroids, targeted immune modulators, azithromycin, hydroxychloroquine) are actually helpful.” Kuppalli said people can lower their risk of contracting the virus by washing their hands, covering their coughs and sneezes, maintaining distance from each other, and following public health measures that have been implemented in their area. We’ve reported on many falsehoods and misleading statements about the new coronavirus. See “A Guide to Our Coronavirus Coverage” for stories, videos and resources. Editor’s note: FactCheck.org is one of several organizations working with Facebook to debunk misinformation shared on social media. Our previous stories can be found here. “Coronavirus disease (COVID-19) advice for the public: Myth busters.” World Health Organization. Accessed 1 Apr 2020. “Live Updates//Netanyahu, Mossad Chief to Enter Quarantine After Health Minister Diagnosed With Coronavirus.” Haaretz. 2 Apr 2020. “The Novel Coronavirus: Emergency Regulations.” State of Israel Ministry of Health. Accessed 1 Apr 2020. Kuppalli, Krutika. Infectious diseases physician and fellow, Johns Hopkins University Center for Health Security. Telephone interview with FactCheck.org. 1 Apr 2020. Rogers, Angela. Assistant professor of medicine, Stanford University Medical Center. Email to FactCheck.org. 1 Apr 2020.   Q: Is one day isolation sufficient to stop forward transmission of COVID-19?  A: People with COVID-19 could potentially transmit it to others well beyond a day after developing symptoms or testing positive. New guidance from the CDC advises people to isolate until they have been fever-free and with symptoms improving for at least 24 hours, and then take precautions for five days, which covers the period when “most people are still infectious.”,
https://factcheck.afp.com/who-warns-against-self-medicating-covid-19-aspirin-lemon-juice-and-honey-remedy,Error fetching data,
https://factcheck.afp.com/these-are-test-kits-made-south-korea-not-cure-covid-19,Error fetching data,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/mar/06/viral-image/no-donald-trump-didnt-tweet-israel-has-coronavirus/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 Between attacks on former Vice President Joe Biden and former New York City Mayor Mike Bloomberg, President Donald Trump has lately been tweeting about the coronavirus.  But he didn’t tweet this: "Corona vaccine from Israel! Stock market up! Economy even stronger now! Besides US, Israel best at inventions: Judaism, olives. Wonderful vaccine, will stop Corona DEAD around world. Can’t make vaccines when being bombed, not have been possible without peace I created in Israel!"  A screenshot posted on Facebook on March 5 gives the impression that he did, at 8:41 a.m. on March 1, to be exact.  This post was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.)  Searching Twitter, we found no such tweet from Trump. Nor did he delete the tweet.  Trump has tweeted about vaccines, though. On March 2, for example, he wrote: "I am meeting with major pharmaceutical companies today at the White House about progress on a vaccine and cure. Progress being made!" Trump’s tweets draw media coverage, but searching online for the language that appears in the Facebook post we found no mention of anyone saying it.  We rate this Facebook post False. 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 Facebook post, March 5, 2020 Donald Trump tweet, March 2, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://www.boomlive.in/coronavirus-outbreak/false-different-types-of-tea-can-act-as-a-cure-for-covid-19-7506,Viral messages claiming that tea prepared with different ingredients is a tested cure for COVID-19, the deadly disease caused by the Coronavirus, are false.  The World Health Organization has stated that there has been no treatment approved nor any medical prevention protocol to tackle the COVID-19, so far.  The two messages making the claim are as follows:  1. Tea made with lemon and bicarbonate (baking soda) alkalize the immune system as it becomes acidic in the night and that Israel has no deaths as Israelis regularly drink this concoction.  The claim is false on two counts as there is no scientific evidence of this concoction changing the PH levels in the body and Israel has over 7,000 confirmed cases and 36 deaths  (so far) due to COVID-19 as reported by Johns Hopkins University.  2. The second message claims Dr Li Wenliang, the Chinese whistleblower doctor who first raised alarm bells about a new virus and who died in detention, had also found a cure for Coronavirus in the form of green tea which was actively being given to the patients in Wuhan.  The whistleblower who died due to COVID-19 in February had only informed about the emergence of a new virus and there is no evidence of him having found a cure for the Coronavirus. Furthermore, there is no scientific evidence stating that the compounds in green tea can cure COVID-19.   Both the posts are actively being shared on WhatsApp and Facebook. BOOM received these messages several times on its helpline numbers.  BOOM has debunked several posts in the past suggesting prevention and cures for the current outbreak of the novel coronavirus.  Also Read:Boiled Garlic Water For Treating Coronavirus? Not Really Also Read: Did Italians Throw Their Money On The Streets Due To COVID-19 Deaths? The WHO has repeatedly stated that medicines and vaccines are being developed and are being used on experimental basis to tackle COVID-19. The disease currently has no prescribed prevention or treatment protocol.  Claim: 'Drink a mixture of lemon and bicarbonate as hot tea which kills the virus and  alkalize the immune system as at night the body becomes acidic. Israelis are not worried and the country has no deaths as they drink this tea'.  The claim that the Israelis are not worried and that the country has no deaths is false. According to Johns Hopkins University's COVID-19 dashboard, the country has 36 deaths and over 7,000 cases as of April 3,2020. The health minister of Israel tested positive on April 2, 2020.  The claim that the mixture of lemon and baking soda (bicarbonate) kills the virus is not scientifically accurate. US-based fact-checking website Snopes debunked this claim earlier. Human body's normal pH levels are 7. pH levels decide the acidity or alkalinity of a solution. The human blood with a pH of 7.4 is alkaline whereas the stomach is acidic as it breaks down food and aids in digestion.  Lemons are rich in vitamin C whose effect on respiratory tract viruses has been actively debated over the years. The National Institutes of Health in the United States eventually stated that regular uptake of 200mg/day of vitamin C does not affect the common cold causing virus. A single lemon has merely 30 mg of vitamin C.  Furthermore, the body's pH levels are not that easily changed unless kept in optimum laboratory conditions or if a person is suffering from chronic health conditions like acidosis. Regular diet or intake of acid-rich foods have not been seen to change the body's acidic or alkaline levels. The claim that bicarbonate with lemon will have any effect on the current strain of Coronavirus is thus not backed by scientific research.  Claim: 'Dr Li. Wenliang had proposed a cure of methylxanthine, theobromine and theophylline stimulant compounds found in green tea which was given to patients in Wuhan' Dr. Li Wenliang was the whistleblower of the virus who was apprehended and put into prison after he raised his voice about the emergence of a new virus in China. He lost his life to Coronavirus in February but there is no evidence stating that he discovered a cure for COVID-19.  Alongside, these compounds that are found in green teas have their own properties but have not been scientifically or micro biologically proven to impact the coronavirus. Caffeine is a type of methylxanthine and helps in good airway control but has not been seen to affect viral infections. This concoction is also known to reduce drowsiness and fatigue but high consumption could also lead to headache and tremors.  There is no known cure for COVID-19 so far. The recovered cases are on case-to-case basis and depend on the individual's immune response. All the medications that are being used including anti-HIV drugs, are on an experimental basis and cannot be labelled as cures yet.  Also Read: Anti-HIV Drugs For COVID-19: What It Really Means  ,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/no-evidence-russian-president-putin-ordered-madagascars-covid-19-cure/,We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/nigerias-cov-herbal-cough-mixture-not-a-cure-for-covid-19/,The headline of an article circulating on social media claims that the Nigerian government has found a cure for Covid-19.  “Finally, Nigerian Government Finds Cure For Covid-19,” it reads. The article has been shared on Facebook more than 1,200 times and debated in close to 100 comments. Nigeria had nearly 6,000 confirmed cases of Covid-19 by 18 May 2020. Has the country now found a cure for the disease? The article itself does not mention a Covid-19 “cure”. It is about a memo from the permanent secretary of the federal health ministry, Abdulaziz Abdullahi, to the director general of the Nigerian National Agency for Food and Drug Administration and Control, Prof Mojisola Adeyeye. The memo discusses a medicine for the coughs of Covid-19 patients. Dated 28 April, it is titled: “Formulation of a phyto medicine cough mixture/syrup for the management of Covid-19 patients by Traditional, Complementary and Alternative Medicine Department of the ministry.” It was widely reported in Nigeria’s mainstream media. The memo says the “Cov-herbal cough mixture” is made of garlic, onions, ginger, West African black pepper and baobab fruit.  The memo doesn’t claim the mixture can cure Covid-19. It only suggests the medicine can help manage the coughs of Covid-19 patients. No cure for Covid-19 has yet been found. The World Health Organization says: “While some western, traditional or home remedies may provide comfort and alleviate symptoms of mild Covid-19, there are no medicines that have been shown to prevent or cure the disease.” We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/no-proof-siam-weed-cures-coronavirus-as-nigerian-prophetess-claims/,We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VFyKkopIbNY,,
https://www.sbs.com.au/news/harmful-coronavirus-myths-are-being-spread-in-australia-s-multicultural-communities,Cedric Yin-Cheng is trying to combat misinformation in Australia's Chinese communities. Source: Supplied The most common conspiracy theories about coronavirus debunked Share this with family and friends The most common conspiracy theories about coronavirus debunked Migrating to Australia Stabbings Personal income Missing persons Russia Ukraine war Missing People World Tourism Crime Morning (Mon–Fri) Afternoon (Mon–Fri) Weekend By subscribing, you agree to SBS’s terms of service and privacy policy including receiving email updates from SBS. SBS World News,
https://twitter.com/JimEWood/status/1239670905535713280,Error fetching data,
https://www.abc.net.au/news/2020-06-13/coronacheck-usb-drive-sticker-covid-19/12338622,Fact Check CoronaCheck is RMIT ABC Fact Check’s regular email newsletter dedicated to fighting the misinformation infodemic surrounding the coronavirus outbreak. You can read the latest edition below, and subscribe to have the next newsletter delivered straight to your inbox. With varying states of lockdown still being imposed around the world, some social media users have questioned whether the COVID-19 death toll justifies the restrictions. We've taken a look at some of the inaccurate claims being spread in the UK and US, which have been hit hard by the virus. We've also looked at a claim that the Queen signalled that children would be removed from homes, similar to what happened during World War II. A video claiming that 5G radio waves "penetrate red blood in the lungs, making them easy prey for COVID-19 to enter and cause oxygen starvation" has been debunked by Lead Stories. "Scientists have proven that 5G broadband can't enter the body because skin protects the internal organs," the fact checkers said. "Engineering experts point out that the 5G signal has such limited scope that signals are blocked by common objects like trees and buildings." A study cited in the video as evidence for the danger was found to relate to Wi-Fi, rather than 5G, and had been widely criticised by scientists. Meanwhile, a device marketed as a protective measure against the supposed harm of 5G has been found by IT experts to be nothing more than a cheap USB drive with a sticker on it. The "quantum holographic catalyzer technology for the balance and harmonisation of the harmful effects of imbalanced electric radiation" was being sold for as much as £300 ($550). The myth-busting hasn’t stopped anti-5G activists from continuing to push misinformation, with hundreds protesting in Australia over the rollout of the technology, as well as other gripes including vaccination and the coronavirus lockdown. As coronavirus lockdown measures drag on, some unhappy Facebook users have used unverified COVID-19 survival rate statistics to argue that the restrictions have amounted to overreach. One post claims that the COVID-19 survival rate is 98.54 per cent, while others put the death rate at 0.1 per cent or even as low as 0.004 per cent.  Fact checkers at PolitiFact found that while a 98.54 per cent survival rate wasn't too far off the current figure for the US, it was important to note that the numbers were preliminary and were likely to change. "Also, while a 98.5 per cent survival rate might sound promising, it really isn't," PolitiFact said. "Even a 1 per cent mortality rate (99 per cent survival rate) would mean that a disease is 10-times more lethal than the seasonal flu." Meanwhile, Full Fact looked into that same figure when it was shared in the UK. "We don't yet know the true survival rate [in the US] or in the UK, as we don't have a good idea of how many people have had Covid-19," the fact checkers reported. Back in the US, Lead Stories looked into a claim that a "22 trillion dollar economy" had been shut down to stop the spread of a virus with a 0.1 per cent death rate. That's roughly the death rate of the seasonal flu, while figures at the time showed about 5.8 per cent of confirmed coronavirus patients were dying. Fact checkers at Reuters, AAP, USA Today and AFP have all debunked similar claims. Read our full coverage of the coronavirus pandemic The title of a YouTube video viewed more than 230,000 times suggests the World Health Organisation and Queen Elizabeth II are conspiring to remove children from their homes amid the coronavirus pandemic. However, as Reuters points out, the title does not represent the footage it shows — neither the Queen nor the WHO have made any announcements regarding the evacuation of children from coronavirus-infected homes. The video shows a WHO senior adviser saying that because people were quarantining at home to comply with lockdown laws, some vulnerable and sick people may be removed from homes so they could be isolated. The advisor did not mention children. Meanwhile, the Queen's special broadcast amid the pandemic saw her reflecting on her first-ever broadcast in 1940, where she spoke of children being evacuated from cities during World War II. Referring to current lockdown measures, she noted that "once again, many will feel a painful sense of separation from their loved ones". An image showing a quote about "forcible vaccinations", attributed to former US secretary of state Henry Kissinger, continues to circulate despite the ongoing efforts of fact checkers around the world. "Once the herd accepts mandatory forcible vaccination, it’s game over," the quote, which has spread on Facebook, begins. "They will accept anything — forcible blood or organ donation — for the 'greater good'." While the image has been circulating since at least early 2019, it has gained traction in recent months as scientists work to produce a COVID-19 vaccine and authorities urge people to get a flu shot so as not to put added strain on healthcare systems during the pandemic. Fact checkers from PolitiFact, Snopes and Africa Check looked into the quote last year and found no evidence of Dr Kissinger having ever made such a claim. Since the coronavirus outbreak and re-emergence of the image, Reuters and Full Fact have also dismissed the claim, with representatives of Dr Kissinger telling Reuters that the quote is a "complete fabrication". A Facebook post claiming that no virus harmful to humans "has ever been proven to exist" and that "you can't make a vaccine for something you can’t even prove exists" has been debunked by Reuters. The fact checkers reviewed an article published in the American Society for Microbiology's Journal of Virology which listed measles, poliomyelitis, rabies, yellow fever and smallpox as viruses which infect and are harmful to humans. Lynda Coughlin, a virologist at Mt Sinai Hospital, told Reuters: "The statement that "no virus harmful to humans has ever been proven to exist" is absolutely false. There are numerous examples of viruses which are known to cause disease in humans." Fact checkers, researchers and journalists have begun to piece together a picture of the groups and individuals spreading coronavirus misinformation, including some who are pushing nationalistic disinformation. An investigation by the BBC found that a network of more than 1,200 Twitter, YouTube and Facebook accounts was being used to praise Beijing's handling of the coronavirus crisis, while amplifying negative messages about those figures critical of China’s response. "Although there is no definitive evidence that this network is linked to the Chinese government," the BBC said, "it does display features similar to a state-backed information operation originating in China that Facebook and Twitter removed last year." In the US, NBC has reported that "troll farms" in North Macedonia and the Philippines have been responsible for coronavirus disinformation on Facebook, with one large publisher of the fake content, the so-called "Natural News", banned from the social media platform after pushing the discredited "Plandemic" video. Read our full coverage of the coronavirus pandemic "Facebook said that it had found foreign trolls repeatedly posted content from Natural News, an anti-vaccination news site that frequently posts false coronavirus conspiracy theories about 5G towers and Bill Gates," NBC said, adding that the trolls also posted content from Natural News' sister sites, NewsTarget and Brighteon. Meanwhile, new research commissioned by the Australia Institute's Centre for Responsible Technology and conducted by experts at the Queensland University of Technology has found that pro-Trump and QAnon conspiracy Twitter bots have been responsible for pushing the theory that COVID-19 is a Chinese bio-weapon.  "The co-ordinated efforts to promote the bioweapon conspiracy theory focused on 882 original tweets, which were retweeted 18,498 times and liked 31,783 times, creating an estimated 5 million impressions on Twitter users," the researchers found. "Similar research in January suggests there is a sustained, co-ordinated effort to promote this theory by pro-Trump, Republican and aligned networks of accounts." The Washington Post's Fact Checker, having analysed thousands of Facebook, Twitter and YouTube posts and advertisements from US President Donald Trump, his campaign team and "a long list of surrogates", has found that together they are creating an online "alternate reality" around the coronavirus. "The data revealed the backbone of a five-point strategy to tell their version of the coronavirus story," the fact checkers determined. "Rewriting mistakes, highlighting achievements, deflecting blame, declaring victory and creating distraction." In the early stages of the virus outbreak, according to the Post, Mr Trump and his allies downplayed the threat, before pivoting to more self-promotional tactics in early March. By mid-April to early May, "[Mr] Trump and his team appeared to all but claim victory over the virus", before moving on to discuss new topics online, including launching attacks on his political adversaries and presumptive election opponent Joe Biden. "All presidential campaigns try to portray their candidate in the best possible light," the fact checkers concluded. "But what is notable about the Trump campaign is that its social media reach allows the campaign to rewrite even the most recent history." Got a fact that needs checking? Tweet us @ABCFactCheck or send us an email at factcheck@rmit.edu.au Fearlessly follow the facts no matter where they lead. Send us your tip-offs, or let us know what you think. Fact Check made in partnership with RMIT University IFCN Fact-Checkers' Code of Principles Signatory We acknowledge Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander peoples as the First Australians and Traditional Custodians of the lands where we live, learn, and work. This service may include material from Agence France-Presse (AFP), APTN, Reuters, AAP, CNN and the BBC World Service which is copyright and cannot be reproduced. AEST = Australian Eastern Standard Time which is 10 hours ahead of GMT (Greenwich Mean Time),
https://us3.campaign-archive.com/?u=88247005ecfbacf91efa65685&id=d6150bb96e,#2: Drinking and gargling water“It’s incorrect to suggest that people who have Covid-19 could cure themselves (either during this initial period or at any other time) by drinking water or gargling."
- Full Fact#3: Bathing in hot water "Taking a hot bath will not prevent you from catching COVID-19."
- The World Health Organisation#4: Tea"At present, there is absolutely no evidence or data to support the claim that tea can cure coronavirus."
- Dr Neeraj Jain, as quoted by The Quint,
https://us3.campaign-archive.com/?u=88247005ecfbacf91efa65685&id=257434e00d,Image source: Instagram The stream of misinformation surrounding 5G technology and the coronavirus has prompted Australia's chief medical officer, Brendan Murphy, to address the issue. Speaking at a recent press briefing, Dr Murphy said there was "absolutely no evidence about 5G doing anything in the coronavirus space".
"I have unfortunately received a lot of communication from these conspiracy theorists myself," he said. "It is complete nonsense."
In the UK, a partnership between Twitter and the government means users searching for 5G conspiracy tweets will see a pop-up informing them that "the UK government has said there is no evidence of a link between 5G and coronavirus (COVID-19)" and directing them to further information.
In one recent example of 5G misinformation, a video that has been viewed thousands of times shows a supposed telecoms engineer who is erecting 5G masts in the UK holding up an electrical circuit board. The man claims the board is "a piece of kit that has COV-19 on it".Reuters found that the circuit board was not used in 5G technology but that it had been taken from a Virgin Media box for cable television. Virgin Media told Reuters the board was from a "very old set-top box" and had never been inscribed or imprinted with "COV-19".
"It has absolutely no relation with any mobile network infrastructure, including that used for 5G."
Similarly, a claim that "radiation pneumonitis" allegedly caused by 5G was being misdiagnosed as COVID-19 was also found to be false by Reuters. Remdesivir is the latest drug being hailed as a promising treatment for COVID-19. But how accurate are claims about patents, ownership and profits related to the drug?
Firstly, remdesivir is an experimental antiviral drug, manufactured by pharmaceutical company Gilead and recently approved as a COVID-19 treatment in the US. In Australia, the drug is not yet being used in any clinical trials, though some hospitals are expected to receive doses of the drug for use with COVID-19 patients. Misinformation around COVID-19 treatments, including remdesivir, have spread rapidly throughout the pandemic.
In one example, a Facebook post claimed that hydroxychloroquine, another touted COVID-19 treatment, was "91 per cent effective" and cheap, while remdesivir was effective in just 50 per cent of patients and cost US$1,000.
"Why is Fauci pushing Remdesivir? It was invented by Fauci and Gates. Its stock is now soaring. Always follow the $$$$$$$." the post stated, referencing US infectious diseases expert and White House adviser Anthony Fauci and Microsoft founder Bill Gates.
But USA Today found that neither hydroxychloroquine nor remdesivir had been proven effective against COVID-19, with clinical trials ongoing. Further, Gilead Sciences was the only organisation able to profit from the sale of remdesivir and neither Mr Gates nor Dr Fauci had any involvement in the development of the drug. 
Another Facebook post imagines a remdesivir conspiracy centred around Unitaid, which it suggests is Gilead's "drug patent sharing subsidiary branch". Unitaid apparently has an office in Wuhan, and is backed by Bill and Melinda Gates, billionaire investor George Soros and the World Health Organisation. Hillary Clinton, Dr Fauci and Wuhan’s Institute of Virology also rate mentions. Snopes found these claims to be false. Unitaid is not linked to Gilead and does not have an office near Wuhan. And while the organisation, which invests in innovations to prevent, diagnose and treat a number of global health issues, is supported financially by the Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation, it has no ties to Mr Soros or Dr Fauci. Unitaid is a "hosted partnership" of the WHO, but receives no financial support from the organisation. A number of news stories in recent days have raised concerns that COVID-19, which has been viewed mainly as a respiratory disease, may also be killing sufferers through thrombosis (the formation of blood clots).
UK-based Full Fact took a look at claims posted on social media that COVID-19 patients were being misdiagnosed with pneumonia, when really they were suffering from thrombosis. The posts went on to say that the way to fight the disease is with "antibiotics, antivirals, anti-inflammatories and anticoagulants".
The fact checkers found that patients were not being "misdiagnosed" with pneumonia. Rather, both pneumonia and Disseminated Intravascular Coagulation (DIC), which leads to thrombosis, had been found to be present in COVID-19 cases.
Indian-based BOOM also found that, contrary to some claims, respiratory failure rather than thrombosis was the leading cause of COVID-19 deaths.
"It is thought that thrombosis of the lungs is a factor that can further complicate the course of pneumonia in COVID-19 patients," they said.
When it came to how to treat COVID-19, Full Fact found that antibiotics were not recommended, given they are used to treat bacterial infections rather than viruses like COVID-19. And while antivirals can be used to treat viral infections, no specific drug has been shown conclusively to be effective against COVID-19.
Meanwhile, anti-inflammatories such as ibuprofen could be helpful in treating COVID-19 symptoms at home, and there was evidence to suggest anticoagulants helped treat some patients. With little else to keep them occupied, many Australians are turning to exercise in order to relieve boredom and stay fit and healthy during the coronavirus restrictions.Claims made online, however, have suggested that exercise may actually weaken the immune system. In one example, an advertisement linking to an article claims that a "window of opportunity" exists in the hours after strenuous exercise which can leave people vulnerable to infection from viruses.
Fact checkers at USA Today found that the "window of opportunity" theory has been around for decades, supported by at least one study that found "vigorous workouts could have a temporary negative effect on the immune system".
But when it came to the long-term effects of exercising, several scientific studies suggested regular exercise promotes good health and reduces the risk of infections.
"People should not fear that their immune system will be suppressed by exercise, placing them at increased risk of coronavirus," John Campbell, of the University of Bath's Department of Health, told USA Today. #26: Brown sugar"There is no official cure for COVID-19 as of May 21, according to the World Health Organization (WHO). There are several clinical trials being conducted to test potential cures, but consuming brown sugar is not one of them."
- Rappler As the US grapples with soaring numbers of COVID-19 cases and the highest number of deaths in the world, Republicans are blaming former Democratic president Barack Obama for having left the current administration poorly placed to cope with the pandemic.
During an online discussion hosted by President Trump’s re-election campaign, Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell said it may no longer be that pandemics are a once-in-100-year occurrence, and he wanted to be ready for the next one.
"Clearly, the Obama administration did not leave to this administration any kind of game plan for something like this."
But fact checkers at the Washington Post, CNN’s Fact First and Politifact found that claim to be false, and that the Obama administration had left behind a 40-page National Security Council "playbook" on fighting pandemics.
"McConnell is wrong to say the Obama administration left "no game plan" to deal with a pandemic," the Washington Post concluded.
"The Obama team crafted a detailed document setting forth questions and policies that should be considered, as well as put in place programs that might have helped spur action sooner."
Senator McConnell later conceded in a Fox News interview: "I was wrong." Australia has seen an "unprecedented" drop in the number of hours worked, according to the Australian Bureau of Statistics, plunging 9.2 per cent between March and April.
Women were more adversely affected by the drop in hours (down 11.5 per cent), compared to men (down 7.5 per cent).,
https://us3.campaign-archive.com/?u=88247005ecfbacf91efa65685&id=43a7ff5f04,Image source:  ABC News - Nick. Haggarty Touted by some as a miracle cure for COVID-19, the anti-malarial drug hydroxychloroquine was thrust into the spotlight again this week when US President Donald Trump revealed he was taking it to avoid contracting the illness. 
The drug recently made headlines in Australia when outspoken businessman Clive Palmer donated almost 33 million doses — reportedly more than the equivalent of entire US stocks — to Australia’s national medical stockpile. In a series of newspaper ads and TV interviews, Mr Palmer claimed hydroxychloroquine was behind Australia’s low mortality rate, which he said had fallen since the drug was made available to treat hospitalised coronavirus patients in early April.
But can Australia’s success be linked to the drug? Fact Check asked the experts and found Mr Palmer’s claim to be baseless. In fact, the drug was already available to hospital patients, and experts said the death curve had flattened because just a few weeks earlier the case curve had done the same.
The jury is still out on whether the drug works as a treatment for COVID-19. However, the evidence isn't promising. Given the known risks of hydroxychloroquine, Australia's medicines regulatory body strongly advises against giving it to coronavirus patients in the absence of positive clinical trial results. It feels like ancient history, but for a time, just a few short weeks ago, supermarket shelves normally filled with toilet paper, pasta, flour and cleaning supplies were bare and the Prime Minister labelled the apparent cause, panic buying, "ridiculous" and "not sensible".
Despite those scenes, federal Agriculture Minister David Littleproud recently declared that Australia had "the most secure food security in the world".
"We're a nation of 25 million people," Mr Littleproud told ABC Radio National's Afternoon Briefing program on May 11. "We produce enough food for 75 million."
In a fact check published earlier this week, we found that claim to be in the ballpark.
Many studies and experts say Australia enjoys a very high level of food security, exports far more than it needs and has ample alternative sources of certain foods should they become scarce.
In terms of Australia's international ranking, we're not quite the most food secure nation but one comparison places us 12th among 113 countries in terms of food security. A post shared widely on Facebook and attributed to the Department of Health claims that tests for the novel coronavirus, known as SARS-COV-2, are not able to distinguish the virus from other illnesses.
"It should be noted that PCR tests cannot distinguish between "live" virus and non-infective RNA," the post states. "This means the test cannot [distinguish] covid from a cold or measles or ebola."
  As Australian Medical Association ACT President Antonio Di Dio explained to the ABC in March, Polymerase Chain Reaction (PCR) tests are the most widely used COVID-19 tests in Australia, and work by taking a "fingerprint" of RNA from a patient. 
"In the context of COVID-19, you get a piece of the RNA from a swab of the patient, you double it, then again and again," Dr Di Dio said. "Until you have millions of copies." Within a few hours, the sample would be large enough to see whether COVID-19 is present.
A caption alongside the Facebook post claims the information has been taken "from [the Department of Health’s] own website".
In a statement, a department spokesman told RMIT ABC Fact Check the post contained "selectively chosen information taken out of context" from a factsheet for clinicians, along with "complete inaccuracies".
"The factsheet is actually dealing with COVID-19 positive people continuing to test positive after the infectious period has passed," the spokesman said. "It is true that the PCR may still result in a positive test, because of remaining non-infectious viral load within the patient."
He said the test would not detect any pathogen other than the SARS-COV-2 virus. Image source: Twitter/@DeepStateExpose NewsGuard, a self-described "internet trust tool", has published a list of Twitter "super spreaders" — accounts that "repeat, share and amplify" coronavirus misinformation and myths to large numbers of followers.
The 10 accounts listed by NewsGuard reach a combined 3.3 million followers and have continued to publish misinformation despite Twitter announcing a crackdown on March 18 in a bid to address the so-called "infodemic".
Included in the list are the accounts of former Nigerian politician Femi Fani-Kayode, conservative radio commentator Bill Mitchell and former British footballer David Icke.
The accounts have propagated myths including that COVID-19 does not exist and that zinc or herbal remedies can prevent or cure the virus, and are spreading unproven claims about the effect of 5G technology on the virus. #25: A vegetarian diet "No evidence exists to support the claim that a vegetarian lifestyle can protect someone from contracting COVID-19, a claim that has been debunked by media outlets and the Indian government." - Snopes US President Donald Trump this week claimed that he had been taking hydroxychloroquine as a COVID-19 preventative, prompting scorn from political adversaries including House of Representatives Speaker Nancy Pelosi, a Democrat.
"He's our president, and I would rather he not be taking something that has not been approved by the scientists, especially in his age group and, shall we say, his weight group, [which] is morbidly obese, they say," Ms Pelosi told CNN.
While her comments were met with glee by some, others have accused her of "fat shaming". But was her comment accurate? 
Not quite, according to fact checkers at PolitiFact, who found that based on figures from Mr Trump's latest physical examination he would not be considered "morbidly obese" by medical standards. Weighing in at 243 pounds (110 kilograms) and measuring 6 feet 3 inches (191 centimetres), Mr Trump just falls into the obese category.
And while some pundits have questioned the official height and weight figures provided by Mr Trump, PolitiFact found that he would need to be shorter than 5 feet 8 inches (173 centimetres) and weigh 260 pounds (118 kilograms) to be classified "morbidly obese". Australia has recorded its biggest-ever drop in overseas visitor numbers, with arrivals falling 60 per cent year-on-year in March.
The figures, issued by the Australian Bureau of Statistics, also reveal a record decline in the number of Australians returning from short-term (less than one year) trips overseas.,
https://us3.campaign-archive.com/?u=88247005ecfbacf91efa65685&id=0987e8c850,Image source: Facebook A Facebook post shared in the US, Canada and Australia providing advice on “how to legally decline a vaccine” has been debunked by fact checkers at AFP and Lead Stories.
The post suggests people should ask questions including whether a vaccine (and presumably any potential COVID-19 vaccine) contains "MRC-5" and whether it may result in an "iatrogenic reaction". If the doctor administering the vaccine answers in the affirmative, ,then a person apparently has the right to decline.
"Remember, doctors have sworn the Hippocratic Oath (which is to do no harm) and they MUST honour it,” the post states. “This is how we can legally (and respectfully) decline their offered mandated services and there is absolutely NOTHING they can do about it!"
But AFP found that while there were ways to refuse a vaccine legally in each of the jurisdictions in which the post has been circulating, they were not those listed.
While some Australian states mandate vaccinations for children enrolling in childcare or school, vaccination itself is not compulsory so the steps outlined in the post for refusing a vaccine did not apply. 
"While the government supports immunisation, it is not compulsory and people maintain the right to choose whether to receive a vaccination," a spokesperson for the Department of Health told AFP. Image source: News Break NG One of the first recipients of a trial vaccine for COVID-19 has been the subject of false reports of her death, Full Fact and Reuters have found.
Elisa Granato, who is part of a vaccine trial at the University of Oxford, and is herself a scientist, was reported to have died shortly after receiving the vaccine last week.
However, there was no truth to the reports. Dr Granato tweeted at the weekend that she was "doing fine" while the university issued a statement in response to a Reuters’ query confirming that she was "alive and well". The UK Department of Health and Social Care also tweeted that the news was "completely untrue".
Dr Granato is among 800 participants who will either receive the trial vaccine or a control vaccine as part of the study.  Australians have been warned to be on the lookout for digital scammers using the coronavirus pandemic to con them into buying goods, sharing personal information and installing malicious software on their computers.  Image source: Twitter A little while ago we brought you a story about celebrity chef Pete Evans and his "hybrid subtle energy revitalisation platform", a light-emitting device he implied could help cure or treat COVID-19.
Since then, the Therapeutic Goods Administration (TGA) has fined Mr Evans $25,200.In a statement, the administration found claims that the so-called BioCharger could be used in relation to what Mr Evans referred to as the "Wuhan Coronavirus" had "no apparent foundation".
"Any claim that references COVID-19 is a restricted representation under therapeutic goods legislation, and is of significant concern to the TGA given the heightened public concern about the pandemic.” Image source: YouTube: Fox News Comparisons between the coronavirus and various causes of death have been rife as some commentators, politicians and business owners push for economies to reopen and for a return to business-as-usual. One such comparison was made by TV’s "Dr Phil" — real name Phil McGraw — who claimed during a Fox News interview that 45,000 Americans die every year in road accidents, 480,000 from smoking and 360,000 in swimming pools.As PolitiFact found, while Dr Phil had the ballpark figures correct for smoking and road deaths, he overstated the number of people who die by drowning each year in the US by almost 10 times the actual figure.
In reality, 3,709 drowned in 2017, including those people who drowned in natural bodies of water and baths, not just swimming pools. 
Regardless, PolitiFact warns against apples-and-oranges comparisons, quoting Arthur Caplan, the founding head of the division of medical ethics at the New York University School of Medicine.
"The issue isn’t how many people die of car crashes or swimming pool accidents or strokes or whatever,” Caplan said. "The question is whether they all happen at once and overwhelm the healthcare system." #18: A few drops of hydrogen peroxide in the ear canal  “This does not sound plausible. Liquids won't penetrate the eardrum. In fact, it seals off the middle ear and prevents that from happening. Some drugs can be absorbed through the skin, but hydrogen peroxide is not one of them.” - Dr Mark Prince, quoted by Lead Stories Regular readers of this newsletter can probably guess the likely subject of this section today: the extraordinary potential COVID-19 treatments floated by US President Donald Trump in recent days.
During what now appears to have been one of his final daily coronavirus press briefings last week, Mr Trump pondered whether disinfectant could be injected into the body to kill off the virus, or whether "very powerful" light could be a potential treatment.PolitiFact found "no evidence that using sunlight or disinfectants could help treat COVID-19 patients".
On the suggestion that light therapy could kill the virus, Dr Jonathan Reiner, a cardiologist at The George Washington University Hospital, told CNN’s Facts First: "Very little of what the President said as it pertains to disinfection or phototherapy makes any sense."
Meanwhile, the company that owns disinfectant brands Dettol and Lysol issued a statement which reads: "As a global leader in health and hygiene products, we must be clear that under no circumstance should our disinfectant products be administered into the human body (through injection, ingestion or any other route)."
But that wasn’t the end of it for our fact-checking colleagues in the US — Mr Trump later claimed his comments had amounted to sarcasm. CNN Facts First branded that claim a lie, while factcheck.org simply presented the videos of Mr Trump's comments and invited readers to make up their own minds. Reporters at the New York Times and Financial Times have found that the true death toll of COVID-19 may be far higher than official numbers.
By comparing the number of deaths this year to historical averages, the investigators show that the extra deaths recorded since the outbreak of the virus actually exceed the official coronavirus death tolls reported in most of the countries studied.
This graph, from the Financial Times, shows deaths in the province of Guayas, in Ecuador, were more than 10,000 above the average, though just 245 official COVID-19 deaths were recorded between March 1 and April 15.,
https://us3.campaign-archive.com/?u=88247005ecfbacf91efa65685&id=0e85eb9fcf,Image source: Twitter Author of the uber-successful Harry Potter franchise JK Rowling last week announced she’d had "all the symptoms" of the coronavirus but had since recovered, in part thanks to the help of a breathing technique seen performed in a video by a doctor from Queen's Hospital, London.
But the technique, a type of controlled coughing, has been called into question in an article published by The Conversation, which said it could actually help spread the virus.
According to Brian Oliver, the head of the respiratory molecular pathogenesis group at the University of Technology Sydney, coughing as instructed in the video could directly infect people close by or spread the virus by transferring it to hands and surfaces.
"One common COVID-19 symptom is a dry cough," Professor Oliver added. "So, it’s difficult to imagine why controlled coughing would help when you’re coughing so much anyway."
Full Fact in the UK also examined  the video and quoted the Association of Chartered Physiotherapists and Respiratory Care, which said: "If you have the symptoms of coronavirus and do have a persistent dry cough, there is no reason to make yourself cough after taking deep breaths." Image source: ABC News It was only a matter of time before Pete Evans (celebrity chef, champion of alternative medicines and fan-activated almonds) spruiked a bogus coronavirus treatment.
'Paleo Pete' used an Instagram live video last week to promote the BioCharger NG, which is described on his website as a “hybrid subtle energy revitalisation platform” in which "four transmitted energies stimulate and invigorate the entire body to optimise and improve potential health, wellness, and athletic performance".
In the video, Mr Evans claimed the product was programmed with a thousand different "recipes" including some for the novel coronavirus. What that means exactly is unclear, but it would certainly appear to imply the machine could help treat or prevent COVID-19.
But, according to the ABC, the makers of the device were quick to distance themselves from Mr Evans’s comments, stating: "The BioCharger is not a medical device."
The Australian Medical Association also lambasted Mr Evans in a tweet, calling the device a "$15,000 fancy light machine" and pointing to the celebrity chef’s lack of scientific and medical qualifications. With shortages worldwide of personal protection equipment, many people are attempting to find ways to reuse protective face masks. A suggestion that the masks should be microwaved in order to decontaminate them has been shared widely on social media, but fact checkers are urging caution.  The Washington Post spoke to Benjamin Neuman, the chair of the Department of Biological Sciences at Texas A&M University, who suggested there was some evidence microwaves could kill some viruses in a lab setting, although scientists hadn’t verified whether the method would work for COVID-19. 
The Post suggested N95 surgical masks, which have a small metal plate attached, "absolutely cannot go in a microwave" and that other masks could be rendered ineffective by the heat of the microwave.
According to Snopes: "The [Centers for Disease Control and Prevention] has not explicitly forbidden the public from microwaving the face coverings nor weighed in on the effectiveness of the method. But it has made this recommendation, including in its April 9 guide: 'A washing machine should suffice in properly washing a face covering.'"
Meanwhile, Reuters found that microwaving face masks was a fire hazard, and local US fire authorities had publicly warned against the method. Image source: Facebook In an effort to curb the spread of misinformation, and in welcome news to inundated fact checkers everywhere, WhatsApp last week placed tighter limits on the forwarding of viral messages.
Where WhatsApp detects that a message has been forwarded more than usual — through a chain of at least five people — users will now be restricted to forwarding on that message to just one further chat. That may be a chat with one other person, or a group chat.
"We’ve seen a significant increase in the amount of forwarding which users have told us can feel overwhelming and can contribute to the spread of misinformation," the company, which is owned by Facebook, said in a statement.
The forwarding of these chain messages had previously been restricted to five chats since 2019. Given the extent of lockdown binge-viewing going on, it’s no surprise some people are having trouble separating fiction from reality. A photo shared more than 10,000 times on Facebook apparently shows four Italian healthcare workers collapsed on the floor of an operating theatre. The image is accompanied by a caption encouraging people to pray for Italy.
But, according to AFP Fact Check, the image isn’t from Italy — it’s a still taken from an episode of long-running US TV drama Grey’s Anatomy. Image source: Facebook #15:  Cocaine "We wouldn’t recommend trying a highly addictive drug in hopes of fighting off a viral disease. We rate this Pants on Fire!" - PolitiFact   We recently looked at a story where a man in the US died after consuming fish tank cleaner that contained a derivative of chloroquine, a substance President Donald Trump has touted as a potential cure for COVID-19.
The President isn’t the only one talking up the drug. Hydroxychloroquine, which is used mainly to treat malaria, has been championed by French media, celebrities such as Elon Musk, and conservative-leaning media including Breitbart.
But as the Washington Post Fact Checker explains in this video that tracks how misinformation about hydroxychloroquine was spread, scientists say there is only anecdotal evidence it is effective in treating COVID-19.  In a move to detect more coronavirus cases, the Victorian and South Australian governments this week announced they would begin testing anyone showing symptoms of COVID-19.
But how does Australia's overall testing compare to other countries?
This graph, prepared by Professor Mark Osborn of RMIT University, gives important context to the figures, combining the number of positive tests per 1000 conducted with the percentage of the population that has been tested.
Click through for a larger version.,
https://us3.campaign-archive.com/?u=88247005ecfbacf91efa65685&id=0e85eb9fcf,Image source: Twitter Author of the uber-successful Harry Potter franchise JK Rowling last week announced she’d had "all the symptoms" of the coronavirus but had since recovered, in part thanks to the help of a breathing technique seen performed in a video by a doctor from Queen's Hospital, London.
But the technique, a type of controlled coughing, has been called into question in an article published by The Conversation, which said it could actually help spread the virus.
According to Brian Oliver, the head of the respiratory molecular pathogenesis group at the University of Technology Sydney, coughing as instructed in the video could directly infect people close by or spread the virus by transferring it to hands and surfaces.
"One common COVID-19 symptom is a dry cough," Professor Oliver added. "So, it’s difficult to imagine why controlled coughing would help when you’re coughing so much anyway."
Full Fact in the UK also examined  the video and quoted the Association of Chartered Physiotherapists and Respiratory Care, which said: "If you have the symptoms of coronavirus and do have a persistent dry cough, there is no reason to make yourself cough after taking deep breaths." Image source: ABC News It was only a matter of time before Pete Evans (celebrity chef, champion of alternative medicines and fan-activated almonds) spruiked a bogus coronavirus treatment.
'Paleo Pete' used an Instagram live video last week to promote the BioCharger NG, which is described on his website as a “hybrid subtle energy revitalisation platform” in which "four transmitted energies stimulate and invigorate the entire body to optimise and improve potential health, wellness, and athletic performance".
In the video, Mr Evans claimed the product was programmed with a thousand different "recipes" including some for the novel coronavirus. What that means exactly is unclear, but it would certainly appear to imply the machine could help treat or prevent COVID-19.
But, according to the ABC, the makers of the device were quick to distance themselves from Mr Evans’s comments, stating: "The BioCharger is not a medical device."
The Australian Medical Association also lambasted Mr Evans in a tweet, calling the device a "$15,000 fancy light machine" and pointing to the celebrity chef’s lack of scientific and medical qualifications. With shortages worldwide of personal protection equipment, many people are attempting to find ways to reuse protective face masks. A suggestion that the masks should be microwaved in order to decontaminate them has been shared widely on social media, but fact checkers are urging caution.  The Washington Post spoke to Benjamin Neuman, the chair of the Department of Biological Sciences at Texas A&M University, who suggested there was some evidence microwaves could kill some viruses in a lab setting, although scientists hadn’t verified whether the method would work for COVID-19. 
The Post suggested N95 surgical masks, which have a small metal plate attached, "absolutely cannot go in a microwave" and that other masks could be rendered ineffective by the heat of the microwave.
According to Snopes: "The [Centers for Disease Control and Prevention] has not explicitly forbidden the public from microwaving the face coverings nor weighed in on the effectiveness of the method. But it has made this recommendation, including in its April 9 guide: 'A washing machine should suffice in properly washing a face covering.'"
Meanwhile, Reuters found that microwaving face masks was a fire hazard, and local US fire authorities had publicly warned against the method. Image source: Facebook In an effort to curb the spread of misinformation, and in welcome news to inundated fact checkers everywhere, WhatsApp last week placed tighter limits on the forwarding of viral messages.
Where WhatsApp detects that a message has been forwarded more than usual — through a chain of at least five people — users will now be restricted to forwarding on that message to just one further chat. That may be a chat with one other person, or a group chat.
"We’ve seen a significant increase in the amount of forwarding which users have told us can feel overwhelming and can contribute to the spread of misinformation," the company, which is owned by Facebook, said in a statement.
The forwarding of these chain messages had previously been restricted to five chats since 2019. Given the extent of lockdown binge-viewing going on, it’s no surprise some people are having trouble separating fiction from reality. A photo shared more than 10,000 times on Facebook apparently shows four Italian healthcare workers collapsed on the floor of an operating theatre. The image is accompanied by a caption encouraging people to pray for Italy.
But, according to AFP Fact Check, the image isn’t from Italy — it’s a still taken from an episode of long-running US TV drama Grey’s Anatomy. Image source: Facebook #15:  Cocaine "We wouldn’t recommend trying a highly addictive drug in hopes of fighting off a viral disease. We rate this Pants on Fire!" - PolitiFact   We recently looked at a story where a man in the US died after consuming fish tank cleaner that contained a derivative of chloroquine, a substance President Donald Trump has touted as a potential cure for COVID-19.
The President isn’t the only one talking up the drug. Hydroxychloroquine, which is used mainly to treat malaria, has been championed by French media, celebrities such as Elon Musk, and conservative-leaning media including Breitbart.
But as the Washington Post Fact Checker explains in this video that tracks how misinformation about hydroxychloroquine was spread, scientists say there is only anecdotal evidence it is effective in treating COVID-19.  In a move to detect more coronavirus cases, the Victorian and South Australian governments this week announced they would begin testing anyone showing symptoms of COVID-19.
But how does Australia's overall testing compare to other countries?
This graph, prepared by Professor Mark Osborn of RMIT University, gives important context to the figures, combining the number of positive tests per 1000 conducted with the percentage of the population that has been tested.
Click through for a larger version.,
https://us3.campaign-archive.com/?u=88247005ecfbacf91efa65685&id=0e85eb9fcf,Image source: Twitter Author of the uber-successful Harry Potter franchise JK Rowling last week announced she’d had "all the symptoms" of the coronavirus but had since recovered, in part thanks to the help of a breathing technique seen performed in a video by a doctor from Queen's Hospital, London.
But the technique, a type of controlled coughing, has been called into question in an article published by The Conversation, which said it could actually help spread the virus.
According to Brian Oliver, the head of the respiratory molecular pathogenesis group at the University of Technology Sydney, coughing as instructed in the video could directly infect people close by or spread the virus by transferring it to hands and surfaces.
"One common COVID-19 symptom is a dry cough," Professor Oliver added. "So, it’s difficult to imagine why controlled coughing would help when you’re coughing so much anyway."
Full Fact in the UK also examined  the video and quoted the Association of Chartered Physiotherapists and Respiratory Care, which said: "If you have the symptoms of coronavirus and do have a persistent dry cough, there is no reason to make yourself cough after taking deep breaths." Image source: ABC News It was only a matter of time before Pete Evans (celebrity chef, champion of alternative medicines and fan-activated almonds) spruiked a bogus coronavirus treatment.
'Paleo Pete' used an Instagram live video last week to promote the BioCharger NG, which is described on his website as a “hybrid subtle energy revitalisation platform” in which "four transmitted energies stimulate and invigorate the entire body to optimise and improve potential health, wellness, and athletic performance".
In the video, Mr Evans claimed the product was programmed with a thousand different "recipes" including some for the novel coronavirus. What that means exactly is unclear, but it would certainly appear to imply the machine could help treat or prevent COVID-19.
But, according to the ABC, the makers of the device were quick to distance themselves from Mr Evans’s comments, stating: "The BioCharger is not a medical device."
The Australian Medical Association also lambasted Mr Evans in a tweet, calling the device a "$15,000 fancy light machine" and pointing to the celebrity chef’s lack of scientific and medical qualifications. With shortages worldwide of personal protection equipment, many people are attempting to find ways to reuse protective face masks. A suggestion that the masks should be microwaved in order to decontaminate them has been shared widely on social media, but fact checkers are urging caution.  The Washington Post spoke to Benjamin Neuman, the chair of the Department of Biological Sciences at Texas A&M University, who suggested there was some evidence microwaves could kill some viruses in a lab setting, although scientists hadn’t verified whether the method would work for COVID-19. 
The Post suggested N95 surgical masks, which have a small metal plate attached, "absolutely cannot go in a microwave" and that other masks could be rendered ineffective by the heat of the microwave.
According to Snopes: "The [Centers for Disease Control and Prevention] has not explicitly forbidden the public from microwaving the face coverings nor weighed in on the effectiveness of the method. But it has made this recommendation, including in its April 9 guide: 'A washing machine should suffice in properly washing a face covering.'"
Meanwhile, Reuters found that microwaving face masks was a fire hazard, and local US fire authorities had publicly warned against the method. Image source: Facebook In an effort to curb the spread of misinformation, and in welcome news to inundated fact checkers everywhere, WhatsApp last week placed tighter limits on the forwarding of viral messages.
Where WhatsApp detects that a message has been forwarded more than usual — through a chain of at least five people — users will now be restricted to forwarding on that message to just one further chat. That may be a chat with one other person, or a group chat.
"We’ve seen a significant increase in the amount of forwarding which users have told us can feel overwhelming and can contribute to the spread of misinformation," the company, which is owned by Facebook, said in a statement.
The forwarding of these chain messages had previously been restricted to five chats since 2019. Given the extent of lockdown binge-viewing going on, it’s no surprise some people are having trouble separating fiction from reality. A photo shared more than 10,000 times on Facebook apparently shows four Italian healthcare workers collapsed on the floor of an operating theatre. The image is accompanied by a caption encouraging people to pray for Italy.
But, according to AFP Fact Check, the image isn’t from Italy — it’s a still taken from an episode of long-running US TV drama Grey’s Anatomy. Image source: Facebook #15:  Cocaine "We wouldn’t recommend trying a highly addictive drug in hopes of fighting off a viral disease. We rate this Pants on Fire!" - PolitiFact   We recently looked at a story where a man in the US died after consuming fish tank cleaner that contained a derivative of chloroquine, a substance President Donald Trump has touted as a potential cure for COVID-19.
The President isn’t the only one talking up the drug. Hydroxychloroquine, which is used mainly to treat malaria, has been championed by French media, celebrities such as Elon Musk, and conservative-leaning media including Breitbart.
But as the Washington Post Fact Checker explains in this video that tracks how misinformation about hydroxychloroquine was spread, scientists say there is only anecdotal evidence it is effective in treating COVID-19.  In a move to detect more coronavirus cases, the Victorian and South Australian governments this week announced they would begin testing anyone showing symptoms of COVID-19.
But how does Australia's overall testing compare to other countries?
This graph, prepared by Professor Mark Osborn of RMIT University, gives important context to the figures, combining the number of positive tests per 1000 conducted with the percentage of the population that has been tested.
Click through for a larger version.,
https://us3.campaign-archive.com/?u=88247005ecfbacf91efa65685&id=ce0f43570b,While we have already covered claims that the coronavirus was created and spread deliberately in China (false), one particular Facebook post that questions how China was able to contain the virus keeps cropping up. The post suggests the Chinese Government spread the coronavirus to achieve world domination, adding that the virus did not spread to Beijing, Shanghai, North Korea and Russia. Apart from the fact there’s no evidence the virus originated anywhere other than in nature, fact checkers at Rappler found the disease reached Beijing and Shanghai in January, while Russia had its first cases as early as February. North Korea claims it is virus-free, but this is largely contested, as Rappler points out. Fact checkers at Reuters concurred that the virus spread to Beijing and Shanghai in January. As of April 13, Beijing had more than 580 COVID-19 cases, Shanghai more than 600, and Russia more than 18,000, according to Johns Hopkins University’s Center for Systems Science and Engineering.   Image source: Facebook Image source: AFP Fact Check A viral news article claiming a pastor in South Africa was responsible for the deaths of 59 parishioners after encouraging them to drink Dettol to prevent coronavirus is false, according to fact checkers at AFP and PolitiFact. 
South African police denied there had been any investigation into deaths related to Dettol and dismissed the claims as false.
Oddly, a pastor did make churchgoers drink Dettol antiseptic liquid back in 2016. None died, but the incident prompted the company to issue a statement clarifying the product is not for human consumption.
"We have been in contact with Prophet Rufus Phala and have asked him to stop this practice," the statement reads. "History repeats itself. Came across this poem written in 1869, reprinted during 1919 Pandemic.”
So begins a viral Facebook post featuring a poem describing a situation eerily familiar to the millions of people worldwide who are locked down in the fight to stop the spread of the coronavirus.
But the poem, attributed to ‘Kathleen O’Mara’, was in fact written last month by Catherine O’Meara, a retired Wisconsin teacher, according to fact checkers at Snopes, AFP Fact Check, Reuters, and PolitiFact. Interviewed by O Magazine, the poet said of her work:
"I was getting kind of sad. There was nothing I could do. I couldn’t help my friends. I was very worried about them. My husband said: ‘Write. Just write again.’" Image source: Facebook The Reuters Institute for the Study of Journalism at Oxford University has released a report into the “infodemic” of misinformation surrounding the coronavirus showing a 900 per cent increase in English-language fact checks published between January and March.
Of the fact checks included in the researchers’ sample, 38 per cent involved completely fabricated claims while 59 per cent involved misinformation where existing information and facts were “spun, twisted, recontextualised, or reworked”. 
The single biggest category of misleading claims identified by the researchers involved misinformation regarding the actions of public authorities, such as the WHO or UN, as well as governments.
The report found room for improvement in the response of social media platforms, with 59 per cent of posts rated as false on Twitter remaining live on the site without being labelled with a warning. On YouTube, 27 per cent of false claims have remained live while 24 per cent have stayed up on Facebook. No, lemon and bicarbonate of soda did not prevent people in Israel from dying of coronavirus, as a viral Facebook post suggests.
The claim, that a lemon-bicarb tea concoction cures the virus and is the reason no Israelis have died, is false on multiple fronts, according to Snopes, Africa Check, factcheck.org and AP Fact Check. #14:  Silver solution (colloidal silver) "Often [colloidal silver] is peddled as an immune boosting, disease curing dietary supplement, but there is no scientific evidence to back up these claims." - PolitiFact At a news briefing last week it took US President Donald Trump just 16 minutes to contradict himself on plans to freeze funding to the World Health Organisation, making live fact-checking possible for CNN’s Facts First.
"We're going to put a hold on money spent to the WHO. We're going to put a very powerful hold on it and we're going to see," the President told reporters during a daily coronavirus taskforce briefing.
But a few minutes later, when asked if freezing funding to the WHO in the midst of a global pandemic was a good idea, the President denied he had made such a pronouncement.
"I’m not saying we’re going to do it," the President said before another reporter interjected to say he had indeed said funding would be frozen.
"No, I didn’t. I said we’re going to look at it, we’re going to investigate it, we’re going to look at it," President Trump responded. 
As Facts First pointed out, the President “was denying something he had plainly said”. Job search website SEEK has released an employment snapshot showing the dramatic effects of the coronavirus on the Australian jobs market. This graph shows the decline in the number of new job advertisements posted to the website, which saw a 65.3 per cent drop in ad postings in the week ending April 5.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/saline-solution-kills-china-coronavirus-experts-refute-online-rumour,China has sealed off millions of people near the epicentre of the virus outbreak as the death toll from the pathogen, known by its technical name 2019 Novel Coronavirus (2019-nCoV), reached 26 on January 24, 2020. Here is an AFP report on the issue. Shortly after China confirmed human-to-human transmission in the outbreak of the new SARS-like virus, multiple posts appeared on social media purporting to share "professional advice" from Chinese respiratory expert Zhong Nanshan. The posts, for example here on Facebook on January 22, 2020, have a traditional Chinese caption saying: “Zhong Nanshan’s brilliant idea on preventing infection".  Zhong Nanshan is a scientist at the National Health Commission who helped expose the scale of the Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome (SARS) outbreak that killed hundreds of people in both mainland China and Hong Kong in the early 2000s. Here is an AFP report on this issue. The posts purport to quote Zhong Nanshan as saying: "I suggest everyone rinse his/her throat with diluted saline water before going to hospitals or other public areas, and rinse again upon returning home. “Here’s the method: Swish a mouthful of diluted saline water in your mouth -- tilt your head back and let the salt water come into contact with your throat -- slightly open your mouth, breath slowly through your throat, and make a ‘ha’ sound. At this moment, the saline water will slowly move with your breath, spit it out after a few seconds. Repeat the above steps with a second mouthful of saline water, then repeat the whole procedure 3-5 times. “Since virus or bacteria lurks in the pharynx after first entering through the nasal cavity, diluted saline water can kill the bacteria right away so as to prevent infection. “During the period of SARS, I promoted the same method among students, supervising and encouraging them to follow. As a result, none of the students in our class was infected." The posts claim that the information is a: "Suggestion from Academician Zhong Nanshan. January 21, 2020” Below is a screenshot of the misleading post: The same claim was repeated in scores of posts, for example here, here and here on Facebook, here on Twitter, and also here and here on Weibo. Similar claims linking the same prevention method to other people or hospitals were posted here, here and here on Facebook, and on Weibo here and here. For example, the exact same instructions on how to use diluted saline to prevent infection was shared in this Facebook post, citing the Wuhan Union Hospital rather than Zhong Nanshan as the source of the information. The caption starts with: “This is sent by Wuhan Union Hospital”; and ends with: “This method is simple, effective and easy. The key is to be consistent.” All of the claims are false.  The First Affiliated Hospital of Guangzhou Medical University, where Zhong’s medical team is based, said the claim was medically inaccurate. This January 22, 2020 Weibo post by the The First Affiliated Hospital of Guangzhou Medical University contains an image of the misleading claim, which has been partly covered by two red simplified Chinese characters that read “rumour refutation”. The post’s simplified Chinese caption translates to English as: “#RumorsRefutation Recently, a rumour circulating online claims: ‘Academician Zhong Nanshan suggests rinsing your mouth with saline water in order to prevent infection’. "Academician Zhong’s team at our hospital hereby officially refutes the rumour: Saline helps clean the mouth and throat, and is helpful for curing pharyngitis. However, the new coronavirus invades the respiratory tract, which cannot be cleaned by mouth rinsing. "Secondly, no present findings have suggested that saline water can kill the new coronavirus. Please don't believe or spread the rumour. Thank you.​​​​” Below is a screenshot of the hospital's post: The World Health Organization also told AFP there was no evidence to suggest rinsing with saline solution is effective in preventing infection. In an email to AFP dated January 24, 2020, the WHO said: "We have seen no convincing evidence that rinsing one's mouth with diluted saline water will provide protection from this disease. "While our understanding of the disease is still evolving, the best advice we can give people right now is to do things like wash their hands frequently, practice good respiratory hygiene (e.g. to cough or sneeze into a tissue or their elbow), avoid contact with sick people, and cook food thoroughly. This will help protect people from this new coronavirus but also a range of other diseases." Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
http://southasiacheck.org/fact-check/pm-makes-unfounded-claims-about-pcr-test-rate-virtues-of-nepali-diet/,Prime Minister KP Oli addressing parliament on June 12. By Deepak Adhikari Responding to questions from lawmakers in parliament on June 12, Prime Minister KP Oli defended his government’s measures against the COVID-19 pandemic. Oli spent around one hour and 45 minutes speaking about the pandemic and the budget for the fiscal year 2020/21, which was unveiled on May 28. During his speech, Oli made some unverified and unproven claims. Social media users questioned his claims and newspapers published reports debunking them. We fact-checked his claims and found that three of them were false. First claim “Fellow lawmakers have complained that we are conducting fewer PCR [polymerase chain reaction] tests compared to elsewhere [other countries in South Asia]. In terms of tests per million people, we are second only to Bhutan. Bhutan’s population is small. It has closed its international borders. The country had fewer people in foreign countries. Barring Bhutan, we are ahead of other countries [in terms of tests per million].” Prime Minister Oli’s remarks came when demonstrations have become widespread across the country calling for more PCR tests. Lawmakers have also asked the government to increase PCR tests. According to the figures Prime Minister Oli presented in parliament, Nepal had conducted 106,330 PCR tests and 166,158 rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) until June 11. While experts have questioned the reliability of the RDT, demands are growing for more PCR tests to contain the spread of the disease. Nepal’s daily test rates hover around 5,000. Prime Minister Oli was apparently comparing the COVID-19 test rates of the South Asian countries. The Maldives appears to be way ahead than other South Asian countries in terms of PCR tests. According to Worldometers, which maintains such database, as on June 14, Nepal’s test rate per million population is 11,821 while Bhutan’s is 26,882 and the Maldives’ test rate per million population stands at 53,588. Therefore, Oli’s claim that Nepal is second only to Bhutan in terms of PCR tests per million is false. Second claim “We should have knowledge of the geography of Nepal. When hot wind from the deserts comes toward Nepal, it cools down even before reaching the mountains. The hot wind is already subdued before reaching the mountains.When it slams into the mountains, it is almost like ice and ready to flow. We Nepalis breathe such air [and have stronger immunity]…This is a science thing. ” Prime Minister Oli here made misleading claims by generalizing complex and interconnected issues such as geography, desert, atmospheric science and climate, according to experts. Oli’s statement demonstrated that he lacked basic knowledge of science, an expert told South Asia Check asking not to be named. The monsoon, which enters Nepal from the Arabian Sea and the Bay of Bengal, brings the summer rains, which last for about four months every year. “It is a weather system of regularly reversing winds that bring wet and dry seasons,” the expert said.”Temperatures in Nepal are influenced by macro level interactions between wind sources and topography including elevations,” he said. Nepal’s diverse geography has resulted in different temperatures in different parts of the country. The westerlies bring rains and snow during the winter. “First of all, the wind does not flow directly from the desert to the high mountains. It first hits the Chure range, then reaches the Mahabharata range, and flows between the valleys. It then hits the mid-hills, high mountains and finally the Himalayan range,” he said. “Hot wind does not directly hit the Himalayas. Temperatures depend on elevations and wind dynamics,” he said. “The higher you go, the colder it gets.” He said Oli’s statement that the wind becomes almost like ice and is ready to flow after hitting the mountains is false because it is the mountain snow that melts and flows after interacting with the wind. “The wind does not turn into ice and flow,” he said. PM Oli’s statements reflect his total lack of understanding of modern science and scientific enquiry, he said. Atmospheric scientist Ashok Pokharel also called Prime Minister Oli’s claim baseless. “When you talk about hot air from the desert, it means dry air (without moisture in it). It’s not possible for such air to cause rain. Therefore, it’s wrong to say it turns into ice,” Pokharel, who works for Weather Extreme, a US-based company, told South Asia Check. Third claim “Nepali diet doesn’t consist of bread and butter. We have a variety of cereals including pulses, rice, maize and soybeans, and turmeric is a must. Cumin, coriander, onion and garlic are essential ingredients of our food. Salt is essential, so is chili. Nepalis have boosted their immune system by consuming these herbal medicines every day. It goes without saying that they have stronger immunity.” Over the past few months, Prime Minister Oli has been repeatedly claiming that Nepal has fewer COVID-19 cases because Nepalis have stronger immunity. But the continuously rising COVID-19 cases have proven him wrong. When a lawmaker asked about the source of his claim, Prime Minister Oli brushed it off saying the source was none other than himself. Though the food items Oli referred to are considered healthy, there is no evidence to prove they boost immunity against COVID-19. “These foods do not boost immunity (against COVID-19). Though fruits and vegetables contain vitamin C and antioxidants, we don’t have any scientific study to link them with enhanced immunity,” said Dr Pushpa Mani Kharal, who specializes in general practice and emergency medicine and is associated with Metro Hospital, Kathmandu. In an interview with news website Nepal Live, Dr Bhagawan Koirala, a senior cardiothoracic surgeon, said such claim was wrong and misleading. “We don’t have any unique quality that can protect us from COVID-19,” he said. The World Health Organization has also said the consumption of foods like turmeric cannot prevent COVID-19. “There is no scientific evidence that lemon/turmeric prevents COVID-19.  In general, however, WHO recommends consuming adequate fruits and vegetables as part of a healthy diet,” it said. Two other factors also prove Oli’s claim incorrect. No matter where they live, most Nepalis generally eat Nepali food. But at least 121 Nepalis have died in foreign countries from COVID-19. The food Oli mentioned in his speech is also widely used in the diet of India and China, where a large number of people have died of COVID-19. Therefore, Oli’s immunity argument is not supported by facts. See this also: PM advises misleading remedies against COVID-19,
https://www.poynter.org/?ifcn_misinformation=the-dettol-disinfectant-label-says-the-cov-was-tested,Fact-checked by: AFP 2020/02/06 | Australia Explanation: COVID-19 is a family of viruses. This false claim originated from: Facebook The #CoronavirusFacts database records fact-checks published since the beginning of the COVID-19 outbreak. The pandemic and its consequences are constantly evolving and data that was accurate weeks or even days ago might have changed. Remember to check the date when the fact-check you are reading was published before sharing it. Support responsible news and fact-based information today!,
https://www.altnews.in/a-fake-prescription-coronavirus-has-been-circulating-in-the-name-of-ganga-ram-hospital-delhi/,As of June 12, India has the fourth-highest number of COVID-19 cases. The coronavirus dashboard on Johns Hopkins University indicates India has over 3 lakh cases. While the debate on the effectiveness of the lockdown and the possible impact of unlocking the economy continues, the capacity of medical infrastructure in New Delhi seems to fall short. Issues like the shortage of hospital beds, unaffordable cost of treatment in private hospitals are frequently discussed on social media. In one such instance on June 11, a notice that appears to be issued by Sir Ganga Ram Hospital has gone viral. The notice states, “As per ICMR (Indian Council of Medical Research) guideline, the contacts of COVID+ cases should be put on HOME ISOLATION even with mild symptoms.” The viral notice suggests to wash hands, follow social distancing and wear a mask. Additionally, it prescribes hydroxychloroquine (HCQ) 400 mg, vitamin C, zing 50 mg. As per the notice, in case of fever one should take crocin/ calpol 650 mg and in the case of throat pain, it suggests cetirizine 10 mg and syrup alex 2/3 teaspoon. This notice seems to be have been written on the prescription slip of Dr Raj Kamal Agarwal of Sir Ganga Ram Hospital. It mentions his contact details and the hospital’s contact details. The notice is duly stamped by Dr Agrawal. The screenshots below show a post on Facebook (archive link) and Twitter (archive link). Alt News received several requests to fact-check this on WhatsApp (+917600011160) and on our official Android application.  Alt News performed a keyword search and found that no such news was reported by the mainstream media. Moreover, it wasn’t reported by the Ministry of Health and Family Welfare or any government official. On June 11, Sir Ganga Ram Hospital published a tweet saying, “It has been brought to our notice that someone has circulated a fake image and forged the doctor’s signature. #SGRHIndia strongly dissociates itself from such messages.” It has been brought to our notice that someone has circulated a fake image and forged the doctor’s signature. #SGRHIndia strongly dissociates it self from such messages. pic.twitter.com/2obOptXxhp — Sir Ganga Ram Hospital (@sgrhindia) June 11, 2020 Alt News tried reaching out to Dr Agrawal using the mobile number mentioned on the slip. Despite multiple attempts at different intervals, we couldn’t connect because it was switched off. Next, we called on the hospital’s number mentioned on the slip.  This time the phone rang and we learnt that the number corresponds to Sir Ganga Ram Coalmet Hospital in Rajinder Nagar. The front office staff shared with us the number of Sir Ganga Ram Hospital (SGRH) and we subsequently connected with on-duty doctor Varun who confirmed that the hospital has not released such a document. He said that it could be photoshopped. When we asked about Dr Aggarwal, Varun said that he is associated with SGRH but has not issued the prescription. On June 12, Dr Aggarwal spoke with Hindustan Times and denied writing the prescription. He added that people should not pay heed to the notice or use the medicines prescribed but consult a doctor in case of sickness. Alt News also visited the ICMR website and found no existing guideline that recommends home isolation for people showing mild symptoms of COVID-19. The latest press release is from May 30 that is about ‘ICMR advises States to conduct sero-survey to measure Coronavirus exposure in the population using IgG ELISA Test’.  Thus, it is clear that the viral image is false and misleading. On May 21, Alt News debunked a fake WhatsApp text that attributed 21 dos and don’ts post lockdown to ICMR. Donate Now Ketan is Senior Editor at Alt News Hindi. A video of a ladder moving on its own, purportedly from Jharkhand, is viral on… In a 2-minute video, a man recommends a “technique” to prevent infection from Omicron, the… A video of a set of iron nails that appear to melt after being placed… Several social media users have shared an image that shows two columns — ‘Cepa/variante’ (Spanish… A 90-second video of a man dissecting a banana has been shared on the internet….,
https://www.boomlive.in/fake-news/no-mumbais-kem-hospital-did-not-prescribe-this-list-of-covid-19-drugs-8462,A viral WhatsApp message claiming that KEM hospital in Mumbai has issued a list of medicines for treating symptoms of COVID-19 has been falsely attributed to the hospital. BOOM spoke to the dean of the hospital who confirmed that the list of medicines were not issued by the hospital.  "This has not been issued by the hospital. KEM's name has been falsely used", Dr. Hemant Deshmukh, dean of KEM hospital, said.  "Please do not self-medicate or take any of these medicines without a doctor's recommendation or prescription," he added. King Edwards Memorial (KEM) Hospital is a dedicated COVID-19 facility in Mumbai and is one of the oldest government-run facilities in the city. It currently has 464 isolation beds for confirmed and suspected cases, 229 beds with oxygen cylinders, 89 ICUs and 54 ventilators. Mumbai is the worst affected city with over 55,000 cases and 2,000 deaths.  The message details preventive measures such as eating home-cooked food if a coughing spell arises, along with drinking beverages such as ginger tea, turmeric milk and hot water as immunity boosters. It follows it up with a list of medicines such as Azee for cough, Omee for acidity, Limcee for vitamin C, Dolo for fever and only recommends consulting a doctor for an X-ray after three days.  Furthermore, the message even prescribes medicines after an X-ray is conducted. It recommends Asthakind syrup for cough while Tamiflu medicines if the X-ray detects pneumonia. It further advises an electrocardiogram (ECG) before prescribing hydroxychloroquine. It further goes to claim that all hospitals are following this treatment and those who cannot be admitted into hospitals should self medicate.  It also alleges that private hospitals are cheating COVID-19 patients.  The message is also viral on other social media platforms.  1/ 🙏🏻🙏🏻🙏🏻🙏🏻Brothers and Sisters This article has been sent by a reputed doctor from K.E.M HOSPITAL! Read the full AND Don't worry! Also, the treatment methods of your family Dr. Follow their advice! ＊ Don't be afraid of Corona! ＊ 1) If you have a dry cough at The medicines mentioned in the list are individually used for treating different ailments. However, doctors only prescribe them after understanding a patient's medical history. Certain medicines could cause side effects in people with existing illnesses.  Even for hydroxychloroquine, the government has recommended an ECG before distributing it as a measure of prophylaxis. There is not enough scientific evidence supporting the use of Arsenicum Album against SARS-CoV-2.  BOOM has previously debunked advisories claiming to be from the government, hospitals as well as international organisations that discuss drinking water, drinking hot water, drinking lemon tea as potential tips and tricks to wade off the virus.  There is no definite treatment for COVID-19 so far. The World Health Organization is conducting Solidarity trials with various medicines and treatments such as plasma therapy, hydroxychloroquine, remdesivir, and anti-HIV drugs lopinavir and ritonavir to ascertain treatments for COVID-19. ,
https://www.boomlive.in/fake-news/viral-message-recommending-covid-19-home-kits-is-not-from-tata-health-8492,A WhatsApp forward describing three stages of COVID-19 along with details of a COVID-19 kit for households, has been falsely attributed to Tata Health. The message contains a link to Tata Health's website. Adding a URL of genuine website to a text message is often a strategy to lend credibility to the message itself. BOOM contacted Tata Health - which denied that the message originated from them.  Tata Health is a digital health platform with a range of online and offline services that provide medical advice through chat/ video. The organisation is currently providing consultations free of charge.  "This particular message regarding Covid medical kit you are referring to is fake and has not been shared or created by Tata Health. However, the link in the message is correct and leads to a service provided by us," a spokesperson for Tata Health told BOOM. The message provides a list of things that should be a part of a COVID medical kit and should be available at every household. The list includes medicines like Paracetamol, vitamin C and D3 medicines, B complex, vapour capsules for steams, Betadine for mouth gargles, pulse oximeter for measuring oxygen levels, and oxygen cylinders along with the government's aarogya setu application.  Below is the screenshot of the viral message BOOM received on its WhatsApp helpline.  The message also details three stages of COVID-19- in the nose, in the throat, and in the lungs. It further recommends measuring oxygen levels through the oximeter and only recommends visiting a hospital when the oxygen levels are between 98-100 without mentioning a unit. The message is also viral on Facebook.   The post has also been shared on Instagram.   Covid Medical kit Required at home: 1. Paracetamol 2. Betadine for mouthwash and gargle 3. Vitamin C and D3 5. B complex 6. Vapour+ capsules for steam 7. Oximeter 8. Oxygen cylinder (for emergency only) 9. arogya Setu app 10.Breathing Exercises Covid Three stages: 1. Covid only in nose - recovery time is half a day. (Steam inhaling), vitamin C. Usually no fever. Asymptomatic. 2. Covid in throat - sore throat, recovery time 1 day (hot water gargle, warm water to drink, if temp then paracetamol. Vitamin C, Bcomplex. If severe than antibiotic. 3. Covid in lungs- coughing and breathlessness 4 to 5 days. (Vitamin C, B complex, hot water gargle, oximeter, paracetamol, cylinder if severe, lot of liquid required, deep breathing exercise. Stage when to approach hospital: Monitor the oxygen level. If it goes near 43 (normal 98-100) then you need oxygen cylinder. If available at home, then no hospital else admit. *Stay healthy, Stay Safe!* Please fwd to your contacts in India. You never know who it may help. Tata Group has started good initiative, they are providing free doctors consultation online through chats. This facility is started for you so that you need not to go out for doctors and you will be safe at home. Below is the link, I reqest everyone to take benefit of this facility. https://www.tatahealth.com/online-doctor-consultation/general-physician #coronavirus #FightAgainstCoronaVirus #StayHomeStaySafe #telugunews #journalist sai A post shared by  Journalistsai (@journalist_sai) on Jun 14, 2020 at 4:50am PDT The message details the need of pulse oximeters and sometimes oxygen cylinders as equipment that should be a part of COVID medical kits.  BOOM spoke to Dr. Jai Mullerpattan, pulmonologist, Hinduja Hospital for the need of these equipment.  "Many of our patients suffering from other pulmonary issues do use pulse oximeters, so having one definitely helps but there should be no need to hoard them. For oxygen cylinders. I believe medical centers are better equipped to help patients," said Dr. Mullerpattan.  Dr. Mullerpattan emphasises that panic buying of oxygen cylinders will lead to problems of refilling these cylinders. Hospitals have contracts for refilling them.  Currently, Mumbai has 62 oxygen supported beds in quarantine and isolation centres,  6208 oxygen supported beds in dedicated COVID health centers, and 7912 oxygen supported beds in dedicated COVID hospitals.  BOOM also asked Dr. Mullerpattan about the three stages of COVID-19 mentioned in the message.  Symptoms of COVID-19 can only be ascertained as the disease after being tested. Dr. Mullerpattan mentioned that there is no scientific evidence supporting that steam inhalation or drinking hot water prevents COVID-19.  "Preventionary measures are fine but this message recommends self-medicating. None of the medicines or steps should be taken without consulting a doctor." The message also mentions a specific number of days it would take to recover from the illness. There is no scientific evidence so far stating that if the virus is present in the nose, the recovery will take half a day. The recovery depends on a person's immunity. The Ministry of Health and Family Welfare (MOHFW) recommends people with mild symptoms to self-isolate and follow a doctor's advice.  BOOM has previously debunked messages that recommend teas, coffees, drinking hot water as ways to prevent and treat COVID-19. According to the World Health Organisation, the only way that the spread of the virus can be prevented is through following social distancing, continuous hand-washing, and wearing masks in the open.  There is no prescribed medical prevention, treatment, or cure for the COVID-19 so far.  Also Read:No, Mumbai's KEM Hospital Did Not Prescribe This List Of COVID-19 Drugs Also Read: Local Train Services Resume In Mumbai: All You Need To Know,
https://www.boomlive.in/fake-news/viral-message-falsely-claims-coffee-can-cure-covid-19-8470,A viral message claiming that the deceased Chinese COVID-19 whistleblower Dr. Li Wenliang found that coffee was a potential cure for COVID-19 is fake. BOOM could not find any evidence supporting both the claims, that the doctor left behind documents citing a cure and that coffee has COVID-19 curing abilities.  Dr. Li Wenliang was the whistleblower of COVID-19 who was apprehended by the Chinese government for raising the alarm on COVID-19 and who later died due to the virus. The message claims that he found that certain chemicals such as methylxanthine, theobromine and theophylline are found to act against the SARS-CoV-2, the virus causing COVID-19 and these are found in coffee.  The message also claims that patients were given coffee in hospitals which led to their recovery in Wuhan in China, the epicenter of the COVID-19 outbreak. BOOM has previously debunked a similar message which replaced coffee with green tea as the concoction that was provided to the COVID-19 patients.  Below is a screenshot of the message that BOOM received on its WhatsApp requesting for its verification.  Below are a few posts seen on Facebook.  The post has been in circulation since March.  Dr. Li Wenliang who was the whistleblower of the virus was apprehended and put into prison after he raised his voice about the emergence of a new virus in China. He lost his life to Coronavirus in February but there is no evidence stating that he discovered a cure for COVID-19. The three compounds Methylxanthine, Theobromine, Theophylline are found in caffeine and coffee. They have their own scientific properties but have not been scientifically or microbiologically proven to impact the coronavirus.  Caffeine, the main element in coffee is a type of methylxanthine and helps in good airway control but has not been seen to affect viral infections. This concoction is also known to reduce drowsiness and fatigue but high consumption could also lead to headache and tremors. Previously, the same claim has circulated with green tea as the concoction found in India which is made from the three elements and being given to patients in Wuhan. This claim was circulating with claims about other types of teas curing COVID-19. BOOM had previously debunked this claim.  The same message claiming that these compounds are found in green tea which is a cure for COVID-19 Also Read: False: Different Types Of Tea Can Act As A Cure For COVID-19 The World Health Organization (WHO) has not found a treatment or a cure for COVID-19 so far. Vaccines are at different stages of clinical trials while the WHO is conducting a Solidarity Trial to asess the effect of plasma therapy, remdesivir, hydroxychloroquine, and anti- HIV drugs lopinavir and ritonavir on SARS-CoV-2. There have been many theories on the way the virus orginated, spread, and its prevention and treatment. BOOM has been actively debunking claims surrounding the virus since January 2020.  Also Read: Fake News In The Time Of Coronavirus: A BOOM Study ,
https://www.newsroom.co.nz/2020/04/17/1131565/fear-and-misinformation-go-viral-in-fiji,Newsroom 
					Quality worth making room for				 A Covid-19 herbal tea cure, vodka that eliminates the virus, and cell towers enabling its spread – just some of the more extreme rumours circulating in Fiji about Covid-19.  With 17 confirmed cases and the14-day lockdown lifted from Suva at 5.30am Friday morning, authorities have taken a heavy-handed approach to those defying emergency rules.  More than 1000 people have been arrested since special emergency laws were implemented on March 30, including a handful of individuals accused of spreading false information or promoting information that allegedly harms the Government’s response plan.  While the authoritative approach sends a clear message to flagrant rule breakers and loud conspiracy theorists, debunking fear and misinformation at community level requires a slightly different approach.  Ilisapeci Rokotunidau, Director-General of Fiji Red Cross (with 250 staff and volunteers), says misinformation about how Covid-19 is spread is the main issue. “Often, it’s partly true, but partly false.” She says there is a lack of clear understanding about how the disease is transmitted and how to prevent it. “Some people think it’s the length of time you’re in Suva, or in the cities – which isn’t completely false. But then, that doesn’t mean you don’t change habits and observe restrictions, like keeping the two-metre distance or have good hand-washing practices.” For volunteers working in their own communities and villages, the priority is ensuring the right information gets through. When Fiji’s first cases were announced in Lautoka last month, volunteers distributing information about Covid-19 and promoting safe practice were met with suspicion.  “These are people in their own communities, in their own villages, who were not being allowed into households in the very places they were from. They were told, ‘Oh, it’s because you go to town, and you go here and you meet other people, and you might be the person bringing it.  “We’ve never had anything like that,” Rokotunidau says. “But then, we’ve never seen anything like Covid-19 before.”  An initial “overflow” of information from organisations such as the Health Ministry and police created a lot of uncertainty, she says. Local media and government authorities also focused on individual cases and their families, and reported people trying to hide symptoms and evade identification. “People were a bit afraid and they were not sure how to handle the messages [about] Covid-19 because of the information overflow at the top level, and some people were just not sure how it was spread,” she says. A grassroots volunteer network, which only last week was busy responding to Cyclone Harold, is now busy addressing basic information needs. “All our volunteers have megaphones – because that’s actually used by them during disasters. They ended up using them to do their awareness [for Covid-19]. So they’d leave resources outside a house and could talk to people without going inside.  “As the weeks have gone on, [the volunteers] are saying they’re feeling a lot more confident and families are not so scared. It’s also helped getting protective gear and equipment to volunteers. People see that and have engaged a bit more.” Carl Lorentzen is the Red Cross Communications Manager for the entire Pacific. He has similar concerns to Rokotunidau, and emphasises that each Pacific nation has its own unique challenges.  While Fiji is pursuing a containment and elimination policy, Sāmoa and Tonga remain Covid-19-free. Notably, the Sāmoan Government addressed the 5G cell phone network conspiracy head-on by issuing a statement that it had no evidentiary base.  “Because of the fake news that has been circulated about 5G and its connection to Covid-19 we are witnessing in other countries people are destroying critical infrastructure that keeps them connected,” the statement read. “It is important that we as a nation understand that there is no 5G threat so that we do not result to destroying critical infrastructure at this time of difficulty and when it is mostly needed.” Lorentzen says volunteers had reported few concerns about conspiracy theories, complacency, and the wider social and economic impacts of lockdowns. But trading restrictions and border closures from Covid-19 all effect the type of information reaching communities.  “Overall, in the Pacific, we haven’t seen a huge number of cases of Covid-19 – which is great. Of course, people will start to create or spread rumours, and we have had trouble in some communities which have been targeted by people peddling fake cures for Covid-19.” For the Red Cross, which partners with other NGOs and government institutions, its main strength is in its volunteer network. Even with the influence of social media among urban Pacific populations, personal contact is often the most effective way of reaching people, he says.  “That is really where we play our part – when we mobilise all our volunteers throughout the Pacific. For example, in the last few days, we have been going door-to-door in Palau to make sure everyone is aware of how to tackle Covid-19, what they can do and what they shouldn’t do.” The Pacific’s experience as a disaster-prone region is also important, particularly for smaller nations that are attempting to remain Covid-19 free, he adds.  “A lot of our work is simply making sure that people are prepared between disasters. At the moment, it means we work a lot on having the right infrastructure – from things like appropriate shelter to access to clean water and sanitation stations.”  
		Join the Conversation
		Subscribe to Newsroom Pro to unlock commenting on articles. Start your 14-day free trial now or sign in. Please note: All commenters must display their full name to have comments approved. Click here for our full community rules. 
	 Start your day with a curation of our top stories in your inbox Start your day with a  curation of our top stories in your inbox.  
							We've recently sent you an authentication link. Please, check your inbox!						 
							Sign in with a password below, or sign in using your email.						 
							Get a code sent to your email to sign in, or sign in using a password.						 
							Enter the code you received via email to sign in, or sign in using a password.						 Subscribe to our newsletters: 
									Sign in with your email
								 
									Lost your password?
								 
									Try a different email
								 
									Send another code
								 
									Sign in with a password
								 
																	
																I agree to Newsroom's Terms and Conditions																	
															,
https://www.boomlive.in/fake-news/no-this-letter--is-not-ayush-ministry's-nod-to-patanjali's-coronil-8684,A viral image of a letter from AYUSH ministry acknowlegding documents submitted by Baba Ramdev's Patanjali to get clearance on the ayurvedic company's COVID-19 cure, Coronil Kit is falsely being shared as the company receiving permission to sell the 'Coronil Kit'. BOOM found that the image is a reply sent by the the ministry to Patanjali saying they have received the documents and will study it before submitting a final reply on whether the Patanjali medicine can cure COVID-19.  BOOM also reached out to Dr. D. C Katoch, joint advisor to the Ministry of AYUSH who confirmed the contents of the email and said that the Patanjali cure "is still being researched."       Patanjali Ayurved, founded Ramkrishna Yadav, more popularly known as Baba Ramdev launched a Corona Kit on June 23 and claimed that the kit was "100 percent recovery in three to seven days" from COVID-19. In a press conference, Ramdev claimed that the kit, made with Ayurvedic ingredients- Ashwagandha, Giloy, Tulsi, Swasari Vati, and Anu Taila is not an immunity booster but a definite cure according to clinical trials. Following this, a controversy broke out with officials saying that Patanjali never applied for the Coronil kit to be sold as a cure for COVID-19. BOOM received the image with the fake claim on its WhatsApp helpline and a search showed that on June 24, Acharya Balkrishna, CEO of Patanjali tweeted the same image, a screenshot of an email copy, calling it a "resolution to the AYUSH controversy". The AYUSH ministry had requested Patanjali to send the documents supporting their claims of their Corona kit curing COVID-19.  Balkrishna did not clarify that the image was a reply by the ministry to Patanjali, confirming the receipt of the documents. .@moayush के विवाद की पूर्णाहुति!The resolution of AYUSH controversy, finally! @yogrishiramdev pic.twitter.com/TkZGkghWiQ View archive here BOOM received the same image on its WhatsApp helpline that read "Finally, Patanjali has permission, Ayush Ministry has given permission, Discussion is over, India's identification is Ayurved. Cure for Corona will be available for Rs. 600 only." (Translated from: आखिरकार मिल गयी पतंजलि  को अनुमति। आयुष मंत्रालय ने दी अनुमति। विवाद खत्म।भारत की पहचान आयुर्वेद।अब केवल 600 रुपये में होगा कोरोना का इलाज). This caption is shared with the image of the email that Patanjali  received from the AYUSH ministry.  The image of the email and the Hindi caption have also been shared on Facebook. View the archive here. BOOM found that the image shows an email sent by the AYUSH ministry on June 24, to Patanjali divya yoga. We read through the text in the image and found that it is a receipt from the ministry to Patanjali acknowledging that they have received the documents that they had asked Patanjali to send to the ministry for verifying their claims of treating COVID-19. The text in the mail says, "In the given context, it is to acknowledge the receipt of subject related documents of the clinical trial including site of clinical study and medical research, Institutional Ethics Committee clearance, registration details in Clinical Trials Registry of India, study protocol, sample size and study results data" and it also adds, "Ministry will have the study documents verified for validation of the data of the research outcome" clearly stating that the AYUSH ministry is yet to verifiy the documents submitted by Patanjali.  On June 23, the AYUSH ministry had asked Patanjali to share its study protocol, ethical clearance for conducting the trial from the National Institute of Medical Sciences, Jaipur (NIMS) that had collaborated on the study, the sample size, registration of clinical trial, as well as the name, composition, and scientific relevance of the products. The succeeding email on June 24, only expresses that the Ministry has received all the requested documents. This email does not mention approving or accepting Patanjali's product,    BOOM confirmed the same from a AYUSH ministry official, Dr. Katoch, joint advisor to the Ministry of AYUSH who said that the Patanjali matter is still under process and that the Ministry is yet to reach a conclusion on Patanjali's Coronil Kit, so far.  "The final authorization lies with the State Licensing authority but our expert committee is still going through the details of all the documents," Dr. Katoch stated.   On June 24, the Uttarakhand State Licensing Authority announced that requisite licenses had been issued for for the kit to be sold only as an immunity booster and not as a cure. BOOM had earlier reached out to Dr. Y. Rawat, Joint Director, State Medicinal Licensing Authority, Uttarakhand who explained that the documents the department received did not mention that these products were to cure COVID-19.  "We have sent a notice to Patanjali and are awaiting a response", he said. The Rajasthan government, where NIMS university is based, said they were not aware of any such clinical trials being conducted in the state. An FIR has been filed against Baba Ramdev and four others for allegedly trying to sell a fake Ayurvedic medicine as a cure for COVID-19.  Also Read: Does Drinking 'Kashayam' Cure COVID-19? A Factcheck   ,
https://www.boomlive.in/fake-news/does-drinking-kashayam-cure-covid-19-a-factcheck-8661,A viral image falsely claims that drinking a 'corona kashayam' made by boiling turmeric, cloves, lemons, and ginger with water will cure COVID-19 positive patients. BOOM spoke to an Ayurveda expert who stated that the mixture can be consumed as an immunity booster but should not be labelled as a cure for COVID-19.  The viral image being shared on WhatsApp describes the exact proportion of ingredients to use to make this kashayam. Kashayam or kadha as many languages call it is an ayurvedic water made from an extract of herbs. It is also referred to as medicinal tea.   The image further claims that an allopathic doctor has recommended drinking this mixture. It also mentions that a person recovered in 24 hours after consuming this drink. BOOM did not find any doctor claiming to use this medicine as a cure for COVID-19.  BOOM received the image on its WhatsApp helpline asking for verification. A Facebook post from June 9 has the same details as in the image written in Tamil. This posts also gives instructions on how to consume the said water.  BOOM found that the claim is false and also spoke to Ayurvedic doctor who said a 'kashayam'  should be treated as an immunity booster and not as cure for COVID-19. While there has been no prescribed allopathic or traditional cure for COVID-19, the World Health Organization is conducting trials for the effect of allopathic drugs while many vaccines are in different stages of clinical trials.  BOOM spoke to Dr. Govind Khati, Dean, RA Podar College of Ayurveda, Mumbai who called this mixture an immunity booster.  "The Ministry of AYUSH recommended various kadhas and kahvas for protection as well as strengthening immunity purposes. All these ingredients help in improving immunity against normal colds, coughs, and fevers but have their own limitations in terms of action. They only help in reducing pressure on the lungs," Dr. Khati explained.  Dr. Khati also emphasised that they have not come across any patients who said that they were or were not diagnosed with COVID-19 after consuming these mixtures.  BOOM found that though all the ingredients are effective against viral illnesses, there is no study supporting their role in acting against SARS-CoV-2. Turmeric is known to have anti-viral properties but its exact mode of action is not scientifically explained. On similar lines, ginger was seen to stop influenza virus from replicating when used with other natural compounds in a 2013 study. Cloves traditionally known as laving were seen to exhibit anti-viral properties against the herpes virus. Lemons that are sources of Vitamin C have also been reported to improve immunity.   Also Read: Patanjali's COVID-19 Cure Claims A Marketing Ploy, Say Experts In April, the Tamil Nadu government recommended the consumption of different kashayams for immunity boosting and not as cures. According to media reports, the government distributed one lakh packets of kashayams, in the containment zones in Chennai, as a prevention measure for COVID-19    The AYUSH ministry has so far issued a list of Ayurvedic, Unani, Sidha, and Homeopathic medicines for improving immunity on March 6 when India reported only 31 cases of COVID-19. It had also recommended Arsenicum Album, a homeopathic medicine for preventing COVID-19 as early as January 29, a day before the first case of COVID-19 was reported in the country. There have been no studies highlighting the effectiveness of this medicine.  Also Read: Does Homeopathic Medicine Arsenicum Album 30 Prevent Coronavirus? A Fact Check ,
https://www.boomlive.in/fake-news/factcheck-audio-message-claims-steam-inhalation-kills-covid-19-8796,A viral WhatsApp audio clip presumed to be the voice of a Mumbai-based doctor, encourages the use of steam inhalation to kill SARS-CoV-2, the virus that causes COVID-19. BOOM decided to fact check the claim and found out that so far, there is no scientific evidence supporting the claim that steam acts on the COVID-19 virus.  A pulmonologist we reached out to explained that steam only clears the nasal pathway for shedding of mucous but does not inactivate any viruses. The audio viral on WhatsApp is circulating in the name of Dr. Bhonsale from Cooper Hospital in Mumbai wherein he is heard discussing the use of steam inhalation machines to ward off COVID-19 in Marathi and English. BOOM contacted Dr. Bhonsale who declined to comment. In the 7:36 minute audio, a man is heard saying that he distributed steam inhalation machines through his trust. He discusses that the virus settles in the 'paranasal sinus'- cavities around the nose and is killed at a temperature of 60-70º which is provided through steam. He further elaborates the different number of times a person should inhale steam to inactivate the virus if it has entered one's body. He also speaks about eating chickoos and bananas for immunity boosting.  BOOM received the audio on its WhatsApp helpline asking for it to be verified. The caption with the audio reads, "Dr. Bhosale of Cooper Hospital in conversation with his friend."  Also Read:COVID-19 Test In Mumbai Will No Longer Require A Doctor's Prescription In the audio, a man discusses the presence of SARS-CoV-2 in the paranasal sinus and how it can be killed while it is lying dormant in that specific area for four days. BOOM spoke to Dr. Preyas Vaidya, Consultant Pulmonologist, Fortis Hospitals who said that there is no evidence discussing where the virus is found in the body.  "Scientists have not been able to find where the virus settles or lies dormant in the body. Claiming it stays in the paranasal sinus- a cavity around the nose for four days needs more scientific proof. They found the virus in the blood in China. It affects many areas in the body," Dr. Vaidya stated.  Dr. Vaidya also clarified that studies for the effect of steam inhalation on other viruses have shown that it just clears the pathway for shedding of mucous but does not inactivate any viruses. "Steam inhalation at very high temperatures could lead to inflammation and irritation in the nasal route," Dr. Vaidya added.  The man in the audio also mentions that you should inhale steam once in a day if you are not stepping out of the house, twice if you go out for a short while, and every two hours if you are in contact with a COVID-19 patient. He even says that this is the best practice to follow for preventing the virus.  "So far, hand hygiene, wearing a mask, and social distancing have been approved methods of prevention. There is nothing else that the World Health Organization has prescribed," added Dr. Vaidya. India is also using hydroxychloroquine for preventive measures of COVID-19.  The audio clip also mentions police personnel at Santacruz Police station using steam inhalation machines provided by him and thus not having any cases. BOOM reached out to Shriram Koregaonkar, senior inspector, Santacruz police station who confirmed that they have received these machines and they are using them. He, however, denied that no cases of COVID-19 have been detected at the police station. An assistant sub-inspector attached to the hospital passed away due to COVID-19 in June.  BOOM could not independently verify the identity of the person in the audio clip. BOOM has earlier debunked messages claiming garlic, ginger, tea, coffee, kashayams, can prevent and cure COVID-19.  Also Read: Drinking Warm Water With Lemon Does Not Protect You From Coronavirus,
https://pesacheck.org/false-there-is-currently-no-vaccine-against-covid-19-d2ef50cc1dff,Sign up Sign in Sign up Sign in PesaCheck Follow PesaCheck -- Listen Share An article published on Opera News claiming that Israel has announced a vaccine for novel coronavirus is FALSE. The article, which was published on March 1, appears to be based on a statement published by Israel’s MIGAL Research Institute, announcing that they had made a breakthrough in the development of a vaccine against the novel coronavirus (COVID-19). The MIGAL Research Institute is a research organization based in northern Israel, and is recognized for its work in agro-innovation and biomedical research projects. The statement issued on February 27 by the institute goes into detail about the discovery of a vaccine for Infectious Bronchitis Virus (IBV), which is a coronavirus, belonging to the same family of viruses as the one behind COVID-19. This research is expected to contribute to the development of a vaccine against COVID-19. The MIGAL researchers discovered that the poultry coronavirus has high genetic similarity to the human COVID-19, and that it uses the same infection mechanism. The researchers said they have now made the required genetic adjustments to adapt the vaccine to COVID-19. According to the Centers for Disease Control (CDC) there is currently no vaccine against COVID-19, and The World Health Organization (WHO) states that possible vaccines and some specific drug treatments are being tested through clinical trials. The WHO is coordinating efforts to develop vaccines and medicines to prevent and treat COVID-19. There are no reports of the development of a vaccine against COVID-19 from the MIGAL Institute, the World Health Organization, and the government of Israel, indicating that the claim is false. The researchers at MIGAL Institute are currently working to achieve the safety approval that will enable in-vivo testing to enable the production of a vaccine that will counter the novel coronavirus epidemic. PesaCheck has looked into the claim that Israel has announced a vaccine against the novel coronavirus and finds it to be FALSE. This post is part of an ongoing series of PesaCheck fact-checks examining content marked as potential misinformation on Facebook and other social media platforms. By partnering with Facebook and similar social media platforms, third-party fact-checking organisations like PesaCheck are helping to sort fact from fiction. We do this by giving the public deeper insight and context to posts they see in their social media feeds. Have you spotted what you think is fake news or false information on Facebook? Here’s how you can report. And, here’s more information on PesaCheck’s methodology for fact-checking questionable content. This fact-check was written by Fact-Checker Linda Ngari and edited by PesaCheck Deputy Editor Ann Ngengere with research input from Sylvia Makinia. The article was approved for publication by PesaCheck Managing Editor Eric Mugendi. PesaCheck is East Africa’s first public finance fact-checking initiative. It was co-founded by Catherine Gicheru and Justin Arenstein, and is being incubated by the continent’s largest civic technology and data journalism accelerator: Code for Africa. It seeks to help the public separate fact from fiction in public pronouncements about the numbers that shape our world, with a special emphasis on pronouncements about public finances that shape government’s delivery of Sustainable Development Goals (SDG) public services, such as healthcare, rural development and access to water / sanitation. PesaCheck also tests the accuracy of media reportage. To find out more about the project, visit pesacheck.org. PesaCheck is a joint initiative of Code for Africa, through its innovateAFRICA fund, with additional funding support from the International Budget Partnership (Kenya) and Twaweza, in partnership with a coalition of local media organisations, and the International Center for Journalists (ICFJ). -- -- PesaCheck Are they lying? Kenya’s 1st fact-checking initiative verifies statements by public figures. A @Code4Kenya and @IBP_Kenya initiative, supported by @Code4Africa. Help Status About Careers Blog Privacy Terms Text to speech Teams,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/black-seed-oil-medicinal-but-not-proven-cure-for-covid-19/,A Facebook post claims black seed oil is a “solution” to Covid-19 as the Prophet Muhammad, the founder of Islam, said it “cures all diseases”. “COVID-19 SOLUTION: YET ANOTHER REMINDER. ‘Black seed oil cures all diseases except death,’ says Prophet Muhammad (SAW),” the 13 July 2020 post reads. The Prophet Muhammad is quoted as saying this, or a version of this, in the Hadith. This is a record of the prophet’s actions and sayings and, according to Britannica, “revered and received as a major source of religious law and moral guidance, second only to the authority of the Quran, the holy book of Islam”. But is it correct to say that the oil of black seed, also known as black cumin, cures Covid-19? A cure for any disease cannot be presented without scientific evidence, Marycelin Baba, a professor of medical virology at Nigeria’s University of Maiduguri, told Africa Check. “It can only be determined by scientific study. The people that make the claim should provide scientific evidence,” she said.   The post does not provide any scientific evidence for its claim. Black seed is produced by the plant Nigella sativa, which is native to north Africa, southern Europe and southwest Asia. It is cultivated in many countries of the world and widely used in traditional systems of medicine. But Africa Check could find no specific studies that found black seed oil cured Covid-19. However, the abstract of a study, published on 12 June on the World Health Organization website, reveals that scientists are looking at the potential of Nigella sativa compounds as a natural antiviral for the treatment of the coronavirus disease. The study, done in Pakistan, notes that Nigella sativa is used as a medicinal plant and has been reported in several studies to treat different diseases such as influenza, headache, hypertension, diabetes, inflammation, eczema, fever, cough, asthma and bronchitis. The abstract says the study checked the therapeutic potentials of black seed’s chief constituents against Covid-19.  The authors say a compound in the seed, “if validated in wet-lab experiments, could be used to treat Covid-19 and could serve as a lead in the future for the more effective natural antivirals against Covid-19”. Both the WHO and the Nigeria Centre for Disease Control say there is still no specific and proven cure for Covid-19. “However, there are many ongoing clinical trials to test various potential antivirals,” the NCDC says. We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/pax-herbal-remedy-not-approved-as-covid-19-treatment-says-nigerias-drug-control-agency/,Nigeria’s food and drug control agency has approved a certain herbal mix as a treatment for Covid-19, claims a message circulating widely on Facebook since 10 July 2020. “NAFDAC approves PAX Herbal Remedy for Covid-19,” it begins. Nafdac is Nigeria’s National Agency for Food and Drug Administration and Control. The message says Anslem Adodo, director of the Pax Herbal Clinic and Research Laboratories in Edo state, announced the approval. “After a series of screening, spanning eight weeks, NAFDAC has today approved our PAXHERBAL Covid-19 herbal drug, PAXHERBAL CUGZIN, for public use,” it quotes him as saying. “It is the first to be so approved and presently the only one. The drug is specifically for treating the symptoms associated with the coronavirus.” One version of the message has been viewed more than 16,000 times. It’s also appeared on WhatsApp and in a website article. But what’s the real story here? Nafdac regulates and controls the manufacture, import and export, advertisement, distribution, sale and use of food, drugs, cosmetics, medical devices, chemicals and packaged water in Nigeria. On 11 July, the agency tweeted a statement that it had not approved the herbal remedy as “safe to use” as a Covid-19 treatment.  Paxherbal applied for Listing of Pax Herbal Cugzin capsule 290mg which was approved by NAFDAC and Listed as “Safe to use”.
The applicant claimed that it is an immune booster and an anti-infective. “Paxherbal applied for Listing of Pax Herbal Cugzin capsule 290mg which was approved by NAFDAC and Listed as ‘Safe to use’,” the tweet reads. “The applicant claimed that it is an immune booster and an anti-infective.” An anti-infective is a medicine that prevents or treats an infection. “However, as part of the labelling of the product, and in line with global practice, a Disclaimer is on the product label which clearly states that THE CLAIMS HAVE NOT BEEN EVALUATED BY NAFDAC,” Nafdac added.  “Therefore the statements circulating on social media that NAFDAC has approved Paxherbal products ‘specifically for treating symptoms associated with Coronavirus’ is WRONG and INACCURATE.” Therefore the statements circulating on social media that NAFDAC has approved Paxherbal products "specifically for treating symptoms associated with Coronavirus" is WRONG and INACCURATE. The agency added that it was “currently processing Twenty-One (21) herbal medicinal products for ‘Safe to use’ or Listing status”. Many applications claimed the products were immune boosters and anti-infectives that could be used to treat Covid-19 symptoms, it said. But none were backed by clinical studies that proved they worked. As of 13 July, Nigeria had more than 33,000 confirmed cases of Covid-19, with 744 reported deaths. – David Ajikobi We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/no-dexamethasone-not-a-covid-19-vaccine-no-evidence-it-causes-infertility/,We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/no-evidence-drinking-asthma-plant-tea-helps-covid-19-breathing-complications/,We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://factcheck.afp.com/health-authorities-did-not-say-drinking-water-will-prevent-coronavirus,The posts have been shared thousands of times on Facebook -- we’ve archived some of them here, here and here. “DOH Health Bulletin to the Public”, reads one post, which claims to represent a medical laboratory in the Philippines, referring to the country’s Department of Health. “Canadian Department of Health Bulletin. Pls tell ur families, relatives and friends,” reads another post on a Facebook page called “Dr. Kiddy”, which offers “tips about kids health”. The posts go on to recommend drinking warm water to prevent coronavirus, which has killed hundreds of people and spread around the world since emerging in a Chinese market at the end of last year. “The prevention method now is to keep your throat moist, do not let your throat dry up”, read the posts, which all resemble each other almost word for word. “Drink 50-80cc warm water, 30-50cc for kids, according to age. Every time you feel your throat is dry, do not wait, keep water in hand”, they say. Similar advice has been circulating on WhatsApp and Facebook in India, purportedly issued by the country’s health ministry, India Today reported last week. Although drinking water is generally regarded as a good thing for health, AFP found no evidence that authorities have recommended it as a safeguard against coronavirus. Health Canada -- the country’s public health service -- told AFP they did not issue the advice in the Facebook posts. They offer tips on their website on preventing coronavirus infection, but they do not mention drinking water. AFP found no trace of the advice on the Philippines’ health department website, including on an information page on coronavirus. The website issues a warning urging the public to “source information only from official DOH channels and social media accounts”. The World Health Organization’s advice on limiting the risk of infection includes frequently washing hands, coughing and sneezing into a tissue and avoiding close contact with anyone who has fever and cough. As well as drinking water, the Facebook posts give other recommendations, such as staying away from crowded places “till end of March”. However, scientists have not been able to predict how long the epidemic will last. The SARS (Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome) epidemic -- which killed 774 after emerging in Guangdong in southern China in 2002 -- was stemmed after several months thanks to strict hygiene controls and a global mobilisation. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/image-has-circulated-reports-about-china-testing-potential-covid-19-vaccine-has-not-been-approved,The image was published here on Facebook on March 7, 2020. It features one photo of an individual wearing a white gown administering an injection into the arm of another person dressed in military fatigues. It also features a second image of seven people dressed in military fatigues and masks.  Below is a screenshot of the misleading post on Facebook: The English and Chinese text in the image reads: “First shot of Covid-19 vaccine developed by China. The postgraduate research team leader took the first shot. The world’s first new coronavirus vaccine was injected into the left arm of the lead researcher, Dr Chen Wei, today. Seven medical volunteers, all members of the Communist Party also received the new Coronavirus vaccine. State Council Vice Premier Sun Chunlan visited Chen Wei and the expertise team members.” COVID-19 was first detected in the Chinese city of Wuhan in December 2019. It has since spread worldwide, killing at least 13,000 and infecting 300,000 others, according to this AFP report dated March 22, 2020.  The image was also shared here, here, here, here and here on Facebook, here, here, here and here on Twitter and here on Instagram, alongside a similar claim. The claim is misleading. Chinese state media organisation The People’s Daily published this tweet on March 5, 2020 which labels the claim “FAKENEWS”, alongside a link to this post on its Facebook page. Did Chinese PLA medics test a coronavirus vaccine on themselves? #FAKENEWS. Clinical trials remain underway and this is what the real story is: https://t.co/IxrdGlerZt pic.twitter.com/G9BwnEHsvD  The Facebook post reads, in part: “PLA medics are not testing #COVID19 vaccines on themselves, as some would have you believe.  “Photos of a female PLA medic getting a shot have gone viral on the Internet and have made many people wonder if the Chinese PLA is testing a coronavirus vaccine on themselves... the human clinical trial assumption is simply fake news.” The post was published alongside a photo identical to that seen in the misleading image. The People’s Daily states the photo shows Chen Wei, an academician at China’s People's Liberation Army, receiving a shot for “strengthening immunity” before her departure to Wuhan to join the aid effort. Below is a screenshot of the Facebook post: Below is screenshot comparison of the photo from the misleading Facebook post (L) and the photo from the People’s Daily Facebook post (R): This Global Times report dated March 4, 2020 states Chen was sent to Wuhan, and “achieved a major breakthrough in developing a vaccine to the novel coronavirus”. The report states, in part: “The military medical expert team has worked in Wuhan, the coronavirus epicenter, for more than a month, and the team led by Chen Wei, academician at the People's Liberation Army (PLA) Academy of Military Medical Sciences, is seizing every minute and second and focusing all efforts on this emergency scientific research”. China announced on March 17, 2020 that it will start human trials for a COVID-19 vaccine manufactured by Chen’s team. This Global Times report published on the same date reads in part: “The coronavirus vaccine developed by Chen's team passed the registration review of clinical research and was approved for clinical trial on Monday night.” “After arriving at Wuhan, Chen Wei, a Chinese military major general, and her team launched pharmacy, pharmaceutical and toxicological research on COVID-19 vaccine in cooperation with local companies, based on their previous successful experiences in developing Ebola vaccine.”  “Chen, the military scientist, was quoted as saying in the report that the vaccine has been tested on safety, effectiveness and quality control and is prepared for massive production. And the biotechnology firm has started to recruit volunteers for the vaccine.” The World Health Organization (WHO) has said there is currently no medicine that can prevent or treat COVID-19. The Q&A section of its website reads, in part: “To date, there is no vaccine and no specific antiviral medicine to prevent or treat COVID-2019… Possible vaccines and some specific drug treatments are under investigation. They are being tested through clinical trials. WHO is coordinating efforts to develop vaccines and medicines to prevent and treat COVID-19.” Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/jul/29/facebook-posts/2005-chloroquine-study-had-nothing-do-covid-19-and/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 The 2005 study wasn’t published by the NIH and didn’t prove chloroquine was effective against "COVID-1" because that’s not a real disease. The study found that chloroquine could inhibit the spread of Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome in animal cell culture, and the authors said more research was needed.  There are currently no approved medications or treatments for COVID-19. Chloroquine is back. The anti-malarial drug first showed up as a possible COVID-19 treatment around May 2020, when President Donald Trump said he had been taking its chemical cousin, hydroxychloroquine, to prevent getting infected with the virus. Since then, some studies have found that the drugs could help alleviate symptoms associated with COVID-19, but the research is not conclusive. There are currently no FDA-approved medicines specifically for COVID-19. (Chloroquine is chemically similar to hydroxychloroquine, but it is a different drug that’s primarily used to treat malaria. Both carry a particular risk for people with heart problems, plus other possible side effects.) Now, hydroxychloroquine and chloroquine have been thrust back into the spotlight as misinformation about the drugs’ effectiveness and safety recently reappeared online. RELATED: Don’t fall for this video: Hydroxychloroquine is not a COVID-19 cure One such post on Facebook falsely claims that Americans have been deceived because health officials at the National Institutes of Health have known all along that chloroquine is effective against "COVID."  The post reads:  "N.I.H. 15 years ago published a study on chloroquine. It is effective against COVID-(1). We are being lied to America!" The post was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.)  This is flawed.  First, there’s no such thing as "COVID-1." COVID-19 was named for the year it was discovered, not because it’s the 19th iteration.  Second, the 2005 study found that chloroquine was effective on primate cells infected with severe acute respiratory syndrome, known as SARS, which is caused by a coronavirus. But while the two share similarities, SARS-CoV and COVID-19 are different diseases, and primate cells are far from human patients. Third, the study was indexed by the NIH’s National Library of Medicine, but the NIH was not involved. It was published in the peer-reviewed Virology Journal and conducted by researchers from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the Montreal Clinical Research Institute. RELATED: Hydroxychloroquine and coronavirus: what you need to know The study was published in August 2005 and found that chloroquine has "strong antiviral effects on SARS-CoV infection of primate cells" and that it was effective on cells treated with the drug before and after exposure to the virus. The drug was not administered to actual SARS patients, and the study’s authors wrote that more research was needed on how the drug interacts with SARS in animal test subjects. "Cell culture testing of an antiviral drug against the virus is only the first step, of many steps, necessary to develop an antiviral drug," Kate Fowlie, a spokesperson for the CDC previously told PolitiFact in an email. "It is important to realize that most antivirals that pass this cell culture test hurdle fail at later steps in the development process." Dr. Alex Greninger, assistant director of clinical virology at the University of Washington School of Medicine, told us that a problem in virology is trying to determine the difference of how drugs work in cell culture in comparison to humans. "Data on chloroquine is largely taken from these cell culture studies, but we now have trials in people on hydroxychloroquine that show it’s not as effective," Greninger said, "and there’s new data out in the last week that suggests that some of the reasons could be because of the cell types that SARS coronaviruses grow in, and this original experiment was done on African green monkey kidney cells, which is not the tissue we are really worried about." The Food and Drug Administration granted emergency use authorizations for some medicines to be used for certain patients hospitalized with COVID-19, but it revoked the authorization for hydroxychloroquine and chloroquine in mid-June due to concerns over the drugs’ serious side effects. There are currently no FDA-approved medicines for COVID-19.  "It is no longer reasonable to believe that oral formulations of HCQ and CQ may be effective in treating COVID-19, nor is it reasonable to believe that the known and potential benefits of these products outweigh their known and potential risks," FDA Chief Scientist Denise M. Hinton wrote. The NIH’s COVID-19 treatment guidelines, which were developed to inform clinicians on how to care for patients with COVID-19, also currently recommend against the use of chloroquine or hydroxychloroquine for COVID-19 treatment, except in a clinical trial. But even those trials have been halted. The World Health Organization and the NIH announced in mid-June that they would stop hydroxychloroquine patient trials, citing safety concerns that include serious heart rhythm problems, blood and lymph system disorders, kidney injuries, and liver problems and failure. A Facebook post says that the NIH published a study 15 years ago that showed chloroquine was effective against "COVID-(1)" and that health officials have been lying to the American people. This is wrong. There’s no such thing as "COVID-1" and the study cited was not published by the NIH and had to do with animal cells infected with SARS, not COVID-19. The drug was not given to human patients and the study’s authors said more research was needed. Health officials caution against the use of chloroquine or hydroxychloroquine to treat COVID-19 patients, citing the possibility of serious side effects. There are currently no approved treatments for the virus. We rate this False.  

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 Facebook post, July 27, 2020 National Library of Medicine, Chloroquine is a potent inhibitor of SARS coronavirus infection and spread, Aug. 22, 2005 PolitiFact, Hydroxychloroquine and coronavirus: what you need to know, April 8, 2020 PolitiFact, Hydroxychloroquine is not proven to treat COVID-19 or radiation sickness, May 19, 2020 PolitiFact, Don’t fall for conspiracy about Dr. Anthony Fauci, hydroxychloroquine, May 6, 2020 Food and Drug Administration, FDA cautions against use of hydroxychloroquine or chloroquine for COVID-19 outside of the hospital setting or a clinical trial due to risk of heart rhythm problems, Updated July 1, 2020 Food and Drug Administration, Letter revoking EUA for chloroquine phosphate and hydroxychloroquine sulfate, June 15, 2020 National Institutes of Health, Chloroquine or Hydroxychloroquine, Updated June 16, 2020 Nature, Chloroquine does not inhibit infection of human lung cells with SARS-CoV-2, July 22, 2020 Email interview, National Institutes of Health spokesperson, July 28, 2020 Phone interview, Dr. Alex Greninger assistant director of the University of Washington’s Clinical Virology Division, July 28, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://www.factcheck.org/2020/07/video-misrepresents-the-science-behind-face-masks/, By Saranac Hale Spencer Posted on July 24, 2020 A viral video misrepresents scientific papers and the reasons for wearing face masks to claim that they are ineffective in mitigating transmission of COVID-19. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention has said that masks may help prevent the spread of the disease. A video pushing misinformation about face masks racked up hundreds of thousands of views on Facebook and YouTube, before the latter removed it for violating the platform’s community standards. It begins with a promise to answer these questions: “In our highly politicized climate, it seems like everybody has to be on some kind of team… If we set aside feelings and we just look at facts, what do facts say about wearing a face mask?  What does science say about face masks and whether or not they prevent the spread of viruses like COVID-19?” But it doesn’t report either facts or science. Right from the start, in that introduction, the video gets it wrong — COVID-19 isn’t a virus. Rather, it’s the disease that is caused by the novel coronavirus, or SARS-CoV-2. More importantly, contrary to its claim that it would cut through the politics of wearing masks, the video actually goes on to misrepresent several scientific papers in an effort to support the claim that wearing a face mask is useless, or worse, that its use is harmful to the wearer. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention has explained that face coverings are meant to help prevent the spread of the novel coronavirus by containing respiratory droplets created when people cough, sneeze or talk. That’s called source control. The CDC has also noted that masks shouldn’t be worn if they are likely to cause harm, and it has said not everyone will be able to wear one. That’s been the recommendation of the CDC since early April, when the agency changed its original position on the use of face masks during the COVID-19 pandemic, citing new studies on the transmission of the novel coronavirus. We’ve written numerous stories explaining the guidance and correcting misinformation on the issue. Despite all that, misinformation about masks persists. This video is a particularly polished example since it is produced to look like a television news segment. It’s presented by Ben Swann, a television journalist who won regional Emmy Awards in 2005 and 2009. But Swann has more recently been featured as the co-host of a show called Boom Bust on the Russia-based, government-funded TV network RT, formerly Russia Today, and he has made videos pushing conspiracy theories. The video was produced by Swann’s website, called Truth In Media. In this video, Swann starts off by citing seven scientific papers. He incorrectly refers to them all as “studies,” but only two of them are studies, while the rest are reviews. Reviews are often more comprehensive than individual studies since they provide an overview of a scientific issue by analyzing relevant studies, although they don’t provide new facts or findings of their own. After listing the papers, Swann says: “All of these are RTCs, randomized controlled tests, that are essentially set up to determine whether or not these N95 respirator masks help to prevent the spread of viruses in this setting, and all of these studies found that they do not.” Not only is it wrong to say they are all RTCs, or randomized clinical trials — as we said, five of them are reviews of those types of studies — it’s also wrong to characterize their findings that way. One of the studies and two of the reviews he cites looked at how N95 masks compared to surgical masks in protecting health care workers from getting sick, and the rest of them, similarly, mostly examined how masks generally performed in protecting health care workers from disease. It’s important to note that nearly all of the studies covered in the reviews were dealing with the use of masks by health care workers, who have more exposure to infected patients than the general public. They also focused on protection from infection, not source control. Swann then claimed: “In the 2019 study, there was no significant difference by wearing N95 respirator masks. Happened again in 2020.” But the 2019 study looked at the effect of N95 respirators compared to surgical masks to prevent health care workers from getting the flu and “other viral respiratory infections in geographically diverse, high-exposure, outpatient settings.” It did not examine the use of masks as source control for containing the spread of a virus in the general population. It also didn’t include a group of study subjects who didn’t wear masks at all, so the outcomes of those who wore surgical masks or N95 respirators can’t be compared to outcomes for non-mask wearers. The 2020 “study” is actually a review that includes the 2019 study along with five other similar studies, looking largely at the effect of masks in protecting health care workers from getting sick. That review included only one study that wasn’t focused on health care workers. Published in 2009, that study looked at the use of masks in households with a sick child and found that if masks aren’t used regularly and correctly, they won’t be effective in controlling the spread of seasonal viruses. “However,” the study found, “during a severe pandemic when use of face masks might be greater, pandemic transmission in households could be reduced.” As we’ve written before, there have been relatively few studies looking at the efficacy of face masks on the  public, and the ones that have been done are inconsistent or have not observed large effects. Swann goes on to claim (emphasis added): “There’s another study that was also done in 2020. It was done by a group of researchers in Hong Kong. The study was conducted just before COVID-19 hysteria took over and the results of it were released just a few weeks ago and, once again, those researchers found the very same thing: that there was, in fact, no statistical reason to believe that face masks will protect you, but improper use of a face mask actually puts you at greater risk of contamination.” Again, this was a review of previously completed studies, not a new study, and it looked largely at how effective various methods  — including wearing a mask, hand hygiene, covering coughs and sneezes, and cleaning surfaces — would be in responding to an influenza pandemic. The review did include studies of face masks used for source control, but found that “[m]ost studies were underpowered because of limited sample size, and some studies also reported suboptimal adherence in the face mask group.” The researchers also said, “We did not find evidence that surgical-type face masks are effective in reducing laboratory-confirmed influenza transmission, either when worn by infected persons (source control) or by persons in the general community to reduce their susceptibility. However, as with hand hygiene, face masks might be able to reduce the transmission of other infections and therefore have value in an influenza pandemic when healthcare resources are stretched.” Swann released a follow-up video about a week after the original and relied heavily on this paper, claiming that it “proves that face masks do not prevent the spread of a virus.” But one of the researchers who worked on the paper, Benjamin Cowling, told us by email, “It is wrong to say that our review said there was no effectiveness of face masks. We could only rule out very large effects.” Cowling, an epidemiologist at the University of Hong Kong, explained that, “while we said there was not a significant effect, we could not exclude the possibility that masks reduce transmission by 10% or 20%. Those would be useful effect sizes.” He also noted on Twitter that he and his colleagues worked with the World Health Organization in 2019 to come up with guidelines for mitigating pandemic influenza. Those guidelines recommend wearing a mask in “severe epidemics or pandemics.” As for the claim that using a mask improperly could “put you at greater risk of contamination,” that possibility is mentioned in one sentence in the paper, which cites interim guidance from the WHO to address the H1N1 pandemic in 2009. That two-page WHO paper doesn’t explain what that caution is based on, but it does lay out best practices for wearing masks in the general public, saying: If masks are worn, proper use and disposal is essential to ensure they are potentially effective and to avoid any increase in risk of transmission associated with the incorrect use of masks. The following information on correct use of masks derives from the practices in health-care settings: Swann next builds on his claim about contamination, saying (emphasis added): “What we’ve been told, over and over, is that if you just wear a cloth mask over your face, it’s better than nothing, so you should do that. And, so, because of that, we have tens of millions of people walking around with cloth masks on their face. Now, get this, in 2015, there was actually a study done taking a look at medical masks versus just a cloth mask and whether or not wearing a cloth mask would protect against the spread of a virus and what that study found in 2015 should alarm you. Not only does wearing a cloth mask not prevent the spread of a virus, it can actually put you at greater risk for catching the virus.” Again, this study did not look at the effect of masks as source control in slowing the spread of a virus, which is the reason the CDC recommends wearing them. Like most of the other papers cited in this video, it looked at how effective masks were in keeping health care workers from getting sick. And, like the 2019 study, it didn’t include a group who wore no masks, so it couldn’t say whether or not cloth masks might provide more protection than no mask at all. The study did find that “[m]oisture retention, reuse of cloth masks and poor filtration may result in increased risk of infection.” But it said that “[f]urther research is needed to inform the widespread use of cloth masks globally.” Also, the authors of that study released a statement this year to clarify questions about their 2015 findings in relation to COVID-19. They noted the shortage of personal protective equipment and explained that, in their study conducted in Vietnam, the cloth masks may not have been washed well enough and that the effectiveness of a mask could change depending on the material and the number of layers used. On top of that, Raina MacIntyre, who was lead researcher on that study, clarified to FactCheck.org in an email, “The findings of the study are not translatable to the community, or to all cloth masks.” MacIntyre, who heads the biosecurity program at the University of New South Wales’ Kirby Institute, went on to say, “There is also the matter of source control, which is preventing outward transmission from an infected person. A face covering provides a physical barrier.” She stressed that reusable masks have to be cleaned after every use. Swann next made this sweeping claim: “Wearing a face mask on a regular basis is unhealthy for you and there are multiple studies that show that.” That’s based entirely on an article written by Dr. Russell Blaylock, who has pitched several dubious claims over the years and writes an alternative medicine newsletter. Swann focused on the section of the Blaylock article that said health care workers have reported getting headaches with prolonged use of personal protective equipment, which is backed up by two studies cited in Blaylock’s article. Those studies looked at health care workers who wore N95 masks for hours at a time, not shoppers wearing a cloth face covering to go to the grocery store. Swann also read from another section of Blaylock’s article, paraphrasing it this way: “There’s another danger to wearing these masks on a daily basis, especially if you’re wearing it for several hours. When a person is infected with a respiratory virus, they will expel some of that virus with each breath. But if you’re wearing a mask, especially an N95 mask, you’re breathing back in the virus every time you attempt to expel it.” Swann doesn’t explain what he means, but it sounds like a claim we debunked when it was made in the viral video called “Plandemic” that filled social media feeds in May. In that video, Judy Mikovits, a former chronic fatigue researcher, claimed: “Wearing the mask literally activates your own virus. You’re getting sick from your own reactivated coronavirus expressions and if it happens to be SARS-CoV-2, then you’ve got a big problem.” Experts we talked to at the time said her claim didn’t hold up. Linsey Marr, a professor of civil and environmental engineering at Virginia Tech who studies airborne disease transmission, told us then, “If you’re shedding (breathing out) virus, then you’re already infected. Even without a mask, infected people who are shedding virus probably rebreathe some of their own viruses, but there are already billions times more viruses in your body. Hopefully, the mask is protecting other people from your exhalations.” Also, the fact-checking organization Science Feedback addressed the same Blaylock article that Swann cited, debunking the claim that wearing a mask concentrates “exhaled viruses” in the nose, which sends them to the brain. Science Feedback called it “unsupported and illogical.” They wrote: “If someone is exhaling the virus, then they are already infected. The spread of the infection would be largely determined by how well the person’s immune system fights off the infection, not by whether they inhaled virus particles that they previously exhaled.” Swann wrapped up the video with a misrepresentation aimed at Dr. Anthony Fauci, director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases. “Even the biggest doctor of them all in this country, Dr. Anthony Fauci, who keeps talking about this issue, referred to wearing a face mask as mostly symbolic. Listen to his words — he called it, ‘mostly symbolic,'” Swann said. Here’s what Fauci actually said on CNN’s “Newsroom”: “I wear it for the reason that I believe it is effective. It’s not 100% effective. I mean, it’s sort of, respect for another person and have that person respect you — you wear a mask, they wear a mask, you protect each other. I mean I do it when I’m in the public for the reasons, A) I want to protect myself and protect others and also I want to make it be a symbol for people to see that that’s the kind of thing you should be doing.” Regardless of Fauci’s real message, Swann used his twisted version of it to draw the conclusion that the recommendation to wear face masks is not about public health, but about the “submission of the public.” Looking at the camera, Swann asked, “Are we being forced to submit merely because politicians want us to?” Like his bogus claims based on misrepresentations of scientific papers, that claim is based on a misrepresentation of Fauci’s statement. Swann offered no further support for it. Editor’s note: FactCheck.org is one of several organizations working with Facebook to debunk misinformation shared on social media. Our previous stories can be found here. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. “About Cloth Face Coverings.” Updated 28 Jun 2020. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. “Considerations for Wearing Cloth Face Coverings — Help Slow the Spread of COVID-19.” Updated 16 Jun 2020. McDonald, Jessica. FactCheck.org. “COVID-19 Face Mask Advice, Explained.” 6 Apr 2020. Collins, Ben. Daily Beast. “Meet Ben Swann, the Republican Pizzagate Truther Hosting Atlanta’s CBS Nightly News.” 11 Apr 2017. Jacobs, Joshua, et al. “Use of surgical face masks to reduce the incidence of the common cold among health care workers in Japan: a randomized controlled trial.” American Journal of Infection Control. 12 Feb 2009. Radonovich, Lewis Jr., et al. “N95 Respirators vs Medical Masks for Preventing Influenza Among Health Care Personnel — A Randomized Clinical Trial.” JAMA. 3 Sep 2019. Long, Youlin, et al. “Effectiveness of N95 respirators versus surgical masks against influenza: A systematic review and meta‐analysis.” Journal of Evidence-Based Medicine. 13 Mar 2020. Offeddu, Vittoria, et al. “Effectiveness of Masks and Respirators Against Respiratory Infections in Healthcare Workers: A Systematic Review and Meta-Analysis.” Oxford University Press for the Infectious Diseases Society of America. 7 Aug 2017. Smith, Jeffrey, et al. “Effectiveness of N95 respirators versus surgical masks in protecting health care workers from acute respiratory infection: a systematic review and meta-analysis.” CMAJ. 17 May 2016. Cowling, B.J., et al. “Face masks to prevent transmission of influenza virus: a systematic review.” Cambridge University Press. 22 Jan 2010. Bin‐Reza, Faisal, et al. “The use of masks and respirators to prevent transmission of influenza: a systematic review of the scientific evidence.” Influenza Journal. 21 Dec 2011. MacIntyre, C Raina, et al. “Face mask use and control of respiratory virus transmission in households.” Emerging Infectious Diseases. Feb 2009. Xiao, Jingyi, et al. “Nonpharmaceutical Measures for Pandemic Influenza in Nonhealthcare Settings—Personal Protective and Environmental Measures.” Emerging Infectious Diseases. May 2020. World Health Organization. “Advice on the use of masks in the community setting in Influenza A (H1N1) outbreaks — Interim guidance.” 3 May 2009. MacIntyre, C Raina, et al. “A cluster randomised trial of cloth masks compared with medical masks in healthcare workers.” BMJ Open. 2015. MacIntyre, C Raina, et al. “COVID-19, shortages of masks and the use of cloth masks as a last resort.” BMJ Open. 30 Mar 2020. Blaylock, Russell. “Dr. Russell Blaylock: Face Masks Pose Serious Risks To The Healthy.” Accessed 20 Jul 2020. Fichera, Angelo, et al. FactCheck.org. “The Falsehoods of the ‘Plandemic’ Video.” 8 May 2020. Science Feedback. “No evidence that using a face mask helps coronavirus enter the brain, contrary to claim by Russell Blaylock.” 19 May 2020. Stracqualursi, Veronica. CNN. “Fauci says he wears a mask to be a symbol of what ‘you should be doing.’” 27 May 2020. MacIntyre, Raina. Head of the biosecurity program at the University of New South Wales’ Kirby Institute. Email exchange. 22 Jul 2020. Cowling, Benjamin. Epidemiologist, University of Hong Kong. Email exchange 23 Jul 2020. World Health Organization. “Non-pharmaceutical public health measures for mitigating the risk and impact of epidemic and pandemic influenza.” 2019. Q: Is one day isolation sufficient to stop forward transmission of COVID-19?  A: People with COVID-19 could potentially transmit it to others well beyond a day after developing symptoms or testing positive. New guidance from the CDC advises people to isolate until they have been fever-free and with symptoms improving for at least 24 hours, and then take precautions for five days, which covers the period when “most people are still infectious.”,
https://www.altnews.in/no-nanavati-hospital-does-not-recommend-lemon-turmeric-for-covid-treatment/,A viral WhatsApp forward claims that COVID experts at Mumbai’s Nanavati Hospital have informed that the following four “treatments” are given to coronavirus positive patients — warm water with lemon, ginger and jaggery mixed with ghee, hot milk with turmeric and steam once a day.  Alt News has received several requests on WhatsApp to fact-check the message.  The same message was circulating on Twitter and Nanavati Hospital replied to several users clarifying that none of its doctors has recommended the aforestated recipes as treatment. While Vitamin C and others help boost immunity against any infection or illness, these are not recommended treatments by our doctors for Corona Virus patients. Please follow any treatment protocols only after consulting your doctor. — Nanavati Hospital (@Nanavati_H) May 19, 2020 That lemon-infused water (Vitamin C) protects against COVID-19 is a false claim viral since the outbreak of the disease. An Alt News Sci Check published in March informed that there is no evidence suggesting that Vitamin C gets rid of the novel coronavirus. Turmeric, ginger and hot steam are also home “remedies” advised by certain ayurvedic doctors however none of them can prevent or cure the spread of the disease. Drinking hot water, washing it down, gargling or steaming with any other substances will not destroy the virus. The claim that Nanavati Hospital has recommended lemon-infused water, turmeric, ginger and steam as “treatment” for COVID-19 is dangerous misinformation. Donate Now Pooja Chaudhuri is a senior editor at Alt News. A video of a ladder moving on its own, purportedly from Jharkhand, is viral on… In a 2-minute video, a man recommends a “technique” to prevent infection from Omicron, the… A video of a set of iron nails that appear to melt after being placed… Several social media users have shared an image that shows two columns — ‘Cepa/variante’ (Spanish… A 90-second video of a man dissecting a banana has been shared on the internet….,
https://www.boomlive.in/fake-news/age-old-home-remedy-peddled-as-covid-19-cure-found-by-indian-student-8857,An age-old remedy of drinking a mixture of ginger, black pepper and honey to reduce cough is falsely being shared as a cure for COVID-19 discovered by an Indian student from Pondicherry University. The World Health Organization (WHO) has not approved any medicine or vaccine as a cure for COVID-19, so far.  BOOM spoke to the Vice- Chancellor of Pondicherry University who refuted the affiliation to the University. The origin of the message is unclear. Neither is it clear if the message started out as a joke.  The viral post says that an Indian student named Ramu from Pondicherry University has discovered a cure for COVID-19 which has been approved by the WHO. It further hails a remedy that Indians have been using for years to relieve symptoms of cough and cold. This is another addition to the list of home remedies which are being shared across social media to tackle COVID-19.  Also Read: FactCheck: Audio Message Claims Steam Inhalation Kills COVID-19 The claim reads, "Finally a INDIAN student from PONDICHERRY university, named RAMU  found a home remedy cure for Covid-19 which is for the very first time accepted by WHO. - He proved that by adding 1 tablespoon of black pepper powder to 2 table spoons of honey and some ginger juice for consecutive 5 days would suppress the effects of corona. And eventually go away 100% - Entire world is starting to accept this remedy. Finally a good news In 2020!!  This claim is viral on all social media channels while BOOM received the claim on its WhatsApp helpline with a request to verify its authenticity.  The post hailing the student is also viral on Facebook and Twitter.  View archive here.  Finally a INDIAN student from PONDICHERRY university, named RAMU found a home remedy cure for Covid-19 which is for the very first time accepted by WHO.- He proved that by adding 1 tablespoon of black pepper powder to 2 table spoons of honey and some ginger juice for 1/2 View archive here.  Also Read: Does Drinking 'Kashayam' Cure COVID-19? A Factcheck BOOM contacted Gurmeet Singh, Vice Chancellor at Pondicherry University who refuted the claim.  "This is fake. The University has been dragged into these news. None of our students have made any coronavirus cure related discovery," said Singh.  Furthermore, the message claims that the WHO has approved this 'desi' concoction of black pepper, ginger and honey as a cure for COVID-19. The apex organisation has not approved any drugs or vaccines as a cure for coronavirus. Trials and experimental use of drugs such as AIDS anti-virals lopinavir and ritonavir, steroid dexamethasone, anti-viral drugs remdesivir, favipiravir, and immunosuppresant tocilizumab as well as plasma therapy are underway in many countries. There are over 132 vaccine candidates at various stages of vaccine development and clinical trials.  Also Read: Fast Tracking COVID-19 Vaccine Launch: Why ICMR Got It Wrong Effect of Ginger, Honey, Black Pepper The message claims that a mixture of 1 tablespoon of black pepper with 2 tablespoons of honey and ginger when taken for a period of five consecutive days will successfully remove the virus from a person's body. BOOM reached out to Dr. Harish Chafle, Consultant Intensivist and Chest Physician, Global Hospital, Mumbai to understand the scientific basis for this remedy. Dr. Chafle said that its Ayurvedic properties may have helped against cough but there is no substantive proof for its action on COVID-19.  "As a home remedy, Ayurveda talks about their medicinal properties, for acting on coughs. Acting on coronavirus, a definite no," said Dr. Chafle. While pepper does have antimicrobial properties, the WHO has clarified that it has no effect on SARS-CoV-2.  Similarly, honey has antibacterial properties but its effect on COVID-19 has not been determined.  BOOM has earlier debunked a claim that Ginger acts against COVID-19. Experts said that there was no scientific evidence supporting this claim.  Also Read: Can Coronavirus Be Cured By Drinking Boiled Ginger? Many Indians drink concoctions of black pepper, honey, and ginger to relieve spasms of coughs. It is a type of 'kadha' consumed to treat itchy throats. ,
https://factcheck.afp.com/kenya-governor-quotes-non-existent-who-research-defend-alcohol-donations,Sonko made the remarks during a press briefing where he justified the inclusion of bottles of Hennessy cognac in food donations to city dwellers during the partial lockdown. “I think from the research which has been conducted by the World Health Organization and various health organisations, it has been revealed that alcohol plays a very major role in killing the coronavirus or any sort of virus,” Sonko says in the press briefing. “If you take any sanitiser and check the alcoholic content, you will find each sanitiser has above 70 percent of alcohol content... Hennessy has some percentage of alcoholic content, that should act as a throat sanitiser. It kills the virus just in case the virus is held somewhere in the throat. So the Hennessy which are there, I am giving them to adults and not any person below 18-years of age”. “We will have some small bottles of Hennessy in the food packs that we will be giving to our people…” - Nairobi Governor Mike Sonko
		Note: WHO warns that drinking alcohol does not protect you against COVID-19 and can be dangerous pic.twitter.com/vuSuVAb8dy The governor’s remarks came days after he was criticised online when photos of his food donation packages to poor city dwellers revealed that he had included bottles of Hennessy. On April 6, 2020, Kenya banned all movement in and out of Nairobi for a period of 21 days in a bid to contain the virus. Health warning There is no research by the WHO indicating that drinking alcohol kills COVID-19, the disease caused by the novel coronavirus. On April 14, 2020, the agency released a statement encouraging governments to enforce measures to limit alcohol consumption. “WHO/Europe reminds people that drinking alcohol does not protect them from COVID-19,” the statement reads. The organisation also warned against excessive alcohol consumption during lockdown, which it says can exacerbate problems including domestic violence and mental health issues. Hennessy has also denied the Nairobi governor’s claims in a statement seen by AFP. “Our attention has been drawn to a video circulating across different media channels on Tuesday, April 14, 2020, alleging that the consumption of Hennessy helps to fight against COVID-19. Hennessy would like to stress that the consumption of our brand or any other alcoholic beverage does not protect against the virus,” reads the statement signed by Hennessy’s manager in Kenya, Anne-Claire Delamarre. Although the WHO recommends the use of alcohol-based sanitiser (also known as rubbing alcohol) to wash hands, the alcohol found in this product is different from that found in liquor, beer and wine. Serkalem Mekonnen, a poison specialist at the National Capital Poison Center in Washington DC, explains in this article that rubbing alcohol -- which can be toxic if inhaled -- contains isopropyl alcohol, while alcohol found in liquor is known as ethanol or ethyl alcohol. AFP has debunked other coronavirus related myths here. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/health-ministry-rejects-online-rumours-herbal-cure,One post published on May 15, 2020, has been shared more than 2,000 times on Facebook. "Finally a long waited secret of why Basotho (ethnic group native to southern Africa, editor's note) are immune to the CORONAVIRUS is out," it reads. It describes a "mixture of 16 herbal antioxidants found in Lesotho", including garlic and ginger, that has been "used for centuries" to treat the flu. The post features a picture of a bottled drink labelled 'Leso Oxi'. Herbal cures for COVID-19 made headlines in April when Madagascar's President Andry Rajoelina unveiled Covid-Organics, a plant-based drink that has flown off shelves and sparked interest from other African countries. The World Health Organization (WHO) promptly warned against untested herbal remedies for COVID-19 and pointed to the fact that there is currently no specific medicine to prevent or treat the disease. Contacted by AFP Fact Check, Lesotho's Ministry of Health spokesman, Tumisang Mokoai said that they had not heard of Leso Oxi, the remedy promoted in Facebook posts. "There is nothing like that that we’ve endorsed," he said in a WhatsApp message. According to Leso Oxi's Facebook page, the concoction is "a mixture of 16 antioxidants that help one's lungs to perform at their best with regards to excellent gaseous exchange". The recipe is based on a traditional flu remedy and includes artemisia, ginger, garlic, and eucalyptus leaves.  Contacted by AFP Fact Check, director of Leso Oxi, Rorisang Khumalo said the product was a flu remedy and "not a cure" for COVID-19. However, he said the company was open to having the drink tested to treat the disease. "As for Basotho being immune to the virus, that I don’t know and it’s the first time I hear of that!" he said. Shortly before the post was published, Lesotho recorded its first case of COVID-19 on May 13, 2020. The landlocked country surrounded by South Africa has recorded two cases of the disease, according to an AFP tally on June 3, 2020. Although there are similarities between COVID-19 and influenza, they are not the same illness. According to the WHO, both cause respiratory disease and are transmitted by contact, droplets and contaminated surfaces. However, differences include the speed of transmission and severity of the illness, with a higher percentage of people with COVID-19 suffering from "severe" or "critical" infection than people with the flu.   Facebook posts about a herbal COVID-19 cure in Lesotho were first debunked by Kenyan fact-checking organisation PesaCheck. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/list-unproven-covid-19-treatments-debunked-health-experts,The message, which was sent to AFP via WhatsApp, can also be seen in this Facebook post and again in this one, shared more than 120 times. “I am a lady in the UK who is recovering from what I believe was coronavirus as I had all the symptoms. I also have a son, husband and a baby 9 months old who had the virus. A pastor friend and his wife were also gasping for life last weekend (sic),” the message reads. The post does not say whether the woman was tested for the novel coronavirus, nor what the symptoms had been. COVID-19, the disease caused by the virus, affects people in different ways, and the most common symptoms are listed here by the World Health Organization (WHO) as fever, dry cough, tiredness. Less common symptoms include aches and pains, sore throat, diarrhoea, conjunctivitis, headache, loss of taste or smell, rashes, or discolouration of fingers or toes. The lengthy misleading post goes on to list a number of methods purportedly used to treat or prevent symptoms, including eating certain types of food and drinking very hot water . Her tips also include taking painkillers, bathing in salt and putting some salt in the nose. The woman claims that her tips come from doctors in the UK and that her healing  is a testimony of their efficacy.  But AFP Fact Check has already debunked many of these claims in the past months.  “I gargled salt and swallowed some believing that the virus will die away from the throat (sic),” the post claims. AFP Fact Check debunked similar claims about gargling salt and found them to be false. Brandon Brown, a professor at the University of California Riverside’s Center for Healthy Communities, told AFP by email that gargling with warm water is a common remedy for sore throat in general, not for the novel coronavirus in particular. Shabir Madhi, professor of vaccinology at South Africa's University of Witwatersrand, told AFP that salt does not aid in getting rid of the virus because it “is replicating in the cells”. The WHO says there is no evidence to suggest rinsing with saline solution is effective in preventing infection. "There is some limited evidence that regularly rinsing nose with saline can help people recover more quickly from the common cold. However, regularly rinsing the nose has not been shown to prevent respiratory infections,” the WHO states on its website.  The post goes on to claim that the virus is a type of flu which can be treated "with guava, lemon, mango, orange, peaches leaves including the lemon itself and ginger”. However, the British Dietetic Association (BDA) rejects this as false on its website: “Simply put, you cannot ‘boost’ your immune system through diet, and no specific food or supplement will prevent you catching COVID-19/Coronavirus. Good hygiene practice remains the best means of avoiding infection.” The BDA encourages maintaining a balanced diet in order to support immune function, including copper, folate, iron, selenium, zinc and vitamins A, B6, B12, C and D.  And according to the WHO: “While some western, traditional or home remedies may provide comfort and alleviate symptoms of mild COVID-19, there are no medicines that have been shown to prevent or cure the disease.”  The post claims that coronavirus dies at 56 degrees celsius and encourages people to inhale steam over boiled water. But according to experts, steam will not treat or cure the virus. Dr. Jason McKnight, Assistant Clinical Professor in the Department of Primary Care and Population Health at Texas A&M University, said   that steam may provide relief at best. “In general, people may find that inhaling steam during any sort of respiratory illness helps with their symptoms, such as cough, nasal congestion and chest congestion. However, this is only symptomatic relief and it is not a treatment for any viral infection,” he told AFP Fact Check. And “you have the potential to cause real harm to yourself through burns from the heated water vapour to your eyes, face and airways, which if severe enough could cause serious and long-term complications,” McKnight said. Dr. Benjamin Neuman, an expert in coronaviruses who chairs the Biological Sciences department at Texas A&M University-Texarkana, agreed. “The lungs are delicate, and steam is very hot -- not a good mix. Hot steam can and does damage the lungs, and the idea that it could fight a virus that also damages the lungs is just really bad advice,” he said by email. The post also claims that drinking hot water would alleviate symptoms. “I took the hot water bottle and placed it on my chest while drinking very hot water. The severe pneumonia disappeared. The burning sensation in the chest disappeared,” it said. However, as previously debunked by AFP Fact Check, while health experts recommend staying hydrated there is no evidence that drinking hot or cold water can prevent COVID-19. Brown said there was “no need to change the temperature of your drinking water”. “Drinking water is always important, not just for coronavirus prevention,” he said by email.  AFP Fact Check has debunked several posts claiming harm or benefit from drinking water at a certain temperature. Similarly, WHO has issued a statement saying “taking a hot bath will not prevent you from catching COVID-19”.  “Taking a hot bath with extremely hot water can be harmful, as it can burn you.  “The best way to protect yourself against COVID-19 is by frequently cleaning your hands. By doing this you eliminate viruses that may be on your hands and avoid infection that could occur by then touching your eyes, mouth, and nose,” it reads, in part. WHO lists the ways people can protect themselves and others from the spread of COVID-19, including washing your hands regularly and maintaining at least a one-meter distance between yourself and others. But none of the preventative measures in the misleading post appear in the WHO’s guidance. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://turnbackhoax.id/2020/08/04/salah-virus-ini-punya-obat-hydroxychloroquine-zinc-dan-zithromax/,,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/no-ugandan-parliament-speakers-coronavirus-cure-just-external-disinfectant/,We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/no-ghana-university-hasnt-developed-coronavirus-vaccine/,Has Ghana’s Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology successfully created and tested a coronavirus vaccine? That’s the claim on the website News 7PM. Coronaviruses are a large family of viruses that cause illnesses ranging from the common cold to more severe diseases such as Middle East respiratory syndrome and severe acute respiratory syndrome. An outbreak of new coronavirus strain was identified in China in late December 2019. The World Organization reported on 29 January 2020 that 6,065 cases of the strain had so far been confirmed – most in China – with 132 deaths.   The claim of a vaccine from Ghana was published on 27 January. It’s since been shared on Facebook and other websites. “KNUST students successfully create vaccine for coronavirus; Côte d’Ivoire patient cured,” the article says. “Students of the Department of Pharmaceutical Chemistry of the Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology have successfully created and tested a Coronavirus vaccine.” It says the students’ work was supervised by a “Professor Dr Israel Nluki”. On 27 January, the same day the article appeared, Kwame Nkrumah University issued a statement that reports of the vaccine was false. “The attention of management of Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology, Kumasi has been drawn to the ... headline circulating on social media on Monday, 27th January, 2020,” it reads. The statement is signed by Dr Daniel Bekoe, the university’s relations officer. “A quick check with the dean of the faculty of pharmacy, Prof Berko Panyin Anto, on the above news reveals that no such discovery has occurred.” “Again, we wish to state that the person alleged to have supervised the purported project (Professor Dr Israel Nluki) has no affiliations with KNUST. Management thus urges the general public to disregard such publication.” The footer of the News 7PM article gives a definition of the word “satire”. But the article is simply false. It has none of the requirements of real satire. And junk news sites may attempt to excuse their clickbait content – taking advantage of a trending news topic or major tragedy – by claiming it’s satire, when it isn’t. And the article was shared on Facebook as real news, with no disclaimer that it was an attempt at satire. – Motunrayo Joel We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/no-coronavirus-patient-in-china-not-cured-with-hiv-drugs/,We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/no-garlic-doesnt-cure-coronavirus-get-covid-19-facts-only-from-experts/,We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/no-drinking-alcohol-wont-kill-the-coronavirus/,We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://blackdotresearch.sg/wuhanwatch-the-cure-for-coronavirus/,While our previous article on the Wuhan virus covered messages that have spread through WhatsApp and social media, this article looks into the ‘remedies’ and ‘cures’ that have emerged. Here are a few of them. Source: WhatsApp According to this message, the cure for the Wuhan virus is as simple as boiling 8 cloves of garlic in 7 cups of water. It also cited that the information came from an organisation called ‘International Entrepreneurs Federation’. However, a quick check on the URL in the message doesn’t show any sign of the ‘remedy’ mentioned above. In fact, all the page contains are embedded videos about the Wuhan virus from reputable news sources. It’s not surprising, though, that some would think that there is some truth in this claim and forward the message without doing a check. Garlic has long been used in home remedies for ailments like coughs and colds, and according to a study, have been thought to be able “reduce the risk for cardiovascular diseases, have anti-tumor and anti-microbial effects, and show benefit on high blood glucose concentration”. The same study acknowledges, though, that “due to some issues, such as methodological inadequacies, small sample sizes, lack of information regarding dose rationale, variation between efficacy and effectiveness trials, the absence of a placebo comparator, or lack of control groups”, more trials and research is needed to confirm the beneficial effects of garlic in various diseases. Another article which delves into a few studies on the health benefits of garlic,  also notes that “only some of these uses are backed by research”. Regardless, the claim that this garlic water concoction helps individuals to “recover” from the Wuhan virus is unproven, because at time of publication, the search for a cure is still ongoing. Source: WhatsApp This other message suggests that individuals should keep their throats moist and “not let [their] throat dry up” in order to prevent infection. It goes on to warn that “once your membrane in your throat is dried, the virus will invade into (sic) your body within 10 mins” and even gives a recommended amount of water to drink for adults and children. While there are definitely benefits in staying hydrated, there is no proof that keeping your throat moist helps to prevent infection. A health advisory issued by the World Health Organization has listed several ways of how individuals can reduce their risk of infection: Source: WHO website As seen from the attached infographic, there is nothing about drinking a certain amount of water and/or staying hydrated being mentioned. Interestingly enough, this message was actually addressed by the Ministry of Health earlier this month. Then, MOH had come out to debunk the claim, stating that “keeping one’s throat moist does not prevent influenza”. We therefore rate that while the claim doesn’t offer terrible advice, it helping to prevent infection is false.  Another recommendation the message made was that individuals “not go to crowded places, wear mask as needed especially in train or public transportation [and] avoid fried or spicy food and load up vitamin C” until the end of March 2020, which suggests that there’s a certain ‘end date’ to the virus. Currently, it’s impossible to tell when a cure for the Wuhan virus would emerge and subsequently, when the crisis would end. Therefore the suggestion that individuals engage in these practices “until the end of March 2020” is misleading and unproven. Source: WhatsApp This message goes so far as to suggest that a cure has already been found. Chock-full of scientific jargon, it truly embodies the saying ‘if you can’t convince them, confuse them’. At time of publication, a global search for the cure is still ongoing, although China is currently using AbbVie Inc.’s HIV drugs as an ad-hoc treatment for pneumonia caused by the coronavirus. However, it is important to note that there is still “not yet any effective anti-viral drug”. The claim that a cure for the Wuhan virus is therefore false.  Save my name, email, and website in this browser for the next time I comment.  Δdocument.getElementById( "ak_js_1" ).setAttribute( "value", ( new Date() ).getTime() ); 237 ALEXANDRA ROAD, THE ALEXCIER
#06-12 SINGAPORE 159929 feedback@blackdotresearch.sg +65 6517 0627   Your name 
  Email address 
  Subject 
  Your message (optional) 
  Δdocument.getElementById( "ak_js_3" ).setAttribute( "value", ( new Date() ).getTime() ); © 2024 Black Dot Research. 
					   			 ,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/hot-baths-hot-hand-dryers-and-other-heat-will-not-kill-coronavirus/,We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/no-evidence-ibuprofen-makes-covid-19-worse-say-experts/,We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://africacheck.org/spot-check/bcg-vaccine-used-in-africa-could-reduce-symptoms-but-not-cure-or-vaccine-for-covid-19/,Error fetching data,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/fruit-veg-and-natural-herbs-cant-cure-covid-19-produce-vaccine/,We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/no-tea-does-not-cure-covid-19/,Does tea contain chemicals known to cure Covid-19? A message going around Facebook, where it has even been translated into Afrikaans, claims a Chinese “hero doctor” found evidence that chemicals in tea “would significantly decrease the impact” of the Covid-19 coronavirus “on the human body”. The message has also popped up on WhatsApp, and was sent to Africa Check’s WhatsApp fact-checking line for us to look into. It says its information is from Dr Li Wenliang, the Chinese doctor who warned his fellow medics about the new coronavirus disease in December 2019. Except the message is not true, and is unlikely to have come from Li. The main claim of the message is that three chemicals naturally present in tea can “ward off these virus in a human with at least an average immune system”. It says the chemicals are methylxanthine, theobromine and theophylline. One version of the message shared on Facebook suggests that these chemicals are specifically found in “Fever Grass Tea (African Lemon grass tea)”. Other versions claim they are found in “regular tea”. As Britannica explains, methylxanthines are a class of stimulants that include theobromine and theophylline, as well as the more familiar caffeine. Theophylline has been widely used to treat asthma, and does have some effects on the human immune system. Except a study of the amount of methylxanthine stimulants in several types and intensities of brewed tea found that the concentration of theophylline, if present, was so low it could not be detected. An article in Frontiers in Pharmacology gives a detailed description of theobromine. The substance is found both in tea and in chocolate. It is also produced by the liver when it processes caffeine. Theobromine is toxic to some mammals, but it’s a stimulant for humans. The US National Library of Medicine explains that it has had some therapeutic uses as a diuretic (increasing the amount of urine a person produces), a heart stimulant, and a vasodilator (expanding the body’s blood vessels). Except the compound has not been known to “stimulate compounds” that help fight viral infections, as the message claims. Both caffeine, the final substance mentioned in the message, and the methylxanthine that is most strongly present in teas, also have some therapeutic uses. Caffeine is predominantly used “to aid in staying awake and to restore mental alertness” although it has also been used (often in combination with other compounds) to treat migraines and headaches. It is not used to treat viral infections. Lemon grass tea contains less theobromine and caffeine than other teas. A 2015 study of various hot and cold tea infusions found neither substance in lemon grass tea infusions. The World Health Organization currently advises that there is no cure for Covid-19. “To date, there is no vaccine and no specific antiviral medicine to prevent or treat Covid-2019,” it says on its website, as at 15 April 2020. While the WHO is considering some treatment methods, none of the substances mentioned in the message appear in the WHO database of published research and clinical trials related to Covid-19.  Not only is tea (lemon grass tea in particular) not a cure for Covid-19, as the message implies, it is not being considered as a treatment option for the disease. Li Wenliang was an ophthalmologist who worked in Wuhan, China. He was one of the first people to note the spread of a new disease that was later named Covid-19. Li was initially chastised by Chinese police for “spreading rumours” about the disease but later came to be hailed as a “whistleblower” and a “hero” as the story of his death was reported around the world. The viral message claims that Li “had documented casefiles for research purposes and had in the casefiles proposed a cure”. Except Li never released any research, and did not mention any “case files” when he spoke to international media. An article on Li’s importance published in the International Journal of Infectious Diseases also does not mention any research compiled by Li. The article addressed healthcare workers in its final paragraph, saying: “Dr Li Wenliang’s example as an astute clinician should inspire all of us to be vigilant, bold and courageous in reporting unusual clinical presentations.” – Keegan Leech We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/no-edible-plant-known-as-edewu-bush-okra-and-jute-cant-stop-coronavirus-spreading-in-the-body/,We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/ginger-turmeric-wont-cure-coronavirus-or-other-diseases/,We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://pesacheck.org/false-getting-a-new-tattoo-is-not-a-cure-for-covid-19-fa07035dccf,Sign up Sign in Sign up Sign in PesaCheck Follow PesaCheck -- Listen Share An Instagram post with a screenshot featuring CNN anchor Wolf Blitzer claiming that getting a new tattoo is a cure for COVID-19 is FALSE. The screenshot has Blitzer’s image and text across the bottom of the screen that states “New Tattoos cure corona virus”. The image was shared by Ink Master Kenya, a Nairobi-based tattoo business. It is posted next to a tongue-in-cheek message, urging people to stay safe from COVID-19 and make bookings to get tattoos by calling a phone number provided. The business also appears to employ tag spamming; the practice of applying numerous and largely unrelated hashtags to drive traffic to a particular social media post. However, a look through the CNN website shows that while the American media firm has run a number of tattoo-related stories, nothing about the assertion that they can protect one from coronavirus has been broadcast. A reverse image search of the screenshot leads to several versions of the same screenshot created on an online meme generator designed to produce humorous, and often satirical content. PesaCheck has previously debunked similar screenshots, including one claiming that alcohol kills COVID-19, and another ridiculing the Government of Kenya’s curfew order. A tattoo is a permanent mark or design made on the skin with pigments inserted through pricks into the skin’s top layer. There is no evidence that getting one can cure COVID-19. The World Health Organization (WHO) has reiterated that there are currently no medicines that have been shown to prevent or cure the disease. PesaCheck has looked into a screengrab of a CNN broadcast claiming that getting a new tattoo is a cure for COVID-19 and finds it to be FALSE. This post is part of an ongoing series of PesaCheck fact-checks examining content marked as potential misinformation on Facebook and other social media platforms. By partnering with Facebook and similar social media platforms, third-party fact-checking organisations like PesaCheck are helping to sort fact from fiction. We do this by giving the public deeper insight and context to posts they see in their social media feeds. Have you spotted what you think is fake news or false information on Facebook? Here’s how you can report. And, here’s more information on PesaCheck’s methodology for fact-checking questionable content. This fact-check was written by PesaCheck Fact-Checker Simon Muli and edited by PesaCheck Deputy Editor Enock Nyariki. The article was approved for publication by PesaCheck Managing Editor Eric Mugendi. PesaCheck is East Africa’s first public finance fact-checking initiative. It was co-founded by Catherine Gicheru and Justin Arenstein, and is being incubated by the continent’s largest civic technology and data journalism accelerator: Code for Africa. It seeks to help the public separate fact from fiction in public pronouncements about the numbers that shape our world, with a special emphasis on pronouncements about public finances that shape government’s delivery of Sustainable Development Goals (SDG) public services, such as healthcare, rural development and access to water/sanitation. PesaCheck also tests the accuracy of media reportage. To find out more about the project, visit pesacheck.org. PesaCheck is an initiative of Code for Africa, through its innovateAFRICA fund, with support from Deutsche Welle Akademie, in partnership with a coalition of local African media and other civic watchdog organisations. -- -- PesaCheck Are they lying? Kenya’s 1st fact-checking initiative verifies statements by public figures. A @Code4Kenya and @IBP_Kenya initiative, supported by @Code4Africa. Help Status About Careers Blog Privacy Terms Text to speech Teams,
https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/factcheck/2020/05/15/fact-check-china-doesnt-own-patent-covid-19-treatment-remdesivir/5194192002/,The origins, utility and ownership of potential coronavirus treatments are an increasingly discussed subject online, making the topic a ripe target for conspiracy theories. The drug remdesivir has emerged as a centerpiece of many theories claiming that various groups and individuals stand to benefit from the drug's use as a treatment for COVID-19. “Isn’t it just an interesting coincidence that Remdesivir is made by Gilead and is the 'CURE' for COVID-19 … . And here’s where it gets interesting China holds the patent on the drug through an agreement with Gilead’s drug patent sharing subsidy branch called UNITAID who has an office near Wuhan,” a graphic on Facebook shared more than 300 times reads. “And you’ll never guess who are the main financial investors in UNITAID…none other than George Soros, Bill & Melinda Gates, and WHO,” the post continues. Remdesivir is an antiviral drug developed by the firm Gilead Sciences, which maintains the U.S. patent on the drug as a coronavirus treatment. No Chinese institution has a recognized patent for the drug. Fact check: What's true and what's false about coronavirus? Remdesivir has been researched by Gilead as far back as 2009 as a treatment for viruses ranging from hepatitis C and respiratory syncytial virus to Ebola and now COVID-19. Gilead first received a patent for the drug as a treatment for Ebola in 2017. In fall 2015, Gilead applied for two patents for remdesivir, one for combating coronaviruses and another for filoviruses, the family of pathogens that includes Ebola. Both were approved in spring 2019.  In April, a National Institutes of Health study found the drug to speed the recovery time of critically ill COVID-19 patients by 31%. Gilead has since said that, with federal assistance, it will begin deploying remdesivir to hospitals around the country. Gilead Sciences remains the only organization in the world entitled to intellectual property rights over remdesivir as a treatment for COVID-19. In January, Chinese researchers at the Wuhan Institute of Virology filed for a patent to use remdesivir as a treatment against COVID-19. At the time, no research had been published showing that remdesivir was effective. Even so, the drug was already being deployed for clinical trials in Wuhan and elsewhere. In early February, the Chinese company BrightGene Bio-Medical Technology also said that it had been approved to produce remdesivir by the Chinese government, though regulators eventually said the company had not received approval from the government nor Gilead Sciences. The Chinese government has not approved a patent for the drug, a move that would likely draw further criticism from the United States and others concerned about Chinese violations of international norms regarding intellectual property. Given the severity of the pandemic globally, however, several international groups have made repeated calls for the sharing of intellectual property rights relating to medicines and vaccines that can combat the new coronavirus. Video:What to know about antiviral drug remdesivir and COVID-19 Unitaid is not a subsidiary of Gilead Sciences but rather a global health research initiative backed by the United Nations and World Health Organization to fund research projects combating a range of viruses. Founded by the French government in 2006, the group is headquartered in Geneva and funded by the governments of Brazil, Chile, France, Norway, South Korea, Spain and the United Kingdom, as well as the Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation. Unitaid has no financial ties to George Soros or the Open Society Foundations, which Soros founded and manages. The Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation also does not have a patent for the remdesivir and doesn't stand to profit from its use. Fact check:Dr. Anthony Fauci, Bill Gates won't profit from drug remdesivir In late March, Unitaid’s chair Marisol Touraine told the Financial Times that “extraordinary circumstances” warranted “extraordinary solutions,” while endorsing a WHO-backed plan for companies to voluntarily pool intellectual property governing any treatments or research that can be used in the fight against COVID-19. “I welcome his initiative & call for pooled rights to #COVID19 diagnostics, drugs & vaccines,” Tedros Adhanom, director-general of the World Health Organization, said of the proposal, which would allow companies around the world to share intellectual property rights and produce patented goods with the consent of other members in any such initiative. The strategy is an attempt to temper competition between firms and countries as the race to find treatments and a potential vaccine for the new coronavirus intensifies. On April 24, the WHO launched a cooperative initiative called “Access to COVID-19 Tools Accelerator,” which would coordinate and fund support for coronavirus research by member states and institutions. Unitaid and the Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation are listed as cosignatories. The United States and China are not members of the coalition, which may ultimately include a patent pooling resolution. Gilead Sciences has not licensed the production of remdesivir to any other firm as it continues to ramp up production of the drug. Fact check: Price didn't drive promotion of remdesivir over hydroxychloroquine No Chinese firm has an approved claim to a patent for remdesivir. No international organizations – including the Gates Foundations, Unitaid, the Open Societies Foundation, or the WHO – hold patents for the antiviral drug either. While there are efforts to pool patents for potential treatments, and thus alter the financial incentives of the parties to such pooling arrangements, the United States and China are not obligating their domestic firms to join these movements. Gilead Sciences, which owns the U.S. patent for promising COVID-19 treatment remdesivir, solely maintains the intellectual property rights to the drug. We rate this claim FALSE because it is not supported by our research.  Thank you for supporting our journalism. You can subscribe to our print edition, ad-free app, or electronic newspaper replica here. Our fact check work is supported in part by a grant from Facebook.,
https://africacheck.org/fbcheck/canine-coronavirus-vaccine-is-for-dogs-not-related-to-new-coronavirus-that-causes-covid-19/,A photo shared on Facebook in South Africa shows a small bottle labelled “Canine Coronavirus Vaccine”. “Now this was 2001 tell me why 19 years later they say there is no vaccine,” the caption reads. The vaccine is real, but it’s unrelated to the new coronavirus that causes Covid-19. The photo shows the Nobivac Canine 1-Cv vaccine, produced by drug company Merck Animal Health. As its label information says, it is for animal use only. The vaccine is given to dogs at six weeks old to immunise them against canine coronavirus. As veterinary company VCA explains on their website: “Canine coronavirus (CCoV) is not the same virus as Sars-CoV-2 that causes the novel coronavirus (Covid-19).” CCoV does not affect people. In dogs, it attacks the digestive system rather than the respiratory system, as Covid-19 does. VCA also makes it clear that the vaccine for CCoV will not prevent Covid-19. Johns Hopkins Medicine explains that the virus that causes Covid-19 is just one of many coronaviruses. The new coronavirus does appear to be similar to certain bat coronaviruses, as the journal Nature reported in February 2020. It is not unusual for coronaviruses to be “zoonotic”, meaning they can be transmitted from animals to humans. But as the US Centers for Disease Control has said: “The risk of animals spreading Covid-19 to people is considered to be low.” There have been cases of animals testing positive for Covid-19, including a pet dog in Hong Kong. But the dog showed no symptoms of the disease, and was not believed to be infectious. The dog probably picked up the virus from its owner. The canine vaccine pictured in the Facebook post won’t be effective against Covid-19. And there is no evidence that people need to worry about catching either Covid-19 or canine coronavirus from dogs. – Keegan Leech We believe that everyone needs the facts. You can republish the text of this article free of charge, both online and in print. However, we ask that you pay attention to these simple guidelines. In a nutshell: 1. Do not include images, as in most cases we do not own the copyright. 2. Please do not edit the article. 3. Make sure you credit "Africa Check" in the byline and don't forget to mention that the article was originally published on africacheck.org. A fact-checker has rated your Facebook or Instagram post as “false”, “altered”, “partly false” or “missing context”. This could have serious consequences. What do you do? Click on our guide for the steps you should follow. Africa Check is a partner in
Meta's third-party fact-checking programme
to help stop the spread of false information on social media. The content we rate as “false” will be downgraded on Facebook and Instagram. This means fewer people will see it. You can also help identify false information on Facebook. This
guide explains how.
 Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  For democracy to function, public figures need to be held to account for what they say. The claims they make need to be checked, openly and impartially. Africa Check is an independent, non-partisan organisation which assesses claims made in the public arena using journalistic skills and evidence drawn from the latest online tools, readers, public sources and experts, sorting fact from fiction and publishing the results. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.
  © 2024 - Africa Check - All rights reserved. We will never charge you for verified, reliable information. Help us keep it that way by supporting our work. Africa Check values your trust and is committed to the responsible management, use and protection of personal information. See our privacy policy.  Support independent fact-checking in Africa. ,
https://pesacheck.org/false-there-is-no-scientific-evidence-that-a-herbal-medicine-from-tanzania-cures-covid-19-9d8959600941,Sign up Sign in Sign up Sign in PesaCheck Follow PesaCheck -- Listen Share A Facebook post claiming that Tanzania has developed a coronavirus drug called COVIDOL that can cure COVID-19 is FALSE. The post, published on June 3, congratulates Tanzania President John Magufuli, claiming that his government and the national health committee has approved the remedy. The post is illustrated by images of the president, Health Minister Ummy Mwalimu and bottles of the purported remedy. The claim appears to have originated from statements made by Dr Hamis Malebo, a research scientist at the National Institute for Medical Research (NIMR), who promoted Covidol during a show on Tanzania Broadcasting Service (TBS) on May 11. In the televised report, he claimed that Covidol’s efficacy was proved after trials on COVID-19 patients, adding that it was approved by the government of Tanzania. He explained that the remedy protects against infection by improving and strengthening the immune system. The claim was shared on Facebook by Breaking News Kiswahili on June 2, with a further claim that Covidol is better than Madagascar’s COVID-Organics and works faster, curing patients within seven days. However, during the same TBS interview, an officer from NIMR refuted claims that they had tested Covidol, saying he has only seen it mentioned on social media platforms. NIMR is the same institute that Dr Malebo works for and is the authority responsible for clinical trials of medicines. On May 3, Tanzania’s Ministry of Health issued a statement saying that there is currently no COVID-19 vaccine or treatment. The ministry urged herbal medicine practitioners to educate the public about herbal treatments and warned against the use of untested medicines. Dr. Paul Mohammed from the Ministry of Natural Medicine and Alternative Medicine said that the medicine has not been approved by the ministry and advertisements on social media do not mean it has been tested by authorities. There has been a surge of claims for COVID-19 herbal cures in Tanzania, prompting medical experts to warn the public against taking treatments at face value before they are scientifically tested. Researchers around the world have been working to develop viable vaccines and treatments for the novel coronavirus that has infected more than seven million people worldwide. Experts have said that a vaccine for the virus will not be available for widespread use for at least 12 to 18 months. While patients can and do recover from coronavirus infections, the World Health Organization (WHO) says that there is currently no approved vaccine or treatment that is known to work against COVID-19. PesaCheck has looked into the post claiming that Tanzania has developed a coronavirus drug called Covidol that is effective and cures COVID-19 and finds it to be FALSE. This post is part of an ongoing series of PesaCheck fact-checks examining content marked as potential misinformation on Facebook and other social media platforms. By partnering with Facebook and similar social media platforms, third-party fact-checking organisations like PesaCheck are helping to sort fact from fiction. We do this by giving the public deeper insight and context to posts they see in their social media feeds. Have you spotted what you think is fake news or false information on Facebook? Here’s how you can report. And, here’s more information on PesaCheck’s methodology for fact-checking questionable content. This fact-check was written by PesaCheck Researcher Sylvia Makinia and edited by PesaCheck News Editor Enock Nyariki. PesaCheck is East Africa’s first public finance fact-checking initiative. It was co-founded by Catherine Gicheru and Justin Arenstein, and is being incubated by the continent’s largest civic technology and data journalism accelerator: Code for Africa. It seeks to help the public separate fact from fiction in public pronouncements about the numbers that shape our world, with a special emphasis on pronouncements about public finances that shape government’s delivery of Sustainable Development Goals (SDG) public services, such as healthcare, rural development and access to water/sanitation. PesaCheck also tests the accuracy of media reportage. To find out more about the project, visit pesacheck.org. PesaCheck is an initiative of Code for Africa, through its innovateAFRICA fund, with support from Deutsche Welle Akademie, in partnership with a coalition of local media and other civic watchdog organisations in 14 African countries. -- -- PesaCheck Are they lying? Kenya’s 1st fact-checking initiative verifies statements by public figures. A @Code4Kenya and @IBP_Kenya initiative, supported by @Code4Africa. Help Status About Careers Blog Privacy Terms Text to speech Teams,
https://www.boomlive.in/fake-news/this-video-does-not-show-vladimir-putins-daughter-receiving-covid-19-shots-9270,A video of a volunteer who took part in a clinical trial for a Russian COVID-19 vaccine has surfaced with claims that misidentify her as Russian president Vladimir Putin's daughter.  The video shows the volunteer, identified as Natalya, studying medicine, inside a hospital lounge after receiving the vaccine. Furthermore, an unrelated image from 2017 showing Putin being felicitated by a girl, is also doing the rounds, where the latter has been misidentified as Putin's daughter.  These images and video are viral in the backdrop of reports about Russia developing the COVID-19 vaccine "Sputnik V". The Associated Press further reported that Putin's daughter is among those who were inoculated. 'Sputnik-V' COVID-19 produced by Gamaleya National Research Center for Epidemiology and Microbiology in Moscow in coordination with the Russian Defence Ministry was approved after initiating human trials in less than two months. Respect 🙏Putin's daughter was among the volunteers for trials.#RussianVaccine #Russie pic.twitter.com/tQGjcIFcwp #RussianVaccineWorlds first vaccine in russia given to Putin's daughter #Russian #putin pic.twitter.com/lT9kOh0JXI According to reports, Putin has two daughters from his former wife Lyudmila Aleksandrovna Ocheretnaya, Maria Vorontsova and Katerina Tikhonova. Which of Putin's two daughters was administered the vaccine has not been divulged.     					  				,
https://www.altnews.in/ayush-kwath-or-kadha-cannot-boost-immunity-to-fight-against-covid-19/,On April 24 2020, the Ministry of AYUSH promoted a herbal formulation called AYUSH Kwath for ‘immunity boosting’ of the masses for the COVID-19 pandemic. The ministry requested the State/UT governments to “direct the AYUSH Licensing Authorities to consider granting license/approval for manufacturing of AYUSH Kwath formulation to the interested licensed Ayurveda/Siddha/Unani drug manufacturers.” The Ministry of AYUSH presents ‘AYUSH KWATH’ formulation as an immunity-enhancing measure for the public. Ayush Kwath is a combination of four medicinal herbs commonly used in the Indian kitchen. The formulation has been standardized for commercial manufacturing and pic.twitter.com/46KgH4saUV — Ministry of AYUSH (@moayush) April 25, 2020 The recommended formulation of the AYUSH Kwath (also known as kadha) comprises of: Subsequently, on July 4, 2020, Shripad Naik, Minister of AYUSH, Government of India, launched two immunity boosters against the novel coronavirus infection, namely AYUSH Kwath and Giloi Tea manufactured by Vibha Natural Products Ltd, a Mumbai-based company. As many people started concocting their own versions of this kadha, the herbal market produced and sold various generic products of AYUSH Kwath. A drug manufacturer Nutriley labelled its AYUSH Kwath upfront with ‘COVID-19’ on its bottle. Baidyanath’s advertisement claimed that the individual components of AYUSH Kwath like tulsi and cinnamon increase immunity. Kudos Ayurveda’s advertisement for AYUSH Kwath claimed ‘no side effects of prolonged use’ and ‘no infections’. The advertisement by Naturoveda Organics asks people to “start AYUSH Kwath at the first sign of sore throat or cold-cough”. Acharya Manish, an Ayurvedic practitioner also claimed that “AYUSH Kwath works against all symptoms of COVID-19.” The product page of AYUSH Kwath on Shuddhi Ayurveda clinic recommended by the Ministry of AYUSH claims that “AYUSH Kwath is the only approved and possible remedy for COVID-19.” This slideshow requires JavaScript. False Our immune system has two broad components, innate and adaptive immunity, which were explained in our previous Alt News Science article. What does it mean to ‘boost’ our immune system against infections? ‘Immunity booster’ is not a medical term. It is often used in common parlance for foods that have antioxidant properties. But these are a part of a balanced diet which maintain our immune system and general health and do not enhance it beyond what our body innately has to justify the term ‘immunity booster.’ A healthy immune system can only be achieved with adequate sleep, a balanced diet, exercise and adequate sunlight or vitamin D, unless the patient is suffering from an immune system disease such as AIDS, bone marrow cancer or is undergoing other immune-modulatory treatments like chemotherapy or steroids Allergies and autoimmune diseases are caused by a hyperactive immune system The blanket call for ‘boosting’ the immune system stems from a myopic view of the immune system as a defence system that always protects us from infections. But an otherwise well functioning immune system capable of fighting off infections can also cause a variety of disorders grouped under the term ‘hypersensitivity’. In hypersensitivity disorders, our immune system is over-activated which harms our own body. Examples of these disorders are allergic reactions which are immediate hypersensitivity reactions against substances that are not supposed to cause reactions in healthy patients like nuts, pollens, dust particles and a variety of autoimmune disorders like psoriasis, multiple sclerosis, systemic lupus erythematosus, etc. Suppression of the immune system, not ‘boosting’ is required for certain severe COVID-19 cases In some patients with severe COVID-19 infection, there is a ‘cytokine storm’ which has been the cause of death in many young and healthy people with no comorbidities like high blood pressure and diabetes. Cytokines are protein signalling molecules that mediate and regulate immunity and inflammation. But in various infectious and non-infectious diseases, there is a ‘storm’ of excessive cytokines released in the blood circulation. In COVID-19, this cytokine storm is followed by the immune system attacking the body, which causes ARDS (acute respiratory distress syndrome) and multiple organ failure. In such severe cases, the treatment is geared towards suppressing this overactive immune system to save the patient. Thus, the use of steroids like Dexamethasone to suppress the immune system is recommended at the right time to save the patient from death due to COVID-19. Most COVID-19 patients recover on their own and no amount of immunity-boosting can prevent the death of those who succumb While most of the COVID-19 patients recover on their own and would not benefit from formulations claiming to be ‘immunity boosters,’ many severe cases of COVID-19 need suppression (instead of a boost) of the immune system through established drugs like dexamethasone. While there is no clinical proof of efficacy of Kadha/AYUSH Kwath, it is not desirable to boost the immune system of severe COVID-19 patients, many of whom die of an overactive immune system. Only the adaptive immune system can be specific towards a pathogen. Therefore, the immune system can be theoretically enhanced against COVID-19 only from an active method like a vaccine against COVID-19 or a passive method like plasma with antibodies of seropositive patients, i.e. blood component of previously infected and recovered from COVID-19 who have demonstrated COVID-19 antibodies in their blood. Thus natural foods/herbs, or even synthetic antiviral drugs, do not equip our immune system with the ability to prevent COVID-19 disease. A preprint computer simulation study (i.e, a study that is not tested in humans or animals and the results are not peer-reviewed by other scientists) by Khanal, P. et al. (2020) aims to validate the kadha recommended by the Ministry of AYUSH as an ‘immunity booster’ against severe COVID-19 infection. They identified phytoconstituents from six herbs, including the four herbs that are used in AYUSH Kwath that regulate different pathways of the immune system. It is a study conducted through computer simulation and not one done on any living organism or cells. Thus, this study does not give proof of efficacy for AYUSH Kwath or kadha against COVID-19. There are no research studies on the AYUSH Kwath formulation. Therefore, there is no empirical proof, i.e. based on a scientifically validated observation, and not mere theory, of its efficacy against COVID-19. Let us look at any available evidence from previous clinical trials related to these herbs for their efficacy in immunomodulation (boosting or suppression) against viral infections. Immunomodulation refers to any process in which an immune response is altered to the desired level, and this may involve suppression of an overactive immune response or vice versa. Holy basil A double-blinded randomized controlled trial by Mondal S et al. (2011) on 22 healthy volunteers found that there was a statistically significant increase in the levels of various IFN-, IL-4 (which are cytokines) and T-helper cells and NK-cells (which are types of white blood cells) after four weeks in the group that received Tulsi extract in contrast to the placebo group. Given the easier availability of healthy volunteers, a sample size of 22 is too small and further studies would be needed to see if the findings are replicable. And as we have seen, it would actually be harmful if the Tulsi extracts could increase the cytokine levels in severe COVID-19 patients. There have been two clinical studies of holy basil against viral infections and both have very poor methodological quality. The first study by Rajalakshmi et al. (1986) studied the effect of Tulsi on 20 viral hepatitis patients. It shows clinical improvement after taking Tulsi but this sample size is very small and there was no control group to compare with. The second study by Das et al. (1983) has a similar drawback of a very small sample size of 14 cases of viral encephalitis. We have explained the impact of small sample size and lack of control groups in clinical studies in our previous Alt News Science article. Cinnamon We have noted in a previous article at Alt News Science that despite some studies suggesting antibacterial activity of cinnamon against bacteria like Streptococcus mutans and Lactobacillus plantarum and inhibition of fungal infections such as candidiasis, the evidence needed more validation since it is based on flakey preliminary data (Ulbricht, C. et al. 2011). However, there are no clinical studies of cinnamon extracts that show the immunomodulatory effect on healthy individuals or any effects in viral infections. Black pepper There are no clinical trials that evaluate the efficacy of black pepper against any infection or any immunomodulatory effect. Also, WHO has debunked the claim of using pepper to prevent COVID-19 infection. (see infographic)  Dry ginger There are no clinical trials demonstrating the efficacy of dry ginger in viral infections. A pilot study by Stefano, D. et al. (2019) on 10 healthy individuals showed immunomodulatory effects of the combination of Echinacea angustifolia and Zingiber officinale in softgel capsules. They measured the expression of genes in white blood cells (cells responsible for immune function in the blood) of the volunteers and found that after they consumed these softgel capsules, 500 genes were differentially expressed (the process through which the genes makes proteins) in these leukocytes. All these together shifted the leukocyte activity towards suppression of inflammation (which is a response of the immune system). So, contrary to the claims of boosting, the immunomodulation in this study can be similar to the one directed by hydrocortisone administration, a steroid drug used to suppress the immune system. Thus, there is no observational validity to deduce that any of these drug components even given as an independent dose will help the COVID-19 patients in any form. Moreover, the dosage of these herbs or the active ingredient concentration that achieves this modulation of immune proteins has not been studied thoroughly. Since there is no clinical study done for AYUSH Kwath formulation, the interactions possible among its various active ingredients are unknown. Let us look at a few examples of side effects associated with the individual herbs. Cinnamon Cinnamon supplements can cause acute hepatitis; cinnamon oil and cinnamon flavoured gum can cause allergic contact dermatitis and other allergic reactions (Hajimonfarednejad, M. et al. 2019). Dry ginger Preparations made from dry ginger can cause liver damage in certain patients (Suzuki, Y. et al. 2015) and therapeutic use of ginger for nausea and vomiting of pregnancy was associated with a shorter gestational age (duration of pregnancy) and in a smaller circumference of the newborn’s skull (Trabace, L. et al. 2015). Black pepper Piperine, the main constituent of black pepper, increases the blood levels of various rifampicin, sulphadiazine, tetracycline and phenytoin which may harm certain patients by increasing the side effects of these medications (Velpandian, T. et al. 2001). It also increases the gastric acid secretion, potassium loss, gastric cell exfoliation (erosion) (Srinivasan, K. 2007). Holy basil Animal studies show that holy basil can increase the bleeding time (the time taken for the blood to clot) (Singh, S. et al. 2001) and decrease blood sugar (Gholap, S. .et al. 2004). Therefore, these herbs can cause side effects and interact with synthetic/modern medicines, especially since the ministry recommends them for long-term use with no need for consultation with a doctor. While a healthy diet and lifestyle help in maintaining the immunity that we innately possess, there is no way to pop a pill or drink kadha and ‘boost’ the immune system. The term ‘immunity booster’ has no basis in medical science, and yet it remains widely used by the Ministry of AYUSH and the media alike. The market is flooded with ‘immunity boosters’ with everything from khakhra and bread to shirts and beddings claiming to boost our immunity against COVID-19. They divert attention from the harder but proven preventive measures such as social distancing and consistently using masks and washing hands. AYUSH ministry has encouraged mass production of formulations like AYUSH Kwath without testing it for efficacy or safety in humans. It seems to be unaware of the potential dangers of ‘boosting’ the immune system in diseases like COVID-19, where an overactive immune system kills patients. The long-term use of AYUAH Kwath could cause various side-effects in healthy individuals as well. Thus, there is a lack of clarity in immune-boosting or suppression achievable through the intake of these herbs. The research on individual drugs has not shown any proof that it will affect COVID-19 patients or protect healthy people from getting infected. Moreover, since ‘immune-boosting’ should not be achieved theoretically in patients of COVID-19, the claims of immune-boosting via AYUSH Kwath or kadha may harm infected patients. Since, there is no proof that the concoction will help the patients, kwath or kadha may serve as a ‘feel-good’ warm drink during a sore throat, which is better categorised as a placebo relief. References Ulbricht, C., Seamon, E., Windsor, R. C., Armbruester, N., Bryan, J. K., Costa, D., … & Grimes Serrano, J. M. (2011). An evidence-based systematic review of cinnamon (Cinnamomum spp.) by the Natural Standard Research Collaboration. Journal of dietary supplements, 8(4), 378-454. Trabace, L., Tucci, P., Ciuffreda, L., Matteo, M., Fortunato, F., Campolongo, P., … & Cuomo, V. (2015). “Natural” relief of pregnancy-related symptoms and neonatal outcomes: above all do no harm. Journal of ethnopharmacology, 174, 396-402. Suzuki, Y., Yamazaki, Y., Hashizume, H., Oyama, T., Horiguchi, N., Sato, K., … & Yamada, M. (2015). Drug-induced liver injury caused by a dietary supplement (Kin-toki Shoga (®)) made from ginger. Nihon Shokakibyo Gakkai zasshi= The Japanese journal of gastro-enterology, 112(1), 108-114. Velpandian, T., Jasuja, R., Bhardwaj, R. K., Jaiswal, J., & Gupta, S. K. (2001). Piperine in food: interference in the pharmacokinetics of phenytoin. European journal of drug metabolism and pharmacokinetics, 26(4), 241–247. Singh, S., Rehan, H. M. S., & Majumdar, D. K. (2001). Effect of Ocimum sanctum fixed oil on blood pressure, blood clotting time and pentobarbitone-induced sleeping time. Journal of ethnopharmacology, 78(2-3), 139-143. Gholap, S., & Kar, A. (2004). Hypoglycaemic effects of some plant extracts are possibly mediated through inhibition in corticosteroid concentration. Die Pharmazie, 59(11), 876–878. Hajimonfarednejad, M., Ostovar, M., Raee, M. J., Hashempur, M. H., Mayer, J. G., & Heydari, M. (2019). Cinnamon: a systematic review of adverse events. Clinical Nutrition, 38(2), 594-602. Mondal, S., Varma, S., Bamola, V. D., Naik, S. N., Mirdha, B. R., Padhi, M. M., … & Mahapatra, S. C. (2011). Double-blinded randomized controlled trial for immunomodulatory effects of Tulsi (Ocimum sanctum Linn.) leaf extract on healthy volunteers. Journal of ethnopharmacology, 136(3), 452-456. Srinivasan, K. (2007). Black pepper and its pungent principle-piperine: a review of diverse physiological effects. Critical reviews in food science and nutrition, 47(8), 735-748 Stefano, D. A., Grabnar, I., Verardo, R., Enio, K., Marchionni, L. L., Eddie, L. I., … & Voinovich, D. (2019). Combined extracts of Echinacea angustifolia DC. and Zingiber officinale Roscoe softgel capsules: Pharmacokinetics and immunomodulatory effects assessed by gene expression profiling. Khanal, P., Duyu, T., Dey, Y. N., Patil, B. M., Pasha, I., & Wanjari, M. (2020). Network pharmacology of AYUSH recommended immune-boosting medicinal plants against COVID-19. Rajalakshmi, S., Sivanandam, G., & Veluchamy, G. (1986). Role of Tulsi (Ocimum sanctum Linn.) in the management of Manjal Kamalai (viral hepatitis). Journal of Research in Ayurveda and Siddha, 9(3-4), 118-123. Das, S., Chandra, A., Agarwal, S., & Singh, N. (1983). Ocimum sanctum (tulsi) in the treatment of viral encephalitis (A preliminary clinical trial). Antiseptic, 80, 323-327. [Update: The article has been updated with a new featured image, i.e. the image that shows up on social media posts along with the article. The earlier featured image has been replaced after an objection was raised. However, we clarify that the earlier image was representative and had no connection with any organisation or company.] Donate Now A video of a ladder moving on its own, purportedly from Jharkhand, is viral on… In a 2-minute video, a man recommends a “technique” to prevent infection from Omicron, the… A video of a set of iron nails that appear to melt after being placed… Several social media users have shared an image that shows two columns — ‘Cepa/variante’ (Spanish… A 90-second video of a man dissecting a banana has been shared on the internet….,
https://pesacheck.org/false-scientists-in-the-us-have-not-discovered-a-cure-for-covid-19-35362d61ae4b,Sign up Sign in Sign up Sign in PesaCheck Follow PesaCheck -- Listen Share An article claiming that scientists in the United States have discovered a coronavirus cure “that works 100 percent” is FALSE. The article claimed that Sorrento Therapeutics — a biotechnology company — had in its possession a COVID-19 cure. However, on May 15, the California based company clarified it had discovered an antibody that was effective in blocking the virus that causes COVID-19 during early testing in cells. Trials are yet to be conducted in living animals and humans. The announcement said the antibody could potentially be used to develop a drug to treat COVID-19. Sorrento Therapeutics researchers screened and tested billions of antibodies to narrow their coronavirus treatment candidates down to hundreds. They found a dozen that could prevent the viral protein from grabbing onto a key receptor in the body. The virus uses that receptor to enter human cells. The chief executive of Sorrento Therapeutics, Henry Ji, said in an interview on May 18 that the drug will be tested in clinical trials in a few months to see its effectiveness against COVID-19, check its safety for this particular use and determine the proper dosage. Sorrento has only conducted tests in cells. In order to gain the approval of the Food and Drug Administration (FDA), the US agency responsible for ensuring the safety of drugs among other things, the firm will need to advance trials of the coronavirus treatment to animals. Then, Sorrento will have to apply for FDA permission to test the treatment for safety and effectiveness in humans. Dr. Rollins Makokha, a surgery resident at Kenyatta National Hospital, told PesaCheck that when the human body is invaded by a foreign body like a virus, the immune system responds by creating antibodies, which are proteins that neutralize the invader body. This is happening to people who are fighting SARS-CoV-2 around the world. Research is ongoing to find out if the antibodies produced are specific, adequate and long-lasting. Researchers around the world have been working to develop viable vaccines and treatments for the novel coronavirus that has infected more than five million people worldwide. But experts have said that a vaccine for the virus will not be available for widespread use for at least 12 to 18 months. While patients can and do recover from coronavirus infections, the World Health Organization (WHO) says that there is currently no approved vaccine or treatment and no specific antiviral medicines that are known to work against COVID-19. PesaCheck has looked into the claim that scientists based in the United States have discovered a coronavirus cure ‘that works 100 percent”’ and finds it to be FALSE. This post is part of an ongoing series of PesaCheck fact-checks examining content marked as potential misinformation on Facebook and other social media platforms. By partnering with Facebook and similar social media platforms, third-party fact-checking organisations like PesaCheck are helping to sort fact from fiction. We do this by giving the public deeper insight and context to posts they see in their social media feeds. Have you spotted what you think is fake news or false information on Facebook? Here’s how you can report. And, here’s more information on PesaCheck’s methodology for fact-checking questionable content. This fact-check was written by PesaCheck Researcher Sylvia Makinia and edited by PesaCheck News Editor Enock Nyariki. The article was approved for publication by PesaCheck Managing Editor Eric Mugendi. PesaCheck is East Africa’s first public finance fact-checking initiative. It was co-founded by Catherine Gicheru and Justin Arenstein, and is being incubated by the continent’s largest civic technology and data journalism accelerator: Code for Africa. It seeks to help the public separate fact from fiction in public pronouncements about the numbers that shape our world, with a special emphasis on pronouncements about public finances that shape government’s delivery of Sustainable Development Goals (SDG) public services, such as healthcare, rural development and access to water/sanitation. PesaCheck also tests the accuracy of media reportage. To find out more about the project, visit pesacheck.org. PesaCheck is an initiative of Code for Africa, through its innovateAFRICA fund, with support from Deutsche Welle Akademie, in partnership with a coalition of local media and other civic watchdog organisations in 14 African countries. -- -- PesaCheck Are they lying? Kenya’s 1st fact-checking initiative verifies statements by public figures. A @Code4Kenya and @IBP_Kenya initiative, supported by @Code4Africa. Help Status About Careers Blog Privacy Terms Text to speech Teams,
https://pesacheck.org/false-novavaxs-trial-covid-19-vaccine-has-not-been-released-to-the-public-yet-87b0110c6f8f,Sign up Sign in Sign up Sign in PesaCheck Follow PesaCheck -- Listen Share An article claiming that US-based biotech company Novavax has released a COVID-19 vaccine is FALSE. The article by Opera News attributes the information to a tweet from CNN stating that Novavax has released the phase one trial results of its NVAX-CoV2373 vaccine. The Opera News article appears to misinterpret the information on the tweet, which was further elaborated in an August 5 article CNN. According to the tweet, Novavax is the third US company to release study results on a trial vaccine after Moderna and Pfizer, adding that phase 1 data shows that the NVAX-CoV2373 trial vaccine is safe and elicits an immune response. However, the vaccine is still in clinical trials, and has not been released to the public. The results of the Phase 1 trial were announced in a press release on August 4. The trial involved 131 volunteers and found that after two doses of the vaccine, participants developed neutralizing antibodies that can fight the virus at levels four times higher than in people who had recovered from COVID-19. The Phase 1 trial was meant to establish safety rather than the efficacy of the Novavax experimental COVID-19 vaccine, which still has to go through Phase II and III trial stages. It is also important to note that data from the study was published on a preprint server, meaning the study is yet to be peer-reviewed. Currently, there is no vaccine or specific antiviral treatment for the disease that has so far infected over 19 million people and claimed over 731,000 lives globally. Several clinical trials of potential COVID-19 vaccines, including this one by Novavax, are ongoing. PesaCheck has looked into an article claiming that biotech company Novavax has released a COVID-19 vaccine and finds it to be FALSE. This post is part of an ongoing series of PesaCheck fact-checks examining content marked as potential misinformation on Facebook and other social media platforms. By partnering with Facebook and similar social media platforms, third-party fact-checking organisations like PesaCheck are helping to sort fact from fiction. We do this by giving the public deeper insight and context to posts they see in their social media feeds. Have you spotted what you think is fake news or false information on Facebook? Here’s how you can report. And, here’s more information on PesaCheck’s methodology for fact-checking questionable content. This fact-check was written by PesaCheck Fact-Checker James Okong’o and edited by PesaCheck Deputy Editor Enock Nyariki. The article was approved for publication by PesaCheck Managing Editor Eric Mugendi. PesaCheck is East Africa’s first public finance fact-checking initiative. It was co-founded by Catherine Gicheru and Justin Arenstein, and is being incubated by the continent’s largest civic technology and data journalism accelerator: Code for Africa. It seeks to help the public separate fact from fiction in public pronouncements about the numbers that shape our world, with a special emphasis on pronouncements about public finances that shape government’s delivery of Sustainable Development Goals (SDG) public services, such as healthcare, rural development and access to water/sanitation. PesaCheck also tests the accuracy of media reportage. To find out more about the project, visit pesacheck.org. PesaCheck is an initiative of Code for Africa, through its innovateAFRICA fund, with support from Deutsche Welle Akademie, in partnership with a coalition of local African media and other civic watchdog organisations. -- -- PesaCheck Are they lying? Kenya’s 1st fact-checking initiative verifies statements by public figures. A @Code4Kenya and @IBP_Kenya initiative, supported by @Code4Africa. Help Status About Careers Blog Privacy Terms Text to speech Teams,
https://pesacheck.org/false-coconut-does-not-cure-covid-19-54ea6e21aabe,Sign up Sign in Sign up Sign in PesaCheck Follow PesaCheck -- Listen Share An article claiming that coconut fruit cures COVID-19 is FALSE. The article, published on the Opera News website, claims scientists from the Philippines have discovered that oil extracted from coconuts can cure COVID-19. In June this year, the Department of Science and Technology in the Philippines announced that the country had started conducting trials on the viability of virgin coconut oil as a potential medicine for COVID-19 at the Philippine General Hospital. On July 22, 2020, the Manila Bulletin reported that the initial clinical trial phase with virgin coconut oil showed promise as a supplement for COVID treatment following one of three clinical trials conducted by the Department of Science and Technology using the oil as a supplement for the treatment of COVID-19. According to the article, the majority of patients involved in the study were sent home. According to the publication, phase one trials of the study that was conducted at Sta. Rosa Community Hospital and it involved 45 patients with mild COVID-19 symptoms. The patients were given virgin coconut oil after meals for 28 days. The second phase of the virgin coconut oil trials will be conducted in the near future at the Philippines General Hospital. The article on Opera News seems to have borrowed from a post on the Travel Daily website, describing the results of the study by two Philippine researchers as promising. A statement published by Ateneo de Manila University by Dr Fabian Dayrit from the university and Dr Mary Newport of Spring Hill Neonatology(USA) proposed the potential of coconut oil as a safe agent against COVID-19. They explained that coconut oil derivatives have been shown to be safe and effective antiviral compounds in both humans and animals. However, there is currently no vaccine or specific antiviral treatment for the disease that has thus far infected over 16.7 million and claimed over 660,000 lives globally. Nonetheless, several clinical trials of potential COVID-19 vaccines are ongoing. Mr Tarik Jasarevic, a spokesperson for the World Health Organization (WHO), confirmed to PesaCheck in a phone interview that to date there is no cure or vaccine for COVID-19. The spokesperson added that the WHO doesn’t recommend self-medication, but advocates for self-care and healthy habits for preventing and managing the symptoms of COVID-19. PesaCheck has looked into the claim that coconut fruit cures COVID-19 and finds it to be FALSE. This post is part of an ongoing series of PesaCheck fact-checks examining content marked as potential misinformation on Facebook and other social media platforms. By partnering with Facebook and similar social media platforms, third-party fact-checking organisations like PesaCheck are helping to sort fact from fiction. We do this by giving the public deeper insight and context to posts they see in their social media feeds. Have you spotted what you think is fake news or false information on Facebook? Here’s how you can report. And, here’s more information on PesaCheck’s methodology for fact-checking questionable content. This fact-check was written by PesaCheck Fact-Checker James Okong’o and edited by PesaCheck Deputy Editor Enock Nyariki. The article was approved for publication by PesaCheck Managing Editor Eric Mugendi. PesaCheck is East Africa’s first public finance fact-checking initiative. It was co-founded by Catherine Gicheru and Justin Arenstein, and is being incubated by the continent’s largest civic technology and data journalism accelerator: Code for Africa. It seeks to help the public separate fact from fiction in public pronouncements about the numbers that shape our world, with a special emphasis on pronouncements about public finances that shape government’s delivery of Sustainable Development Goals (SDG) public services, such as healthcare, rural development and access to water/sanitation. PesaCheck also tests the accuracy of media reportage. To find out more about the project, visit pesacheck.org. PesaCheck is an initiative of Code for Africa, through its innovateAFRICA fund, with support from Deutsche Welle Akademie, in partnership with a coalition of local African media and other civic watchdog organisations. -- -- PesaCheck Are they lying? Kenya’s 1st fact-checking initiative verifies statements by public figures. A @Code4Kenya and @IBP_Kenya initiative, supported by @Code4Africa. Help Status About Careers Blog Privacy Terms Text to speech Teams,
https://pesacheck.org/false-headline-the-covid-19-cure-that-machakos-county-received-from-tanzania-has-not-been-4ac9ab4f50dd,Sign up Sign in Sign up Sign in PesaCheck Follow PesaCheck -- Listen Share An article published on the Opera News website claiming that Machakos County has received bottles of a COVID-19 cure has a FALSE HEADLINE. The article is based on a message posted by Machakos County Governor Dr Alfred Mutua, stating that he has received bottles of medicine that is being used in Tanzania to treat COVID-19. Dr Mutua’s post further states that he would send the medicine bottles to Machakos Research Labs and Kenya Medical Research Institute (KEMRI) for testing. The medicine, identified as Baycaro, is a traditional remedy claimed to cure COVID-19, cancer and other diseases. Raphael Mbakizak, one of the people behind its creation, claimed in a YouTube video posted on May 15 that Tanzania’s National Institute For Medical Research (NIMR) had declared the medicine safe for human consumption, but there is no evidence that it works against COVID-19. However, the article’s author misrepresents the post by Governor Mutua, alleging that the treatment is “a breakthrough in the fight against COVID-19”. While there are several ongoing clinical trials of both modern clinical medicine and traditional medicine, the World Health Organization (WHO) maintains that there is currently no approved treatment for COVID-19. PesaCheck has looked into an article published by Opera News claiming that Machakos County has received bottles of COVID-19 cure, and finds it has a FALSE HEADLINE. This post is part of an ongoing series of PesaCheck fact-checks examining content marked as potential misinformation on Facebook and other social media platforms. By partnering with Facebook and similar social media platforms, third-party fact-checking organisations like PesaCheck are helping to sort fact from fiction. We do this by giving the public deeper insight and context to posts they see in their social media feeds. Have you spotted what you think is fake news or false information on Facebook? Here’s how you can report. And, here’s more information on PesaCheck’s methodology for fact-checking questionable content. This fact-check was written by PesaCheck Fact-Checker Simon Muli and edited by PesaCheck Deputy Editor Enock Nyariki. The article was approved for publication by PesaCheck Managing Editor Eric Mugendi. PesaCheck is East Africa’s first public finance fact-checking initiative. It was co-founded by Catherine Gicheru and Justin Arenstein, and is being incubated by the continent’s largest civic technology and data journalism accelerator: Code for Africa. It seeks to help the public separate fact from fiction in public pronouncements about the numbers that shape our world, with a special emphasis on pronouncements about public finances that shape government’s delivery of Sustainable Development Goals (SDG) public services, such as healthcare, rural development and access to water/sanitation. PesaCheck also tests the accuracy of media reportage. To find out more about the project, visit pesacheck.org. PesaCheck is an initiative of Code for Africa, through its innovateAFRICA fund, with support from Deutsche Welle Akademie, in partnership with a coalition of local African media and other civic watchdog organisations. -- -- PesaCheck Are they lying? Kenya’s 1st fact-checking initiative verifies statements by public figures. A @Code4Kenya and @IBP_Kenya initiative, supported by @Code4Africa. Help Status About Careers Blog Privacy Terms Text to speech Teams,
https://pesacheck.org/false-scotts-emulsion-does-not-protect-against-covid-19-99b7c7af7723,Sign up Sign in Sign up Sign in PesaCheck Follow PesaCheck -- Listen Share A Facebook post claiming that Scott’s Emulsion provides immunity against COVID-19 is FALSE. The post implies that children who grew up in the 1990s are immune to COVID-19 because they took Scott’s Emulsion, which contains cod liver oil — a rich source of calcium and Vitamin A and D. Scott’s Emulsion is usually given to children to help build resistance to rickets and to aid in the growth and development of bone structure and teeth. However, there is no scientific evidence to show that the medicine gives immunity against COVID-19. The World Health Organization (WHO) maintains the stance that at the moment, there is no specific cure for the disease caused by the novel coronavirus. WHO spokesperson, Tarik Jasarevic, told PesaCheck in a phone interview that to date, there is no cure or vaccine for COVID-19. Mr Jasarevic, however, said that while no food or diet can prevent or cure COVID-19, healthy dietary supplements containing micronutrients and vitamins are important in supporting the immune system and helping it to fight off the virus and other respiratory tract diseases. PesaCheck has looked into a post claiming that Scott’s Emulsion causes immunity against COVID-19 and finds it to be FALSE. This post is part of an ongoing series of PesaCheck fact-checks examining content marked as potential misinformation on Facebook and other social media platforms. By partnering with Facebook and similar social media platforms, third-party fact-checking organisations like PesaCheck are helping to sort fact from fiction. We do this by giving the public deeper insight and context to posts they see in their social media feeds. Have you spotted what you think is fake news or false information on Facebook? Here’s how you can report. And, here’s more information on PesaCheck’s methodology for fact-checking questionable content. This fact-check was written by PesaCheck Fact-Checker James Okong’o and edited by PesaCheck Deputy Editor Enock Nyariki. The article was approved for publication by PesaCheck Managing Editor Eric Mugendi. PesaCheck is East Africa’s first public finance fact-checking initiative. It was co-founded by Catherine Gicheru and Justin Arenstein, and is being incubated by the continent’s largest civic technology and data journalism accelerator: Code for Africa. It seeks to help the public separate fact from fiction in public pronouncements about the numbers that shape our world, with a special emphasis on pronouncements about public finances that shape government’s delivery of Sustainable Development Goals (SDG) public services, such as healthcare, rural development and access to water/sanitation. PesaCheck also tests the accuracy of media reportage. To find out more about the project, visit pesacheck.org. PesaCheck is an initiative of Code for Africa, through its innovateAFRICA fund, with support from Deutsche Welle Akademie, in partnership with a coalition of local African media and other civic watchdog organisations. -- -- PesaCheck Are they lying? Kenya’s 1st fact-checking initiative verifies statements by public figures. A @Code4Kenya and @IBP_Kenya initiative, supported by @Code4Africa. Help Status About Careers Blog Privacy Terms Text to speech Teams,
https://pesacheck.org/false-a-diet-of-these-selected-vegetables-does-not-cure-covid-19-c7f470a31d9,Sign up Sign in Sign up Sign in PesaCheck Follow PesaCheck -- Listen Share An article claiming that consuming a diet of select vegetables can cure COVID-19 is FALSE. The article published by Opera News states that okra, ugu (fluted pumpkin leaves), spinach and waterleaf provide immunity against COVID-19, adding that a healthy diet that includes vegetables is of great importance in the prevention and cure of the disease. While the article correctly claims that eating a balanced diet enables people to develop stronger immunity against infections such as COVID-19, there is no evidence that the selected vegetables can cure COVID-19 as the headline suggests. The World Health Organization (WHO) has also refuted the claim, stating that balanced diets are good for the body’s immunity, but there is no cure for COVID-19, as yet. “While there is no cure for COVID-19 and no food can prevent the infection”, WHO spokesperson Tarik Jasarevic told PesaCheck, “a nutritious and healthy diet rich in protective foods containing vitamins — mostly from vegetables and fruits, carbohydrates, fats, minerals, fibre and water can boost one’s immunity and capacity to fight the infection. People who eat a well-balanced diet tend to be healthier with stronger immune systems,” Mr Jasarevic said. The WHO also states on its website that no specific treatment for the disease caused by a novel coronavirus currently exists, recommending that treatment be based on the patient’s clinical condition. The UN agency also stresses the need for supportive care for infected persons. PesaCheck has looked into an article claiming that eating a diet of specific vegetables can cure COVID-19, and finds it to be FALSE. This post is part of an ongoing series of PesaCheck fact-checks examining content marked as potential misinformation on Facebook and other social media platforms. By partnering with Facebook and similar social media platforms, third-party fact-checking organisations like PesaCheck are helping to sort fact from fiction. We do this by giving the public deeper insight and context to posts they see in their social media feeds. Have you spotted what you think is fake news or false information on Facebook? Here’s how you can report. And, here’s more information on PesaCheck’s methodology for fact-checking questionable content. This fact-check was written by PesaCheck Fact-Checker James Okong’o and edited by PesaCheck Deputy Editor Enock Nyariki. The article was approved for publication by PesaCheck Managing Editor Eric Mugendi. PesaCheck is East Africa’s first public finance fact-checking initiative. It was co-founded by Catherine Gicheru and Justin Arenstein, and is being incubated by the continent’s largest civic technology and data journalism accelerator: Code for Africa. It seeks to help the public separate fact from fiction in public pronouncements about the numbers that shape our world, with a special emphasis on pronouncements about public finances that shape government’s delivery of Sustainable Development Goals (SDG) public services, such as healthcare, rural development and access to water/sanitation. PesaCheck also tests the accuracy of media reportage. To find out more about the project, visit pesacheck.org. PesaCheck is an initiative of Code for Africa, through its innovateAFRICA fund, with support from Deutsche Welle Akademie, in partnership with a coalition of local African media and other civic watchdog organisations. -- -- PesaCheck Are they lying? Kenya’s 1st fact-checking initiative verifies statements by public figures. A @Code4Kenya and @IBP_Kenya initiative, supported by @Code4Africa. Help Status About Careers Blog Privacy Terms Text to speech Teams,
https://pesacheck.org/false-headline-south-africa-has-not-developed-a-cure-for-covid-19-b64aa61db86a,Sign up Sign in Sign up Sign in PesaCheck Follow PesaCheck -- Listen Share An article claiming that South Africa has developed a cure for COVID-19 has a FALSE HEADLINE. The headline of the article, published by Opera News, says that South Africa has produced a cure for COVID-19, and that this cure would retail for less than 300 rand. However, there is no evidence that South Africa has developed a cure for COVID-19, and the text of the article appears to have been copied from an article published by Business Insider South Africa about a COVID-19 rapid antibody test that will cost less than 300 rand. Text from the Opera News article The Opera News article appears to have changed some words from the Business Insider article, possibly to avoid detection for plagiarism. Tarik Jasarevic, a spokesperson for the World Health Organization (WHO), told PesaCheck in a phone interview that to date there is no cure or vaccine for COVID-19. “What we have are several potential vaccines by different organizations from across the globe with a few of them on the human trial phases,” said Mr Jasarevic. WHO also says on its website that at the moment there is no specific treatment for the disease caused by a novel coronavirus, recommending that treatment be based on the patient’s clinical condition. The UN agency also stresses the need for supportive care for infected persons. While there is no cure for the disease, South Africa is the first country in Africa to take part in human clinical trials aimed at producing a potential vaccine against COVID-19. On June 23, the University of the Witwatersrand in Johannesburg announced the launch of the first clinical trial of a COVID-19 vaccine on the continent. The trial is being conducted in partnership with the Jenner Institute at the University of Oxford. The trial vaccine, known as ChAdOx1 nCoV-19, is already being tested in the UK and Brazil. On July 9, the Johannesburg-based University released a progress report on the ongoing clinical trial, which involves 2,000 volunteers aged 18–65, some of whom are HIV positive. The vaccine is now in Phase III clinical trials, which means researchers are assessing how well it works to prevent coronavirus infections across a broad range of ages. It will also evaluate the safety aspects of the vaccine and its ability to generate a good immune response. Researchers at Oxford University, who developed the vaccine, are also working with AstraZeneca on its further development and production. PesaCheck has looked into an article claiming that South Africa produced a cure for COVID-19 and finds that it has a FALSE HEADLINE. This post is part of an ongoing series of PesaCheck fact-checks examining content marked as potential misinformation on Facebook and other social media platforms. By partnering with Facebook and similar social media platforms, third-party fact-checking organisations like PesaCheck are helping to sort fact from fiction. We do this by giving the public deeper insight and context to posts they see in their social media feeds. Have you spotted what you think is fake news or false information on Facebook? Here’s how you can report. And, here’s more information on PesaCheck’s methodology for fact-checking questionable content. This fact-check was written by PesaCheck Fact-Checker James Okong’o and edited by PesaCheck Deputy Editor Enock Nyariki. The article was approved for publication by PesaCheck Managing Editor Eric Mugendi. PesaCheck is East Africa’s first public finance fact-checking initiative. It was co-founded by Catherine Gicheru and Justin Arenstein, and is being incubated by the continent’s largest civic technology and data journalism accelerator: Code for Africa. It seeks to help the public separate fact from fiction in public pronouncements about the numbers that shape our world, with a special emphasis on pronouncements about public finances that shape government’s delivery of Sustainable Development Goals (SDG) public services, such as healthcare, rural development and access to water/sanitation. PesaCheck also tests the accuracy of media reportage. To find out more about the project, visit pesacheck.org. PesaCheck is an initiative of Code for Africa, through its innovateAFRICA fund, with support from Deutsche Welle Akademie, in partnership with a coalition of local African media and other civic watchdog organisations. -- -- PesaCheck Are they lying? Kenya’s 1st fact-checking initiative verifies statements by public figures. A @Code4Kenya and @IBP_Kenya initiative, supported by @Code4Africa. Help Status About Careers Blog Privacy Terms Text to speech Teams,
https://factcheck.afp.com/hoax-report-circulates-about-university-oxford-coronavirus-vaccine-trial,The Sinhala-language article was published here on April 26, 2020.  The report's headline translates to English as: “England’s CHADOX1 Corona vaccine becomes a success”. Below is a screenshot of the misleading article: The report translates to English as: “Biologist Sarah Gilbert and a team of researchers from England's Oxford University have run a clinical trial of the ChAdOx1 vaccine on April 23.  A total of 72 out of 100 corona patients have completely recovered after using the vaccine by now (April 27). However, England's medical research agency still has not granted authorization to mass produce this vaccine.” The blog site is named "CNN Lanka" but is not connected to the US-based media channel CNN, which operates under a different URL, and is not one of CNN's global partner channels. The article was also shared on Facebook here, here and here alongside a similar claim. A team of researchers at the University of Oxford did begin testing a COVID-19 vaccine, formally called ChAdOx1 nCoV-19, using human volunteers on April 23 and the study is being led by Professor Sarah Gilbert. But the claim that the trial was successful, curing 72 out of 100 COVID-19 patients of the disease, is false. Vaccines are administered to people in order to prevent a particular disease, rather than to cure them of one. According to the University of Oxford, up to 1,112 volunteers were invited to participate in the clinical trial for the coronavirus vaccine. The volunteers were required to have never tested positive for COVID-19, according to eligibility requirements published on the vaccine trial's website here. Below is a screenshot of the participation criteria:  In an email to AFP on April 29, 2020, Dr. Joanna Bagniewska, an Oxford University Paediatrics Department Communication and Public Engagement Officer, said the trial was ongoing. The success rate of the vaccine also remains unknown, she said. In a statement published on April 23, 2020, the University of Oxford said that results would be released once researchers can “compare the number of infections in the control group with the number of infections in the vaccinated group.” “We may get enough data in a couple of months to see if the vaccine works, but if transmission levels drop, this could take up to six months,” the statement reads.  John Bell, an Oxford regius professor of medicine, told NBC News on May 3, 2020 that the vaccine research team is “pretty sure we’ll get a signal by June about whether this works or not.” EXCLUSIVE: Sir John Bell of Oxford University says “we’re pretty sure we’ll get a signal by June” about whether this works or not. #MTP #IfItsSunday
		Sir Bell: “This is likely to be a seasonal coronavirus vaccine.” pic.twitter.com/sIFeXb6KJy The image in the misleading posts contains an illustrative image of a vaccine that was previously published here on April 24, 2020.  Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://srilanka.factcrescendo.com/english/fact-check-sri-lanka-navy-hospital-did-not-use-alternative-medicine/,Fact Crescendo Sri Lanka English | The leading fact-checking website The Fact Behind Every News! With the COVID-19 pandemic numbers growing exponentially and citizens around the world in lockdown, many are tuned in to any possible information that can be found online – especially in the hope that a cure is available. While many research labs and medical professionals are hard at work in search of this very cure, no treatment has been successful to date. While some professionals are in search of a preventive vaccine, others have attempted clinical trials administering medication such as antimalarial drugs, arthritis medication and others, nothing has proved to work or cure the virus. In fact, a Google search will inform people of this fact.  The fact that a cure hasn’t been found doesn’t seem to have stopped fake news around the topic. A recent Lankan post on a public Facebook group named “වෙදකම වෙනුවෙන් බුකී හටන” (A Bookie for Medication) informed audiences that the Navy Hospital in Welisara had rejected Western medicine and was administering Ayurvedic treatments to patients successfully. The post seemed to be a screenshot taken from a Facebook Page named “ඩුබායි සිංහයා” (The Lion of Dubai). The shared screenshot and original post can be seen below: The text in the post which was shared over 6000 times, says: The Sri Lanka Navy in Welisara have defeated Western medicine by utilizing traditional/ Ayurvedic medical practices which show excellent results in 4 days. All soldiers are well and there is no one in the ICU. Blessings of the Triple Gem. All hail our soldiers! FACT CHECK As we mentioned in the introduction itself, the WHO has not confirmed any cure for COVID-19 to date.  We searched further to have a better understanding of how Ayurvedic practices are connected to the virus. It is in fact true that the government of Sri Lanka has urged Ayurvedic practitioners to seek a cure for the virus locally. A NEWSFIRST.LK article published on 7th April in fact confirms this. The article titled “Ayurvedic Medical Practitioners Requested to Find Alternative Indigenous Medicine against COVID-19” goes on to tell us that a representative consortium had gathered to discuss this further.  A more recent article about a potential Ayurvedic cure developed in Kerala seems to have been approved for a clinical trial just days ago. Indian medical website medicaldialogues.in published an article on 4th May titled “Clinical Trial of Ayurvedic Medicine Zingivir-H Tablet Starts on COVID-19 Patients”. As the title suggests, this is merely a clinical trial and not a confirmed cure. Several other clinical trials are underway across the planet as the search for a cure continues to gather momentum. In order to ascertain the facts mentioned in the viral post specifically related to the Sri Lanka Navy, we spoke with the official SL Navy spokesman Lt. Commander Isuru Suriyabandara who refuted the claim immediately, telling a Fact Crescendo representative that none of the information in the viral post was true. In fact, the Naval hospital has not employed any alternative medicinal practices to date.  Additionally, Namal Lasantha Ulluvisheva, a Sri Lanka Navy physician made a statement on his Facebook profile confirming this information on 3rd May 2020. The post can be seen below: Furthermore, we contacted the Health Promotions Bureau and Department of Ayurveda attached to the Ministry of Health and both of them refuted the claim as well. CONCLUSION Our investigation confirms that no cure has been found in any form of medical practice for COVID-19 and the official statement from the Sri Lanka Navy. Hence, we declare the viral post to be misleading and false. Title:No. Sri Lanka Navy Did Not Use Alternative Medicine To Cure COVID-19
 Result: False  Your email address will not be published. Required fields are marked * Comment *  Name *  Email *  Website  Save my name, email, and website in this browser for the next time I comment. ,
https://www.facebook.com/MoHBhutan/posts/3042363429158586,,
https://pesacheck.org/false-there-is-no-evidence-that-smoking-cannabis-can-prevent-covid-19-9f0663e35c3a,Sign up Sign in Sign up Sign in PesaCheck Follow PesaCheck -- 1 Listen Share A video shared on Facebook claiming that smoking cannabis can prevent COVID-19 is FALSE. According to the video, non-smokers are more vulnerable to COVID-19 than regular smokers of cannabis, and the abundance of the drug in Jamaica is apparently the reason why there have been no confirmed cases of COVID-19 in the country. However, while studies have shown that cannabis has medicinal properties, and a cannabis-based drug has been approved by the US Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of Dravet syndrome and Lennox-Gastaut syndrome, two rare and severe forms of epilepsy, there is no evidence to suggest it can be used to prevent COVID-19. In fact, when the video was published on March 31, 2020, Jamaica had already confirmed 38 cases of COVID-19, indicating that smoking cannabis does not provide immunity against the disease. The World Health Organization identifies people with pre-existing medical conditions such as asthma, diabetes and heart disease, are the ones more vulnerable to COVID- 19, rather than those who don’t smoke cannabis as claimed. Further, smoking cannabis can damage the lungs according to the American Lung Association, and can cause chronic bronchitis, which results from damage to the cells that line the airways. Lung damage from smoking has been cited by the World Health Organization as a risk factor for severe COVID-19 and could contribute to serious symptoms and death among patients that have underlying cardiovascular diseases The five measures that the World Health Organization recommends to prevent the spread of COVID-19 are washing hands regularly for 20 seconds with soap and water or alcohol-based hand rub, not touching one’s eyes, nose and mouth, covering one’s nose and mouth with a disposable tissue or flexed elbow when coughing or sneezing, social distancing by avoiding close contact with people who are unwell and staying home and self-isolating from others if unwell. PesaCheck has looked into a claim that smoking cannabis can prevent COVID-19 and finds it to be FALSE. This post is part of an ongoing series of PesaCheck fact-checks examining content marked as potential misinformation on Facebook and other social media platforms. By partnering with Facebook and similar social media platforms, third-party fact-checking organisations like PesaCheck are helping to sort fact from fiction. We do this by giving the public deeper insight and context to posts they see in their social media feeds. Have you spotted what you think is fake news or false information on Facebook? Here’s how you can report. And, here’s more information on PesaCheck’s methodology for fact-checking questionable content. This fact-check was written by Fact-Checker Simon Muli and edited by Enock Nyariki The article was approved for publication by PesaCheck Managing Editor Eric Mugendi. PesaCheck is East Africa’s first public finance fact-checking initiative. It was co-founded by Catherine Gicheru and Justin Arenstein, and is being incubated by the continent’s largest civic technology and data journalism accelerator: Code for Africa. It seeks to help the public separate fact from fiction in public pronouncements about the numbers that shape our world, with a special emphasis on pronouncements about public finances that shape government’s delivery of Sustainable Development Goals (SDG) public services, such as healthcare, rural development and access to water / sanitation. PesaCheck also tests the accuracy of media reportage. To find out more about the project, visit pesacheck.org. PesaCheck is a joint initiative of Code for Africa, through its innovateAFRICA fund, with additional funding support from the International Budget Partnership (Kenya) and Twaweza, in partnership with a coalition of local media organisations, and the International Center for Journalists (ICFJ). -- -- 1 PesaCheck Are they lying? Kenya’s 1st fact-checking initiative verifies statements by public figures. A @Code4Kenya and @IBP_Kenya initiative, supported by @Code4Africa. Help Status About Careers Blog Privacy Terms Text to speech Teams,
https://pesacheck.org/false-a-team-of-medical-doctor-trainees-from-jkuat-has-not-produced-a-vaccine-for-coronavirus-b821354a403,Sign up Sign in Sign up Sign in PesaCheck Follow PesaCheck -- Listen Share A blog post shared on Facebook claiming that medics at the Jomo Kenyatta University of Agriculture and Technology have developed a vaccine for the Wuhan coronavirus, and that six Chinese victims of the disease had been cured with this vaccine is FALSE. According to the post, a 7-member medical student team from JKUAT had completed work on the vaccine ‘last week’ and shipped samples to China ‘over the weekend’, with those who received the treatment showing rapid signs of recovery. There is no date of publication on the article, making it difficult to determine what the dates are. However, this story has not appeared in any other news outlets, and it contains a number of inconsistencies. Viral diseases, such as those caused by the coronavirus family, require an individual to be inoculated before infection for them to be effective, and not after infection. Additionally, the article does not indicate key details, such as which university the students were at for the exchange program, and when and where exactly the vaccines were administered. There is no Professor Moses Yumbya listed on staff at the JKUAT School of Health, or anywhere else on the university website. The article also claims that the JKUAT team was expected to head to China to assist in mass production of the vaccine to help fight the virus, but Kenya Airways and a number of other airlines have suspended flights to the area. There is no information about students on an exchange program to China on the JKUAT website, and the university also negated this claim when called for comment on this article. Dr. Rollins Makokha, a Surgery resident at Kenyatta National Hospital, told PesaCheck that it is not possible to develop a vaccine and conduct human trials within a month. According to Dr Makokha, the first process would be to recreate the virus in a lab and then study it to determine the type of antibodies that the immune system would produce in response to it. The vaccines would then be subjected to animal testing, and once the safety and efficacy is established, the vaccines can advance into clinical trials in humans. If they pass the process and are deemed safe for humans they can then be mass produced for vaccination. ABC News Australia reported on 29 January that Australian scientists had succeeded in growing the 2019-nCoV virus in a lab, which is the first step in the vaccine development process. The scientists are aiming to meet a 16-week deadline to test the coronavirus vaccine on humans. In the meantime, the World Health Organisation called for continued collaboration on studies into the severity and transmissibility of the virus in order to advance scientific understanding of the virus and contribute to the development of medical countermeasures such as vaccines and treatments. PesaCheck has looked into the claim that medics at the Jomo Kenyatta University of Agriculture and Technology have developed a vaccine for the Wuhan coronavirus, and that six Chinese victims of the disease had been cured with this vaccine and finds it to be FALSE. This post is part of an ongoing series of PesaCheck fact-checks examining content marked as potential misinformation on Facebook and other social media platforms. By partnering with Facebook and similar social media platforms, third-party fact-checking organisations like PesaCheck are helping to sort fact from fiction. We do this by giving the public deeper insight and context to posts they see in their social media feeds. Have you spotted what you think is fake news or false information on Facebook? Here’s how you can report. And, here’s more information on PesaCheck’s methodology for fact-checking questionable content. This fact-check was written by PesaCheck Managing Editor Eric Mugendi, with research input from Sylvia Makinia. PesaCheck is East Africa’s first public finance fact-checking initiative. It was co-founded by Catherine Gicheru and Justin Arenstein, and is being incubated by the continent’s largest civic technology and data journalism accelerator: Code for Africa. It seeks to help the public separate fact from fiction in public pronouncements about the numbers that shape our world, with a special emphasis on pronouncements about public finances that shape government’s delivery of Sustainable Development Goals (SDG) public services, such as healthcare, rural development and access to water / sanitation. PesaCheck also tests the accuracy of media reportage. To find out more about the project, visit pesacheck.org. PesaCheck is a joint initiative of Code for Africa, through its innovateAFRICA fund, with additional funding support from the International Budget Partnership (Kenya) and Twaweza, in partnership with a coalition of local media organisations, and the International Center for Journalists (ICFJ). -- -- PesaCheck Are they lying? Kenya’s 1st fact-checking initiative verifies statements by public figures. A @Code4Kenya and @IBP_Kenya initiative, supported by @Code4Africa. Help Status About Careers Blog Privacy Terms Text to speech Teams,
https://pesacheck.org/false-there-is-no-evidence-that-breast-milk-prevents-or-cures-covid-19-d7607402a9b0,Sign up Sign in Sign up Sign in PesaCheck Follow PesaCheck -- Listen Share An article claiming that breast milk provides antibodies that fight the virus that causes COVID-19 is FALSE. The article, by Opera News, attributes the information to the World Health Organization (WHO). However, the WHO has distanced itself from the claim saying there is no scientific evidence to prove that breast milk prevents or cures COVID-19. “There is no evidence that breast milk can give people antibodies that fight COVID-19 or can cure COVID-19,” Mr Tarik Jasarevic, the WHO spokesperson, told PesaCheck in a telephone interview. Mr Jasarevic noted that while breast milk is traditionally good for boosting children’s immune systems, there’s no evidence of COVID-19 antibodies in breast milk, nor is there any conclusive study that supports the claim. However, a study to test breast milk antibodies is in progress. Dr Rebecca Powell, an infectious disease expert at the Icahn School of Medicine, has put out a call for samples of breast milk to test for the presence of coronavirus antibodies and assess their potential ability to combat disease. SARS-CoV-2, the virus that causes COVID-19, has not been detected in breast milk, meaning that there is no known risk of an infected mother passing it to a child through milk. At the moment, there are no vaccines or treatments for COVID-19. However, there are many ongoing clinical trials across the world evaluating potential treatments. PesaCheck has looked into an article claiming that breast milk provides antibodies that fight the virus that causes COVID-19 and finds it to be FALSE. This post is part of an ongoing series of PesaCheck fact-checks examining content marked as potential misinformation on Facebook and other social media platforms. By partnering with Facebook and similar social media platforms, third-party fact-checking organisations like PesaCheck are helping to sort fact from fiction. We do this by giving the public deeper insight and context to posts they see in their social media feeds. Have you spotted what you think is fake news or false information on Facebook? Here’s how you can report. And, here’s more information on PesaCheck’s methodology for fact-checking questionable content. This fact-check was written by PesaCheck Fact-Checker James Okong’o and edited by PesaCheck Deputy Editor Enock Nyariki. The article was approved for publication by PesaCheck Managing Editor Eric Mugendi. PesaCheck is East Africa’s first public finance fact-checking initiative. It was co-founded by Catherine Gicheru and Justin Arenstein, and is being incubated by the continent’s largest civic technology and data journalism accelerator: Code for Africa. It seeks to help the public separate fact from fiction in public pronouncements about the numbers that shape our world, with a special emphasis on pronouncements about public finances that shape government’s delivery of Sustainable Development Goals (SDG) public services, such as healthcare, rural development and access to water/sanitation. PesaCheck also tests the accuracy of media reportage. To find out more about the project, visit pesacheck.org. PesaCheck is an initiative of Code for Africa, through its innovateAFRICA fund, with support from Deutsche Welle Akademie, in partnership with a coalition of local African media and other civic watchdog organisations. -- -- PesaCheck Are they lying? Kenya’s 1st fact-checking initiative verifies statements by public figures. A @Code4Kenya and @IBP_Kenya initiative, supported by @Code4Africa. Help Status About Careers Blog Privacy Terms Text to speech Teams,
https://www.aap.com.au/homemade-grapefruit-recipe-wont-make-hydroxychloroquine/,A Facebook post claims hydroxychloroquine can be made using a recipe that includes “three organic grapefruits”. The post features a purported recipe using grapefruit peels and makes the claim that “Quinine is Hydroxychloroquine without big pharmas (sic) fillers and preservatives and prescriptions !!!”. The August 4 post has received more than 220 shares. The post’s hydroxychloroquine recipe follows on from US President Donald Trump’s promotion of the anti-malaria drug as a potential treatment for COVID-19. However, it falsely claims that hydroxychloroquine is the same as quinine. Hydroxychloroquine is a drug that is used to prevent malaria and treat conditions such as arthritis, according to the US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. It was first synthesised in 1950 as a less toxic alternative to chloroquine, according to the American College of Clinical Pharmacy. Quinine is a compound which comes from the bark of the Cinchona tree. It is also an antimalarial which is used to treat cramps. University of Sydney pharmaceutical expert Dr Nial Wheate told AAP FactCheck the Facebook post’s claim that quinine is hydroxychloroquine “without fillers and preservatives” is incorrect. Alan Armstrong, Professor of Organic Synthesis at Imperial College London previously rejected the claim, saying: “Hydroxychloroquine is a completely different chemical substance to quinine.” Prof Armstrong told Reuters: “Historically, hydroxychloroquine was discovered during efforts to synthesise alternatives to quinine as anti-malarials.” Regarding the recipe, Dr Wheate told AAP FactCheck that he could not find any scientific evidence of quinine in grapefruit peels. He added that a person would “probably need an entire bag full of peel to be able to get enough quinine from it to actually do anything”. Dr Wheate said quinine and hydroxychloroquine in their natural forms do not dissolve well in water and someone using the recipe would need to drink an “unhealthy” amount of water – about five litres per day – for it to have any effect. “Quinine is massively dangerous chemical for people to be taking – it has really bad side effects,” he warned. “If you get the dose wrong and take too much, you can get in serious trouble.” Based on the evidence, AAP FactCheck found the claims in the Facebook post to be false. Hydroxychloroquine is a synthetic drug while quinine is a compound found in cinchona bark. Regarding the recipe, a pharmaceutical expert told AAP FactCheck he could not find scientific evidence of quinine in grapefruit peels and it would not create hydroxychloroquine. False – The primary claim of the content is factually inaccurate. AAP FactCheck is an accredited member of the International Fact-Checking Network. If you would like to support our independent, fact-based journalism, you can make a contribution to AAP here. 
	All information, text and images included on the AAP Websites is for personal use only and may not be re-written, 
	copied, re-sold or re-distributed, framed, linked, shared onto social media or otherwise used whether for compensation 
	of any kind or not, unless you have the prior written permission of AAP. For more information, please refer to our 
	standard terms and conditions.
 Media Literacy Campaign 
			 Stay in Touch AAP FactCheck provides factual, authoritative information Australians can rely on. Accredited with the Poynter Institute's International Fact-Checking Network and adhering to the highest industry standards, our experienced team works to minimise the impact of misinformation. Image buyers from all industries rely on AAP Photos. A digital treasure trove of content depicting Australian life, our fully-searchable database contains millions of images from around the country and around the world.   AAPNews delivers newswire content direct to the public. Choose from a number of subscription models to not only gain access to high-quality fact-based news on your desktop or mobile device, but also to show your support for Australia's only not-for-profit newswire. Get the news feed your organisation needs, with AAP offering extensive coverage of news, courts, politics, sports, finance and the arts. Take advantage of AAP’s partner content to get the international news that matters to your business, with news feeds delivered via multiple channels including API and FTP. AAP is Australia's only independent newswire service, delivering stories and images around the country and around the world every day. By supporting AAP with your contribution you are backing a team of dedicated, objective journalists to continue this work. Thank you.   Donations over $2 are tax deductible. AAP Acknowledgement of Country 
                        In the spirit of reconciliation Australian Associated Press acknowledges the Traditional Custodians of country throughout Australia and their connections to land, sea and community. We pay our respect to their Elders past and present and extend that respect to all Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander peoples today.
                     © 2024 Australian Associated Press. All rights reserved.,
https://www.aap.com.au/medical-mask-colour-instructions-are-misleading-and-false/,A Facebook post claims medical face masks being used to prevent the transmission of COVID-19 are designed to be worn differently depending on the health of the wearer. The post shows an infographic headed, “The correct way to use a medical mask” and claims that masks should be worn “colored side out if you are sick and do not want to spread germs around”. It also claims the white side of the mask is “the filter part” to be worn facing out when the wearer is not sick, to prevent germs getting in. The July 29 post has been viewed more than 2.3 million times and shared by more than 160 users. The Facebook post falsely advises that the “correct” way to use a face mask is to have the coloured side facing out if a person is sick and the white side out if they’re healthy. The post’s claim goes against advice outlined by the World Health Organization. In an instructional video (1min14sec) on March 9, Dr April Baller from WHO’s Health Emergencies Programme explains how to wear a medical mask correctly. Dr Baller says the inside of the mask is “usually the white side”, advice she reiterates in another video on June 5. Providing more detail, Dr Seto Wing Hong, co-director of the WHO Collaborating Center for Infectious Disease Epidemiology and Control, addresses the claim in this video. “You see it (the mask) has the blue colour on the outside because it is waterproof and then you have white on the inside because it is absorbent,” he said. “So, if I cough, it absorbs it… so, you gotta wear it like this – blue on the outside, white on the inside.” In the same video, Dr Wing Hong also stresses the importance of wearing the mask the correct way up, with the metal wired edge running over the nose. A WHO infographic details how to wear a medical mask safely with an instruction that says “ensure the coloured-side faces outwards”. There is no advice that the coloured and white sides are used to indicate the health of the wearer. Versions of the post have been fact checked here, here, here and here. Based on the evidence, AAP Factcheck found the claims in the Facebook post to be false. The post incorrectly advises people to have the coloured side facing out if they are sick and the white side out if they are healthy. False – The primary claims in the post are factually inaccurate.  AAP FactCheck is an accredited member of the International Fact-Checking Network. If you would like to support our independent, fact-based journalism, you can make a contribution to AAP here. 
	All information, text and images included on the AAP Websites is for personal use only and may not be re-written, 
	copied, re-sold or re-distributed, framed, linked, shared onto social media or otherwise used whether for compensation 
	of any kind or not, unless you have the prior written permission of AAP. For more information, please refer to our 
	standard terms and conditions.
 Media Literacy Campaign 
			 Stay in Touch AAP FactCheck provides factual, authoritative information Australians can rely on. Accredited with the Poynter Institute's International Fact-Checking Network and adhering to the highest industry standards, our experienced team works to minimise the impact of misinformation. Image buyers from all industries rely on AAP Photos. A digital treasure trove of content depicting Australian life, our fully-searchable database contains millions of images from around the country and around the world.   AAPNews delivers newswire content direct to the public. Choose from a number of subscription models to not only gain access to high-quality fact-based news on your desktop or mobile device, but also to show your support for Australia's only not-for-profit newswire. Get the news feed your organisation needs, with AAP offering extensive coverage of news, courts, politics, sports, finance and the arts. Take advantage of AAP’s partner content to get the international news that matters to your business, with news feeds delivered via multiple channels including API and FTP. AAP is Australia's only independent newswire service, delivering stories and images around the country and around the world every day. By supporting AAP with your contribution you are backing a team of dedicated, objective journalists to continue this work. Thank you.   Donations over $2 are tax deductible. AAP Acknowledgement of Country 
                        In the spirit of reconciliation Australian Associated Press acknowledges the Traditional Custodians of country throughout Australia and their connections to land, sea and community. We pay our respect to their Elders past and present and extend that respect to all Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander peoples today.
                     © 2024 Australian Associated Press. All rights reserved.,
https://www.poynter.org/?ifcn_misinformation=a-post-claims-several-medicine-combinations-cure-covid-19,Fact-checked by: La Nación 2020/07/29 | Costa Rica Explanation: There is no known cure for the virus, and specialists explain why these combinations do not work. This false claim originated from: WhatsApp/Facebook The #CoronavirusFacts database records fact-checks published since the beginning of the COVID-19 outbreak. The pandemic and its consequences are constantly evolving and data that was accurate weeks or even days ago might have changed. Remember to check the date when the fact-check you are reading was published before sharing it. Support responsible news and fact-based information today!,
https://www.poynter.org/?ifcn_misinformation=ruth-mari-calderon-from-the-academy-john-maxwell-in-bolivia-shares-information-on-the-unknown-cures-for-covid-19,Fact-checked by: Bolivia Verifica 2020/04/03 | Bolivia, Dominican Republic Explanation: There is no scientific evidence in the OMS to support the information about the cures she has been discussing. This false claim originated from: Facebook The #CoronavirusFacts database records fact-checks published since the beginning of the COVID-19 outbreak. The pandemic and its consequences are constantly evolving and data that was accurate weeks or even days ago might have changed. Remember to check the date when the fact-check you are reading was published before sharing it. Support responsible news and fact-based information today!,
https://www.poynter.org/?ifcn_misinformation=health-authorities-in-ireland-have-banned-hydroxychloroquine-as-a-potential-covid-19-treatment,Fact-checked by: TheJournal.ie 2020/07/24 | Ireland Explanation: Health authorities have not banned the use of hydroxychloroquine in Ireland. This false claim originated from: Facebook The #CoronavirusFacts database records fact-checks published since the beginning of the COVID-19 outbreak. The pandemic and its consequences are constantly evolving and data that was accurate weeks or even days ago might have changed. Remember to check the date when the fact-check you are reading was published before sharing it. Support responsible news and fact-based information today!,
https://www.poynter.org/?ifcn_misinformation=hand-sanitiser-can-go-on-fire-if-left-in-a-car-in-hot-weather,Fact-checked by: TheJournal.ie 2020/06/05 | Ireland Explanation: Hand sanitiser bottles can not go on fire if left in a car. The temperature inside the car would need to reach around 365 degrees Celsius for this to happen. This false claim originated from: Facebook The #CoronavirusFacts database records fact-checks published since the beginning of the COVID-19 outbreak. The pandemic and its consequences are constantly evolving and data that was accurate weeks or even days ago might have changed. Remember to check the date when the fact-check you are reading was published before sharing it. Support responsible news and fact-based information today!,
https://www.sochfactcheck.com/warm-water-salt-and-vinegar-wont-keep-you-safe-from-coronavirus/,Claim: Drinking lots of water and gargling a mixture of warm water, vinegar and salt can eliminate COVID-19. Fact: There is no evidence to support this claim.  Don’t believe everything your uncle sends to the family WhatsApp group! There has been an outpouring of misinformation and disinformation after the 2019 Novel Coronavirus (COVID-19) outbreak in December. An image recently circulated on social media through WhatsApp and Facebook claims that the COVID-19 remains in the recipient’s throat for four days before infecting the entire body, and therefore one should gargle with a mixture of warm water, salt and vinegar to keep the virus at bay. Upon some research, Soch found this information to be false.  Does the virus remain in the throat for 4 days initially?  No, it doesn’t. AFP and AAP, who are both accredited by the International Fact Checking Network have debunked the myth that the COVID-19 necessarily starts from a throat infection. An infectious diseases physician from the University of Sydney, Professor Anthony Cunningham told AAP FactCheck that it is not accurate to say that the virus will infect the throat first as the delicate tissues behind the nose are more likely starting points.  Moreover, according to the World Health Organisation and  US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), early symptoms of COVID-19 include fever, cough, shortness of breath and breathing difficulties Will a mixture of warm water, vinegar and salt eliminate the virus?  No. This is false. There is no scientific proof that correlates warm water and saline with mitigating effects of the virus in the human body. The world health organisation clearly states in an infographic about corona that “there is no evidence that regularly rinsing the nose with saline has protected people from the new coronavirus.” AAP Fact-check also debunks this claim by stating that gargling warm water and salt provides symptomatic relief at best and is not a cure to the virus itself.  Summary: There is no evidence to support the claim that gargling a mixture of warm water, vinegar and salt will eliminate COVID-19.,
https://www.sochfactcheck.com/pakistan-has-not-developed-a-cure-for-coronavirus-but-news-outlets-cant-stop-claiming-we-have/,CLAIM: Pakistan is manufacturing a cure for the 2019 Novel Coronavirus and exporting it to China in large quantities. FACT: Although some researchers believe a drug called Chloroquine Phosphate could help treat the disease, on 20 February 2020, Dr. Janet Diaz, lead for clinical case management in the WHO Health Emergencies program, said there is currently “no proof” that it is effective. According to viral news stories published by local news and entertainment websites, a cure for the 2019 Novel Coronavirus, or COVID-19, is being manufactured in Pakistan for export to China. The articles identify the cure as Chloroquine Phosphate, a drug previously used to treat Malaria. Citing an earlier news report from China Economic Net, it was reported that more than 300,000 tablets of Chloroquine Phosphate were exported by Bayer International from one of its subsidiaries in Pakistan after receiving a request from the Guangdong provincial government.  The oldest news report featuring the claim in the Pakistani media was published on 20 February 2020 by Express Tribune. The article originally appeared in the aforementioned China Economic Net story, the source for most of these reports. This article itself references another China Economic Net news story from 20 February 2020, with the headline “Pakistan has effective drug for COVID-19, Over 300,000 pieces exported to China”. However, searches for keywords included in the headline of this article on popular search engines and the internal website search tool do not yield any results. The oldest mention of the 300,000 pieces being exported to China is from a 20 February story on Schine.cn, referencing the the drug trials being conducted on Chloroquines effectiveness for treating COVID-19 in Beijing and Guangdong as the reason why the Guangdong provincial government is importing these drugs, which was left out of the later China Economic Net story and subsequent stories in the Pakistani media. It was reported on 15 February 2020 that Zhang Xinmin, director of the China National Centre for Biotechnology Development under the Ministry of Science and Technology said Chinese researchers have narrowed their attention to a few existing drugs including Chloroquine Phosphate after multiple rounds of screening. Dr. Janet Diaz, lead for clinical case management in the WHO Health Emergencies program, said on 20 February 2020 that [although] some scientists had claimed that anti-malaria drug Chloroquine could be a potential treatment for the new virus, but currently, there is “no proof” that it is effective,  China’s national news service confirmed on 22 February that Chloroquine Phosphate had been used to treat only 135 cases in Beijing and Guangdong province. To understand the story better, Soch spoke to Dr Faisal Mahmood, associate professor infectious diseases at the Aga Khan University Hospital in Karachi.  He said, “In the lab, in a test tube, chloroquine is able to inhibit growth of some viruses including the new SARS CoV-2 virus. However just because a drug works in a test tube does not mean that it will lead to patients getting better faster. The amount of the medication that you need to kill the virus may be higher than the toxic dose of the drug or the drug may not even be able to physically get to where it needs to.” When asked if it is accurate to call this medicine a cure, Dr Mahmood said, “While the first step in finding medications is to test it in the lab, perhaps the more important part of this process is to see if patients who are given the medications actually get better compared to those who did not get the medicine (also called a drug trial). To this effect drug trials are underway in China to examine the effect of chloroquine on patients infected with the virus. However to date these have not been published and therefore it is too early to say if this indeed will work. It is a promising approach but too premature to tout it as a cure.” Chloroquine Phosphate has also been hailed as a wonder drug in misleading viral stories across the world, including one claiming it cured more than 12 thousand people of the virus in China. This demonstrates the propensity for scientific research to be sensationalized into misleading and harmful news coverage, highlighting the importance of fact checking scientific claims in the media. COVID-19, is a respiratory virus first identified in Wuhan, Hubei Province, China. According to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the World Health Organization, common symptoms of the disease are coughing, fever and breathing difficulties.  Summary: Some researchers believe Chloroquine Phosphate may be useful in treating COVID-19. It has been reported that trials are underway in China, for which the drug is being imported from Pakistan. Experts at the World Health Organization have clarified that there is not enough evidence for it to be considered an effective treatment yet. It is misleading to refer to the drug as a “cure.” ,
https://www.sochfactcheck.com/garlic-water-has-its-benefits-curing-coronavirus-is-not-one-of-them/,Claim: 2019 Novel Coronavirus can be cured by consuming a bowl of freshly boiled garlic water. Fact: There is no evidence to support this claim. Verdict: Mostly False The World Health Organisation (WHO) has declared the outbreak of the 2019 Novel Coronavirus a global emergency. As of January 3, 2020, at least 304 people have died from the virus that has infected over 14,500 people worldwide.  Since the past week, a message has been making rounds on Whatsapp, claiming boiled garlic water can cure people infected by the virus.  The message reads “Good news, Wuhan’s corona virus can be cured by one bowl of freshly boiled garlic water.Old Chinese doctor has proven it’s efficacy. Many patients has also proven this to be effective. Eight (8) cloves of chopped garlic add seven (7)cups of water and bring to boil., Eat and drink the boiled garlic water, overnight improvement and healing. Glad to share this.” Soch also searched the keywords “garlic coronavius” in Tweet Binder and found that this piece of misinformation spread on Twitter at a rapid rate in the last seven days.  Dr Osama Khalid, an infectious diseases specialist at Ziauddin University, told Soch there is no evidence to support this rumour. “If garlic water was so effective, the Chinese authorities would be promoting it. I have not seen anything from the Chinese government that is promoting this,” he said. “As a general rule, you would tell anyone who has a viral infection to drink/have warm liquids like tea or soup because it would make them feel better. But that doesn’t bring down the actual infection,” he elaborated. Moreover, the official WHO Western Pacific account posted a tweet earlier today clearly stating that there is no evidence to back this claim.  This particular piece of misinformation has made its way around the globe and fact checkers from India, Indonesia and Taiwan debunked the claim after it went viral in their respective countries. It is interesting to note that the message being circulated in Pakistan is a word-for-word copy of the messages circulated in the aforementioned countries, highlighting how easily misinformation – especially health related misinformation – can cross borders.  Summary: There is no evidence to support the claim that freshly boiled garlic water can cure the 2019 Novel Coronavirus. ,
http://southasiacheck.org/fact-check/who-hasnt-approved-any-home-remedy-for-covid-19/,Honey and ginger.                                                                                                  Photo courtesy of www.freepik.com By Deepak Adhikari For the last several days, a message circulating on WhatsApp and Facebook Messenger claims that an Indian student from Pondicherry University has found a cure for COVID-19. The message claims that the World Health Organization (WHO) also has approved the ‘home remedy’ for the disease, which is caused by a coronavirus. The message reads: “Finally a INDIAN student from PONDICHERRY university, named RAMU found a home remedy cure for Covid-19 which is for the very first time accepted by WHO. He proved that by adding 1 tablespoon of black pepper powder to 2 table spoons of honey and some ginger juice for consecutive 5 days would suppress the effects of corona. And eventually go away 100%. Entire world is starting to accept this remedy. Finally a good news in 2020!! PLEASE CIRCULATE THIS INFORMATION TO ALL YOUR FAMILY MEMBERS AND FRIENDS.” .   A message circulating on WhatsApp. After Facebook and Twitter started tackling misinformation related to COVID-19 by flagging suspicious posts, such claims are now being spread through closed chat apps such as WhatsApp and Facebook Messenger. These apps are used in Nepal for chatting especially with family members and friends. Like many posts that go viral on social media, it is difficult to determine the source and origin of the message. Most Nepali social media users have forwarded and shared a WhatsApp message from someone called ‘Lilyan Thomas’. The same message has also been shared on Facebook Messenger. It has also been uploaded to Reddit, a website for news and discussions. The WHO has said trials for COVID-19 drugs and vaccines are ongoing. The UN body has said there’s no evidence that any home remedy can cure the disease. The US-based National Academies of Science Engineering Medicine has said mixing ginger with other ingredients does not cure COVID-19.  “Combining ginger with other ingredients, such as lemon, garlic, honey, or vinegar, will not destroy the virus. Drinking hot ginger tea, with or without these additional ingredients, will not prevent or cure COVID-19,” the organization says on its website. We asked Dr Prabhat Adhikari, an infectious diseases specialist, to review the claim and whether it has any scientific basis. “It is not proven that drinking a combination of ginger and honey can cure COVID-19. Ayurvedic medicine may advocate this, but I don’t think they have scientific evidence yet,” he told South Asia Check. Experts say a concoction of black pepper powder, honey and ginger is used as a home remedy for cough in Nepal, but its effectiveness against COVID-19 is unproven. Therefore, the claim circulating on chat apps is misleading.,
https://www.sochfactcheck.com/warm-water-salt-and-vinegar-wont-keep-you-safe-from-coronavirus/,Claim: Drinking lots of water and gargling a mixture of warm water, vinegar and salt can eliminate COVID-19. Fact: There is no evidence to support this claim.  Don’t believe everything your uncle sends to the family WhatsApp group! There has been an outpouring of misinformation and disinformation after the 2019 Novel Coronavirus (COVID-19) outbreak in December. An image recently circulated on social media through WhatsApp and Facebook claims that the COVID-19 remains in the recipient’s throat for four days before infecting the entire body, and therefore one should gargle with a mixture of warm water, salt and vinegar to keep the virus at bay. Upon some research, Soch found this information to be false.  Does the virus remain in the throat for 4 days initially?  No, it doesn’t. AFP and AAP, who are both accredited by the International Fact Checking Network have debunked the myth that the COVID-19 necessarily starts from a throat infection. An infectious diseases physician from the University of Sydney, Professor Anthony Cunningham told AAP FactCheck that it is not accurate to say that the virus will infect the throat first as the delicate tissues behind the nose are more likely starting points.  Moreover, according to the World Health Organisation and  US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), early symptoms of COVID-19 include fever, cough, shortness of breath and breathing difficulties Will a mixture of warm water, vinegar and salt eliminate the virus?  No. This is false. There is no scientific proof that correlates warm water and saline with mitigating effects of the virus in the human body. The world health organisation clearly states in an infographic about corona that “there is no evidence that regularly rinsing the nose with saline has protected people from the new coronavirus.” AAP Fact-check also debunks this claim by stating that gargling warm water and salt provides symptomatic relief at best and is not a cure to the virus itself.  Summary: There is no evidence to support the claim that gargling a mixture of warm water, vinegar and salt will eliminate COVID-19.,
https://www.sochfactcheck.com/pakistan-has-not-developed-a-cure-for-coronavirus-but-news-outlets-cant-stop-claiming-we-have/,CLAIM: Pakistan is manufacturing a cure for the 2019 Novel Coronavirus and exporting it to China in large quantities. FACT: Although some researchers believe a drug called Chloroquine Phosphate could help treat the disease, on 20 February 2020, Dr. Janet Diaz, lead for clinical case management in the WHO Health Emergencies program, said there is currently “no proof” that it is effective. According to viral news stories published by local news and entertainment websites, a cure for the 2019 Novel Coronavirus, or COVID-19, is being manufactured in Pakistan for export to China. The articles identify the cure as Chloroquine Phosphate, a drug previously used to treat Malaria. Citing an earlier news report from China Economic Net, it was reported that more than 300,000 tablets of Chloroquine Phosphate were exported by Bayer International from one of its subsidiaries in Pakistan after receiving a request from the Guangdong provincial government.  The oldest news report featuring the claim in the Pakistani media was published on 20 February 2020 by Express Tribune. The article originally appeared in the aforementioned China Economic Net story, the source for most of these reports. This article itself references another China Economic Net news story from 20 February 2020, with the headline “Pakistan has effective drug for COVID-19, Over 300,000 pieces exported to China”. However, searches for keywords included in the headline of this article on popular search engines and the internal website search tool do not yield any results. The oldest mention of the 300,000 pieces being exported to China is from a 20 February story on Schine.cn, referencing the the drug trials being conducted on Chloroquines effectiveness for treating COVID-19 in Beijing and Guangdong as the reason why the Guangdong provincial government is importing these drugs, which was left out of the later China Economic Net story and subsequent stories in the Pakistani media. It was reported on 15 February 2020 that Zhang Xinmin, director of the China National Centre for Biotechnology Development under the Ministry of Science and Technology said Chinese researchers have narrowed their attention to a few existing drugs including Chloroquine Phosphate after multiple rounds of screening. Dr. Janet Diaz, lead for clinical case management in the WHO Health Emergencies program, said on 20 February 2020 that [although] some scientists had claimed that anti-malaria drug Chloroquine could be a potential treatment for the new virus, but currently, there is “no proof” that it is effective,  China’s national news service confirmed on 22 February that Chloroquine Phosphate had been used to treat only 135 cases in Beijing and Guangdong province. To understand the story better, Soch spoke to Dr Faisal Mahmood, associate professor infectious diseases at the Aga Khan University Hospital in Karachi.  He said, “In the lab, in a test tube, chloroquine is able to inhibit growth of some viruses including the new SARS CoV-2 virus. However just because a drug works in a test tube does not mean that it will lead to patients getting better faster. The amount of the medication that you need to kill the virus may be higher than the toxic dose of the drug or the drug may not even be able to physically get to where it needs to.” When asked if it is accurate to call this medicine a cure, Dr Mahmood said, “While the first step in finding medications is to test it in the lab, perhaps the more important part of this process is to see if patients who are given the medications actually get better compared to those who did not get the medicine (also called a drug trial). To this effect drug trials are underway in China to examine the effect of chloroquine on patients infected with the virus. However to date these have not been published and therefore it is too early to say if this indeed will work. It is a promising approach but too premature to tout it as a cure.” Chloroquine Phosphate has also been hailed as a wonder drug in misleading viral stories across the world, including one claiming it cured more than 12 thousand people of the virus in China. This demonstrates the propensity for scientific research to be sensationalized into misleading and harmful news coverage, highlighting the importance of fact checking scientific claims in the media. COVID-19, is a respiratory virus first identified in Wuhan, Hubei Province, China. According to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the World Health Organization, common symptoms of the disease are coughing, fever and breathing difficulties.  Summary: Some researchers believe Chloroquine Phosphate may be useful in treating COVID-19. It has been reported that trials are underway in China, for which the drug is being imported from Pakistan. Experts at the World Health Organization have clarified that there is not enough evidence for it to be considered an effective treatment yet. It is misleading to refer to the drug as a “cure.” ,
https://www.sochfactcheck.com/garlic-water-has-its-benefits-curing-coronavirus-is-not-one-of-them/,Claim: 2019 Novel Coronavirus can be cured by consuming a bowl of freshly boiled garlic water. Fact: There is no evidence to support this claim. Verdict: Mostly False The World Health Organisation (WHO) has declared the outbreak of the 2019 Novel Coronavirus a global emergency. As of January 3, 2020, at least 304 people have died from the virus that has infected over 14,500 people worldwide.  Since the past week, a message has been making rounds on Whatsapp, claiming boiled garlic water can cure people infected by the virus.  The message reads “Good news, Wuhan’s corona virus can be cured by one bowl of freshly boiled garlic water.Old Chinese doctor has proven it’s efficacy. Many patients has also proven this to be effective. Eight (8) cloves of chopped garlic add seven (7)cups of water and bring to boil., Eat and drink the boiled garlic water, overnight improvement and healing. Glad to share this.” Soch also searched the keywords “garlic coronavius” in Tweet Binder and found that this piece of misinformation spread on Twitter at a rapid rate in the last seven days.  Dr Osama Khalid, an infectious diseases specialist at Ziauddin University, told Soch there is no evidence to support this rumour. “If garlic water was so effective, the Chinese authorities would be promoting it. I have not seen anything from the Chinese government that is promoting this,” he said. “As a general rule, you would tell anyone who has a viral infection to drink/have warm liquids like tea or soup because it would make them feel better. But that doesn’t bring down the actual infection,” he elaborated. Moreover, the official WHO Western Pacific account posted a tweet earlier today clearly stating that there is no evidence to back this claim.  This particular piece of misinformation has made its way around the globe and fact checkers from India, Indonesia and Taiwan debunked the claim after it went viral in their respective countries. It is interesting to note that the message being circulated in Pakistan is a word-for-word copy of the messages circulated in the aforementioned countries, highlighting how easily misinformation – especially health related misinformation – can cross borders.  Summary: There is no evidence to support the claim that freshly boiled garlic water can cure the 2019 Novel Coronavirus. ,
https://factcheck.afp.com/video-shares-false-claim-pfizer-biontech-covid-19-vaccine-contains-nanotechnology,The video was shared on Facebook by an Australian-based user here on November 28. The man narrating the video shows a purported list of ingredients for the Pfizer-BioNTech COVID-19 vaccine. He then focuses on a yellow tag which reads; “Lipid nanoparticles that carry and protect the mRNA from degradation”. The narrator then says: “We know people have been talking about nanotechnology and being injected with nanotechnology. Well there it is, you have to say that is what’s happening, nanotechnology is made of nanoparticles.”  The narrator then suggests Bill Gates could be involved in creating the technology, echoing long-running Covid-19 conspiracy theories. “We don’t know what's in those particles, but they are so f***in nano that just about you could definitely have little computers in there,” the narrator claims. Nanotechnology is the manipulation or creation of materials and devices at the atomic scale. Nanoparticles are microscopic particles that measure less than 100 nanometres. Nano refers to a unit of size on the nanoscale, which is measured in billionths of the metre.  The video has also been viewed thousands of times in multiple Facebook posts here, here and here alongside similar claims. The claims in the video, however, are misleading.  Griffith University professor of infectious diseases, Nigel McMillan, told AFP in an email that “no such technology exists at this time” that would allow robots or computers to be encased in the lipid nanoparticles found in the new Pfizer/BioNTech vaccine.  The Pfizer/BioNTech COVID-19 vaccine is an mRNA vaccine, which sends instructions to our cells to create a section of the spike protein found on the surface of the COVID-19 virus, according to the CDC. “Our immune systems recognize that the protein doesn’t belong there and begins building an immune response and making antibodies,” the CDC adds.  Professor McMillan said the lipid nanoparticles found in the Covid-19 mRNA vaccine are a form of protection for the mRNA vaccine as they enter cells. “They [the lipid nanoparticles] are made of fats that either naturally occur in your body (eg think cholesterol) or are derived from plants (think margarine),” he said in a December 8 email.  Canadian biotechnology company Acuitas Therapeutics developed the lipid nanoparticles in the Pfizer/BioNTech Covid-19 vaccine and described the process here, explaining: “In simple terms, it takes the mRNA safely through the body and delivers it into our cells, placing it exactly where it needs to be,” the company said.  Conspiracy theories about Bill Gates and false suggestions that he plans to use the Covid-19 vaccine to microchip people have been circulating online throughout the pandemic. The Bill Gates Foundations told AFP in June the claims were false. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/retired-italian-doctors-false-claims-about-covid-19-tests-and-vaccines-circulate-globally-online,The video was published in this Facebook post on August 28, 2020. The six-minute video features statements from a man wearing a white coat who is identified as “Dr. Roberto Petrella”.  In the recording, he claims that Covid-19 is a “mass extermination program” aimed at “depopulating more than 80%” of the population. He also warns against vaccinating against the disease, stating that it will infect people and eventually kill them.  The video was also shared in Facebook posts here, here, here, here, here, here and here. The video has also circulated in Spanish, Serbian, Polish, Dutch, Arabic, Malaysian and Indonesian.  Petrella is a retired gynecologist, known for his opposition to Human Papillomavirus (HPV) vaccines, according to Italian news media reports here and here. AFP found that multiple claims made in the video are false.  At the beginning of the video, Petrella claims that Covid-19 means “vaccination identification certificate with artificial intelligence” and that number 19 “is the year it was created”. He also claims that Covid-19 is a “mass extermination program” and that “it is not the name of the virus, it is rather the name of the international plan to control and reduce populations”.  The World Health Organization dubbed the disease caused by SARS-CoV-2 virus, a novel strain of coronavirus, “Covid-19”. The name combines corona (Co), virus (vi), disease (d), and the year it emerged (2019). WHO director general Tedros Adhanom Ghebreyesus made the announcement about the name of the virus on February 12, 2020. It can be seen here. Different false conspiracy theories about “international control plans” “for population reduction” have circulated on social media since the outbreak of the coronavirus pandemic. Both “plans” are often attributed to businessman and philanthropist Bill Gates.  A spokesperson for the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation told AFP that the claims about control by implanting a microchip are false. Petrella claims the vaccination will leave everyone  “seriously ill, weakened” and will eventually kill them. He also claims the virus is reactivated by “the immune ground in which it finds itself” and that “what they intend to inject inside of us is going to be the most terrible vaccines of all”. Dr Vanessa Bryant, immunologist at Walter and Eliza Hall Institute of Medical Research in Australia, told AFP by email on December 2, 2020, that although there were concerns during the development of the Covid-19 vaccine that it could potentially trigger a harmful immune response called an antibody-mediated enhancement, trials have not shown that is the case.  “This was a theoretical concern early on in vaccine development but given the significant numbers of people who have participated in vaccine trials for COVID-19 around the world (more than 100,000 people), it hasn’t proven to be an issue. Antibody mediated enhancement is extremely rare and there is no evidence of this in any models of disease or SARS-CoV-2 vaccine clinical trials,” Dr Bryant said.  “The tests are not reliable and none can accurately detect the SARS-CoV-2 virus,” Petrella said. The gold-standard and most commonly used Covid-19 test in Australia is the PCR (Polymerase Chain Reaction) test, which is performed using a nasal swab.  PCR tests “detect the genetic material of SARS-CoV-2 to determine whether a person is currently infected. The Chinese authorities provided the complete genomic sequence of the virus in early January, which allowed many laboratories to develop PCR tests that are now used to detect cases around the world,”  WHO said in June 2020. According to Dr Bryant, the PCR test is sensitive and accurate. “PCR testing tests for small fragments of viral genetic material and is sensitive enough to detect low levels of virus prior to symptom onset and may still be detected after a person has stopped being infectious".  "There are also rapid antigen tests that are becoming available across the world (not currently available in Australia), which test actively replicating virus at the time of the test. Rapid tests are not quite as sensitive as the PCR tests because they test for protein fragments of the virus, not genetic material but are still useful, particularly for worker surveillance and in populations where you need to test people frequently (ie. for frontline healthcare workers)," Dr Bryant added.  Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://fullfact.org/health/coronavirus/#coronavirus,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does Our fact checkers are fighting to protect people from bad information about Covid-19. There’s a lot of misinformation about Covid-19, so Full Fact is sharing its top tips on how to check if a claim is true. 
            Read more…
           The vaccine causes an immune response to a spike protein, but this almost certainly won’t make the body attack the placenta. Several candidate vaccines use this technology. Posts on social media have overestimated the Covid recovery rate. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Vaccine misinformation is dangerous and threatens to prolong the pandemic. Stay informed with our latest fact checks. This is based on official data that warns against drawing comparisons in this way. The rate actually fell slightly, according to official data. These remain available in the country. There is more than one “coronavirus” and they’ve existed for years. There’s no evidence anybody manufactured it deliberately, and it has nothing to do with 5G. Multiple social media posts falsely report actress Betty White had her third Covid vaccine three days before she died. It has now been sequenced over a million times in the UK. A Facebook post implies the risk of developing a blood clot or heart problem from a Covid-19 vaccine outweighs the benefits. The key symptoms are usually a high temperature and a new, continuous cough. Other symptoms like a runny nose don’t rule it out. Research linking climate change to strokes, dementia and migraines is not a cover up for Covid-19 vaccine harms, as Instagram user claims. Surveys on the prevalence of long Covid did not measure the difference between groups of people based on when they caught Covid in the first place, nor necessarily based on when they experienced long The Washington Post claimed at least 50% of people who survive Covid-19 have debilitating health issues in the months afterwards. Official estimates are far lower. There’s no evidence that water or high temperatures will prevent infection, though some are good for your health in general. Washing your hands with soap is best. The substance was used as a tool to study a sample during the vaccine’s development. It is not an ingredient in the vaccine itself. Virtually all the most vulnerable people are vaccinated against Covid, so most of the people who die of it are too. A video showing people collapsing claims to show deaths due to 5G activating ingredients injected into them. There’s currently no proven cure for the virus and you should be wary of methods professing to cure it like hot drinks or gargling salt water. This claim comes from an activist who supplied no supporting evidence. It is contradicted by data on deaths published by the New Zealand government. Social media posts claiming egg yolks could be a key in fighting Covid-19 infections misinterpret the research and falsely link it to egg shortages. A page of the National Institutes of Health website says that ivermectin is not recommended, and does not work, as a treatment for Covid-19. Use sources like NHS England and the ONS for figures on deaths and testing, but be aware they’re not always up-to-date and may not cover all cases so far. This is based on official data that warns against drawing comparisons in this way. Pandemic deaths in the UK were indeed among the worst in western Europe as the Inquiry had heard—but also about in the middle, by the standards of Europe as a whole, as Mr Johnson said. Rishi Sunak claimed A&E waiting times are at their best in two years. But experts say this is hard to reconcile with public data, which shows that June 2023 was not the best month in the last 24. If you’re not sure, don’t share. Many posts falsely claim to be from the government or NHS, and you can reverse-search photos online to check they’re accurate. A video of a man talking to a pharmacist about myocarditis has resurfaced on social media. Claims in the video about the mortality rate of the condition are incorrect. This claim comes from an activist who supplied no supporting evidence. It is contradicted by data on deaths published by the New Zealand government. Tests with two different wells for samples that can detect three different infections do not prove the infections are the same. We've asked readers to send in their questions about Covid-19, to help sort the good information from the bad. Check out our answers here. Readers have asked us what the guidance says on going into work while pregnant, and what employers need to do to ensure safety. A 2020 court case, known as Bell vs Tavistock, doesn’t mean it’s illegal to vaccinate teenagers without parental consent or a court order A website article misleadingly claims the Covid-19 vaccine drive has “overwhelmed” the NHS. It’s vital that everyone receives clear, factual information about Covid-19. We are working to correct misinformation about the virus. This is based on official data that warns against drawing comparisons in this way. The rate actually fell slightly, according to official data. These remain available in the country. We are grateful to all our donors for supporting us to tackle dangerously false claims during this global crisis. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/jul/30/michael-schraa/wisconsin-gop-lawmaker-misleads-claim-masks-are-in/,Error fetching data,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/jul/31/facebook-posts/no-cdc-who-study-does-not-prove-masks-do-not-preve/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 
A man wearing mask to protect against the spread of COVID-19 is reflected next to a sign requiring face coverings at a business in San Antonio on June 24, 2020. (AP)
 The study was done on influenza, which spreads in ways similar to COVID-19, but it makes no mention of COVID-19. The study was published by the CDC and supported by WHO, but it was done by the University of Hong Kong. One of the study’s authors told us the claim is incorrect. As Americans argue over whether face coverings stop the spread of COVID-19, a video shared on Facebook makes a stark claim about masks and viruses generally. A 2020 study from the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the World Health Organization, the video declares, "proves face masks do not prevent the spread of a virus."  The video was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.) One of the study’s authors, University of Hong Kong public health professor Ben Cowling, told PolitiFact that the claim amounts to an "incorrect interpretation" of the study, "confusing absence of evidence with evidence of absence." Virologist Angela Rasmussen, a research scientist at Columbia University, said of the study cited in the video: "The bottom line is that this paper doesn’t prove that face masks don’t prevent transmission, but that the available data didn’t show a statistically significant effect. "The available data is incomplete and more studies need to be done to better understand whether masks are effective at reducing community transmission or not. That is why I continue to wear a mask in public places." As we’ve reported, facial coverings are not in themselves totally effective in fighting the coronavirus, and there is a need for more study. But health officials largely agree that wearing any kind of face mask, coupled with social distancing and frequent hand-washing, is more protective than going unmasked.  The CDC generally recommends wearing masks in public settings where other social distancing measures are difficult to maintain, such as grocery stores, pharmacies, and gas stations.  As the CDC puts it: "Your cloth face covering may protect them. Their cloth face covering may protect you." The 15-minute video was narrated and posted by Ben Swann, who describes himself as a "journalist who speaks truth to power!" Swann, who has 486,000 Facebook followers, runs TruthInMedia.com, which says it provides "content focusing on issues that impact humanity." The video was also shared the same day on YouTube by RT, a news network formerly known as Russia Today that is funded by the Russian Federation. In February 2018, YouTube began labeling state-funded posts and videos promoting conspiracy theories. The step was significant, the Wall Street Journal reported at the time, in part because YouTube has been a major conduit for RT, "which U.S. intelligence officials called ‘the Kremlin’s principal international propaganda outlet.’" The study cited in the video was conducted by researchers at the University of Hong Kong — not by the CDC and WHO, as the video claims — although there are affiliations. First published in February, the study appears in the May edition of Emerging Infectious Diseases, a peer-reviewed journal published by the CDC. The study says it was "conducted in preparation for the development of guidelines by the World Health Organization on the use of nonpharmaceutical interventions for pandemic influenza in nonmedical settings," and was supported by the WHO. The CDC confirmed it did not participate in the study and would not comment on it, but a spokesman cited a separate CDC study published in July. It looked at clients exposed to two hair stylists who were symptomatic with confirmed COVID-19. Among 139 clients who wore face masks while the stylists also wore face masks, there were no symptomatic secondary cases reported. Among 67 clients who tested for COVID-19, all test results were negative. "Adherence to the community’s and company’s face-covering policy likely mitigated spread of COVID-19," the study said. WHO did not provide comment before we published. The study cited in Swann’s video amounts to a review of research on personal protective equipment and influenza spread. It does not mention coronavirus or COVID-19.  After reviewing 10 studies on randomized and controlled trials that were published from 1946 to 2018, the study determined there was "no significant reduction in influenza transmission with the use of face masks." That was regarding masks worn by infected persons or by persons in the general community. "We did not find evidence that surgical-type face masks are effective in reducing laboratory-confirmed influenza transmission, either when worn by infected persons or by persons in the general community to reduce their susceptibility," the researchers wrote. "However, as with hand hygiene, face masks might be able to reduce the transmission of other infections and therefore have value in an influenza pandemic when healthcare resources are stretched." Cowling, one of the study’s authors, told us that because COVID-19 spreads in similar ways as to influenza, the study findings should apply to COVID-19. But University of San Francisco research scientist Jeremy Howard cautioned that influenza and COVID-19 are different diseases, "and we do not know whether evidence from influenza trials are relevant to COVID-19."  The "we did not find evidence" phrase doesn't prove either that masks are effective or ineffective, Howard said. He added that it’s important to note that none of the 10 trials reviewed was done during a pandemic. Rasmussen reiterated that "this was a systematic review of other published studies and it tells us much of what we already know: there’s not a good evidence base for masks outside of a healthcare setting, but there are still many knowledge gaps, especially regarding mechanisms of transmission."  Texas A&M University-Texarkana virologist Ben Neuman said the study reflects the understanding of masks in the early phase of the pandemic, but scientific opinion has shifted because of several important papers published since then. "The kicker is," he added, "just weeks later, a group with the same senior author, plus some coronavirus specialists, produced a paper demonstrating that masks are indeed highly effective in stopping infected people from releasing airborne viruses." The post claims a CDC study proved that masks do not prevent COVID-19. But it wasn’t a CDC study, and it didn’t "prove" that masks were ineffective. Scientists are still studying masks and the prevention of COVID-19. We rate the statement False. 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 Facebook, post (archived here), July 23, 2020 Lead Stories, "Fact Check: New CDC And WHO Study Does NOT Prove 'No Evidence' Face Masks Prevent Virus," July 26, 2020  Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s Emerging Infectious Diseases, "Nonpharmaceutical Measures for Pandemic Influenza in Nonhealthcare Settings—Personal Protective and Environmental Measures," May 2020 YouTube, RT post of video, July 23, 2020 Email, Ben Cowling, professor of public health, University of Hong Kong, July 30, 2020 Email, University of San Francisco research scientist Jeremy Howard, July 29, 2020 Email, virologist Angela Rasmussen, associate research scientist at Columbia University, July 30, 2020 Email, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention spokesman Scott Pauley, July 31, 2020 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, "Absence of Apparent Transmission of SARS-CoV-2 from Two Stylists After Exposure at a Hair Salon with a Universal Face Covering Policy — Springfield, Missouri, May 2020," July 17, 2020 Email, Texas A&M University-Texarkana virologist Ben Neuman, July 30, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://fullfact.org/health/masks-not-harmful/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does Wearing a mask can cause hypercapnia, by making you breathe in too much carbon dioxide. This is not true. Wearing a mask is safe for most people. There may be rare instances of harm involving  tight-fitting N95 or FFP2 masks. We’ve seen posts on Facebook claiming or implying that face masks can be harmful, because they force the wearer to breathe in too much carbon dioxide.  For most masks and face coverings, as we have mentioned before, this is not true. (In rare cases, it might be correct for certain medical respirators, known as N95 masks in the US and FFP2 masks here in the UK.) We’ve written elsewhere about the evidence on whether masks reduce the chance of spreading or contracting Covid-19.  Honesty in public debate matters You can help us take action – and get our regular free email The Facebook posts describe people inhaling too much carbon dioxide (causing a condition called hypercapnia), supposedly as a result of wearing masks. “[The claim that wearing masks can give someone] hypercapnia is malicious misinformation,” says Keith Neal, Emeritus Professor of the Epidemiology of Infectious Diseases at the University of Nottingham. “Surgeons wear masks for hours doing some operations.” Paul Hunter, Professor in Medicine at the University of East Anglia, conducted a review of the evidence on mask-wearing in April. He told Full Fact: “We spent some time looking for evidence of harm.” “There are studies that show, with an N95 mask, some people have an elevated blood carbon dioxide level, and some also reduced oxygen level, so there is an element in truth in that. That does not apply to ordinary surgical masks, and it sure as heck doesn’t apply to other types of face covering.” This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as partly false
            because most masks, such as surgical masks and face coverings, won’t cause hypercapnia, although there’s some evidence that N95 respirators may cause an elevated carbon dioxide level.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://fullfact.org/health/legionnaires-masks/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does A woman was hospitalised with suspected Covid-19, only for her illness to be shown to be Legionnaires’ disease caught from a mask. You cannot catch Legionnaires’ disease from a mask. A Facebook post shared hundreds of times has claimed that a woman who thought she had Covid-19 actually had actually contracted Legionnaires’ disease from her mask. The post reads: “Mask wearers beware... Worth checking it out. A caller to a radio talk show recently shared that his wife was hospitalized and told she had COVID and only a couple of days left to live. A doctor friend suggested she be tested for legionnaires disease because she wore the same mask every day all day long. Turns out it WAS legionnaires disease from the moisture and bacteria in her mask. She was given antibiotics and within two days was better. WHAT IF these "spikes" in COVID are really something else due to mask wearing??” This is incorrect. You cannot catch Legionnaires’ disease from wearing a mask. A US non-profit, Legionella, that raises awareness about the disease says, “You cannot contract Legionnaires' disease from wearing face masks. Legionella bacteria is transmitted by aspirating drinking water or breathing in water droplets. Legionella is not spread from person-to-person in respiratory droplets nor does the bacteria survive on dry surfaces. Your mask would not be a source of transmission for the Legionella bacteria.” What is true is that Legionnaires’ disease and Covid-19 have some similar symptoms—high temperature and coughing. So it could be possible for one to be confused for the other, but Legionnaires’ disease is relatively uncommon and someone could not catch it from wearing a mask or face covering. This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as false
            because Legionnaires’ disease cannot be caught from masks.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/aug/18/facebook-posts/facebook-posts-labels-months-old-image-mask-policy/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 The photo is outdated. The giveaway is the Nasdaq composite index listed in the bottom right-hand corner. The Nasdaq hasn’t sat at 9,415.23 since mid-June; the post claims the photo was taken in mid-August. The quote depicted in the image is from at least as early of March, a Google search shows. The World Health Organization currently says governments should encourage the general public to wear a fabric mask if "there is widespread community transmission, and especially in settings where physical distancing cannot be maintained." People are using an old photo of a Fox News graphic to spread new misinformation about mask policies amid the coronavirus pandemic. "As of the last 24 hours this is the protocol regarding masks — BAM spread the word!," the post shared Aug. 14 says. The post points down to an image of a Fox News television graphic that reads:  "Masks should only be used by healthcare workers, caretakers or by people who are sick with symptoms like fever and cough." The post, which has been shared more than 10,000 times, was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.)  There’s nothing about this post that happened in the last 24 hours, other than people spreading it as misinformation. The quote is from at least as early as March, according to Fox News. And the image is likely from late May or early June. The Fox News graphic includes the composite index of the Nasdaq Stock Market in the bottom right corner. The index measured 9,415.23 at the time the photo was taken. The Nasdaq has stayed above 10,000 since July 1, according to Marketwatch. It hasn’t been at 9,415 since mid-June. The text on the graphic tracks with a Fox News story published online May 28, which said that the World Health Organization was only recommending healthy people wear masks in cases where they were in contact with someone infected with COVID-19. The story includes the same quote referenced in the image.  "If you do not have any respiratory symptoms such as fever, cough or runny nose, you do not need to wear a mask," Dr. April Baller, a public health specialist for the WHO, says in a video on the world health body's website posted in March. "Masks should only be used by health care workers, caretakers or by people who are sick with symptoms of fever and cough." The post we’re checking doesn’t claim WHO said not to wear a mask in March or April or May. It made the claim that the guidance happened in the last 24 hours — meaning the middle of August. A search of the World Health Organization website shows that’s not the case. In an FAQ, the international health organization says it recommends that people always consult local authorities on recommended practices in their area. "If there is widespread community transmission, and especially in settings where physical distancing cannot be maintained, governments should encourage the general public to wear a fabric mask. WHO also provides details on the composition of a fabric mask and how to safely wear one," WHO writes. A post says, "As of the last 24 hours this is the protocol regarding masks: Masks should only be used by healthcare workers, caretakers or by people who are sick with symptoms like fever and cough." The post was shared Aug. 14, and has more than 10,000 shares on Facebook. But the details in the image are months old, and the instructions are outdated.  WHO says governments should encourage the use of masks in places where there social distancing isn’t possible or where there is widespread community transmission. We rate this claim False.  

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 Fox News, "WHO guidance: Healthy people should wear masks only when 'taking care of' coronavirus patients," May 28, 2020 Marketwatch, NASDAQ composite index WHO, FAQ on mask policies, access Aug. 18, 2020 Facebook post, Aug. 14, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://www.factcheck.org/2020/08/asthma-medicine-not-proven-as-covid-19-cure/, By Angelo Fichera Posted on August 4, 2020 | Updated on February 10, 2021 A viral headline on Facebook claims that a vaccine isn’t “Needed” for COVID-19 because “There Is Already A Cure.” But the supposed “cure” is an asthma medication, touted by a Texas doctor, that has not yet been proven in clinical trials as an effective treatment for COVID-19 — though researchers are exploring its efficacy.  In a video interview shared on social media in early July, a Texas doctor promised a “silver bullet” and “cure” for COVID-19. The answer, Dr. Richard Bartlett claimed, is an existing asthma medicine — inhaled budesonide, a corticosteroid — whose success, he suggests, negates the need for a vaccine. The video has racked up 4 million views on YouTube and its claims have migrated elsewhere. A headline shared on Facebook nearly 40,000 times, for example, claims that “COVID-19 No Vaccine Needed, There Is Already A Cure.” But experts say the medication has not yet been proven as an effective treatment for COVID-19 and, even if helpful, wouldn’t dismiss the need for a vaccine for the novel coronavirus that causes the disease — which would help to prevent people from becoming sick in the first place. The World Health Organization also notes that there is “currently no licensed medication to cure COVID-19.” Bartlett, a general practice doctor who initiated a short-lived run for Congress as a Republican in 2019, said in his interview on the conservative talk show “America Can We Talk?” that he uses a nebulizer machine to administer the budesonide. He said he also uses zinc and clarithromycin, an antibiotic. “My silver bullet is inhaled budesonide,” he said. “It works. One hundred percent of my patients are alive.” He said that patients “tell me, ‘I feel better during the first treatment,’ and so their chest pain goes away, their shortness of breath goes away, their fever breaks.” In describing the success of one patient, he refers to the treatment as a “cure.” Mona Bafadhel, associate professor of respiratory medicine at the University of Oxford, told us in an email that “there is NO evidence to suggest that inhaled budesonide or any inhaled steroids (ICS) is a cure for COVID.” (Emphasis is hers.) Bafadhel is currently conducting a randomized controlled clinical trial to examine the use of inhaled budesonide to treat patients with early COVID-19 infection. “If ICS were proven to be successful, as a treatment, this would NOT mean we don’t need a vaccine,” she said. (Update, Feb. 10, 2021: Unpublished results from Bafadhel’s study, posted to the preprint server medRxiv, suggest that giving inhaled budesonide soon after developing symptoms can reduce the need for urgent care or hospitalization and shorten recovery time.) Dr. Mitchell Grayson, a professor of pediatrics and chief of the Division of Allergy and Immunology at the Nationwide Children’s Hospital at Ohio State University College of Medicine, also said in a phone interview that “the jury is out” on whether inhaled corticosteroids will help with treatment of COVID-19. Grayson briefly evaluated the dearth of evidence available on the issue for the American Academy of Allergy, Asthma & Immunology. “I don’t see any strong signals that would make me think that inhaled steroids are going to be remarkably better,” he said, but a clinical trial is the only way to know more definitively. Grayson said one possibility is that the steroid could help temper the immune system’s overreaction to the disease, since that overreaction can lead people to getting seriously ill. Bartlett recently started a website, “covidsilverbullet.com,” where he has published a case study of inhaled budesonide that involves two patients treated via telemedicine. The patients — a 63-year-old woman and 38-year-old man — both are reported to have preexisting conditions and use other medications, too. “It’s very hard to make any kinds of heads or tails out of” the case study, Grayson said. A large, randomized clinical trial in the U.K. by the RECOVERY group found that 22.9% of COVID-19 patients allocated dexamethasone — another steroid — by mouth or intravenously died within 28 days, as opposed to 25.7% of patients allocated usual care. It was most effective among patients receiving invasive mechanical ventilation. The study only looked at hospitalized patients and did not look at inhaled steroids. It also did not find a benefit for those not receiving respiratory support. In a July 30 commentary for The Lancet Respiratory Medicine, Bafadhel and Dan Nicolau, a physician and mathematician at Queensland University of Technology in Australia, lay out the hypothesis that inhaled corticosteroids “could be a therapeutic intervention for COVID-19 for several reasons.” “We would propose that ICS could have a dual role: first, reducing the inflammatory [acute respiratory distress syndrome-like] response affecting a minority of patients with COVID-19; and second, directly inhibiting viral replication,” they note. They later add: “Whether use of ICS protects against COVID-19 is still unknown, but to dismiss this hypothesis as nonsense is premature.” In addition to Bafadehl’s study, there are several other clinical trials also exploring inhaled corticosteroids and COVID-19. But in the viral video, Bartlett dubiously suggests the medication is already being used so widely as to keep COVID-19 fatalities low in Taiwan, Japan, Singapore and Iceland. “They’re doing what I’m doing … an inhaled steroid,” he claims. The WHO, in a statement provided to FactCheck.org, said “there is no evidence suggesting that inhaled corticosteroid have reduced case fatality rate in Taiwan, Japan, Singapore, and Iceland.” Taiwan, with a population of nearly 24 million, has reported only 475 COVID-19 cases and seven deaths — but it’s not because of an inhaled steroid, said Tsung-Mei Cheng, a health policy research analyst at Princeton University who has written about Taiwan’s health care system and closely follows the country’s COVID-19 response. Cheng said in a phone interview that she had “never” heard of such a treatment being responsible for low fatalities. Instead, she said the country prepared itself for such a crisis in the aftermath of the SARS outbreak in the early 2000s. She said the country’s leadership (including a central command system), a national policy, and “very, very strict, effective quarantine and contact tracing” protocols helped to prevent the disease from spreading within the country. The WHO statement also said that “[t]here is limited information on possible effect of inhaled steroids and there is no evidence there is any advantage to use this route of administration to improve patient outcomes.” (Emphasis is theirs.) “Available evidence from randomized clinical trials such as RECOVERY suggest that systemic corticosteroids” — meaning, taken orally or through a shot — “provide benefits in reducing mortality in severe and critically ill patients requiring respiratory support,” it noted. “In addition, data indicate that [there is] no benefit of systemic corticosteroids in patients who did not require supplemental oxygen.” Dr. Amesh Adalja, senior scholar at the Johns Hopkins University Center for Health Security who studies infectious diseases, also said in an email that “[t]here is no definitive evidence to support the use of inhaled corticosteroids like budesonide in the treatment of COVID-19. While there is biological plausibility that such a treatment could have a beneficial role it can only be determined in a proper clinical trial.” Adalja cautioned that “[w]hen it comes to steroid treatments for COVID19 it is important to realize that, as was shown with systemic steroid treatment, there is an appropriate and inappropriate time to administer them.” He also said “inhaled corticosteroids are not benign and have a range of side effects that range from osteoporosis to making one more vulnerable to bacterial pneumonia so I would not advise the use of such treatments for COVID19 outside of a clinical trial or protocol (though those prescribed them for other reasons should continue taking them).” In a subsequent interview, with the conservative outlet One America News Network, Bartlett said that a hospital in Texas south of San Antonio — Frio Regional Hospital — “emptied” its ICU of COVID-19 patients by using inhaled budesonide. The CEO of the hospital, John Hughson, told FactCheck.org in a phone interview that the hospital, which typically has a 25-bed capacity, did use inhaled budesonide on three patients in a room converted into an ICU — and that they improved several days later and were discharged. He said he believes the inhaled budesonide can be effective for some patients and that while some doctors at the hospital use it, others haven’t adopted it. Hughson noted that “it is a very, very small sample size and all those patients were on high-flow oxygen.” “It’s up to the physician’s discretion and their medical judgment … if they initiate the therapy at all,” he said. “I would also say that’s not the only treatment we use.” “I wouldn’t say this is indicated for every patient, it is not the magic cure for everything, and it is not going to keep everyone from getting the disease,” he added. On that point, Bartlett also suggested — in his earlier interview — that a vaccine isn’t needed if inhaled budesonide is being widely used. For example, after advancing the baseless claim about Taiwan’s wide adoption of the steroid, he says: “Taiwan, 24 million people, they don’t need to wait for a vaccine — they don’t have a problem that you should vaccinate 24 million people for.” Adalja, however, said that “no treatment will obviate the need for a vaccine — a vaccine is the only way to remove this virus as a threat to human health.” And Cheng, who said she has spoken recently with both Taiwan’s former health minister and the current health minister, dismissed the suggestion that the country isn’t in need of a vaccine. She said Taiwan is putting many resources into vaccine development and negotiating with vaccine manufacturers to ensure that, when one is ready, the country can procure enough doses to begin with protecting health care workers — followed by the rest of the population. Editor’s note: FactCheck.org is one of several organizations working with Facebook to debunk misinformation shared on social media. Our previous stories can be found here. Adalja, Amesh. Senior scholar, Johns Hopkins University Center for Health Security. Email to FactCheck.org. 29 Jul 2020. Barnes, Peter. Professor of medicine, National Heart and Lung Institute in London. Email to FactCheck.org. 28 Jul 2020. Bafadhel, Mona. Associate professor of respiratory medicine, University of Oxford. Email to FactCheck.org. 29 Jul 2020. Bafadhel, Mona and Dan V. Nicolau.“Inhaled corticosteroids in virus pandemics: a treatment for COVID-19?” The Lancet Respiratory Medicine. 30 Jul 2020. “Budesonide and COVID-19.” American Academy of Allergy, Asthma & Immunology. 19 Jul 2020. “Budesonide (Inhalation Route).” Mayo Clinic. 1 Jul 2020. Cheng, Tsung-Mei. Health policy research analyst, Princeton University. Phone interview with FactCheck.org. 4 Aug 2020.  “COVID-19 Dashboard.” Center for Systems Science and Engineering, Johns Hopkins University. Accessed 3 Aug 2020. Edgin, Alana. “Odessa man drops from Congressional run due to other ‘like-minded’ candidate.” GoSanAngelo.com. 27 Sep 2019. Grayson, Mitchell. Professor of pediatrics and chief of the division of allergy and immunology, Nationwide Children’s Hospital at Ohio State University College of Medicine. Phone interview with FactCheck.org. 30 Jul 2020. Hughson, John. CEO, Frio Regional Hospital. Phone interview with FactCheck.org. 4 Aug 2020. “Mythbusters.” World Health Organization. Accessed 3 Aug 2020. RECOVERY Collaborative Group. “Dexamethasone in Hospitalized Patients with Covid-19 — Preliminary Report.” New England Journal of Medicine. 17 Jul 2020. World Health Organization. Email statement to FactCheck.org. 31 Jul 2020. Q: Is one day isolation sufficient to stop forward transmission of COVID-19?  A: People with COVID-19 could potentially transmit it to others well beyond a day after developing symptoms or testing positive. New guidance from the CDC advises people to isolate until they have been fever-free and with symptoms improving for at least 24 hours, and then take precautions for five days, which covers the period when “most people are still infectious.”,
https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/fauci-quote-hydroxychloroquine/,About this rating   In July 2020, social media users posted a meme that included a screenshot of an article excerpt that allegedly demonstrated hydroxychloroquine would be an effective "cure and vaccine" against COVID-19.  The claim stems from an opinion piece by Bryan Fischer, former director of the American Family Association, that interpreted a 2005 study on the utility of chloroquine to treat SARS as being relevant to COVID-19 — a disease that did not exist at the time of that paper's publication. SARS (aka SARS-CoV, which caused epidemics in the early 2000s) and COVID-19 (aka SARS-CoV-2) are both caused by coronaviruses, but that does not mean that both could be treated with the same medication.  Similarly, hydroxychloroquine and chloroquine are related drugs, but that does not mean they are interchangeable. Finally, the excerpted study was limited in scope and based on laboratory results. Fischer attempted to tie Dr. Anthony Fauci to the 2005 study by falsely alleging that it was published in a journal run by the U.S. agency Fauci heads.  Are SARS and COVID-19 the same? No. While SARS and COVID-19 are both coronaviruses, that does not mean these two diseases are interchangeable, nor that they can be treated with identical medicines. Hundreds of coronaviruses exist, most of which circulate among animals. These viruses occasionally jump to humans and cause diseases that range in severity. The common cold, for instance, which isn't particularly known for being lethal, can be caused by a coronavirus. On the other hand, COVID-19, which has caused more than 150,000 deaths in the United States (and close to 700,000 total deaths worldwide) as of this writing, is also caused by a coronavirus. Nobody would argue that a treatment for the common cold would be equally effective against COVID-19.   Fischer attempts to dismiss the fact that SARS and COVID-19 are two distinct diseases by arguing that they share a similar scientific name (SARS-CoV-1 and SARS-CoV-2) and 79% of the same genome. Saying that these two diseases share 79% of their genome sequence may make it sound like these diseases are nearly identical, but consider this: Humans share 98% of our genome with chimpanzees.  Are hydroxycloroquine and chloroquine the same thing? No. Although these drugs are similar (they are both derivatives of a 4-aminoquinoline [4AQ] nucleus), they aren't interchangeable. Chloroquine is primarily used to treat malaria, while hydroxychloroquine, which is considered less toxic than chloroquine, is used to treat rheumatoid arthritis, lupus, and certain blood disorders.  CNN writes: Chloroquine is used to treat malaria, as well as in chemoprophylaxis, which is the administering of drugs to prevent the development of disease, according to the US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. Since 2006, it has not been recommended for use in severe malaria because of problems with resistance, particularly in the Oceania region, according to the World Health Organization. [...] Hydroxychloroquine is what's known as an analog of chloroquine, meaning the two have similar structures but different chemical and biological properties. The former is considered the less toxic derivative, according to studies.
It's given to patients with rheumatoid arthritis, lupus and the blood disorder porphyria cutanea tarda, the CDC said. Did this study prove that chloroquine was an effective treatment against SARS? No. The 2005 article published in Virology Journal was based on a laboratory cell-culture experiment that used primate cells, not human cells. The authors noted at the time that more testing was needed before antivirals could be developed to treat the disease in humans: Chloroquine has been widely used to treat human diseases, such as malaria, amoebiosis, HIV, and autoimmune diseases, without significant detrimental side effects [15]. Together with data presented here, showing virus inhibition in cell culture by chloroquine doses compatible with patient treatment, these features suggest that further evaluation of chloroquine in animal models of SARS-CoV infection would be warranted as we progress toward finding effective antivirals for prevention or treatment of the disease. It should also be noted that this was an in vitro study, meaning that it was conducted in a controlled environment, like a test tube, not inside a living organism. The Universal Health Network, a medical research organization in Toronto, Ontario, Canada, noted that in vitro models have a reputation of being "less translatable" to humans than other research methods: A major drawback is their failure to capture the inherent complexity of organ systems. For example, in vitro models may not account for interactions between cells and biochemical processes that occur during turnover and metabolism. As a result, in vitro studies have developed a reputation for being “less translatable” to humans. More importantly, in the years since the SARS outbreak in 2002, chloroquine has not been widely used to treat the disease.  Did this study say that hydroxychloroquine was an effective treatment against SARS? No.  The 2005 paper in the Virology Journal never mentions hydroxychloroquine. Was Fauci or the NIH involved in this 2005 paper? No.  As mentioned earlier, the above-displayed screenshot shows an excerpt from an opinion piece written by Fischer, which was published on websites such as One News Now and the conspiratorial True Pundit, a site that traffics in misinformation.  Fischer's article is centered on a 2005 paper published in the Virology Journal entitled "Chloroquine Is a Potent Inhibitor of SARS Coronavirus Infection and Spread." Although this is a genuine article, it was not authored by Fauci. Fischer attempted to connect Fauci to this article by stating that the "Virology Journal [is] the official publication of Dr. Fauci’s National Institutes of Health [NIH]," but that simply isn't true. The Virology Journal is not an official publication of the NIH.  The Virology Journal is published by Biomed Central (BMC), part of the publishing group Springer Nature, an academic publishing company. Some government researchers were involved with this 2005 study (five of the eight listed authors were from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention [CDC], the other three were from Clinical Research Institute of Montreal), but this study did not involve Fauci or anyone else from the NIH. Is hydroxychloroquine an effective treatment for COVID-19? No.  As of this writing, hydroxychloroquine has not been shown to be an effective treatment of COVID-19.  Hydroxychloroquine has been an effective treatment for other diseases, such as malaria, but studies have not found the drug to be useful in the fight against COVID-19. In June 2020, the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) revoked "the emergency use authorization (EUA) to use hydroxychloroquine and chloroquine to treat COVID-19," writing that a large, randomized clinical trial showed that the drug provided "no benefit for decreasing the likelihood of death or speeding recovery." Universal Health Network.   "In vitro vs. In vivo: Is One Better?"
    Retreived 4 August 2020. McLaughlin, Eliott.   "Chloroquine and Hydroxychloroquine: What to Know About the Potential Coronavirus Drugs."
    CNN.   24 March 2020. FDA.   "FDA Cautions Against Use of Hydroxychloroquine or Chloroquine for COVID-19 Outside of the Hospital Setting or a Clinical Trial Due to Risk of Heart Rhythm Problems."
    1 July 2020. Seley-Radtke, Katherine.   "Here's Why Hydroxychloroquine Doesn't Block The Coronavirus in Human Lung Cells."
    Science Alert.   1 August 2020. Duply, Beatrice.   "Chloroquine/SARS Study Doesn’t Prove Hydroxychloroquine Works Against COVID-19."
    Associated Press.   31 July 2020. Niaid.nih.gov.   "Coronaviruses."
    Retrieved 4 August 2020. Silverman, Craig.   "Revealed: Notorious Pro-Trump Misinformation Site True Pundit Is Run By An Ex-Journalist With A Grudge Against The FBI."
    Buzzfeed. &nbs; 27 August 2018. Virology Journal.   "Chloroquine is a Potent Inhibitor of SARS Coronavirus Infection and Spread'"     22 August 2005. True Pundit.   "COVER UP: Fauci Approved Chloroquine, Hydroxychloroquine 15 Years Ago to Cure Coronaviruses; "Nobody Needed to Die.'"
    5 May 2020. Dan Evon is a former writer for Snopes. Company Navigate Sections Account © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc. This material may not be reproduced without permission. Snopes and the Snopes.com logo are registered service marks of Snopes.com,
https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/neck-gaiters-covid-19/,About this rating   As the world continued to grapple with changing restrictions and recommendations surrounding the coronavirus pandemic, rumors persisted into late summer 2020 regarding scientific understanding behind the effectiveness of certain face coverings used to reduce COVID-19 transmission. In August, a number of news publications reported findings from Duke University research and claimed wearing "neck gaiters" — stretchy, thin articles of clothing worn around the neck to sometimes cover the face — can be worse for transmission than foregoing a mask altogether. Our research found this claim to be false and largely misreported by some media outlets. The claim can be traced back to a study published in Science Advances on Aug. 7, 2020. Throughout the course of their research, scientists set out to determine the best methods for testing how to evaluate 14 types of face coverings — not determine which one is the most effective in protecting against transmission. The study was not meant to be a conclusive guide describing which masks to wear, but rather how to test their varied effectiveness. Results regarding the effectiveness of any particular face covering were merely a byproduct of the study.    A simple and cost-effective method for testing the efficacy of certain face coverings is thought to be a crucial element to furthering the understanding of how SARS-CoV-2, the coronavirus responsible for COVID-19, is spread. To that end, the research team turned to optical imaging in order to “highlight stark differences in the effectiveness of different masks and mask alternatives” that may help stop the spread of respiratory droplets, which are known to contain SARS-CoV-2 and can transmit during “regular speech." Furthermore, as of mid-2020, there was still much to be determined about the infection pathways of COVID-19, the route of transmission, how to properly use a mask, and how the virus may be affected by environmental variables. For the proof-of-concept study, which is meant to inform future research, a person wearing a mask stood inside of a dark enclosure and spoke into the direction of a laser beam. Respiratory droplets were visible as they scattered light from the laser beam that a cell phone camera recorded. A simple computer algorithm then counted the droplets. Masks tested included a fitted N95 mask both with and without valves, surgical masks, different variations of polyester or cotton masks, as well as a bandana, and neck fleece, or gaiter. These were then compared against respiratory droplets emitted by a person who wore no face covering. In short, the study findings concluded that the laser-beam method for viewing, recording, and counting respiratory droplets from analyzed face coverings is a quick and easy way to test their effectiveness. But how well each mask worked was not determined —– that would require further, more specific, evaluation, stricter testing mechanisms, and greater control over variables. Now, other scientists can use this same laser-beam method to specifically test for mask effectiveness. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LeEBn4ttZZY&feature=youtu.be A fitted N95 mask was determined to be the most effective, since just .1% of droplets were transmitted. A gaiter, on the other hand, was shown to disperse larger droplets into smaller ones, resulting in a higher droplet count than any other face covering and, indeed, than even foregoing a face mask altogether. “We noticed that speaking through some masks (particularly the neck fleece) seemed to disperse the largest droplets into a multitude of smaller droplets, which explains the apparent increase in droplet count relative to no mask in that case,” wrote the researchers. “Considering that smaller particles are airborne longer than large droplets (larger droplets sink faster), the use of such a mask might be counterproductive.”    Katherine Ellen Foley, a health and science reporter at Quartz, pointed out in a Twitter thread that the research is not without limitations. For starters, test subjects were just talking and not sneezing, coughing, or breathing heavily. Furthermore, the study counted the number of droplets transmitted through each mask — a finding that does not necessarily equate to risk. In all, the research was meant to inform attempts to improve training on proper mask use to determine the safety and efficacy of reusing some masks. “This was just a demonstration — more work is required to investigate variations in masks, speakers, and how people wear them — but it demonstrates that this sort of test could easily be conducted by businesses and others that are providing masks to their employees or patrons,” said study author Martin Fischer, Ph.D., a chemist and physicist and director of the Advanced Light Imaging and Spectroscopy facility, in a Duke University news release. Then there is the argument regarding mask material. The researchers only tested gaiters made from fleece. However, different fabrics or materials — like polyester or cotton — could influence how effective a gaiter is in reducing transmission. Outside experts contended headlines misrepresented the findings by saying that it’s better to wear no mask than a neck gaiter. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention recommends that people wear masks in public settings and when around people outside of their household, citing evidence that masks are effective in reducing the transmission of COVID-19 and spray of droplets when worn over the nose and mouth. “If everyone wore a mask, we could stop up to 99% of these droplets before they reach someone else,” said Duke University physician Eric Westman. “In the absence of a vaccine or antiviral medicine, it’s the one proven way to protect others as well as yourself.” Fischer, Emma et al.   "Low-Cost Measurement of Facemask Efficacy for Filtering Expelled Droplets During Speech."
    Science Advances.   7 Aug 2020.   Chiu, Allyson.   "Wearing a Neck Gaiter May Be Worse Than No Mask At All, Researchers Find."
    The Washington Post.   11 Aug 2020.   McNamara, Audry.   "Some Neck Gaiters May Be Worse Than Not Wearing a Mask At All, Study Shows."
    CBS News.   13 Aug 2020.   Popescu, Saskia.   "Neck Gaiters for COVID-19 Worse Than No Face Covering At All."
    Infection Control Today.   13 Aug 2020.   Lambert, Jonathan.   "4 Reasons You Shouldn’t Trash Your Neck Gaiter Based on the New Mask Study."
    Science News.   13 Aug 2020.   Foley, Katherine.   "Don’t Give Up on Your Buff Just Yet."
    Quartz.   12 Aug 2020.   Madison Dapcevich is a freelance contributor for Snopes. Company Navigate Sections Account © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc. This material may not be reproduced without permission. Snopes and the Snopes.com logo are registered service marks of Snopes.com,
https://www.factcheck.org/2020/08/trump-hahn-mischaracterize-data-on-covid-19-convalescent-plasma/, By Jessica McDonald Posted on August 26, 2020 | Updated on September 3, 2020 In a hyped press briefing the eve of the Republican National Convention, President Donald Trump falsely said that convalescent plasma had been “proven to reduce mortality by 35%,” even though the therapy has not yet been shown to be effective for COVID-19. Food and Drug Administration Commissioner Dr. Stephen Hahn also mischaracterized the data, inaccurately saying that a relative mortality decrease of 35% between those given high- versus low-concentration plasma meant that administering plasma would save 35 out 100 people sickened with COVID-19. That’s not right, and exaggerates the observed effect. The administration’s inaccurate and imprecise summary of the existing data on convalescent plasma occurred in a Sunday night press briefing that Press Secretary Kayleigh McEnany billed as revealing “a major therapeutic breakthrough” for the coronavirus. The press conference was held one day after Trump alleged, baselessly, that the “deep state, or whoever, over at the FDA” was making it hard for companies to test COVID-19 vaccines and therapeutics in an effort to delay results until after the Nov. 3 election. There is no evidence for such a claim.  Convalescent plasma, which dates back to the 1918 influenza pandemic, refers to isolating the liquid portion of blood from patients who have recovered from COVID-19, which may contain antibodies that could help sick patients better fight off the virus. In announcing that the FDA was issuing an emergency use authorization for convalescent plasma to treat COVID-19 — a decision that days before, the New York Times reported had been put on hold after other federal health officials thought the data was too weak — Trump claimed that the therapy had “an incredible rate of success” and that a Mayo Clinic study had “proven” that it worked.  Trump, Aug. 23: We’ve provided $48 million to fund the Mayo Clinic study that tested the efficacy of convalescent plasma for patients with the virus. Through this study, over 100,000 Americans have already enrolled to receive this treatment, and it has proven to reduce mortality by 35%. …The FDA, MIT, Harvard and Mount Sinai hospital have also found convalescent plasma to be a very effective method of fighting this horrible disease. Based on the science and the data, the FDA has made the independent determination that the treatment is safe and very effective. In fact, the FDA did not determine that convalescent plasma is “safe and very effective,” as few randomized controlled trials exist, making its true efficacy unknown. Instead, the agency decided that the totality of the evidence supports the idea that plasma “may be effective in the treatment of hospitalized patients with COVID-19,” and that it is reasonable to think that the potential benefits outweigh the known and potential risks. Those risks include “allergic reactions, transfusion-associated circulatory overload, and transfusion associated lung injury, as well as the potential for transfusion-transmitted infections,” the FDA said in a press release announcing the EUA. The FDA’s clinical memorandum emphasizes that additional research is still needed, writing, “Adequate and well-controlled randomized trials remain necessary for a definitive demonstration of [COVID-19 convalescent plasma] efficacy and to determine the optimal product attributes and appropriate patient populations for its use.”  The memo further explains that there are public results for only two randomized controlled trials of convalescent plasma for COVID-19 — one in Wuhan, China, and another in the Netherlands. Neither identified a statistically significant clinical improvement, although both trials were small and terminated early, and therefore may have missed the opportunity to detect a meaningful clinical benefit. Previously, patients could obtain convalescent plasma through one of three pathways, including the expanded access program, which is what led to the Mayo Clinic study. Holly Fernandez Lynch, a professor of medical ethics at the University of Pennsylvania, told us that with the EUA, hospitalized patients can now receive plasma outside of those programs — “just like any other prescription drug, so long as it is provided within the terms of the EUA.” Initially in the briefing, Hahn was more circumspect in his description of the data on convalescent plasma, saying that agency scientists concluded that “COVID-19 convalescent plasma is safe and shows promising efficacy.” But in explaining the Mayo Clinic results, he neglected to mention that the study, which has not yet been peer-reviewed, was not a randomized controlled trial comparing treatment to a placebo — and that the so-called 35% mortality benefit was in a subset of patients, comparing those who received plasma with a high concentration of antibodies to those who received a low concentration. “In the optimal treatment — the optimal patients … treated with convalescent plasma at the highest titers,” Hahn said, referring to the concentration of antibodies in the plasma, “there was a 35% improvement in survival, which is a significant clinical benefit.” He then proceeded to incorrectly cast the finding as an absolute mortality benefit. “So let me just put this in perspective. Many of you know I was a cancer doctor before I became FDA commissioner, and a 35% improvement in survival is a pretty substantial clinical benefit,” Hahn continued. “What that means is — and if the data continue to pan out — 100 people who are sick with COVID-19, 35 would have been saved because of the administration of plasma.” When pressed by a reporter and asked directly whether he was saying convalescent plasma was a promising treatment or had been shown to be effective, Hahn dodged the question — and let the misleading interpretation of the study stand. “So I would say that a 35 — if you’re one of those 35 out of 100 people who these data suggest or show survive as a result of it,” he said, “this is pretty significant for that person and their family.” As we’ll explain, the 35% figure is a relative number, reflecting how much better patients who were given high titer plasma fared compared with those given low titer plasma. It does not mean that if the results hold that 35 people out of 100 would be saved by plasma. That would be an absolute mortality benefit, or the proportion of patients who avoid death because of the therapy. In this case, the study did not test plasma against a placebo, so it cannot provide that information, although the absolute mortality reduction of giving concentrated plasma rather than low-concentration plasma, at least as reported in the preprint, is just 4.8% — meaning that fewer than five extra patients in 100 would survive as a result. But even more critically, that particular result was drawn from a subset of participants and does not come from a randomized controlled trial, so it’s not definitive — and doesn’t settle the question of whether convalescent plasma is effective for COVID-19. Hahn has since apologized for his flawed description of the Mayo Clinic results. “I have been criticized for remarks I made Sunday night about the benefits of convalescent plasma,” he said in an Aug. 24 tweet. “The criticism is entirely justified.  What I should have said better is that the data show a relative risk reduction not an absolute risk reduction.” And in an Aug. 25 interview on “CBS This Morning,” Hahn said, “I personally could have done a better job and should have done a better job at that press conference explaining what the data show regarding convalescent plasma.” The Mayo Clinic study reports the results of more than 35,000 patients in the U.S.’s Expanded Access Program for convalescent plasma. Rather than assigning people to either receive plasma or not, as would happen in a randomized placebo-controlled trial, the investigators followed the outcomes of patients hospitalized with COVID-19 who were given plasma at nearly 2,000 sites across the country.  To get a sense of whether the treatment worked, researchers then analyzed the data to see whether patients were less likely to die if they received the plasma earlier in their disease course, or, in a subset of patients for whom their plasma was evaluated for antibodies, whether those who got plasma that was rich in antibodies survived better than those who received less concentrated plasma. Overall, the data point to convalescent plasma being beneficial for COVID-19. According to the preprint, 8.7% of patients who received plasma within three days of diagnosis died within seven days, versus 11.9% of those who got it after four days or more. Similarly, the seven-day mortality rate was 8.9% for those who received the most concentrated plasma, compared with 13.7% for those who received the least concentrated plasma. That’s an absolute risk reduction of 4.8% and a 35% reduction in the relative mortality. Still, as a Johns Hopkins University review notes, because of the study design, it’s not possible to tell from this work whether or not convalescent plasma is effective for COVID-19.  “[T]he cause of these differences in mortality may not be due to plasma therapy as the patients treated changed over time – were younger, healthier, less likely to have complications, and more likely to receive remdesivir later in the study – and the titer of antibodies transfused increased and the time to treatment also decreased over time,” the review reads. “This study highlights the need for randomized controlled studies to determine if there is a benefit for convalescent plasma for COVID-19.” Trump and Hahn have emphasized the 35% mortality reduction from the Mayo Clinic study, but it’s worth noting that it’s based on a subset of patients. And it’s not even entirely clear which data produced the statistic. As noted above, there is a 35% crude relative mortality reduction reported in the preprint at seven days for those who received high-concentration plasma versus low-concentration plasma. This number is based on 1,076 patients who received plasma that had been measured for antibody titers and met the cutoff parameters (see table 1). But the preprint also shows a 35% relative decrease in mortality for high versus low concentration plasma at day seven when adjusted for potential confounding factors using a pooled relative risk estimate. That number is based on a total of 1,058 patients, approximately a third of whom were on a ventilator and a fifth of whom had “many” severe risk factors (see figure 3). Previously, however, the FDA told the New York Times that the 35% statistic was based on other data from the Mayo Clinic study that the agency included in its EUA application — specifically a survival graph at 30 days for a subset of fewer than 1,300 patients who were younger than 80, were not on a ventilator and had received plasma within three days (see figure 3 on page 12). Although the 35% is never written anywhere in the EUA application — and cannot be directly calculated because no exact numbers are provided — the Times estimated a 76% survival probability for patients receiving high-concentration plasma and a 63% survival probability for patients receiving low-concentration plasma from the graph, which works out to a 35% relative decrease in mortality. Notably, Dr. Arturo Casadevall of Johns Hopkins University, who was one of the senior authors of the Mayo Clinic study, told the New York Times that he didn’t know where the 35% came from. When we asked the FDA which specific data were used to make the 35% claim, the agency pointed us to Hahn’s “CBS This Morning” interview and promised to provide further information “when it is available.” We will update the story if we hear back. At this point, however, it remains unclear which information was used to generate the administration’s primary talking point. Regardless of the exact source, Hahn’s presentation of a 35% absolute mortality reduction, rather than a relative one, is incorrect.  While this might seem to be a small error, Dr. David Boulware, an infectious disease specialist at the University of Minnesota, told us that it wasn’t. “THIS IS A HUGE MISTAKE which is very basic,” he said in an email. “I want to give Dr. Steve Hahn the benefit of the doubt that he was speaking extemporaneously and flubbed something,” he added, but the difference in this case is “huge.”  Indeed, if it is based on the preprint figure, that would mean Hahn exaggerated the effect of convalescent plasma sevenfold. Boulware said he suspected that compared to no plasma, patients getting convalescent plasma probably are better off — but this remains an unanswered question. So are other critical questions, such as which patients benefit, which is especially important to know in deciding how to allocate a limited supply. The Expanded Access Program, Boulware said, “was meant to be a short term bridge back in April. Yet tens of thousands of patients later, we don’t know what the benefit of plasma is.” As for the EUA, Boulware said it “may” be warranted, but the hype beforehand was not — and that Hahn’s portrayal of a 35% absolute reduction in mortality was “deceptively misleading.” While the administration claims the EUA will expand access of convalescent plasma, Boulware said it changes little other than the paperwork. “Plasma remains a scarce resource,” he said. “We use all the plasma locally that is available.” More worryingly, Boulware thinks the EUA will make completing the necessary clinical trials more difficult to do. “People will want plasma which ‘saves 35% of people’s lives,’” he said, “and not enroll in randomized trials” in which patients may not be assigned to get the treatment.  For his part, Casadevall, a senior author of the Mayo Clinic study, supports the EUA and believes it will help improve COVID-19 health inequities.  “Plasma was already available in well resourced hospitals but understaffed hospitals caring for [underserved] populations struggled with the paperwork under the prior regs,” he said in an Aug. 24 tweet. “EUA makes usage easier.” Dr. Scott Gottlieb, the previous FDA commissioner under Trump, didn’t doubt that the EUA decision was science-based, but echoed the call for randomized controlled trials of convalescent plasma. “Plasma may provide a benefit, and it could be meaningful for certain patients, but we need more evidence to prove it,” he said in a tweet. “The data FDA had supports an authorization for emergency use, where the standard is ‘may be effective’ but we need better studies to confirm preliminary findings.” After reviewing the published and unpublished evidence that underpinned the FDA’s EUA decision, the National Institute of Health’s COVID-19 Treatment Guidelines Panel issued a statement on Sept. 1 emphasizing the lack of available evidence on convalescent plasma. “There are currently no data from well-controlled, adequately powered randomized clinical trials that demonstrate the efficacy and safety of convalescent plasma for the treatment of COVID-19,” the statement reads, adding that the FDA’s analysis of a subset of patients from the Mayo Clinic found no overall benefit in survival at seven days among those given high- versus low-concentration plasma. Rather, an effect was found only in patients who were not intubated, with 11% of patients given high-concentration plasma dying within a week compared with 14% of patients given low-concentration plasma — a 21% decrease in relative mortality. “Although these data suggest that convalescent plasma with high antibody titers may be beneficial in nonintubated patients, uncertainty remains about the efficacy and safety of convalescent plasma due to the lack of a randomized control group and possible confounding,” the statement said. “Additionally, antibody levels in currently available COVID-19 convalescent plasma are highly variable, and assays to determine the effective antibody titers remain limited.” The panel concluded that for now, there are “insufficient data to recommend either for or against the use of convalescent plasma for the treatment of COVID-19.” Update, Aug. 27: We added more information about how the EUA for COVID-19 convalescent plasma changes how patients can access the therapy. Update, Sept. 3: We added the NIH COVID-19 Treatment Guidelines Panel’s statement about the FDA’s EUA for convalescent plasma. Editor’s Note: Please consider a donation to FactCheck.org. We do not accept advertising. We rely on grants and individual donations from people like you. Credit card donations may be made through our “Donate” page. If you prefer to give by check, send to: FactCheck.org, Annenberg Public Policy Center, 202 S. 36th St., Philadelphia, PA 19104. Q: Is one day isolation sufficient to stop forward transmission of COVID-19?  A: People with COVID-19 could potentially transmit it to others well beyond a day after developing symptoms or testing positive. New guidance from the CDC advises people to isolate until they have been fever-free and with symptoms improving for at least 24 hours, and then take precautions for five days, which covers the period when “most people are still infectious.”,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/may/08/south-west-news-service/Evidence-lacking-that-cats-eaten-as-COVID-19-cure/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 Cats are eaten in Vietnam, but there is no evidence of widespread killing and consuming of black cats as a treatment for COVID-19. Cats and dogs have long been a controversial part of the cuisine for some in Vietnam. But a new claim circulating online says that people there are eating black cats as a treatment for COVID-19. Tabloid news sites including the Toronto Sun, the New York Post, the U.S. Sun and Vietnam Insider published stories saying black cats are being "collected, killed and their bodies ground up as a supposed coronavirus treatment." Each of the stories in some way attributed its information to the South West News Service, which describes itself as a "UK- and US-based news and media content agency with a proud 40-year history." These stories and other posts with the same claim were flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.) With fewer than 300 reported cases and zero deaths, Vietnam has been highlighted for its response to COVID-19, which included strict quarantining and intensive testing. Much of the country has reopened, with children returning to school May 4. While Vietnam has grappled with real issues related to animal welfare, experts we spoke to say they haven’t found widespread evidence that black cats are being killed and turned into a paste to treat COVID-19. The news service that generated the story said it has removed the article from circulation amid concerns about its credibility. Here’s what we know. On April 17, The Sun, a tabloid in the United Kingdom and Ireland, published a story that reported on an investigation by an animal rights group called Four Paws. According to the story, the group said it examined dining app data and found that dog and cat meat sales were surging through dining app delivery services in Cambodia and Vietnam. The story surmised that "doctors in the region are encouraging many to eat dog and cat meat, claiming its properties help fight off viruses." A week later, on April 23 and 24, stories credited to the South West News Service were published elsewhere that had a similar storyline, but took the claim further to suggest black cats are being singled out, turned into paste and consumed as medicine.  Pictures credited to South West News Service accompanied some versions of the online stories. But the captions were vague and the images hard to verify. They included, for example, a photo of a baby drinking from a bottle that appears to contain a black substance. "This distressing image shows a baby reportedly being fed the black cat concoction," the caption said. The stories’ only source appeared to be the head of another charity, No to Dog Meat, based in London. We reached out to that group for evidence. They sent us to their YouTube account which includes four videos uploaded in April and May that claim in captions or titles to show cat mistreatment in Vietnam but which included no verifiable information about exactly where or when they were taken. Asked about the black cat claim, Cat Besch, founder and director of Hanoi-based Vietnam Animal Aid & Rescue, told PolitiFact she has seen "zero evidence in Vietnam so far that this is true." Nam Nguyen, an editor in Vietnam with the government-run Vietnam News Agency, told PolitiFact "the rumor has been around these weeks and originated from one post in Thailand social media, but as far as I know, Vietnamese are not so superstitious like other nations in southeast Asia to practice those ancient rites." He said the post has been deleted. Phuong Tham, director of Human Society International in Vietnam, told PolitiFact that black cats are being killed there "by people with lack of knowledge, believing that black cats' bones can treat asthma in children, while others kill them for superstitious beliefs," but "we have seen no evidence that black cats in Vietnam are being killed for COVID-19 treatment." Tham and Dr. Todd Pollack, Harvard University medical professor and country director in Hanoi of the Partnership for Health Advancement in Vietnam, said it is significant that they had not seen the claim reported by news organizations in Vietnam. VN Express, a newspaper in Vietnam, reported that on May 6, police in Nghe An province seized 630 kilograms of dog, cat carcasses and entrails of other animals from a passenger bus. The driver said the meat was being taken to Hanoi for consumption, according to the report. But the report contains no suggestion the meat was being used for treatment of coronavirus. When we reached out to South West News Service about the source of the information, the agency told PolitiFact that "shortly after publication, we identified a number of issues with this story and pulled it from our service. We received new information which led us to doubt the widespread nature of the claims the charity had made on this issue." We rate this claim False. 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 Toronto Sun, "'Cruelty' in reports black cats killed for COVID-19 cure," April 24, 2020 Email, No To Dog Meat, May 2, 2020 Email, South West News Service picture editor Jon Mills, May 6, 2020 International Business Times, "Following false claims, people in Vietnam try black cat paste to ward off coronavirus," April 24, 2020 Email, Phuong Tham, the director of Human Society International ni Vietnam, May 4, 2020 YouTube, No To Dog Meat channel, accessed May 6, 2020 YouTube, "Black Cats tortured in Vietnam," posted and accessed May 6, 2020 YouTube, "Cao Ngựa Bạch Bắc Giang Cao Mèo Đen Nguyên Chất 2," posted May 5, 2020, and accessed May 6, 2020 Email, Ho Chi Minh City-based journalist Michael Tatarski, May 4, 2020 USA Today, "Eating dogs and cats banned in U.S. in House-passed bill," Sept. 13, 2018 South China Morning Post, "‘It’s sweeter and tenderer than dog meat’: Vietnam’s taste for cat leaves pets in peril," accessed May 4, 2020 Email, Le Quyen Duong, an epidemiologist in Ho Chi Minh City with the World Mosquito Program, May 4, 2020 Email, Tuan Bendixsen, Vietnam director of Animals Asia, May 5, 2020 BBC News, "Vietnamese capital Hanoi asks people not to eat dog meat," Sept. 12, 2018 Reuters, "Vietnam introduces 'fake news' fines for coronavirus misinformation," April 14, 2020 Reuters, "Fancy felines hit Hanoi for first ever cat show," Feb. 16, 2020 Email, San Francisco State University medical and cultural anthropologist Martha Lincoln, May 3, 2020 Email, Nam Nguyen, news editor, Vietnam News Agency, May 4, 2020 Email, Thaveeporn Vasavakul, lead specialist for Southeast Asia with the Governance Support Facility Initiatives for the 21st Century, a governance research group, May 4, 2020 Email, Cat Besch, founder and director of Hanoi-based Vietnam Animal Aid & Rescue, May 4, 2020 The Mirror, "No To Dog Meat loses complaint against Mirror article about ‘missing’ donations," Aug. 11, 2016 Newsweek, "Eating Cats And Dogs Banned In A Second City In China In Wake Of Covid-19 Pandemic," April 15, 2020 Email, Dr. Todd Pollack, Harvard University medical professor and country director in Hanoi of the Partnership for Health Advancement in Vietnam, May 4, 2020  VN Express, "Police find 630 kg of dog and cat carcasses on Vietnam bus," May 7, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/jun/25/facebook-posts/no-osha-does-not-say-masks-dont-work-against-covid/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 
A worker wears a mask as he walks behind a fence at Agri Beef's Washington Beef processing plant in Toppenish, Wash., on May 7, 2020. (AP)
 OSHA recommends that masks be worn to help slow the spread of COVID-19. Masks aren’t a cure to prevent spread of COVID-19, experts say. But they are an effective tool in slowing transmission. When it comes to fighting the spread of COVID-19, the consensus among health authorities is that masks provide some measure of protection for people around the wearers. So, has the federal agency charged with ensuring healthy conditions in the workplace declared that face coverings don’t work, and actually pose a health risk? That’s the claim of an article (archived here) widely shared on Facebook that carries this headline: "OSHA says masks don't work — and violate OSHA oxygen levels." The post was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.)  In fact, the Occupational Safety and Health Administration, part of the Department of Labor, recommends the use of masks. Initially, the lead federal agency on the coronavirus, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, did not recommend face coverings. That changed in April: "We now know from recent studies that a significant portion of individuals with coronavirus lack symptoms (‘asymptomatic’) and that even those who eventually develop symptoms (‘pre-symptomatic’) can transmit the virus to others before showing symptoms. This means that the virus can spread between people interacting in close proximity—for example, speaking, coughing, or sneezing—even if those people are not exhibiting symptoms.  In light of this new evidence, CDC recommends wearing cloth face coverings in public settings where other social distancing measures are difficult to maintain (e.g., grocery stores and pharmacies) especially in areas of significant community-based transmission." The article we’re checking is on a website called GreenMedInfo. The article doesn’t have text per se, but rather two videos and links to OSHA web pages.  But we found that on its website, OSHA repeatedly recommends the use of face coverings: From OSHA’s "COVID-19 Frequently Asked Questions": Cloth face coverings are worn in public over the nose and mouth "to contain the wearer's potentially infectious respiratory droplets produced when an infected person coughs, sneezes, or talks and to limit the spread" of the coronavirus.  From OSHA’s "Guidance on Returning to Work":  Employers must determine PPE (personal protective equipment) such as gloves, surgical masks and face shields) are necessary for employees.  From OSHA’s "Guidance on Preparing Workplaces for COVID-19": "Provide a face mask, if feasible and available, and ask the person to wear it, if tolerated. ...Most workers at high or very high exposure risk likely need to wear gloves, a gown, a face shield or goggles, and either a face mask or a respirator, depending on their job tasks and exposure risks." A Department of Labor spokeswoman told PolitiFact that OSHA "generally recommends that employers encourage workers to wear face coverings at work. Face coverings are intended to prevent wearers who have COVID-19 without knowing it from spreading potentially infectious respiratory droplets to others.  "OSHA has not suggested they are ineffective for that purpose." The spokeswoman also said OSHA has not made any determination on whether masks have any impact on oxygen levels.  A Facebook post claims "OSHA says masks don't work" to reduce COVID-19 transmission "and violate OSHA oxygen levels." OSHA actively recommends masks, when appropriate, in the workplace, and has made no determination on whether they affect a person’s oxygen levels.  We rate the post False. 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 Greenmedinfo.com, "OSHA says masks don't work — and violate OSHA oxygen levels," post (archived here), June 18, 2020 Email, OSHA spokeswoman Kimberly Darby, June 23, 2020 Snopes, "Are These Claims About the Effectiveness of Face Masks True?", June 18, 2020 OSHA, "Guidance on Preparing Workplaces for COVID-19," accessed June 22, 2020 OSHA, "COVID-19 Frequently Asked Questions," accessed June 22, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/jul/01/viral-image/no-coronavirus-vaccines-development-havent-killed-/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 
A lab technician works at a Johnson & Johnson lab in Belgium that is working on potential vaccines for COVID-19, June 17, 2020. (AP)
 • There is no evidence that children have died because of a COVID-19 vaccine. • No vaccine currently in development has been approved for widespread public use. • There is no evidence the vaccines in development will contain microchips. There’s still no proven, publicly available vaccine for the coronavirus, but misinformation about it is already coursing through the internet. One recent Facebook post shares an image containing inflammatory claims about a coronavirus vaccine that might one day be available to the public. "The covid-19 vaccine will be mandatory in order to go back too school. They will contain RFID Chips," the image in the post reads. It continues: "Many kids will die from the covid-19 vaccine. Just to remind you the 4 kids that took the vaccine, died immediately." The post was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.) The claims in the post are speculative and misleading in a number of ways, and have been debunked by another fact-checking organization. COVID-19 has killed more than half a million people worldwide, including nearly 130,000 in the U.S. Companies around the world are scrambling to develop a vaccine, and many potential vaccines are undergoing safety trials in humans.  Health officials are struggling to reassure some skeptics that a vaccine can be developed quickly without compromising safety. As of June 30, only one coronavirus vaccine had been approved for limited use. The Chinese government has approved it only for military personnel.  Currently there is no coronavirus vaccine that has been approved for the American public. And there is no evidence that children have died because they received one of the COVID-19 vaccines being developed. In April, PolitiFact investigated a claim that seven children in Senegal died after receiving COVID-19 vaccines and discovered the Facebook post’s claim was false.  In May, Reuters also reported that social media posts were incorrect in claiming that a TV news report from 2019 showed the deadly results of a COVID-19 vaccination trial in Guinea.  PolitiFact found no evidence that anyone has died from complications related to a trial COVID-19 vaccination. PolitiFact has also debunked several false claims involving the coronavirus vaccine and microchips. The U.S. isn’t developing an "antivirus" for COVID-19 that will include an RFID chip, for example. There’s also no evidence that Democrats are pushing for mandatory vaccinations or microchip implants to fight the coronavirus. And there is no evidence yet of any requirement that students be vaccinated against COVID-19 before returning to school, though some states could require it if a vaccine becomes available.  State laws govern immunization requirements for schoolchildren, including those in private schools and daycare centers, but all states allow exemptions for medical reasons, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, and some allow exemptions for religious or philosophical reasons. A viral image on Facebook claimed, "Many kids will die from the covid-19 vaccine. Just to remind you the 4 kids that took the vaccine, died immediately."  There is no evidence that children have died because of the coronavirus vaccines in development, or that a future vaccine will contain microchips. We rate this claim False. 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 New York Times, "Coronavirus Vaccine Tracker," accessed June 30, 2020 Reuters, "Fact check: Four children have not died from a COVID-19 vaccine containing microchips," June 24, 2020 PolitiFact, "No, seven children in Senegal didn’t die after COVID-19 vaccines," April 13, 2020 PolitiFact, "No, Democrats aren’t pushing microchips to fight coronavirus," April 23, 2020 PolitiFact, "No, the US isn’t developing a vaccine or ‘antivirus’ with a chip to track people," April 3, 2020 Reuters, "False claim: video shows aftermath of fatal COVID-19 vaccination in Guinea," May 1, 2020 Wisconsin Public Radio, "Will Wisconsin Kids Need An Eventual COVID-19 Vaccine To Go To School? History Has Some Answers," June 12, 2020 CNN, "Beijing approves experimental Covid-19 vaccine for use in Chinese military," June 30, 2020 CDC, "State School and Childcare Vaccination Laws," accessed July 1, 2020 Washington Post, "Trump’s promise of ‘Warp Speed’ fuels anti-vaccine movement in fertile corners of the Web," May 20, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/jun/29/viral-image/no-wearing-mask-doesnt-void-concealed-carry-permit/,No national law prohibits licensed concealed-carry holders from carrying a weapon and wearing a mask. Some states generally prohibit wearing a mask in public to conceal one’s identity. But states with those laws have said the laws don’t apply to wearing a mask to guard against spreading the coronavirus. A viral image shared on Facebook claims that wearing a mask in public, which is widely recommended for fighting the spread of the coronavirus, threatens the rights of people who are licensed to carry guns. The image shows a handgun and an identification card and this message: "Know what else wearing a mask does??? Anyone?? REMOVES YOUR CONCEAL CARRY ability. That’s right!! Its in the rules. CCW licensees are NOT allowed to wear face coverings while carrying. Now let that sink in." The post was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.) Some states generally ban wearing masks in public, unrelated to their concealed-weapon laws. There is no nationwide law banning carrying a concealed weapon while wearing a mask. "With some minor exceptions, concealed carry is a matter of state law," said Duke University law professor Darrell Miller, co-director of the Duke Center for Firearms Law. He and UCLA law professor Adam Winkler said they were aware of no federal law that would bear on masks and concealed carry. In Illinois, it is a felony to carry in a vehicle or on your person "any pistol, revolver, stun gun or taser or firearm or ballistic knife, when he or she is hooded, robed or masked in such manner as to conceal his or her identity.".  Under an executive order from Gov. J.B. Pritzker in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, as of May 1, most Illinois residents are required to wear masks while in public.  But the governor’s order "does not require or suggest that law enforcement should arrest or criminally charge concealed-carry license permit holders for wearing protective masks while in public, as long as they are complying with the other provisions of the Illinois Concealed Carry Act and are not committing any other violations of Illinois law," Illinois State Police said. We couldn’t find any state where wearing a protective mask while carrying a concealed weapon is currently banned. Here’s a look at the situation in several states, some of which were the subject of similar Facebook claims: North Carolina: We’ve rated as False a claim that in North Carolina, "you can be charged with a felony for wearing a mask and concealed carrying." A state law — sometimes known as the anti-Ku Klux Klan law — forbids adults to conceal their identities in public. But it applies whether they’re carrying a concealed weapon or not. And the law was suspended in May for the coronavirus, although it expires Aug. 1. Georgia: Fordham University law professor Nicholas Johnson noted that Georgia has a KKK-related law similar to North Carolina’s. But that law was suspended for people wearing masks because of the coronavirus in an April executive order from Gov. Brian Kemp. Oregon: "Oregon law does not prohibit someone from wearing a mask while lawfully carrying a concealed weapon," reads a June 25 statement from Marion County Sheriff's Office.  South Carolina: "There is no South Carolina concealed-weapons permit law that prohibits a South Carolina CWP holder from wearing a mask to comply with a city or a county health ordinance or to help stop the spread of COVID-19 while carrying a concealed weapon," reads a June 25 statement from the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division. Utah: "Utah law has no prohibition against carrying a concealed firearm and wearing a mask," tweeted the Utah Department of Public Safety, June 24. Virginia: Virginia has a law that generally prohibits the wearing of masks to conceal identity. Gov. Ralph Northam issued an executive order requiring masks for the coronavirus, leading to questions about concealed carry. The Augusta County Sheriff’s Office said May 28: "This order doesn’t restrict your ability to conceal a firearm legally." We rate the statement False. 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 Facebook, post (archived here), June 23, 2020 PolitiFact, "Facebook post wrong about wearing mask, carrying concealed weapon in North Carolina," June 26, 2020  FactCheck.org, "Wearing Face Mask During Pandemic Doesn’t Affect Concealed Carry Permit," June 26, 2020 Email, UCLA law professor Adam Winkler, June 28, 2020 Email, Fordham University law professor Nicholas Johnson, June 28, 2020 South Carolina Law Enforcement Division, statement, June 25, 2020 RAND Corp., "The Effects of Concealed-Carry Laws," April 22, 2020 Facebook, Augusta County (Va.) Sheriff’s Office post,  May 28, 2020 Facebook, Marion County (Ore.) Sheriff's Office post, June 25, 2020  Email, Duke University law professor and Duke Center for Firearms Law co-director Darrell Miller, June 27, 2020  Twitter, Utah Department of Public Safety tweet, June 24, 2020 NewsChannel20.com, "ISP responds to face coverings, concealed carry concern," April 28, 2020 North Carolina Law Review, "A Survey of Statutory Changes in North Carolina in 1953," June 1, 1953 Associated Press, "Gov. Kemp suspends Georgia's anti-mask law amid pandemic," April 15, 2020 Illinois General Assembly, unlawful use of weapons law, accessed June 27, 2020 Email, Wisconsin Carry chairman Nik Clark, June 27, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/jun/26/instagram-posts/face-mask-exempt-card-doesnt-exempt-you-wearing-ma/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 
A man wearing mask to protect against the spread of COVID-19 is reflected next to a sign requiring face coverings at a business in San Antonio on June 24, 2020. (AP)
 The Justice Department has debunked the claim. The Freedom to Breathe Agency isn’t a real federal agency.  The Americans with Disabilities Act, a federal civil rights law that prohibits discrimination based on disability, does not specifically say anything about face masks.  While it’s true that businesses are not allowed to ask customers about their disabilities, and there may be some exceptions to the law, governments have broad authority to issue health mandates during a pandemic. As more cities impose mandatory mask-wearing rules, some Americans are looking for loopholes. Enter the so-called "face mask exempt card."  A June 23 Instagram post shows a photo of a laminated card that says it exempts the owner from "any ordinance requiring face mask usage in public." The image bears the seal of the U.S. Justice Department and includes a logo for another entity called the FTBA. "Wearing a face mask posses a mental and/or physical risk to me," reads text on the card, spelling error included. "Under the Americans with Disability Act (ADA), I am not required to disclose my condition to you." Below the text, there’s the ADA phone number for reporting violations, followed by potential fines for offending businesses and organizations.  "Denying access to your business/organization will be also reported to FTBA for further actions," reads the card, which includes a link to ftbagency.com. The post was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook, which owns Instagram.)  Similar posts started circulating on conservative Facebook pages in late April and early May. The first instance of the "face mask exempt card" we could find was posted in several pro-Donald Trump and Fox News fan groups on June 20, according to CrowdTangle, an audience metrics tool. (Screenshot from Instagram) The advisory is not real. The FTBA — which stands for the Freedom to Breathe Agency — is not a part of the U.S. government. "These postings were not issued by the Department and are not endorsed by the Department," the U.S. Justice Department said in a statement published on the ADA website. "The Department urges the public not to rely on the information contained in these postings." The FTBA website was registered June 12, according to public domain records, and it now appears to be down. FTBA’s Facebook group, which had more than 5,000 members and was created in early June, also appears to be offline. While the card is phony, we wondered whether there is a point about citing an ADA exemption for face masks to evade some state and local mask requirements. The ADA only provides legal protections to Americans who genuinely have disabilities. Legal experts say it’s possible that there could be some situations in which businesses may have to adjust their practices to accommodate people who cannot wear a mask and comply with the law. It’s also possible that some people could abuse the ADA to try to get around mask requirements. "People that are not disabled are not protected by the ADA," said Vinh Nguyen, project director at the Southwest ADA Center. "I realize that does not prevent people from lying." Governments have broad authority to issue health mandates in a pandemic. From New York to California, dozens of states across the country have implemented requirements for people to wear face masks in certain public spaces. The legal framework for mask requirements varies across the country. "Think of it like this: The government has the right to ban smoking in public places because your smoking can affect my health," wrote Al Tompkins of the Poynter Institute in a June 22 column. (Poynter owns PolitiFact.) "And some places have signs that say, ‘No shirt, no shoes, no service.’ Just add ‘no mask’ to the sign." The Americans with Disabilities Act, a federal civil rights law that prohibits discrimination based on disability, does not specifically say anything about face masks. However, there may be situations in which, by requiring people to wear face masks in public, businesses would need to consider aspects of the ADA.  As uncomfortable as masks are we’ve all gotten used to them by now, but some people are saying you can use ADA cards as exemptions from public mandates to wearing them. But is it legit? A post shared by  MediaWise (@mediawise) on Jun 25, 2020 at 12:07pm PDT For example, let’s say you’re deaf and primarily rely on lip-reading to communicate. You go to pick up takeout from a restaurant that requires everyone to wear face masks, including employees. Since you can’t read the employees’ lips, that business must provide "auxiliary aids and services" so they don’t deny you service, according to the ADA. Perhaps the cashier could communicate with you via text message or a dry-erase board to complete your order. "What the ADA basically mandates is that they have to consider serving the customer in another way," Nguyen said. "They don’t have to allow entry into the actual store." There also may be a case in which a customer has a respiratory condition where their breathing cannot be restricted. Similar to the previous example, a business would not have to alter its mask policy to comply with the ADA; it could provide curbside pickup or delivery. It’s true that, per the ADA, businesses are not allowed to ask customers specific questions about their disabilities.  "They cannot ask for medical documentation," said Robin Jones, director of the Great Lakes ADA Center. "They can ask if you’re not wearing a mask due to a disability, but they cannot ask me what my disability is." That creates a situation in which people could potentially abuse the law to try to get around mask requirements. "We know that people abuse these things — just like people take their dogs into places and claim they’re a service animal," Jones said. "This is just unfortunately the nature of human nature. There is no good way for an entity to monitor that." RELATED: Yes, Gov. Newsom has the authority to make masks mandatory In California, legal experts say The ADA permits retailers to deny goods or services to customers if they pose a "direct threat" to the health and safety of others — but only when the threat cannot be mitigated by changing their practices or procedures. That stipulation may apply if someone without a mask exhibits COVID-19 symptoms in a business that requires face coverings. "In this type of scenario, where there’s a chance where an unmasked person may transmit the virus to their employees or to their other customers, they have a right to restrict people from coming into the store," Nguyen said. An Instagram post claimed that a "face mask exempt card" allows you to cite the ADA and not wear a mask. The advisory is not real. The FTBA is not a part of the U.S. government, and the ADA only provides legal protections to Americans who genuinely have disabilities. Legal experts say it’s possible that there could be some situations in which businesses may have to alter their operations to comply with the law. It’s also possible that some people could abuse the ADA to try to get around mask requirements. But that does not mean those people are exempt from wearing face masks. The Instagram post is inaccurate, so we rate it False. 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 AL.com, "Birmingham makes it law: Masks required in public," April 28, 2020 Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, Use of Cloth Face Coverings to Help Slow the Spread of COVID-19, accessed June 25, 2020 CNet, "Are face masks required where you live? Here are the rules for all 50 states," June 9, 2020 CrowdTangle, accessed June 25, 2020 Freedom to Breathe Agency’s Facebook group, archived June 25, 2020 Facebook post, April 28, 2020 Facebook post, June 20, 2020 Facebook post, June 20, 2020 Facebook post, June 20, 2020 Facebook post, June 24, 2020 Facebook post, June 24, 2020 Facebook post, May 2, 2020 Facebook post, May 2, 2020 Hawaii News Now, "State’s emergency order requires everyone to wear face masks at essential businesses," April 17, 2020 Instagram post, June 23, 2020 Interview with Robin Jones, director of the Great Lakes ADA Center, June 26, 2020 Interview with Vinh Nguyen, project director at the Southwest ADA Center, June 26, 2020 The National Law Review, "No Mask, No Service? ADA Considerations for Business Owners Requiring Face Masks in Retail Stores," May 13, 2020 Order of the Governor of the State of Maryland, Number 20-04-15-01 PolitiFact, "QAnon and Donald Trump rallies: What's that about?" Aug. 3, 2018 Poynter, "Can the government legally force you to wear a mask?" June 22, 2020 Statement from the Department of Justice Syracuse.com, "Can store owners require you to wear a face mask to enter?" May 22, 2020 Whois.com, accessed June 25, 2020 WTVT-TV, "Masks recommended, not mandatory as Florida begins to reopen," April 30, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://factcheck.afp.com/video-former-china-cdc-criticising-china-made-vaccines-2010-recirculated-misleading-social-media,The video was published here on Twitter on December 29, 2020. It has since been viewed more than 54,000 times. In the two-minute and 10-second video, a news headline can be seen in simplified Chinese characters at the bottom. It translates to English as: “Director of [China] CDC: Quality of Chinese vaccines is yet to be improved”. The date on the left-hand side reads “March 7” and “Sunday”. An anchor can be heard speaking in Mandarin language at the beginning of the video. The comments translates as: “Wang Yu, member of the National Committee of the Chinese people's Political Consultative Conference (CPPCC), and director of the Chinese Center for Disease Control and Prevention, said in the conference hall of the medical and health field during the CPPCC today that the quality of some domestic vaccines is not up to standard, which greatly affects the outcome of disease prevention.” Wang Yu appears at about the 37-second mark with titles superimposed onto the video, stating also in Mandarin that: “The quality of some [domestic] vaccines amid large-scale use can not meet the quality standards we need now…The quality of the [vaccine] products being used is much poorer than that of imported vaccines, which has greatly affected the outcome of disease prevention.” The video also shows the logo for Chinese television channel Dragon Television owned by Shanghai Media Group (SMG). The caption of the Twitter post in which the video was shared is also written in simplified Chinese. It translates to English as: “Haha, the Chinese Communist Party admitted to the public that the quality of China-made vaccines is not up to standard. I think they themselves are scared to use these vaccines, for fear of killing people and losing face.” China is offering its homegrown coronavirus vaccines to other countries, as reported here by AFP on December 10, 2020. The video was also shared in late December 2020 including here, here and here on Twitter, alongside a similar claim. The video has been shared in a misleading context. A keyword search on Google and Baidu found the same video here on Chinese video site Youku. It was published by the official channel of SMGBB, a media subsidiary of SMG on March 7 2010, alongside the same headline as superimposed in the video. Below are two screenshot comparisons between the misleading Twitter post (L) and the Youku video by SMGBB (R): The video does not mention coronavirus vaccines. According to this document from the official site of China CDC, Wang Yu retired from the director position of China CDC on August 1, 2017. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/korean-social-media-posts-share-false-claim-drinking-pepper-stem-tea-can-prevent-or-cure-covid-19,The claim was shared here on Facebook on December 26, 2020. Part of the Korean-lanauge text in the post translates to English as: "Effective medicine to cure Coronavirus. Full recovery guaranteed within two or three days. "You can easily prevent Covid-19, and you can 100% cure coronavirus with this method. "How to make pepper stem tea. 1. Prepare 100g of pepper stems, three jujubes and seven coarse salts. (Wash pepper stems clearly with water). Pour 2 litres of water and start boiling it down.  "No side effects...For More details contact Korean Medicine Doctor Kang Sung-chun." A similar claim was shared on Facebook here, here, here, here and here. The claim, however, is false.  Kim Gye-jin, a director at the Association of Korean Medicine, a representative group for Korean Medicine Doctors in the country, told AFP there is no scientific evidence to support the claim. “There are no significant records to show that pepper stems were used to prevent or cure the common cold or flu, and certainly, there are no medical grounds to show that pepper stems are effective in preventing or curing Covid-19,” he said in a phone interview on December 28, 2020. As of December 30, 2020, the WHO states on its website: “There is no evidence that current medicine can prevent or cure the disease, while some western, traditional or home remedies may provide comfort and alleviate symptoms of Covid-19.” In December 2020, many countries began vaccination campaigns against the virus, as AFP reported here. A total of 16 vaccines are in the final stage of development, including those already on the market, the WHO says. Britain became the first country in the world to approve the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine for Covid-19 on December 2, 2020. As of December 27, 2020, a total of 16 countries and the European Union had given the green light to the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine. AFP Fact Check debunked a similar misleading claim that drinking tea can cure or relieve symptoms of Covid-19 after it circulated online in Sri Lanka. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://factcheck.afp.com/pelosi-pence-did-not-fake-covid-19-vaccinations-using-capped-needles,“Hard to get the vaccine if they don’t take the cap off the needle,” says a December 18, 2020 Facebook post that includes an image of Pelosi being vaccinated in which the needle is not visible. Other examples of the claim appear on Facebook here, here and here. As Covid-19 vaccines are administered around the world, false and misleading claims about them are spreading across the internet, raising fears and doubts about a key tool in the fight against a disease that has killed more than 1.7 million people. “Today, with confidence in science & at the direction of the Office of the Attending Physician, I received the COVID-19 vaccine,” Pelosi tweeted on December 18.  The claims on Facebook feature an image of Pelosi that does not show the needle because it was apparently inside her arm.  But the following photo of Pelosi’s vaccination makes clear that there was an exposed needle on the syringe.   The same claim was made about Pence, who received a Covid-19 vaccine on the same day as Pelosi. “Pence getting a Covid Death shot with the cap still on. These people are so transparent,” says text in a December 19, 2020 Facebook post above a photo of the vice president being vaccinated. The claim also appears on Twitter here and here. “We gather at the end of a historic week to affirm to the American people that hope is on the way. @SecondLady & I were honored to step forward and receive the Safe and Effective Coronavirus Vaccine and we hope it will be a source of confidence & comfort for the American people,” Pence tweeted on December 18. The following photo shows that the needle was uncovered when Pence’s shot was administered. Other inaccurate claims about Covid-19 vaccines that have been debunked by AFP Fact Check are available in English here.   Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/oct/09/viral-image/no-trump-didnt-tweet-his-blood-vaccine/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 On Oct. 6, 2020, President Donald Trump tweeted misinformation claiming that COVID-19 is less deadly than the flu.  Twitter hid the tweet so that viewers must click "view" to read it. A warning is now also attached: "This Tweet violated the Twitter Rules about spreading misleading and potentially harmful information related to COVID-19. However, Twitter has determined that it may be in the public’s interest for the Tweet to remain accessible." A post on Facebook shares two images that make it appear that another tweet from Trump was blocked by Twitter. The first shows what looks like a tweet from the president at 3:23 p.m. on Oct. 5. "My blood IS the vaccine!!!!!" The second image shows a screenshot of four tweets from Trump and what was a fifth tweet that has been removed. The message says: "This Tweet is no longer available because it violated the Twitter Rules." This post was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.)  We reached out to Twitter about the post but did not immediately hear back.  Here’s what we know. Trump didn’t tweet that his blood is a vaccine.  The screenshot of Trump’s Twitter feed that shows a message saying a tweet was removed stemmed from a separate tweet from the commander in chief: one posted at 5:54 p.m. Eastern Daylight Time Oct. 5 that included the email address of a New York post reporter, according to the website Trump Twitter Archive. He tweeted the same message again at 7:56 p.m. Eastern Daylight Time, only this time he swapped out the reporter’s email for her Twitter handle and @NYPost. As the Twitter account @hoaxeye noted, Trump never tweeted "my blood is the vaccine," according Trump Twitter Archive. The archive shows other tweets that Twitter has flagged — like the one claiming COVID-19 can be less lethal than the flu — but nothing about his blood being a vaccine. We also searched an archive of Trump’s deleted tweets for the word "vaccine" on Facba.se but found none.  Searching more broadly online, we also found no news coverage about Trump claiming his blood was a vaccine, or articles about Twitter removing such a tweet. It’s unbelievable that Twitter deleting the tweet that appears in the Facebook post wouldn’t draw wide media attention. News outlets around the world have reported on past instances of the social media platform hiding tweets by the president.  We rate this Facebook post Pants on Fire. 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 Facebook post, Oct. 8, 2020 Donald Trump tweet, Oct. 6, 2020 HoaxEye tweet, Oct. 9, 2020 PolitiFact, Donald Trump’s false claim that COVID-19 is less deadly than the flu, Oct. 6, 2020 Factba.se, Donald Trump - deleted tweets, visited Oct. 9, 2020 Trump Twitter Archive, visited Oct. 9, 2020 BBC, Twitter hides Trump tweet for ‘glorifying violence,’ May 29, 2020 CBS News, Twitter removes tweet shared by Trump with false coronavirus statistics, Aug. 31, 2020 The Washington Post, Facebook, Twitter, penalize Trump for posts containing coronavirus misinformation, Aug. 7, 2020 NBC News, Twitter removes tweet highlighted by Trump falsely claiming COVID-19 ‘cure,’ July 28, 2020 Al Jazeera, Facebook removes Trump COVID-19 post, Twitter hides similar tweet, Oct. 6, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://fullfact.org/online/disappearing-vaccine-needle/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does Various posts on social media show news footage of a Covid-19 vaccination being given to a patient. After the vaccine is apparently administered, it appears as if the needle has disappeared.  Some have suggested that this is evidence that these patients did not in fact receive a vaccine. This is untrue.  The footage appeared on BBC News and the BBC confirmed to us that it was taken at Backus Hospital in Connecticut, USA.  The syringes used appear to have retractable needles. These syringes have a spring at their tip, and when the vaccination dose is fully administered, the spring automatically retracts the needle down into the barrel of the syringe. These sorts of syringes reduce the risk of exposure to potentially contaminated needles, and reduce the risk of injury. You can watch a demonstration of how they work here.  This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as missing context
            because these syringes are designed to retract the needle once the dose has been administered.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://fullfact.org/online/bells-palsy-vaccine-trial/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does Four volunteers developed Bell's palsy after receiving Pfizer's Covid-19 vaccine. This is true, but that’s about how many people in a group the size of the trial would be expected to develop it in that period of time. There’s no evidence it’s linked to the vaccine. A video on Youtube and a post on Facebook have claimed that four volunteers taking part in the Pfizer-BioNTech Covid-19 vaccine trials were left with Bell’s palsy after participating. Bell’s palsy is a weakness or paralysis of one side of the face which is usually temporary, and treated with steroids. The exact cause isn’t known but it’s thought to have something to do with the herpes virus. It’s true that four people who received the vaccine during trials later got Bell’s palsy, but that doesn’t mean the vaccine caused it. The trials in which this occured included 38,000 participants. Although all four people who got Bell’s palsy were in the group who got the vaccine (rather than a placebo), this is not more than we would expect to develop Bell’s palsy in a group of this size by chance. According to the US Federal Drug Administration (FDA), these cases occurred at 3, 9, 37, and 48 days after vaccination.  Because these trials were so large, a number of people would be expected to get ill over the period covered by the trial. These illnesses won’t necessarily have been caused by the vaccine, but these kinds of incidents are closely monitored in case they are linked to the vaccine. But in this case, there is no evidence that the vaccine is in any way linked to Bell’s palsy, because if you monitored a group of people this size and they hadn’t had the vaccine, this is about how many people you might expect would develop Bell’s palsy.  The FDA’s document on the vaccine explained it this way: “The observed frequency of reported Bell’s palsy in the vaccine group is consistent with the expected background rate in the general population, and there is no clear basis upon which to conclude a causal relationship at this time, but FDA will recommend surveillance for cases of Bell’s palsy with deployment of the vaccine into larger populations.” This doesn’t mean scientists monitoring trials won’t keep observing these sorts of things. And as with all vaccines in the UK, the vaccine’s safety will be continually monitored as it is rolled out to the public, via the yellow card scheme (where information about potential side effects and adverse reactions are monitored and evaluated). This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as missing context
            because although four participants did get Bell’s palsy after being vaccinated, there’s no evidence of a link between the two, as this is around how many people in a group that size would be expected to develop Bell’s palsy over the same period.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://fullfact.org/online/placenta-protein-vaccine/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does The Pfizer vaccine contains syncytin-1 which is vital for the formation of human placenta, so could lead to infertility. The vaccine contains instructions on how to build a spike protein, a very small part of which resembles syncytin-1. Realistically, there is very little chance the vaccine would cause the body to attack syncytin or cause infertility. We’ve seen a number of claims on Facebook claiming that the Covid-19 vaccine will cause fertility problems. There’s no evidence that this is the case. “WOMEN WHO WISH TO CONCEIVE!The vaccine contains a spike protein called syncytin-1, vital for the formation of human placenta in women.If the vaccine works so that we form an immune response AGAINST the spike protein, we are also training the female body to attack syncytin-1, which could lead to infertility in women of an unspecified duration!” As we’ve written before, this is a complete misunderstanding of the facts.  There is a protein on the surface of the SARS-CoV-2 virus (the virus which causes Covid-19), called a spike protein. This spike protein helps the virus enter cells and is also one of the ways the human body recognises a virus and knows to let its immune cells attack it.  The Pfizer vaccine works by giving the body instructions on how to make the spike protein, so that if the person is later infected, their immune system can generate a response that attacks the virus (via the spike protein) faster and more effectively. A small part of this spike protein resembles a part of another protein vital for the formation of the placenta, called syncytin-1. The building blocks of proteins are called amino acids, and it’s sequences of those that make up different proteins. But the sequence of amino acids that are similar in syncytin-1 and the SARS-CoV-2 spike protein is quite short. Only two very small parts of these proteins look the same, so the body is extremely unlikely to confuse the two and also attack syncytin-1 after getting the vaccine. Virology professor Ian Jones at the University of Reading told Full Fact, via the Science Media Centre, that syncytin-1 is “completely unrelated to the SARS [spike] protein” and the risk of infertility is “therefore essentially fictitious”. Professor Jonathan Stoye, Virologist at the Francis Crick Institute, told Full Fact: “I would never say never, but the possibility is vanishingly small.” This spike protein is not syncytin-1, as some Facebook posts have claimed. It is also not true that the vaccine contains syncytin-1. Some of the Facebook posts link to UK government-published guidance on this vaccine, that says: “It is unknown whether COVID-19 mRNA Vaccine BNT162b2 has an impact on fertility.” Government guidance has now changed. The Royal College of Obstetricians & Gynaecologists (RCOG) says that there is “no evidence” to suggest that the Covid-19 vaccines affect fertility. Similar statements have been issued by the British Fertility Association, the NHS and Public Health England.  The RCOG also states that there is no biologically plausible mechanism by which the vaccine would cause fertility problems.  The RCOG and the NHS recommend pregnant women get vaccinated. We’ve written more about fertility and vaccines.  The information included in this article contains the latest evidence and official guidance available at the time it was written. This is not a substitute for medical advice. If you require specific medical advice please consult your GP or midwife.  Update 26 August 2021 This story was updated to include the latest advice on vaccines and fertility and getting vaccinated during pregnancy. This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as partly false
            because two small parts of the spike protein and syncytin-1 are similar, but there is no evidence this means the Pfizer vaccine can affect fertility.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://fullfact.org/health/covid-vaccine-infertile-sued/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does Those administering the Covid vaccines will get £12.58. This is an “item of service” fee, and covers the cost to GPs of providing the treatment. Similar payments are made to GPs for providing a range of services. Covid vaccines contain aborted babies. Human-derived cells have been used in the manufacture of the Oxford/AstraZeneca vaccine, but they are filtered out of the final product. They are replicas of a cell derived from a foetus in the 1970s. They are not used in the manufacture of other vaccines, such as Pfizer’s. The Covid vaccine will make you infertile. This claim has no basis. Experts say that the risk of the Covid vaccine affecting a woman’s fertility is “vanishingly small.” It’s illegal to sue those behind covid vaccines. Current UK law says that if the government decided to authorise a vaccine for emergency use, manufacturers and healthcare professionals would not take responsibility for most civil liability claims. However if the product is not found to have met safety standards or is defective, this immunity is lost. An Instagram post gets several things wrong about the coronavirus vaccine, and makes other claims misleadingly out of context. The post’s text reads: “I get £12.58 If I give you this covid vaccine “And you get aborted babies injected straight in your vein and become infertile & it’s illegal to sue me it’s win win.” It’s incorrect to say that the Covid vaccine contains aborted babies, that it’ll make you infertile, and it’s illegal to sue those administering the vaccine.  It’s true that those administering a Covid vaccine dose will receive £12.58 (and so £25.16 for a two dose vaccine such as the one produced by Pfizer and BioNTech). GPs participating in the Covid vaccination programme will receive a £12.58 “item of service” fee per injection. This figure covers the cost of providing the treatment.  Similar fees are paid to GPs for providing other services, including other vaccinations like the flu shot. (In England, GP practices are independent private companies that provide services in line with one of a number of contracts outlined by the NHS.) “Aborted babies” are not in Covid vaccines. Cells which are replicas of a cell taken from a foetus in the 1970s have been used in the manufacture of the Oxford/AstraZeneca vaccine (which at the time of writing has yet to be rolled out in the UK), but as we’ve written about before, they are filtered out of the final product.  As Factcheck NI says, other vaccines that are mRNA vaccines (such as the Pfizer vaccine that has started to be rolled out) do not use human cells in their manufacture. We have written before about claims that the Pfizer Covid vaccine will affect fertility. This concern comes from the fact that the vaccine works by igniting an immune response to a spike protein on the Covid-19 virus’ surface, and that somewhat similar proteins make up the placenta.  However, experts told Full Fact that the risk of the vaccine affecting a woman’s fertility was “vanishingly small”. The two proteins are not in fact especially similar, and if an immune response to the coronavirus spike protein could somehow affect fertility, you would expect to see it in the immune response to being infected with the virus as well.  There is no evidence that this is the case, as women who have been infected with the coronavirus do not seem more likely to lose a pregnancy or struggle to get pregnant later. We’ve also previously covered the claim that people cannot sue if something goes wrong with their administered vaccine. This claim has some truth to it, but it’s not the case that vaccine manufacturers have total immunity from being sued.  That claim comes from a misreading of a government consultation document which lays out proposals to potentially authorise a vaccine for emergency use. Existing UK law (as informed by EU law) says that if the government decided to do this, manufacturers and healthcare professionals would not take responsibility for most civil liability claims.  However, the document states that if the product is not found to have met safety standards or is defective, this immunity is lost. Update 23 December 2020 This article was updated to clarify the fee to those administering the vaccine is per dose. This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as partly false
            because claims about vaccine contents, their effect on fertility, and their legality are untrue, while the claim about payment to those administering it requires context.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://fullfact.org/health/false-claims-about-first-vaccine-recipients-spread-social-media/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does The same nurse was pictured vaccinating the first two recipients of the Covid-19 vaccine in the UK, despite them being 20 miles apart. The first two patients were not 20 miles apart. They were at the same hospital in Coventry. CNN used a photo of one of the vaccine recipients back in October. It did not. CNN’s website has rolling news video at the top of some of its articles reflecting the current news, not the news at the time of that particular article’s publication. Following the first UK vaccinations against Covid-19, various far-fetched falsehoods are spreading on social media about the people who were vaccinated.  One post notified to us by readers on WhatsApp, which has also been shared on Facebook and Twitter, suggests the whole thing is a media cover up. The post claims the same nurse was pictured vaccinating the first two patients despite them being 20 miles apart.  The patients were not 20 miles apart. The first two patients to receive the vaccine, Margaret Keenan and William Shakespeare, were both vaccinated at University Hospital Coventry. Neither was vaccinated in Stratford-upon-Avon, as the post claims.  Some media reports did note that University Hospital Coventry is just 20 miles away from the birthplace of the playwright William Shakespeare, which may be where the confusion lies.  The post goes on to claim that CNN used a photo of Mr Shakespeare getting the vaccine back in October. This is false. CNN’s website, like others, sometimes displays a video of rolling news at the top of articles. This reel may reflect the current news agenda rather than the news at the time of that particular article’s publication, and is not necessarily related to the article in question. In this case, the article screenshotted in the posts is from 22 October. At the time of writing, this article has rolling news at the top, and one of the videos which appears is a report of the first vaccinations. Suggesting that this video shows these vaccinations happened in October is as ridiculous as suggesting that, say, this article from the BBC in 2015 shows the BBC had advance knowledge about anything that appears in the current “most read” list. This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as false
            because the first two patients to receive the vaccine were not 20 miles apart, and CNN did not know about the vaccinations in October.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://fullfact.org/health/coronavirus-vaccine-brexit/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does The UK was able to approve the Pfizer/BioNTech vaccine more quickly because of Brexit. This is not correct. Under European law, the UK was permitted to act independently to approve the vaccine in an emergency. “Because of Brexit we’ve been able to make a decision [to approve the Pfizer vaccine] based on the UK regulator, a world class regulator, and not go at the pace of the Europeans who are moving a little bit more slowly. We do all the same safety checks and the same processes, but we’ve been able to speed up how they’re done because of Brexit.” In an interview on Times Radio, the health secretary Matt Hancock incorrectly claimed that the UK was able to approve the use of the Pfizer/BioNTech coronavirus vaccine more quickly because of Brexit. Similar claims have also been made by other MPs including the leader of the House of Commons Jacob Rees-Mogg, health minister Nadine Dorries and the MP Michael Fabricant. This is not correct.  Honesty in public debate matters You can help us take action – and get our regular free email The facts behind this story lie with regulation 174 of the Human Medicine Regulations 2012.  Until the Brexit transition period ends on 31 December, vaccines in the UK are supposed to be authorised via the European Medicines Agency (EMA). However, since 2012, the UK’s Medicines and Healthcare products Regulatory Agency (MHRA) has been free, under regulation 174, to give temporary approval to an unlicensed medicinal product in the case of certain types of public health threat, such as a pandemic. When the MHRA approved the Pfizer/BioNTech coronavirus vaccine for use in the UK on 2 December, the government press release accompanying this announcement made clear that approval was given under regulation 174. The government has previously said that “if a suitable Covid-19 vaccine candidate, with strong supporting evidence of safety, quality and effectiveness from clinical trials becomes available before the end of the transition period, EU legislation which we have implemented via regulation 174 of the Human Medicines Regulations allows the MHRA to temporarily authorise the supply of a medicine or vaccine, based on public health need.” This is clear that using regulation 174 is implementing EU legislation. It is true that the government has consulted on and made changes to the Human Medicines Regulations 2012. We have written about this before. However, the consultation document did not propose any changes to the regulations which would have accelerated the approval of the Pfizer vaccine. It said: “If the need arises, regulation 174, in its present form, could be used to authorise nationwide distribution and supply of an unlicensed Covid-19 vaccine (or treatment) in the UK, as well as other potential products. In practice, this means that, if a suitable Covid-19 vaccine candidate – with strong supporting evidence of safety, quality and efficacy – became available before the end of the transition period but it had not yet been licensed by the European Medicines Agency, regulation 174 could be used to enable temporary UK-only deployment.” The head of the MHRA, Dr June Raine, has been clear that the vaccine was approved under EU law. Asked directly whether Brexit made the process quicker, she said: “We have been able to authorise the supply of the vaccine using provisions under European law which exist until 1 January.” Countries in the EU have agreed to work together in their approach to dealing with the pandemic In June, the European Commission called for a “common strategy” between member states and proposed a “central procurement process” for purchasing vaccines. In October, it said it was “imperative that member states follow a common vaccination strategy for vaccine deployment [...] Coordination at EU level is required to align our efforts, to ensure and to show solidarity, and to best ensure the full functioning of the internal market, good public health management for Covid-19 matters and beyond, and the protection of all EU citizens no matter where they live.” If the UK was not leaving the EU, the country may have chosen to follow this “common strategy” and move at the same pace as other members. However, it is not a legal requirement. The EMA has said it plans to make a final decision on whether to authorise the Pfizer/BioNTech vaccine by 29 December at the latest. Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://fullfact.org/online/vaccine-cold/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does Any vaccine that needs to be stored and shipped at -80 degrees isn’t a vaccine. It’s a transfection agent, kept alive so it can infect your cells and transfer genetic material. One candidate RNA vaccine does have to be stored at close to this temperature. It is still a vaccine though, and other vaccines, such as the Ebola vaccine also had to be this cold. This RNA vaccine is in no way alive, although it does contain genetic material that can be read by human cells. A screenshot of a tweet, which claims that one of the potential Covid-19 vaccines isn’t a vaccine, but a “transfection agent” because it has to be stored at -80°C, has been spreading on Facebook. One of the candidate vaccines, created and manufactured by BioNTech and Pfizer, does have to be stored at around -70°C. But this is not because anything in it is “alive”, as the tweet claims. This particular vaccine is what’s known as an RNA vaccine. RNA vaccines contain messenger RNA (mRNA), which provides instructions on how to build a protein specific to the virus’s surface. The body’s cells use this mRNA to build its own copies of these proteins, which the body’s immune system then responds to by producing antibodies. This provides protection if the person catches the real disease.  The vaccine needs to be kept at lower temperatures to stop it degrading. The RNA in the vaccine is in no way “alive”. It is a small piece of genetic material that human cells can read and use to make proteins. In the same way, it can’t really be said to be “infecting” your cells if you get the vaccine. Genetic material is transferred from the vaccine to your cells, but it in no way changes the genetic make-up of those cells—mRNA vaccines do not alter your DNA. What is transferred are instructions on how to make a type of protein. If those human cells replicate, they won’t replicate the genetic material from the vaccine. It’s not clear what exactly the post means by “transfection agent”. Transfection is a very general term for the process by which genetic material is introduced into cells, which in essence is what this RNA vaccine does. It’s not the only vaccine that has to be transported at very low temperatures. The Ebola vaccine had to be transported at -60°C or colder. This wasn’t an RNA vaccine, it was just particularly sensitive to temperature. This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as partly false
            because the Pfizer vaccine that has to be kept at ultra-low temperatures is a vaccine, but is in no way “alive”.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://fullfact.org/online/rna-vaccine-covid/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does The Covid vaccine is an RNA vaccine. This will actually change your DNA. Some of the Covid-19 vaccine candidates are RNA vaccines. These don’t alter your DNA, they comprise of mRNA that gives the body instructions on how to make the proteins on the surface of the virus. A post on Facebook has claimed that the Covid-19 vaccine is an RNA vaccine that will “actually change your DNA”. Although some of the 50 or so candidate Covid-19 vaccines are based on RNA technologies, they do not change your DNA. We’ve written about this before here. Conventional vaccines contain inactivated versions of whatever pathogen causes the disease, or proteins on its surface, to cause an immune response in the body which means it can fight the real infection later. RNA vaccines instead contain what’s called messenger RNA (mRNA), which codes for a protein specific to the pathogen’s surface. The body uses this mRNA to build its own copies of these proteins which the immune system responds to by producing antibodies providing protection if the person catches the real disease later. This introduction of mRNA into human cells does not change the DNA of the human cells and if these cells replicate, the mRNA would not be incorporated into the new cells’ genetic information. This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as partly false
            because some candidate Covid-19 vaccines use RNA but they  do not alter your DNA.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://fullfact.org/online/foetal-cells-covid-vaccine/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does Aborted male foetal cells called MRC-5 are in the Covid-19 vaccine. The cell strain referenced isn’t used to manufacture the vaccine. A different cell strain, derived from kidney cells taken from a female foetus aborted in the 1970s was used to propagate the virus for the vaccine. These cells don’t make it to the final product. “Share [this video] to...anybody that doesn’t want aborted foetal tissue fragments put into them or their DNA changed” A video originally posted on the Vaxxed II Facebook page, which has since spread further online, claims that the Oxford/AstraZeneca Covid-19 vaccine contains cells from the lung of an aborted male foetus. The vaccine does not use the cell strain mentioned, but a different one, called HEK 293, which was derived from human kidney cells of an aborted foetus.  Cells from both foetuses have been replicated over the decades, creating what’s known as cell strains. So the actual cells used in the manufacture of this vaccine are not directly from a foetus.  While human-derived cells are used to manufacture the vaccine, they are filtered out of the final product. Honesty in public debate matters You can help us take action – and get our regular free email The video claims that the ChAdOx1 Covid-19 vaccine, being developed by the University of Oxford and eventually manufactured by AstraZeneca, contains cells that come from an aborted foetus. The video points to a paper that also talks about the ChAdOx1 vaccine and the use of MRC-5 cells, a line of cells that were originally taken from an aborted foetus in 1966.  MRC-5 are a group of cells that can be grown in a lab, or outside of the tissue it came from, and are used for research. These cells originated from those taken from a foetus, but none of the cells being used today were in an aborted foetus. These cells have since been propagated in labs for many years, and has been used in the actual production of other vaccines, such as vaccines against shingles and chickenpox, to grow the virus for use in the injection.  But AstraZeneca told Full Fact that these MRC-5 cells were not used in the development of its Covid-19 vaccine.  So, back to the paper mentioned in the video. This paper is a pre-clinical research study done by some of the same people working on the Oxford/AstraZeneca vaccine to see how the vaccine might work in human cells, before it was tested on people. The study did use MRC-5 cells.  We asked AstraZeneca about this paper, which said: “The paper referred to is preclinical research conducted to show the effectiveness of the vaccine in preclinical studies before moving to human trials. The MRC-5 cell line is not used to produce [the Oxford/AstraZeneca vaccine].” But cells from the HEK 293 TREX producer cell line were used in the manufacture of the vaccine, specifically to propagate the virus. These cells are derived from kidney cells from a female foetus aborted in the 1970s.  According to the Vaccine Knowledge Project at Oxford University: “Some viruses, such as chickenpox (varicella), grow much better in human cells. After they are grown, the viruses are purified several times to remove the cell culture material. This makes it unlikely that any human material remains in the final vaccine.” They also say that the foetus from which MRC-5 cells are propogated, was the result of a legal abortion agreed to by the woman, and was not performed for the purpose of vaccine development specifically.  The origin of HEK 293 cells are less clear, but came from what was likely to have been a therapeutic abortion in the Netherlands in the 1970s. The video also claims that the vaccine will change your DNA which is untrue. We’ve written more about this here. This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as partly false
            because the Oxford/AstraZeneca vaccine does not use the cell strain mentioned in the video, but does use a different one derived from aborted foetal cells. It also does not change your DNA.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://fullfact.org/health/danish-mask-wearing-spectator/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does Landmark Danish study shows face masks have no significant effect. A Danish study found the Covid-19 infection rate was lower among mask-wearers than non-mask wearers but not significantly so. 

However this is not proof that masks don’t have a significant effect, as the study didn’t look at whether mask-wearing protects others by stopping wearers from exhaling the virus. An article in the Spectator by Professor Carl Heneghan and Tom Jefferson from the Oxford Centre for Evidence-Based Medicine claimed that a new study from Denmark shows that wearing face masks “does not significantly reduce the rates of [Covid-19] infection”. The headline on the article was originally “Landmark Danish study shows face masks have no significant effect”; this was subsequently changed following criticism to “Landmark Danish study finds no significant effect for facemask wearers” (our emphasis). This distinction is important. The study, which compared infection rates between people who were asked to wear masks and those who weren’t found that the group who wore masks had a slightly lower chance of infection, but not so different as to be statistically significant. That means the researchers couldn’t be sure the lower chance of infection was real, or due to other factors, including chance, in the study.  In fact the study was only designed to detect a reduction in infection rate of 50% in the group which wore masks (specifically, a reduction from 2% of people getting infected to 1%). The effect which was found fell below this threshold, and had a wide range of uncertainty. But the original framing of the Spectator article missed out a key piece of context, one which the authors of the study themselves acknowledged. Because the study only looked at rates of infection among mask-wearers, it only looked at half of the issue around transmission. As Professor Paul Hunter of the University of East Anglia said in a comment given to the Science Media Centre, “The results of the DANMASK-19 randomised controlled trial on face mask use is a good study of the potential value of wearing a face mask to protect the wearer. It was not designed to show whether potentially infected individuals wearing facemasks would reduce the overall transmission of the infection.” This potential effect of mask-wearing (stopping the wearer from spreading an infection) is known as “source control”.  The US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention says: “Source control refers to the use of masks to cover a person’s mouth and nose and to help reduce the spread of large respiratory droplets to others when the person talks, sneezes, or coughs.  “This can help reduce the spread of SARS-CoV-2, the virus that causes COVID-19, by someone who is infected but does not know it. It is the major reason given for mask-wearing as a way to reduce the spread of Covid-19—for example, the UK government advice on face coverings says that “face coverings are mainly intended to protect others, not the wearer”. The Danish study’s authors make it clear that their study did not look at this question, saying: “The findings,[...] should not be used to conclude that a recommendation for everyone to wear masks in the community would not be effective in reducing SARS-CoV-2 infections, because the trial did not test the role of masks in source control of SARS-CoV-2 infection” Despite the headline change, the Spectator article does not directly address this point. It claims that there is little evidence from trials that face masks protect wearers, especially in the community (as opposed to in healthcare settings).  It adds: “The only studies which have shown masks to be effective at stopping airborne diseases have been ‘observational’ – which observe the people who ordinarily use masks, rather than attempting to create a randomised control group.” It then goes on to note problems with observational studies, such as the difficulty in getting people to accurately recall whether they were or were not doing certain behaviours.  At no point does it discuss other evidence that suggests the possible benefits of mask-wearing as a form of source control, as opposed to benefitting the wearer.  For example, a paper published in Nature Medicine back in April found that the shedding of respiratory viruses (including coronavirus, rhinovirus and the flu virus) were significantly lower from infected people who wore masks than those who did not. As noted, the study’s results had a wide range of uncertainty. The slightly lower level of infection seen among the mask-wearing group could indicate anything from a reduction in infection that fell just below the 50% threshold, to no effect at all, or even a small possible increase in the risk of infection. Professor James Naismith of the Rosalind Franklin Institute and University of Oxford, also told the Science Media Centre: ““The credible interval of their data ranged from an increase of 23% to a reduction of 46% of infection to the mask wearer... It concludes wearing a mask does not cut the infection rate of mask wearers by 50%. I would have been stunned if it had.” So while the study is good evidence that mask-wearing does not cut your chance of catching Covid-19 in half, it doesn’t tell us whether they may have a smaller protective effect on the wearer, and says nothing about whether they might prevent transmission to others. Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://fullfact.org/health/gp-vaccine-first/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does GPs should be the first to be vaccinated when a Covid-19 vaccine becomes available. The government has published plans indicating that health workers will be among the first to receive a vaccine when available. A post suggesting that GPs should be the first to get a Covid-19 vaccine when one becomes available has been shared hundreds of times on Facebook. The post text reads: “If the vaccine is so safe and effective why not do our GPs first [sic]Then they can safely return to their surgeries and attend to all our health needs safe in the knowledge they cannot be infected” It is likely that GPs and other healthcare workers will be among the first to receive a Covid-19 vaccine.  The UK government has already published a provisional priority ranking for a potential vaccine, which currently lists “health and social care workers”, along with those over 80, as second on the list, after older adults resident in care homes and care home workers. This is subject to change, depending on what vaccine becomes available or the state of the pandemic, but it’s likely vaccinating health workers will be considered a priority. This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as missing context
            because health workers are likely to be considered a priority group to be vaccinated.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://fullfact.org/online/coronavirus-vaccine-safety-death-rate/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does Covid-19 does not kill 99.99% of us. Incorrect. It is estimated that Covid-19 has a fatality rate of around 0.5%-1% globally, though could be slightly higher in countries with older populations. A Covid-19 vaccine will kill more people than the virus. There is no evidence for this claim. There have been no reports of deaths attributed to Covid-19 vaccines in any trials. Vaccines are rigorously safety tested before they are rolled out. A screenshot of a tweet making various claims about Covid-19 and a possible vaccine has been going viral on Facebook. It starts by claiming that Covid-19 “does NOT kill 99.99% of us.” This suggests Covid-19 is much less deadly than it is. The key statistic to look at here is called the infection fatality rate (IFR). This is the proportion of people who die from the disease after contracting it.  We know for certain that the IFR is higher than 0.01% as suggested, because we know that 53,675 deaths in England and Wales have so far been registered with an underlying cause of Covid-19. Even if everyone in England and Wales had already contracted the disease (which is implausible), that would still give an IFR of at least 0.09%, so nine times higher than the post suggests. The actual IFR is hard to measure accurately without widespread testing, and will vary due to factors like a country’s quality of healthcare or the age of its population. However studies estimate a global rate of between 0.5% and 1%. Recently a report from Imperial College London estimated an IFR of around 0.23% in a “typical low-income country, with a population structure skewed towards younger individuals” and 1.15% in “a typical high income country, with a greater concentration of elderly individuals”. Also, while Covid-19 may not be fatal for most people, there is some evidence that it can affect health in the medium and potentially long term, so the benefits of vaccination should not be seen purely in terms of avoiding deaths.  The post then suggests that adverse reactions to any potential vaccine would kill more people than the virus itself. There is no evidence that any Covid-19 vaccine currently being trialled has caused a death, let alone that any vaccine has a fatality rate higher than the disease itself. More than 1.3 million people have so far died of Covid-19 worldwide, according to figures from Johns Hopkins University.  There have been no reports of any deaths associated with either the Pfizer or Moderna trials, the two vaccine candidates which have reported late-stage efficacy data. There have been two deaths in Brazil of participants in two separate vaccine trials, but there is nothing to link the deaths to the vaccines themselves. Vaccines are rigorously tested for safety prior to being made available to the public. This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as false
            because the post exaggerates the Covid-19 survival rate and the claim that a vaccine would kill more people than the virus is baseless.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://www.factcheck.org/2020/12/alabama-officials-debunk-false-claim-of-covid-19-vaccine-death/, By Saranac Hale Spencer Posted on December 17, 2020 A false claim that an unidentified nurse died after getting the COVID-19 vaccine in Alabama has been feeding into the anti-vaccine disinformation online. The Alabama Department of Public Health reported that no one who has received the vaccine has died. Contrary to a claim circulating on social media, no nurses have died after getting the COVID-19 vaccine in Alabama. More than 200 registered nurses across the country have died after getting the disease, though. That’s according to a report released in September by National Nurses United, the nation’s largest nurses’ union. As of Dec. 17, the total U.S. death toll was more than 300,000 and the total number of cases topped 17 million. The falsehood about the death of an Alabama nurse started circulating shortly after doses began arriving in the state on Dec. 14. Health care workers were slated to be the first to receive the shots, according to the Alabama Department of Public Health. One vague claim posted Dec. 15 on Facebook said: “One of the first nurses to receive the vaccine in AL is now dead. We shall see how the media spins this.” Another post that didn’t name the purportedly deceased person added some fictional specificity the following day, claiming: “A nurse in Alabama has died approx 8-10 hours after receiving her C-19 vaccine. Let’s see if the news picks it up and tells the truth.” It also included this hashtag: #AntiVaccine. The claim is baloney, though. “[N]o persons who received COVID-19 vaccine in Alabama have died,” the state’s health department said in a press release responding to the claim. “The posts are untrue,” it said. The department checked with every hospital in the state that had administered the COVID-19 vaccine and confirmed that there were no deaths. As we’ve written before, no serious safety concerns have been reported regarding the currently available COVID-19 vaccine, although some health care workers who have taken the vaccine have had allergic reactions. (See “A Guide to Pfizer/BioNTech’s COVID-19 Vaccine” for more.) During the trial phase, serious adverse events — which refer to potentially life-threatening or disabling events — occurred in fewer than 1% of participants, and at similar rates in those vaccinated and those not vaccinated. The few instances the Food and Drug Administration considered possibly related to the vaccine included one case of a shoulder injury and one instance of lymphadenopathy, or swelling of the lymph nodes, following vaccination. Further information about the safety of the COVID-19 vaccine is available from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. Editor’s note: FactCheck.org is one of several organizations working with Facebook to debunk misinformation shared on social media. Our previous stories can be found here. National Nurses United. “Sins of Omission — How Government Failures to Track Covid-19 Data Have Led to More Than 1,700 Health Care Worker Deaths and Jeopardize Public Health.” Sep 2020. Alabama Department of Public Health. Press release. “Three Alabama sites to receive Pfizer COVID-19 vaccine today, additional shipments to be delivered tomorrow.” 14 Dec 2020. Alabama Department of Public Health. Press release. “Rely only on credible sources of COVID-19 information.” 16 Dec 2020. McDonald, Jessica. “A Guide to Pfizer/BioNTech’s COVID-19 Vaccine.” FactCheck.org. Updated 12 Dec 2020. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. “Ensuring the Safety of COVID-19 Vaccines in the United States.” Updated 10 Dec 2020. Q: Is one day isolation sufficient to stop forward transmission of COVID-19?  A: People with COVID-19 could potentially transmit it to others well beyond a day after developing symptoms or testing positive. New guidance from the CDC advises people to isolate until they have been fever-free and with symptoms improving for at least 24 hours, and then take precautions for five days, which covers the period when “most people are still infectious.”,
https://factcheck.afp.com/bill-gates-was-talking-about-side-effects-and-did-not-say-700000-people-would-be-killed-or,The article, which has been shared more than 19,000 times on Facebook, according to social media analysis tool CrowdTangle, claims that Bill Gates, who is co-chair of the Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation, “predicts 700,000 victims from corona[virus] vaccination”. Published here by KenFM, a German website known for “alternative viewpoints”, the article alleges that Gates said 8,300 people will be killed or permanently disabled by the vaccine in Germany alone. “According to Gates, that would be 8,300 corona vaccination victims for Germany with its 83 million inhabitants. He calls this – death or permanent disability – ‘side effects,’” the article reads. A Facebook post shared hundreds of times alongside a screenshot of the KenFM article also claimed that Gates said there will be “permanent vaccination damage” and the world can expect as many as 700,000 victims. The 700,000 figure cited in the KenFM article and the Facebook post comes from an interview Gates gave to CNBC, specifically a section where the billionaire discusses vaccination side effects. To start, Gates did not say a vaccine would kill or permanently disable 700,000 people. In the CNBC interview, he explained that a side effect of a vaccine experienced by, say, one in 10,000 people would mean the potential to affect 700,000 worldwide. Furthermore, Gates made no suggestion that the side effects would be adverse and result in permanent damage, as claimed in the article and on Facebook.  Gates had told CNBC that the “efficacy of vaccines in older people is always a huge challenge,” but in this case, he said the world “clearly needs a vaccine that works in the upper age range because they are most at risk” of dying from Covid-19. He said this must be done “so you don’t have side effects”.  “If we have one in 10,000 side effects, that’s way more -- 700,000 people -- who will suffer from that. So, really understanding the safety at gigantic scale across all age ranges, you know: pregnant, male, female, undernourished, existing comorbidities. It's very, very hard, and that actual decision of 'OK, let's go and give this vaccine to the entire world', governments will have to be involved because there will be some risk and indemnification needed before that can be decided on,” Gates said. There was also no mention of 8,300 “vaccination victims” of “death or permanent disability” in Germany throughout the 26-minute interview. A shorter, four-minute clip of the interview by CNBC captured the actual context of the quotes misinterpreted by the German website and mentioned in the misleading Facebook post. Notably, the interview with Gates was published on April 9, 2020 -- months before any medical research companies had released preliminary efficacy results of the various vaccine trials that have now led to a batch of promising candidates.  The race to develop a Covid-19 vaccine is heating up as several vaccine makers worldwide have published preliminary data showing efficacy rates of 90 percent and higher. Pharma giants Pfizer and BioNTech announced this month that their virus vaccine is 95 percent effective, while US company Moderna said last week early results showed its candidate was 94.5 percent effective. AstraZeneca and Oxford University more recently announced their drug had proved, on average, 70 percent effective at stopping the virus after testing it on 23,000 people. As reported by AFP, Russia said its Sputnik V coronavirus vaccine was 95 percent effective, although the number of cases used to make the calculation was not disclosed. Pfizer, for its part, said none of the 43,000 participants enrolled in its vaccine trial had suffered any adverse side effects. Less than four percent of those vaccinated showed side effects in the form of fatigue and headaches. According to the World Health Organization (WHO), side effects are “unintended effects occurring at normal dose related to the pharmacological properties”. Adverse reactions are “a response to a drug which is noxious and unintended, and which occurs at doses normally used in man for the prophylaxis, diagnosis, or therapy of disease, or for the modifications of physiological function”. The UK National Health Service (NHS) advises that “all medicines can cause side effects, particularly if you don't use them as advised”.  “Side effects can range from mild, such as drowsiness or feeling sick (nausea), to life-threatening conditions, although these are rare. The risk of getting side effects varies from person to person,” NHS explains. The US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) also explain that an “adverse event” is “any health problem that happens after a shot or other vaccine. An adverse event might be truly caused by a vaccine, or it might be pure coincidence”. Volunteers who took Covid-19 jabs from Moderna and Pfizer have discussed the effects of the vaccine shots. According to Science Magazine, “fewer than 2% of recipients of the Pfizer and Moderna vaccines developed severe fevers of 39°C to 40°C”. Follow us Copyright © AFP 2017-2024. All rights reserved. Users can access and consult this website and use the share features available for personal, private, and non-commercial purposes.  Any other use, in particular any reproduction, communication to the public or distribution of the content of this website, in whole or in part, for any other purpose and/or by any other means, without a specific licence agreement signed with AFP, is strictly prohibited.  The subject matter depicted or included via links within the Fact Checking content is provided to the extent necessary for correct understanding of the verification of the information concerned.  AFP has not obtained any rights from the authors or copyright owners of this third party content and shall incur no liability in this regard.  AFP and its logo are registered trademarks.,
https://www.factcheck.org/2020/12/vaccine-recipient-targeted-with-baseless-crisis-actor-claim/, By Angelo Fichera Posted on December 10, 2020 Social media posts are peddling the baseless claim that the first recipient of a COVID-19 vaccine in the United Kingdom was actually a “crisis actor.” There is no evidence for that conspiracy theory. On Dec. 8, a 90-year-old woman in England became the first recipient of a COVID-19 vaccine, made by Pfizer and BioNTech, following its approval for use in the United Kingdom. But falsehoods attempting to cast doubt on the legitimacy of the moment, and on her identity, quickly followed. On Facebook and Twitter, posts baselessly claimed that Margaret Keenan was actually a “crisis actor.” Such nonsense claims of “actors” being used in high-profile events aren’t new: We’ve debunked similar claims that followed the death of George Floyd and the 2018 school shooting in Parkland, Florida, for example. A Dec. 9 Facebook post showed a photo of Keenan receiving the shot alongside a screenshot of a female actor’s listing on a talent website, and then another photo of a woman falling. There is absolutely no evidence the women seen in the different photos are the same person, and the posts don’t offer any. Instead, they simply string photos of women together and present it as supposed proof for the wild conspiracy theory. There are noticeable differences between the women in the photos. A reverse image search shows the last picture is of a woman falling during a September protest — which was against pandemic-related restrictions — in London. The photo is on Getty Images, and the caption does not identify the woman. Readers can compare that image to a photo of Keenan without a mask and to the actor’s photos. Keenan received the shot at the University Hospital, Coventry in England and was discharged on Dec. 9. Multiple news outlets identified her as a grandmother nearing 91 and a former jewelry shop assistant. The National Health Service in England said Keenan was originally from Ireland and has lived in Coventry for more than 60 years. Some posts, including a tweet from a well-followed conservative activist, also falsely suggested that the footage of Keenan receiving the shot had been used by CNN in October. “Excuse me, but how is the exact same person who’s the ‘first to get vaccinated’ today…also in a CNN photo wearing the exact same clothes, in the exact same chair, and getting a shot back in October?” the tweet said. “Which one of these lying stories did you want us to pretend is true?” But CNN merely featured the video of Keenan receiving the shot, along with several other recent videos, at the top of an older story related to COVID-19. It’s not uncommon for news websites to feature newer videos on older pages. Those who visit the Oct. 22 story — titled “Faulty US Covid-19 response meant 130,000 to 210,000 avoidable deaths, report finds” — can see the video including Keenan is in a carousel of several videos that were produced after the story in question. Archived versions of the same story — from Oct. 30, Nov. 1 and Nov. 3, for example — demonstrate that the videos featured at the top repeatedly change. The claim doesn’t make sense for other reasons. The screenshot included in the tweet shows that the video of Keenan includes the headline “UK Patients Now First in World to Get Authorized COVID Vaccine.” So the video was clearly using the footage to depict the first vaccinations. Also, the video of Keenan lists the number of U.S. deaths attributed to COVID-19 as being more than 285,000; that number was reached this week. The death toll now stands at more than 290,000, according to data compiled by Johns Hopkins University as of Dec. 10. Editor’s note: FactCheck.org is one of several organizations working with Facebook to debunk misinformation shared on social media. Our previous stories can be found here. “A woman falls as police move in to disperse protesters in Trafalgar Square in London on September 26, 2020, at a ‘We Do Not Consent!’ mass rally against vaccination and government restrictions designed to fight the spread of the novel coronavirus, including the wearing of masks and taking tests for the virus.” Getty Images. 26 Sep 2020. Booth, William and Karla Adam. “Britain launches the West’s first mass coronavirus vaccination — with a Maggie and a William Shakespeare first in line.” Washington Post. 8 Dec 2020. Fox, Maggie. “Faulty US Covid-19 response meant 130,000 to 210,000 avoidable deaths, report finds.” CNN. 22 Oct 2020. “Landmark moment as first NHS patient receives COVID-19 vaccination.” Press release, National Health Service in England. 8 Dec 2020. “Liz Scott.” StarNow.com. Accessed 9 Dec 2020. “Margaret Keenan Is the First Person to Get the COVID Vaccine.” YouTube. Good Morning Britain. 8 Dec 2020. “Margaret Keenan receives guard of honour after getting first Covid vaccine.” YouTube. The Telegraph. 8 Dec 2020. “World’s First Patient to Receive COVID-19 Vaccination Discharged from University Hospital, Coventry.” Press release, University Hospitals, Coventry & Warwickshire. 9 Dec 2020. Q: Is one day isolation sufficient to stop forward transmission of COVID-19?  A: People with COVID-19 could potentially transmit it to others well beyond a day after developing symptoms or testing positive. New guidance from the CDC advises people to isolate until they have been fever-free and with symptoms improving for at least 24 hours, and then take precautions for five days, which covers the period when “most people are still infectious.”,
https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/covid-19-vaccine-vape/,About this rating   In December 2020, as a vaccination for COVID-19 started rolling out across the U.S., a photograph supposedly showing a Pfizer vape cartridge containing a single dose of the vaccine started to circulate on social media:  This is not a genuine picture of a vape cartridge filled with a single dose of the COVID-19 vaccine.  According to the CDC, the COVID-19 vaccine is currently only available via an intramuscular (IM) injection. Neither Pfizer nor any other pharmaceutical company has produced a vape-version of this vaccine.  There are a few other hints that this picture is bogus. For instance, while Pfizer does make Viagra, a pill that treats erectile dysfunction, the company does not refer to itself as "makers of the boner pill" on packaging. This fake vaccine photo also claims that it was "made in China," but the real COVID-19 vaccine is being manufactured in Germany, Belgium, and the United States.  A spokesperson for Pfizer confirmed to Reuters that this COVID-19 vape vaccine was indeed fake: The real vaccine is being made using Pfizer and BioNTech’s combined manufacturing network in Germany, Belgium and the United States. Reuters contacted Pfizer who confirmed by email the vaporiser cartridge was fake. The real Pfizer vaccine is injected into the upper arm and given as two doses 21 days apart. Dan Evon is a former writer for Snopes. Company Navigate Sections Account © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc. This material may not be reproduced without permission. Snopes and the Snopes.com logo are registered service marks of Snopes.com,
https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/oranges-restore-smell-covid/,About this rating   Nearly a year after the coronavirus was first identified in the U.S., scientists around the world continued to work to characterize SARS-CoV-2 and the respiratory disease that it causes, COVID-19. And as health care providers raced to deliver vaccines in December 2020, the internet was rife with misinformation. One popular rumor claimed that eating burnt oranges would restore lost sense of smell and taste, a common symptom reported by people who contracted COVID-19.   The claim was featured in a video shared on TikTok on Dec. 15, 2020, in which two women describe the “TikTok trick” as a “Christmas miracle.” The two roommates claimed they had COVID-19 at the time of filming and both lost their sense of smell. In the clip, the duo is seen blackening an unpeeled orange on the stovetop, peeling it, mushing it in a cup, adding brown sugar, and eating it. At the time of writing, the video had nearly 800,000 views. But despite its popularity, there is no evidence to suggest that eating any style of orange will restore a person’s loss of smell or taste due to COVID-19. In fact, science is only just beginning to understand the mechanisms behind why people lose their sense of smell from SARS-CoV-2 in the first place, much less how to restore it. Highly specialized sensory cells known as olfactory sensory neurons make up a small patch of tissues inside of the human nose, according to the National Institutes of Health. Each olfactory neuron has one odor receptor in the brain. As substances around the nose release microscopic molecules, the neurons stimulate receptors in the brain and send messages to identify the smell. To reach the olfactory sensory neurons, smells take one of two paths: either through the nostrils or via a channel that connects the roof of the throat to the nose. This is why scent plays such a large role in our sense of taste — chewing food releases molecules that the olfactory sensory neurons in the back of the throat can pick up on. But when this channel is blocked by an infection, the scent of food can be lost on the brain, a condition known as anosmia. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) listed a “new loss of taste or smell” as a symptom of COVID-19 and it is thought that COVID-19 infection creates an inflammation reaction inside the nose that leads to the loss of the olfactory neurons. And anosmia has been shown to be an indicator of viral spread at the community level, making it an important characteristic to track when tracing COVID-19 infection. Anosmia refers to the complete inability to detect odors, and viral anosmia isn’t unique to SARS-CoV-2. It has been determined to be a result of a number of different infections, from the common cold to a variety of human-infecting coronaviruses. In fact, viral infections have been shown to be associated with about 40% of adult anosmia cases — 15% of which are thought to be caused by a coronavirus strain. Anosmia and hyposmia (partial loss of smell) occur when upper respiratory infections damage sensitive nerve endings, resulting in either a temporary or permanent loss of taste or smell. But the exact mechanism behind how SARS-CoV-2, in particular, causes neurological conditions is only just beginning to unfold. Research suggested in 2020 that anywhere from 40% to 80% of COVID-19 patients will experience a loss of taste or smell. In July 2020, a team of researchers led by neuroscientists at Harvard Medical School determined that the olfactory cell types in the upper nasal cavity were the most vulnerable to SARS-CoV-2. Furthermore, olfactory sensory neurons do not express the gene that encodes ACE2 receptor protein, the protein that SARS-Cov-2 uses to enter human cells. Snopes spoke with Chelsae Larson, a special education teacher in Montana, who was diagnosed with COVID-19 on Oct. 20 and lost her sense of smell the day prior. “It happened very abruptly. I ate breakfast and lunch as normal and when I took a bite of my dinner, I could not taste or smell anything,” she said, noting that she suffered from anosmia. “I started to gain my senses back about six weeks after my results. I still do not have my taste and smell fully back and can only smell really strong scents.” And though Larson said that she has “eaten many oranges, tangerines, and various other fruits,” her sense of smell is still not 100% back nearly two months later. There is no one-size-fits-all solution when it comes to restoring anosmia. By and large, health experts agree that it comes down to the individual and their body’s ability to repair and regenerate damaged nerve endings. About 90% of patients will see an improvement in their sense of smell within four weeks of infection without incident, according to medical advice published in the British Medical Journal. Some medical practitioners recommend patients regularly smell strong odors or essential odors as a way to restore their olfactory system, a concept known as “olfactory training.” Providers also suggest that using some topical corticosteroid drops or sprays could help to restore the sense of smell. But until the sense of smell has been restored, experts recommend rigorously adhering to “use by” dates on food and drinks and ensuring all smoke alarms are functioning and tested regularly. Anosmia has been linked to mental health conditions like anxiety and depression, and support groups like Fifth Sense and AbScent can help people cope with these symptoms. Madison Dapcevich is a freelance contributor for Snopes. Company Navigate Sections Account © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc. This material may not be reproduced without permission. Snopes and the Snopes.com logo are registered service marks of Snopes.com,
https://www.factcheck.org/2020/12/covid-19-vaccines-dont-have-patient-tracking-devices/, By Saranac Hale Spencer Posted on December 15, 2020 A video circulating on social media falsely claims that vaccines for COVID-19 have a microchip that “tracks the location of the patient.” The chip, which is not currently in use, would be attached to the end of a plastic vial and provide information only about the vaccine dose. It cannot track people. COVID-19 vaccines have begun rolling out, but so has misinformation about them. A video claiming that the vials containing the vaccines have a microchip that “tracks the location of the patient” has been viewed more than 225,000 times on Facebook, according to data from CrowdTangle. That’s false. The claim is based on a misrepresentation of an interview with Jay Walker, an executive for a medical device company called ApiJect. That interview was posted in May on the website for the Christian Broadcasting Network, a nonprofit founded by conservative televangelist Pat Robertson. In the interview, Walker explained that his company had received a federal contract to ramp up production of its prefilled syringes so that they would be available for use in administering either vaccines or therapeutics for COVID-19. The ApiJect syringes work like an eyedropper, Walker explained, with a plastic pouch as the vial. The syringes can also be made with an optional chip that could be attached to the end of the plastic vial to store information about its contents. The chip is an RFID tag, which is short for radio frequency identification, and requires a device to scan and read the data. “What that chip does is it has the unique serial number for each dose,” Walker said in the original interview. “It is designed so that there is no counterfeiting. It is designed so that we’ll know exactly that the right dose hasn’t expired. However, that chip only refers to the dose — there’s no personal information, no patient information. It’s simply like a barcode, only we know instantaneously where and when that dose has been used.” That portion of the interview wasn’t included in the video that’s currently circulating. Instead, the video includes the falsehood that the chips would be used to track the location of individual patients. It’s unclear how that would even work, though, since the RFID tag is attached to the vial and can’t be injected into a patient. Steven Hofman, spokesman for ApiJect, told us in an interview that the idea of the RFID tags being used to track individuals is “beyond fantasy.” In reality, the chip would allow those administering the vaccine to check that the dose hasn’t expired and isn’t counterfeit, Hofman said. “It’s incapable of collecting any personal information,” he said. Also, it’s worth noting that ApiJect’s syringes aren’t being used for either the currently available vaccine developed by Pfizer and the German biotech company BioNTech or the next one up for emergency use authorization, which was developed by Moderna. “Neither Moderna or Pfizer are using our syringe at this point,” Hofman said. Despite the fact that the syringes aren’t currently being used for COVID-19 vaccines and the optional chips they use can’t track individuals, many Facebook users left comments on the video expressing a misunderstanding. “Nope, never had flu shot, won’t take this either! Especially one with a tracking device. What a crock,” wrote one user. The misconception that vaccines may be used as a vehicle to implant tracking devices isn’t new, though. At the beginning of the pandemic we wrote about a similar claim that anticipated Bill Gates would use a COVID-19 vaccine to track people with microchips. That was bogus, too. Editor’s note: FactCheck.org is one of several organizations working with Facebook to debunk misinformation shared on social media. Our previous stories can be found here. Johnson, Lorie. “RFID Chip May Be Tied to the New Coronavirus Vaccine.” CBN News. 22 May 2020. U.S. Department of Defense. Press release. “DOD Awards $138 Million Contract Enabling Prefilled Syringes for Future COVID-19 Vaccine.” 12 May 2020. ApiJect. “When COVID-19 vaccine and injectable therapeutics become available, the RAPID Consortium can ease a U.S. supply chain problem by filling and finishing 300+ million prefilled syringes per month.” Accessed 14 Dec 2020. Food and Drug Administration. “Radio Frequency Identification (RFID).” 17 Sep 2018. Hofman, Steven. Spokesman, ApiJect. Telephone interview. 14 Dec 2020. McDonald, Jessica. “A Guide to Pfizer/BioNTech’s COVID-19 Vaccine.” FactCheck.org. Updated 12 Dec 2020. Hale Spencer, Saranac. “Conspiracy Theory Misinterprets Goals of Gates Foundation.” FactCheck.org. 14 Apr 2020. Q: Is one day isolation sufficient to stop forward transmission of COVID-19?  A: People with COVID-19 could potentially transmit it to others well beyond a day after developing symptoms or testing positive. New guidance from the CDC advises people to isolate until they have been fever-free and with symptoms improving for at least 24 hours, and then take precautions for five days, which covers the period when “most people are still infectious.”,
https://leadstories.com/hoax-alert/2020/12/fact-check-covid19-rna-vaccine-will-not-change-your-dna.html,Does the COVID-19 RNA, also called mRNA, vaccine change a person's DNA? No, that's not true: The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention says that COVID-19 mRNA vaccines "do not affect or interact with our DNA in any way." The U.S. Food & Drug Administration is considering the RNA, or messenger RNA (mRNA), vaccines for approval. The claim appeared in in a video on Instagram (archived here) December 4, 2020, under the title "There's Never Been A Vaccine Like This... "It will change your DNA." At about the 1 minute, 20 second mark, this claim is made :  Yes, there has never been a vaccine like this. It's an RNA vaccine. It is what's called the transinfection. It will fundamentally change people's DNA. This is what the post with the video looked like on Instagram at the time of writing: A post shared by ColossiLL 💭 (@colossill) 
 "Ribonucleic acid (RNA) is a molecule similar to DNA," according to the National Human Genome Research Institute website. The "Understanding mRNA COVID-19 Vaccines" post on the CDCs website clearly states that such vaccines do not alter the DNA of the people who receive them: They do not affect or interact with our DNA in any way: mRNA never enters the nucleus of the cell, which is where our DNA (genetic material) is kept. The cell breaks down and gets rid of the mRNA soon after it is finished using the instructions. But in the video on Instagram, Dr. Christiane Northrup, as the highlighted quote near the beginning of this article shows, says that the vaccine can alter DNA. The 6:20-minute video, in which she is interviewed, seeks to make a case against the COVID-19 mRNA vaccine. The video is a montage of various video clips. Northrup says that COVID-19 mRNA vaccines alter DNA when the interviewer asks this question: This covid vaccine, can you tell what we do know about it; and what, you from your experience, fear for the people that may take it? At about the 27second mark in the video, Northrup gives her qualifications for offering her opinions about the vaccine. She offers impressive qualifications in obstetrics and gynecology, but not in any medical or science specialties relating to viruses or vaccines. She is a board certified OB/GYN doctor and a former clinical professor of OB/GYN. Northrup says she's written three best-selling books : "Women's Bodies, Women's Wisdom," "The Wisdom of Menopause" and "Goddesses Never Age," before adding: I am kind of straddling the world between holistic medicine and conventional OB/GYN; and my entire career really has been about teaching women everything that can go right with their bodies and how to make that their experience. This video is one of many viral social media posts and videos claiming that the COVID-19 mRNA vaccine alters DNA. The mRNA technique is a new approach to vaccines. The Understanding and Explaining mRNA COVID-19 Vaccines post on the CDC website explains how these vaccines differ from most inoculations. mRNA vaccines take advantage of the process that cells use to make proteins in order to trigger an immune response and build immunity to SARS-CoV-2, the virus that causes COVID-19. In contrast, most vaccines use weakened or inactivated versions or components of the disease-causing pathogen to stimulate the body's immune response to create antibodies. mRNA vaccines have several benefits compared to other types of vaccines including use of a non-infectious element, shorter manufacturing times, and potential to target multiple diseases. 
      See who is sharing it (it might even be your friends...) and leave the link in the comments.:
     Lead Stories is working with the CoronaVirusFacts/DatosCoronaVirus Alliance, a coalition of more than 100 fact-checkers who are fighting misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic. Learn more about the alliance here. Olivera Perkins is a veteran journalist and fact checker at Lead Stories, who has covered a variety of beats, including labor, employment and workforce issues for several years at The Plain Dealer in Cleveland. Olivera has received state and national awards for her coverage, including those from the Society for Advancing Business Editing and Writing (SABEW). She was a Nieman Fellow at Harvard University. 
    Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
      
    Spotted something? Let us know!.
     Please select all the ways you would like to hear from Lead Stories LLC: You can unsubscribe at any time by clicking the link in the footer of our emails. For information about our privacy practices, please visit our website. We use Mailchimp as our marketing platform. By clicking below to subscribe, you acknowledge that your information will be transferred to Mailchimp for processing. Learn more about Mailchimp's privacy practices here. 
       Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
        
        Spotted something?  Let us know!.
      ,
https://fullfact.org/health/independent-sage-contact-tracing/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does England’s test and trace service reaches contacts at a cost of approximately £10,000 each. This is a misleading calculation based on the total cost of the test and trace service, which is mainly spent on testing and not tracing. “Independent SAGE showed that 1 217 214 contacts have been reached by England’s NHS Test and Trace service since May at an approximate cost of £10 000 (€11 000; $13 000) per head so far, based on the government’s commitment to spend £12bn on a tracking system.” On Monday, the British Medical Journal (BMJ) reported a claim from Independent SAGE—a group of experts set up to provide unofficial advice to the UK government during the pandemic. It said that the government was spending around £10,000 to trace each contact through the national test and trace operation. This was also reported in the Express. The figure was calculated by dividing the £12 billion provision for Test and Trace, by the number of contacts of positive cases who had been reached in England as of 28 October.  However, this is misleading, becausethe £12 billion is not spent exclusively, or even primarily, on tracing contacts of positive cases. Most of it is spent on testing, which is a necessary stage before the tracing can begin, but also has other uses in its own right, such as diagnosing people who are ill and identifying infected people who should self-isolate  We have written about problems with these sorts of calculations before. The BMJ article says at the bottom: “On 10 November we amended this story to make it clear that Serco is not the only private company involved in NHS Test and Trace and that the service covers more than just contact tracing.” However the article still says that £12 billion is being spent on the “tracking system” specifically.  Honesty in public debate matters You can help us take action – and get our regular free email The head of Test and Trace, Dido Harding, said in a parliamentary select committee this week that around 80% of that £12 billion is spent on testing, with the remainder spent on tracing, technology and central support functions.  Contact tracing in England comprises both national contact tracing carried out by Serco, Sitel and staff from NHS Professionals, and local contact tracing by Public Health England (PHE) local health teams. The local work is funded from a different budget, separate to the £12 billion. This additional spending is important, because of the roughly 1.2 million total contacts reached as of 28 October, around 370,000 were reached by local health teams.  We have asked the Department for Health and Social Care about this and will update this article if we receive a response.  For the time being, we can’t say how much it cost to trace each contact in England, or the UK. However we can say that the calculation done by Independent SAGE is misleading. Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://fullfact.org/online/covid-test-not-vaccine/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does The Covid-19 test is the vaccine and if you get tested you have been vaccinated. This is not the case. Vaccines have to go through many rounds of testing before they can be rolled out, and none have got to this stage yet in the UK. You must consent to have a vaccine in the UK. A post on Facebook has claimed that if you have been tested for Covid-19, you have been vaccinated, suggesting that a vaccine is being delivered via nasal swab tests. This is not the case. The post uses genuine screenshots of several scientific papers from the years before the pandemic which talk about the potential effectiveness of nasal vaccinations. But these papers discussing the possibility of how effective nasal vaccinations could be, both practically and from a public health point of view, does not prove that the swabs taken for many Covid-19 tests are in actual fact a vaccine. Swabbing the nose is one way of getting a sample that can be tested to see whether the person currently has the virus which causes Covid-19. Tests can also be taken by swabbing the back of the throat.  The swab itself is picking up material that may potentially contain the virus which can be identified by testing—it’s not depositing anything in the nose.  In the UK, a vaccine cannot be given to someone without consent and none are mandatory. As we’ve written before, either the person getting the immunisation or someone with parental responsibility for them (depending on the person’s age and whether they are “Gillick competent”, so whether they can fully understand what the procedure involves) must consent for a immunisation to take place.  Vaccines also have to go through multiple phases of trials to ensure they are both safe and effective, and although many potential vaccines are in development, none have been approved for use yet in the UK. This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as false
            because Covid-19 tests are not vaccines.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://www.altnews.in/fact-check-false-claim-of-pfizer-branded-coronavirus-vaccine-vaporizer-cartridge-has-gone-viral/,Since December 20, several social media users have been posting an image of a sealed pack of a Pfizer coronavirus vaccine that says “Made in China”. Twitter user @anaamika_tiwari shared the viral image and wrote, “I will not take this “Made in China” Vaccine.” (archived link) I will not take this “Made in China” Vaccine.😡 pic.twitter.com/O6SvYjC7wa — Anamika Tiwari (@anaamika_tiwari) December 21, 2020 Similarly, @rey_atl posted image and asked, “Why is the Pfizer Coronavirus vaccine MADE IN CHINA?” and added, “Perhaps this is photoshopped? Let me know.” (archived link) Perhaps this is photoshopped? Let me know. 👇 pic.twitter.com/PKkTM5zBPK — 🇺🇸Dr. Lowkey Rey🇺🇸 (@rey_atl) December 22, 2020 @TwittcrSafety sarcastically wrote, “Sweet. Now I can vape my vaccine. What a time to be alive”, as the package also contained the following information — “1 ml, Single Dose, Vapourizer Cartridge”. Sweet. Now I can vape my vaccine. What a time to be alive. pic.twitter.com/hsmqMqQ0Mo — Twittеr Safety ➐ (@TwittcrSafety) December 20, 2020 The viral image has been published by several news websites including Lokmat English, TFI Post, Siasat Daily and The India Print. Each of these reports, except the last, is attributed to IANS. This slideshow requires JavaScript. Several Facebook users also posted the viral image.  If one notices carefully, the text below the Pfizer logo reads — Makers of “The Boner Pill”, which suggests that the image has been humorously made, as pointed out by Reuters as well.  Alt News performed a reverse image search and found that the viral image was posted on Funny sub-Reddit forum but later removed by the moderators.  The image has also been circulating on Twitter as a satirical post. i bet y’all would get the vaccine if it came like this pic.twitter.com/dLEL7FunD6 — ed (@edxardo8) December 19, 2020 Reuters contacted Pfizer who confirmed by email the vaporiser cartridge was fake. How is Pfizer’s vaccine administered? According to Pfizer’s product catalogue, the COVID-19 vaccine is called “Pfizer-BioNTech COVID-19 Vaccine (also known as BNT162b2)”. The product page also directs to two separate fact-sheets — 1) recipient and caregivers 2) healthcare providers administering vaccine. These documents were updated in December. As per the ‘healthcare providers administering’ vaccine fact-sheet, “The Pfizer-BioNTech COVID-19 Vaccine is a suspension for intramuscular injection administered as a series of two doses (0.3mL each) 3 weeks apart.”  Thus the suggestion that Pfizer’s COVID-19 vaccine is a 1 ml single-dose vaporizer cartridge is false. United Kingdom National Health Service (NHS) also states, “The COVID-19 vaccine is given as an injection into your upper arm. It’s given as 2 doses, at least 21 days apart.” Is Pfizer’s vaccine manufactured in China? Pfizer has four manufacturing centres in China but none of them has been used to manufacture the coronavirus vaccine. The company has listed specific locations from where the vaccines will be shipped. These are a part of its U.S. and European manufacturing networks. The vaccines will be shipped from the following locations: 1) Kalamazoo, US 2) Puurs, Belgian 3) Pleasant Prairie, US 4) Karlsruhe, Germany  Thus the image that allegedly shows a product with Pfizer’s brand was shared on the internet with the claim that COVID-19 vaccine has been manufactured in China. This image also misinforms about how the vaccine will be administered. Donate Now 🙏 Blessed to have worked as a fact-checking journalist from November 2019 to February 2023. A video showing a group of women tearing apart and stomping on posters with the… A 28-second clip of the former chief minister of Maharashtra Uddhav Thackeray is viral on… UK-based Pharmaceutical giant AstraZeneca recently admitted in a court that in “very rare cases”, its… A newspaper clipping from Kannada daily Vijayavani’s Mangaluru edition is viral on social media. It… In a public meeting at Banaskantha, Gujarat, Prime Minister Narendra Modi on May 1 claimed…,
https://srilanka.factcrescendo.com/english/hoax-hospitals-in-lockdown-due-to-covid-vaccine-turning-humans-into-cannibals/,Fact Crescendo Sri Lanka English | The leading fact-checking website The Fact Behind Every News! During the initial months of COVID-19 pandemic, a number of false claims were circulated alleging how people from different parts of the world reacted to the deadly virus. Now as some countries are trying out the new vaccines, similar claims on how people are reacting to the vaccines have emerged. A photo is being shared widely among Tamil Social Media users in SL, and it is being claimed that this is the photo of the first batch of participants who were administered the vaccine. These posts further claim that the participants started eating each other and allegedly from a hospital in Los Angeles.  However, our investigation reveals that this is yet another fabricated hoax. Social Media Posts: A Facebook paged called Kozhi Kari had shared an image of a blood splattered hospital room claiming to be from Los Angeles. The photo is in the form of a CNN breaking news update.  The news bulletin read as “Hospitals on lockdown as first COVID vaccine patients start eating other patients” was published on 26th of December 2020 (26.12.2020) as seen below. Facebook Link | Archived Link Number of users had shared similar content as well. Fact Check  First, we observed the comments on these viral posts and noticed that many users had identified the news to be fake news. A number of users had requested such content to be removed, as it could lead to unnecessary fear among public who are getting ready for vaccination. Using Google reverse image search, Factcrescendo team found the original picture associated with the viral claim from a New York Times report dated February 14, 2019. A third year Medical student called Eric Curran had published the below article. nytimes.com | Archived link  “The trauma bay in the emergency department at Temple University Hospital after resuscitation efforts failed,” the caption of the image reads. In the article, Medical student Curran mentions his experience of treating gunshot victims in Temple University Hospital, and how those horrific scenes continue to haunt him. Therefore, from our research it is clear that the image used for edited CNN news bulletin claim was taken back in 2019 at a hospital in Philadelphia and has no relation to current COVID-19 vaccine phase. We did not find any news report about hospitals being locked down due to patients eating each other either from USA either. Conclusion: From our more investigation, we confirm that the viral claims appearing as CNN breaking news, claiming hospitals were locked down after patients turning into zombies and eating each other as a result of COVID-19 vaccine, are false.  These posts aimed at creating unnecessary fear among public are morphed images made using a 2019 image from a hospital in Philadelphia showing the aftermath of treating victims of gunshot violence. Title:Do Not Fall for This Hoax of People Turning into Zombies Due to COVID-19 vaccine!
 Result: False  Your email address will not be published. Required fields are marked * Comment *  Name *  Email *  Website  Save my name, email, and website in this browser for the next time I comment. ,
https://leadstories.com/hoax-alert/2020/10/fact-check-ptfe-sprayed-on-blue-masks-does-not-cause-symptoms-similar-to-covid19.html,Do blue masks cause symptoms similar to COVID-19 because they are sprayed with PTFE (polytetrafluoroethylene)? No, that's not true: Medical experts said only some masks are sprayed with PTFE, but those that are would not be a concern at temperatures below 300 degrees. Meat begins to denature above 105 degrees. Mask wearers would suffer bodily tissue degradation, similar to cooking, well before PTFE might become a concern. The claim appeared as a post (archived here) where it was published by Dr. Chad Hawk on Facebook on October 10, 2020. It opened: This is what the post looked like on Facebook at the time of writing:   (Source: Facebook screenshot taken on Fri Oct 30 19:08:48 2020 UTC) Dr. Adrian Cotton, MD and Chief of Medical Operations, LLUH Hospitals told Lead Stories the while some masks do have PTFE sprayed on, the majority of them are made out of polypropylene. Possible symptoms or side effects wouldn't be caused unless the temperature of the PTFE mask was "over 300 plus degrees, so it's not a concern." The entire caption on the post with a photograph of a woman wearing a blue mask read: The blue masks that you buy or stores hand you are sprayed with PTFE (Polytetrafluoroethylene). That is synthetic fluoride found in Teflon. Here are some of the possible symptoms/side effects: Fever between 100 & 104 degreesChest TightnessShortness of BreathHeadacheCoughChillsSore Throat  A Tineye.com search for the photograph Dr. Hawk posted of the woman in the mask notes the photograph appeared in 2015 on the website Alibaba.com, a Chinese e-commerce site. The name of the file for the photograph is "polypropylene face masks," and not PTFE or Polytetrafluoroethylene, "Filename: Polypropylene-Face-Masks.jpg_200x200.jpg(200 x 200, 10.4 KB."  The image used on the Facebook post is from an advertisement on the website Wasserstrom.com, a restaurant supply company. The mask is currently unavailable on their website.  Here are examples of Polytetrafluoroethylene masks and Polypropylene masks available on Amazon.com. The Centers for Disease Control recommends wearing a mask to prevent the spread of coronavirus. The CDC recommends Americans wear a mask that has two or more layers of washable, breathable fabric. The CDC recommends Americans do not wear an N95 or surgical masks as they are intended to healthcare workers."  The list of symptoms the post claims that are caused by masks are similar to the COVID-19 symptoms described by the CDC: People with COVID-19 have had a wide range of symptoms reported - ranging from mild symptoms to severe illness. Symptoms may appear 2-14 days after exposure to the virus. People with these symptoms may have COVID-19:Fever or chillsCoughShortness of breath or difficulty breathingFatigueMuscle or body achesHeadacheNew loss of taste or smellSore throatCongestion or runny noseNausea or vomitingDiarrheaThis list does not include all possible symptoms. CDC will continue to update this list as we learn more about COVID-19.  
      See who is sharing it (it might even be your friends...) and leave the link in the comments.:
     Lead Stories is working with the CoronaVirusFacts/DatosCoronaVirus Alliance, a coalition of more than 100 fact-checkers who are fighting misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic. Learn more about the alliance here. Alexis Tereszcuk is a writer and fact checker at Lead Stories and an award-winning journalist who spent over a decade breaking hard news and celebrity scoop with RadarOnline and Us Weekly.As the Entertainment Editor, she investigated Hollywood stories and conducted interviews with A-list celebrities and reality stars.  Alexis’ crime reporting earned her spots as a contributor on the Nancy Grace show, CNN, Fox News and Entertainment Tonight, among others. 
    Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
      
    Spotted something? Let us know!.
     Please select all the ways you would like to hear from Lead Stories LLC: You can unsubscribe at any time by clicking the link in the footer of our emails. For information about our privacy practices, please visit our website. We use Mailchimp as our marketing platform. By clicking below to subscribe, you acknowledge that your information will be transferred to Mailchimp for processing. Learn more about Mailchimp's privacy practices here. 
       Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
        
        Spotted something?  Let us know!.
      ,
https://fullfact.org/health/ptfe-masks-symptoms/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does Blue surgical masks are sprayed with PTFE, which is harmful to humans. Some masks contain PTFE, but ordinary surgical masks are often made from other materials. PTFE is not generally harmful to humans. PTFE in masks can lead to symptoms such as fever, chest tightness, shortness of breath, headache, cough, chills, sore throat. This appears to be describing polymer fume fever, which only happens if someone is exposed to PTFE heated to high temperatures. A post on Facebook has claimed that disposable masks are sprayed with Polytetrafluoroethylene (PTFE) -  and that exposure to this can lead to symptoms including fever, chest tightness, shortness of breath, headache, cough, chills and a sore throat.  It is true that PTFE is used in some masks, but it is extremely unlikely to cause illness during normal use. PTFE is found in items such as non-stick cookware, some clothing, and various medical instruments, and is most commonly associated with the brand name Teflon. However, the Teflon brand refers to a number of products, not all of which are PTFE, and not all PTFE is Teflon.  Blue surgical face masks, like the ones featured in the Facebook post, are most commonly made out of a different type of plastic called polypropylene rather than PTFE, although PTFE is used in the making of some reusable masks, and some disposable masks can have PTFE filters. The post seems to be referring to the symptoms of polymer fume fever, which is a rare ailment caused by inhaling fumes from PTFE heated above 300 to 400 degrees Celsius, such as when a PTFE pan is overheated. Symptoms can resemble flu, like those in the post.  There is no evidence that anyone would suffer from this condition as a result of the normal wearing of a mask made with PTFE.  Correction 13 November 2020 A previous version of this article used PTFE and Teflon interchangeably which is not accurate as not all Teflon-branded products contain PTFE and not all PTFE is Teflon. The article has been updated to reflect this. This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as partly false
            because PTFE can only cause these symptoms if it is heated to a very high temperature.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://fullfact.org/health/Serco-test-and-trace/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does The NHS test and trace app was created by Serco, not the NHS. Serco did not build and does not operate the NHS test and trace app. We’ve seen multiple claims that suggest the recently launched NHS Test and Trace app for England and Wales is not made by and owned by the NHS, but by Serco, a private company that is contracted to provide a range of public services. Firstly, Serco played no role in the creation of the NHS Test and Trace app. This is shown in numerous ways—the company is not listed as a group involved in the app, which includes arms of the NHS, as well as staff from the private firm Accenture, and the company is not mentioned in relation to the app in coverage Serco is not listed as processing any data in the app’s privacy notice. Confusion may have stemmed from the fact that Serco does play a role in the Test and Trace process, rather than the app itself. Along with other companies, Serco is contracted to manage facilities at some regional test sites as well as some aspects of contact tracing via call centres for pillar 2 tests, (which are tests taken by members of the public). However, this work is separate from the app.  It’s unclear where this claim first originated, although Russia Today did claim Serco were behind the app in May.  Contracts awarded to Serco by the government can be found in the awarded and closed section of gov.uk’s Contracts Finder tool. This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as false
            because Serco has nothing to do with the NHS Covid-19 Test and Trace app.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://fullfact.org/online/government-consultation-covid-vaccine-unlicensed/,Our fact checking systematically raises standards in public debate and changes the behaviour of powerful actors We’re campaigning to tackle bad information online, protect our elections and improve the quality of information in public debate Our policy work aims to improve the information environment, in order to protect and encourage good public debate Our technology and training work is designed to help everyone work faster and smarter Bad information ruins lives. We’re a team of independent fact checkers and campaigners who find, expose and counter the harm it does After 18 September, the government is going to say that because there were no objections, they will roll out unlicensed vaccines. Unlicensed (rather than untested) vaccines are already allowed to be rolled out by the government in circumstances such as a pandemic. The government is consulting on whether to clarify the rules around this. These unlicensed vaccines will be administered by non-medical staff, such as your employer. The government is consulting the public on whether to change the rules around who can administer certain vaccines, which may include some people who don’t normally administer them, including some who aren’t registered healthcare professionals. It does not specifically mention employers. The public won’t be able to claim compensation if unlicensed vaccines damage our health. They will in some cases. If the product doesn’t meet safety standards or is defective, then the manufacturer is liable. 
The consultation aside, it’s already true that if the government recommends the roll-out of an unlicensed product, manufacturers can’t usually be sued in civil court for the consequences. A number of posts on Facebook and Twitter have used a link to a government consultation about vaccines to make a number of unfounded claims about government changes to how vaccines are introduced in the UK. One such post reads: “After 18th Sept, The Government are going to say they consulted the public and because there were no objections, we all want and consent to the rollout of unlicensed #vaccines, and that we are happy for non-medical staff to administer them and happy to accept we will not have the ability to ask for compensation if we face damage to our health.” Although there is a genuine consultation happening on the subject of unlicensed vaccines, in general these claims are misleading. The government can already roll-out unlicensed (but not untested) vaccines during a public health emergency, and this consultation is proposing to clarify the rules around doing this. As we can’t fact check what the government might do in future, here we’ve focussed on what the consultation document proposes doing. Honesty in public debate matters You can help us take action – and get our regular free email Some of these posts imply that unlicensed vaccines are untested, which is not the case. An “unlicensed” vaccine for Covid-19 or anything else, does not mean it’s not been tested. As we’ve written before, any vaccine rolled out to the public, unlicensed or not, still has to go through extensive clinical trials. This would include a Covid-19 vaccine. Licensing happens after the vaccine has gone through all three phases of pre-launch trials, which usually means the vaccine has already been tested on thousands of adults. Licensing is when experts within the national Medicines and Healthcare products Regulatory Agency (or the EU regulators, up to the end of the transition period) review the results of the trials. The standards of vaccines generally have to be much higher than those for medication to treat illnesses, as vaccines are usually given to healthy people to prevent disease. The government is asking people to respond to its proposals to change certain aspects of the Human Medicines Regulations 2012. The proposed changes would make it easier for the government to roll-out a Covid-19 vaccine to a large number of people, faster than usual. There are five main proposed changes. Regulation 174 of the Human Medicines Regulations already allow the licensing authority to temporarily grant authorisation to an unlicensed medicinal product in the case of certain types of public health threat, such as a pandemic. The government is not planning to change that regulation, but instead “To provide transparency, we propose to amend the [Human Medicines Regulations] to make it explicit that the supply of products, including COVID-19 vaccines, which is temporarily authorised under regulation 174 may be subject to conditions.” So the plan is to make the rules around fast tracking unlicensed vaccines stricter, not looser. The consultation goes on to say that “a COVID-19 vaccine would only be authorised in this way if the licensing authority was satisfied that there was sufficient evidence to demonstrate the safety, quality and efficacy of the vaccine, in the particular context in which the licensing authority was asked to take that decision.” The government confirms that the decision to roll-out vaccination programmes for unlicensed vaccines will be taken nationally, and not by individual companies. The consultation suggests clarifying some of the rules around who is liable for potential problems around unlicensed medicines.  The government consultation document states that the law “does not provide complete immunity from civil liability.” And if the product is not found to meet safety standards or is defective, then the company will be liable.  However, it’s already true that manufacturers “cannot generally be sued in the civil courts for the consequences resulting from the use of an unlicensed product, or a new use of a licensed product, that a national licensing authority is recommending in order to deal with certain specific health threats”, according to a government consultation document.  We’ve written an entire piece on this issue, which you can read here. At the moment, only “doctors and other qualified prescribers” can normally authorise the administration of unlicensed vaccines. The consultation proposes making administering unlicensed vaccines easier for people like “midwives, nursing associates, operating department practitioners, paramedics, physiotherapists and pharmacists”, and some others in related fields, who aren’t normally allowed to administer products without “full marketing authorisation” such as dieticians or radiographers.  The consultation also recommends allowing “people who are not registered healthcare professionals, to safely administer a licensed or temporarily authorised COVID-19 or influenza vaccine”, which seems to be what the Facebook posts are referring to. The consultation does not specifically mention employers. The government adds: “Any additional workforce operating under the national protocol to administer vaccines will be trained and shown to be competent via an NHS and PHE approved training programme to ensure patient safety”. The consultation document also recommends allowing temporarily authorised products, such as a future Covid-19 vaccine, to be advertised to the public and healthcare professionals. Currently, the promotion of any unlicensed medical products is banned. The government also proposes simplifying the rules around how vaccine supplies are moved between service providers, to allow any problems with supply between organisations to be swiftly solved. The consultation says these measures would be temporary. This article is part of our work fact checking potentially false pictures, videos and stories on Facebook. You can read more about this—and find out how to report Facebook content—here.

        For the purposes of that scheme, we’ve rated this claim as missing context
            because although the government has put out a consultation on unlicensed vaccines, that does not mean the vaccines have not been fully tested, and people would be able to get compensation in some circumstances, for example if the vaccine didn’t meet safety standards.
         Full Fact fights for good, reliable information in the media, online, and in politics. Bad information ruins lives. It promotes hate, damages people’s health, and hurts democracy. You deserve better. Full Fact, 17 Oval Way, London, SE11 5RR Full Fact is a registered charity (no. 1158683) and a non-profit company (no. 06975984) limited by guarantee and registered in England and Wales. © Copyright 2010-2024 Full Fact. Thanks to Bytemark for donating our web hosting.
                        
                        Privacy, terms and conditions.,
https://leadstories.com/hoax-alert/2020/11/fact-check-calling-cv-vaccine-effective-does-not-mean-it-does-not-stop-transmission.html,Does the first study of an effective COVID-19 vaccine show that it only reduces symptoms without stopping transmission? No, that's not true: The transmission part of the study is not complete, so it's too soon to say, either way. But, among infectious diseases that spread person-to-person, this would be the only vaccine that didn't both prevent infection of the vaccinated patient while also slowing community spread of the disease. The U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the Department of Health and Human Services have both long issued blanket advisories in favor of vaccination because (except in the case of soil-transmitted tetanus) vaccination prevents the vaccinated patient from getting sick and also prevents person-to-person transmission. The premature claim that newly-announced COVID-19 vaccines "do nothing" for community spread appeared in a tweet (archived here) published by @melissa4truth on November 15, 2020. The post by Melissa Floyd, who calls herself the "health freedom educator," read: Calling the CV vaccine "effective" doesn't mean it stops transmission--It may only reduce symptoms in the person getting it. Which means it does nothing for community spread. 🤔 But you still need it every year anyway. AND need to wear a mask. AND socially distance forever. 🤷🏻‍♀️ This is what the post looked like on Twitter at the time of writing:   (Source: Twitter screenshot taken on Mon Nov 16 21:36:45 2020 UTC) This claim confuses two separate things, said Dr. Anna Wald, Head of the Allergy and Infectious Diseases Division at the University of Washington School of Medicine. "One, whether vaccines prevent community transmission - yes - and whether the current study shows it prevents community spread - not yet," Wald said in a November 16, 2020 phone interview with Lead Stories: We have experience from other vaccines, knowing that's what vaccines do: they prevent community spread. While she is awaiting the full long-term study of the effects of the two COVID-19 vaccines that have been announced this month, Wald said it would be "bizzare" if the vaccine that has been shown to prevent COVID-19 does not also slow community spread. She said it's only logical: There's no placebo, control group study that you need a parachute to jump off a plane. You have to be a little reasonable, here. Dr. Otto Yang, a professor of medicine in the infectious diseases division at the David Geffen School of Medicine at UCLA, wrote in a November 16, 2020 email to Lead Stories that it is unlikely a COVID-19 vaccine will not slow spread of the disease. It is within the realm of possibility, although far-fetched. Generally, the amount of virus tracks with the degree of symptoms, and the amount of virus determines contagiousness. Even though SARS-CoV-2 is contagious up to 2 days before symptoms, it is most contagious early after symptoms develop. So, it would be extremely surprising if the vaccine stopped symptomatic disease without reducing or stopping virus production. What stops Dr. Wald from flat-out declaring the new vaccines prevent community spread is that there hasn't been the kind of research and data analysis examining a vital distinction: whether the vaccine prevents coronavirus infection or fights the resulting disease, COVID-19 or does both. "What we know about biology is that doesn't really make any sense. If you stop severe disease, you will actually stop transmission as well," but she said that's what makes her work as a vaccinologist interesting. Wald and her University of Washington colleagues faced the first major outbreak of COVID-19 in the U.S. and she now works full-time on clinical research and also treating COVID patients. She said Tetanus is the only vaccine that cannot be said to prevent community spread, since since it does not spread person-to-person. It's spread when cuts or other punctures in the skin are exposed to contaminated soil or manure. Yang dismissed out of hand the Twitter post's claim that vaccination will not slow or stop the spread of COVID-19: Smallpox was eradicated globally through vaccination, not any other measures. Polio is almost gone; at least one strain of it has gone extinct. Diseases like measles are essentially gone from the USA...Saying that vaccines don't reduce spread of illnesses through populations is so illogical it's hard to argue against. It's as if I were to say 'seat belts don't save lives.' Well, all the data say they do. None of the official announcements about COVID-19 vaccines being found to be effective have declared it will need to be renewed yearly, or that people will have to socially distance "forever." The only vaccine announcement available at the time Floyd posted her claims was this news release by Pfizer and BioNTech which said the vaccine candidate they have developed was more than 90% effective in preventing COVID-19 in study participants who showed no signs of prior SARS-CoV-2 infection. At the time of writing, no COVID-19 vaccine had been approved by the FDA. Floyd is half of a podcast team that takes a generally skeptical view of vaccination. She lists her credentials as "health freedom educator" and mother. The CDC's scientists strongly encourage vaccination, both to prevent your own illness, and also to slow the spread of infectious disease: Most vaccine-preventable diseases are spread from person to person. If one person in a community gets an infectious disease, he can spread it to others who are not immune. But a person who is immune to a disease because she has been vaccinated can't get that disease and can't spread it to others. The more people who are vaccinated, the fewer opportunities a disease has to spread. The U.S. Department of Health and Human Services similarly urges vaccination as a means of wiping out infectious disease: That means even people who can't get vaccinated will have some protection from getting sick. And if a person does get sick, there's less chance of an outbreak because it's harder for the disease to spread. Eventually, the disease becomes rare -- and sometimes, it's wiped out altogether. 
      See who is sharing it (it might even be your friends...) and leave the link in the comments.:
     Lead Stories is working with the CoronaVirusFacts/DatosCoronaVirus Alliance, a coalition of more than 100 fact-checkers who are fighting misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic. Learn more about the alliance here. Lead Stories Managing Editor Dean Miller has edited daily and weekly newspapers, worked as a reporter for more than a decade and is co-author of two non-fiction books. After a Harvard Nieman Fellowship, he served as Director of Stony Brook University's Center for News Literacy for six years, then as Senior Vice President/Content at Connecticut Public Broadcasting. Most recently, he wrote the twice-weekly "Save the Free Press" column for The Seattle Times.  
    Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
      
    Spotted something? Let us know!.
     Please select all the ways you would like to hear from Lead Stories LLC: You can unsubscribe at any time by clicking the link in the footer of our emails. For information about our privacy practices, please visit our website. We use Mailchimp as our marketing platform. By clicking below to subscribe, you acknowledge that your information will be transferred to Mailchimp for processing. Learn more about Mailchimp's privacy practices here. 
       Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
        
        Spotted something?  Let us know!.
      ,
https://leadstories.com/hoax-alert/2020/12/fact-check-a-woman-who-developed-sores-on-her-feet-did-not-have-a-trial-dose-of-the-covid19-vaccine.html,Did a COVID-19 vaccine cause terrible sores to erupt on the feet of one of the participants in the vaccine trial? No, that's not really true: While it is true that this woman is dealing with large painful sores on her feet that have been identified by multiple doctors to be a type of adverse reaction called a "fixed drug eruption," she now understands that the reaction was not caused by the vaccine. She was a participant in the vaccine trial, but was one of the people in the control group who received the placebo: injections of sterile saline. She has tested negative for COVID antibodies, further proof that she had not received the vaccine. The claim appears in a post (archived here) published on December 4, 2020. The post contains screenshots with the caption: This is what the post looked like on Facebook at the time of writing:   (Source: Facebook screenshot taken on Tue Dec 8 15:49:42 2020 UTC) The screenshots, which show photos of the sores on the woman's feet, were taken from a November 12, 2020, GoFundMe page that was started by the woman's cousin. This GoFundMe (archived here) is now marked as having met its goal. Because the woman, Patricia, was in the control group, she and the doctors who initially saw her did not know whether or not she had received the vaccine at the time that this mysterious thing happened to her feet. The GoFundMe page, which says she lives in Texas, has been updated regularly as new information surfaced. On November 30, 2020, Patricia posted an update with the news that she had only received the placebo. There's been some breaking news.The manufacturer of the vaccine is standing their ground stating that they unblinded me and revealed that I was in the placebo arm of the trial.... WHUT???!Multiple doctors told me this condition was caused by the injection, including a dermatologist and the emergency room attending physician.What caused this condition is a baffling mystery, as the medications that tend to cause this, are either A. not new to me, for example NSAIDS (acetaminophen, ibuprofen) are things I've been taking for YEARS to manage my back pain, or B. things I don't use (such as anti-epileptics, sulfa drugs, which I am allergic to, and Big Red soda, which I have only had as a kid). Patricia started a YouTube channel to share updates and to answer some of the questions people have. One of the first videos she posted on November 23, 2020, was to show her feet and her face in the same frame as proof for people who were questioning if the feet with the sores in the photos were really her feet. She says that she has received a lot of bullying and harassment over this. In the comments section of her November 27 video titled, "Update + more info:)," Patricia explains that she has tested negative with the antibody test. Some people have questioned if she was truly in the control group, or if that was just what she was told. The negative antibody test serves as proof to Patricia that she did not receive the vaccine. She has not had COVID-19 previously -- having the virus would trigger antibody production -- or any other coronavirus test vaccine that might have created antibodies. The most recent video update about her medical situation was posted to her channel on December 2, 2020, is titled, "FDE update 12/1." This video was filmed after a visit to a podiatrist and she shows off her new footwear. Patricia gives this update:  He agrees that it is definitely fixed drug eruption and finally he's going to send a wound care person, in-home wound care. He agrees it's from the Ketoprofen, which is basically it's like really strong Ibuprofen, prescription Ibuprofen.I told him the whole lowdown and everything, the whole story, showed him the pictures... and he was like, "Yeah if you got placebo, I don't think so... it's got to be that Ibuprofen/Ketoprofen." It seems that Patricia has been forthcoming with updates about her medical condition as soon as she got the information herself. According to her own accounts, she and her doctors are dealing with some questions that can be difficult or impossible to answer. The information that was shared on the GoFundMe page at the outset dates from a time that Patricia, her doctors and her cousin did not know that Patricia was a member of the control group in the study and therefore were unaware that she had not received any doses of the COVID-19 vaccine.  Lead Stories is working with the CoronaVirusFacts/DatosCoronaVirus Alliance, a coalition of more than 100 fact-checkers who are fighting misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic. Learn more about the alliance here. Sarah Thompson lives with her family and pets on a small farm in Indiana. She founded a Facebook page and a blog called “Exploiting the Niche” in 2017 to help others learn about manipulative tactics and avoid scams on social media. Since then she has collaborated with journalists in the USA, Canada and Australia and since December 2019 she works as a Social Media Authenticity Analyst at Lead Stories. 
  
    Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
      
    Spotted something? Let us know!.
     Please select all the ways you would like to hear from Lead Stories LLC: You can unsubscribe at any time by clicking the link in the footer of our emails. For information about our privacy practices, please visit our website. We use Mailchimp as our marketing platform. By clicking below to subscribe, you acknowledge that your information will be transferred to Mailchimp for processing. Learn more about Mailchimp's privacy practices here. 
       Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
        
        Spotted something?  Let us know!.
      ,
https://leadstories.com/hoax-alert/2020/12/fact-check-vaccines-are-not-primarily-designed-to-improve-survival-rates-of-those-already-infected-they-work-by-reducing-the-risk-of-infection.html,Are coronavirus vaccines primarily designed to improve survival rates of those already infected? No, that's not true: Vaccines are designed to reduce the risk of infection in the first place. The claim appeared in a Facebook post (archived here) published by Chad Prather on December 18, 2020. The post read: This is what the post looked like at the time of writing:   (Source: Facebook screenshot taken on Wed Dec 23 16:06:22 2020 UTC) The post, which does not mention a disease but is clearly referring to COVID-19, displays a misunderstanding of vaccines, suggesting that we won't know that the COVID-19 vaccines are working because we won't see a significant shift in the reported survival rate. That's not how vaccines work. Vaccines primarily work by reducing the risk of infection. The hope with the COVID-19 vaccines, as with all vaccines, is that people who otherwise would have contracted the disease, won't get it. A widespread vaccination effort would mean dramatically fewer infections, case counts and deaths. Of course, it's entirely possible that someone who gets the vaccine could still contract COVID-19. At this early stage, experts can't say for certain what impact -- if any -- the vaccine would have on that person's outcome. However, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), the vaccine may help. Here's the CDC: Based on what we know about vaccines for other diseases and early data from clinical trials, experts believe that getting a COVID-19 vaccine may also help keep you from getting seriously ill even if you do get COVID-19. The post is more or less correct when it cites a survival rate of around 99.7%, although there is a good bit of debate around that exact number and the challenges in calculating an estimate. The figure would vary wildly -- depending on a person's age, underlying conditions, access to treatment and other factors -- but at its simplest level, the survival rate could be defined as the number of deaths divided by the number of confirmed COVID-19 cases. As of December 23, 2020, there were 325,520 reported deaths and 18,407,728 confirmed cases in the United States, which translates into a survival rate of approximately 99.98%. Of course, it's worth noting, that even with such a seemingly high survival rate, close to 325,000 Americans have died from COVID-19. That count will surely grow in the coming months. Back in March, Dr. Anthony Fauci, director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Disease, cautioned against focusing on what may look like a low mortality rate. Testifying before Congress, he said: If you count all the cases of minimally symptomatic or asymptomatic infection -- that probably brings the mortality rate down to somewhere around 1%, which means it is 10 times more lethal than the seasonal flu. You can watch a clip from his testimony here: 
 
      See who is sharing it (it might even be your friends...) and leave the link in the comments.:
     Lead Stories is working with the CoronaVirusFacts/DatosCoronaVirus Alliance, a coalition of more than 100 fact-checkers who are fighting misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic. Learn more about the alliance here. Dana Ford is an Atlanta-based reporter and editor. She previously worked as a senior editor at Atlanta Magazine Custom Media and as a writer/ editor for CNN Digital. Ford has more than a decade of news experience, including several years spent working in Latin America. 
    Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
      
    Spotted something? Let us know!.
     Please select all the ways you would like to hear from Lead Stories LLC: You can unsubscribe at any time by clicking the link in the footer of our emails. For information about our privacy practices, please visit our website. We use Mailchimp as our marketing platform. By clicking below to subscribe, you acknowledge that your information will be transferred to Mailchimp for processing. Learn more about Mailchimp's privacy practices here. 
       Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
        
        Spotted something?  Let us know!.
      ,
https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/covid-vaccine-unprotected-sex/,About this rating   In late December 2020, social media users shared a copy-and-pasted meme that falsely claimed pharmaceutical company Pfizer recommended that members of the public receiving its COVID-19 vaccine should use birth control because "genetic manipulation" resulting from the vaccine could lead to birth defects. Here's an example of the meme:  The accompanying link did not lead to safety instructions accompanying the Pfizer vaccine, which has been approved by the U.S. government for emergency use, as the meme insinuates. Instead, the link led to a publicly available document outlining the methods used in a crucial Pfizer/BioNTech clinical trial for the vaccine that is currently in use. The trial is ongoing. Further, page 132 of that study does not state that unprotected sex should be avoided due to risk of birth defects resulting from "genetic manipulation." There is no mention of birth defects or genetic manipulation resulting from the vaccine on page 132. The Pfizer document instead recommended that study participants take measures to avoid pregnancy for 28 days after the last vaccine dose during the trial, a time period "which corresponds to the time needed to eliminate reproductive safety risk" of the vaccine. This is a broad recommendation for all clinical trials of new pharmaceuticals with unknown reproductive risks. The broad guidance for such clinical trials can be seen outlined by the National Institutes of Health. This boilerplate precaution for clinical trials isn't evidence that the COVID-19 vaccine currently in use in the U.S. harms pregnant women or fetuses. The U.S. government has so far approved for emergency use two mRNA vaccines against COVID-19 developed by both Pfizer and Moderna. The vaccines do have side effects like fatigue, fever and headache, as well as localized pain. The claim that the Pfizer vaccine, which is given in two doses, results in birth defects from "genetic manipulation" is likely influenced by viral, false claims that COVID-19 vaccines alter or damage human DNA. Per the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), "Women who are trying to become pregnant do not need to avoid pregnancy after receiving an mRNA COVID-19 vaccine." As the CDC noted, "experts believe that mRNA vaccines are unlikely to pose a risk to the pregnant person or the fetus. However, the potential risks of mRNA vaccines to the pregnant person and the fetus are unknown because these vaccines have not been studied in pregnant people." If pregnant people are among high-risk groups currently being vaccinated, like medical personnel, they can still receive the vaccine, per the CDC. No major safety concerns have been reported to be associated with the Pfizer and Moderna vaccines. Bethania Palma is a journalist from the Los Angeles area who has been working in the news industry since 2006. Alex Kasprak is an investigative journalist and science writer reporting on scientific misinformation, online fraud, and financial crime.  Company Navigate Sections Account © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc. This material may not be reproduced without permission. Snopes and the Snopes.com logo are registered service marks of Snopes.com,
https://www.snopes.com/news/2020/12/29/fight-covid-home/, We refer to repeatedly copy-and-pasted text shared across multiple digital platforms as "copypasta" — a sort of chain email for the social media age. Copypasta has been a major feature of the COVID-19 pandemic and the misinformation associated with it, often claiming to provide anonymously sourced  "insider" information on how to treat, cure, or avoid the disease that is often incorrect and dangerous. As always, we remind our readers that anonymous claims on the internet should never be taken as factual, efficacious, or even safe. In late December 2020, a piece of copypasta allegedly written by someone whose friend "came down with Covid in November" and received information from a nurse on how to fight the disease "at home" went viral: HOW TO FIGHT COVID AT HOME No one ever talks about how to fight Covid at home. A friend came down with Covid in November. She went to the hospital, running a fever of 103, a rapid heart beat, and other common symptoms that come with Covid. While she was there they treated her for the high fever, dehydration and pneumonia. The doctor sent her home to fight Covid with two prescriptions - Azithromycin 250mg & Dexamethason [sic] 6mg. When the nurse came in to discharge her, she asked her, "What can I do to help fight this at home?" [...] Though the post, narratively speaking, seems to make a series of recommendations for post-hospitalization recovery, the title — and several of the points made throughout — suggest or mislead the reader into thinking these tips are meant to be preventive or curative in absence of, or prior to, hospitalization. This latter interpretation is the most problematic way to view these suggestions. In some cases, the suggestions have some scientific basis but are misapplied to home-care situations; in others, the information is flat out wrong. In general, experts say, the post's content risks providing people who are actually sick a reason to delay professional care that could be life-saving. Below, we go through the post point by point. The post makes this claim: Sleep on your stomach at all times with Covid. If you can’t sleep on your stomach because of heath issues sleep on your side. Do not lay on your back no matter what because it smashes your lungs and that will allow fluid to set in. This advice is not applicable to home care. In the medical world, placing patients on their stomach (the prone position) for respiratory reasons is known as proning. Evidence that predates the COVID-19 pandemic derived from patients who have Acute Respiratory Distress Syndrome (ARDS) suggests that patients who require ventilation in an ICU setting could benefit from prolonged time in the prone position. A limited study of proning in severe cases of COVID-19 in an ICU setting suggests some benefit as well. Though a clinical trial is underway investigating the question, no evidence suggests any benefit to a person who does not already require ventilation. If you require ventilation you should not, it bears highlighting, be attempting home care. David Vines, a principal investigator on the COVID-19 trial for proning in milder cases, told Snopes by email that with around 200 patients participating so far, they "have not seen a significant trend in benefit or harm." "The concern with the public using the prone positioning at home to lessen symptoms," Vines told us, is that using this technique "may delay necessary medical care with proven benefits. Their delay in receiving this care from a medical provider could result in their death," he explained, stressing that "anyone having trouble breathing, bluish lips, or inability to stay awake should seek emergency care immediately." Building off the flawed assertions about sleeping in the prone position, the post additionally claims: Set your clock every two hours while sleeping on your stomach, then get out of bed and walk for 15-30 min, no matter how tired or weak that you are. Also move your arms around frequently, it helps to open your lungs. Breathe in thru your nose, and out thru your mouth. This will help build up your lungs, plus help get rid of the Pneumonia or other fluid you may have. When sitting in a recliner, sit up straight - do not lay back in the recliner, again this will smash your lungs. While watching TV - get up and walk during every commercial. At least as phrased here, this is dangerous advice. The notion that you should exercise even if you feel too "tired or weak" goes against virtually all medical advice regarding breathing and COVID-19. Shortness of breath from basic activities like short walks is an indicator that professional medical care may be needed, according to Joseph Khabbaza, a pulmonary doctor at Cleveland Clinic who spoke to WBUR about caring for a COVID patient at home: The main indication for going to the hospital would be shortness of breath — and that kind of is a general term. But if you find you're winded just from walking from the bedroom to the bathroom, that's a good gauge that you might be short of breath because significant lung inflammation may be developing. You also may be short of breath because your oxygen level is too low. The lungs cannot absorb enough oxygen to meet the needs to do such a small task, such as walking to the bathroom. That is really the most important thing because the way this virus can kill people is by that respiratory failure that lands people on the ventilator. The earlier recognition of that, the better. Broadly speaking, the advice regarding breathing exercises may be more relevant to people who have spent time in an ICU during the course of their illness with COVID-19. For example, experts with the Johns Hopkins Rehabilitation Network recommend breathing exercises during recovery from COVID-19 hospitalizations, as prolonged time on a respirator weakens muscles in the lungs, among other things. Some of those exercises do involve arm movements that increase oxygen capacity in the lungs. Again, though, even in recovery, the notion that you should work through exhaustion is dangerous. On the Hopkins breathing exercise page, the facility explicitly states: When recovering from a respiratory illness like COVID-19, it’s important not to rush recovery. … Only increase repetitions or move to the next phase when you can complete the exercise without feeling too out of breath. The post then makes this claim about staying hydrated with non-cold beverages: Drink Pedialyte, Gatorade Zero, Powerade Zero & Water with Electrolytes to prevent you from becoming dehydrated. Do not drink anything cold - have it at room temperature or warm it up. Water with lemon, and little honey, peppermint tea, apple cider are good suggestions for getting in fluids. In general, staying hydrated is important for maintaining good health, or for replacing fluids lost during a fever. As such the suggestion of water and electrolytes is not controversial. Hydration and electrolytes, as well, are indicated as important for recovery from COVID-19 specifically. Problems emerge, however, with the claim that beverages used for hydration must not be cold. Jennifer Nuzzo, a senior scholar at the Johns Hopkins Center for Health Security, addressed the notion that cold water is harmful in the context of COVID-19 recovery on a March 20, 2020, edition of Johns Hopkins' "Public on Call" Podcast. "There’s also a claim that if people drink cold water, their lungs will become fibrotic," she told listeners, referring to a condition in which lung tissue is scarred and degraded. "I want to stress that there's no evidence at all to support these claims."  In terms of food, the post asserts: Eat at least 1 - 2 eggs a day, plus bananas, avocado and asparagus.These are good for Potassium. [...] Drink a smoothie of blueberries, strawberries, bananas, honey, tea and a spoon or two of peanut butter. In terms of recovery, these are all fine foods to eat, and many are included on lists specifically made for COVID-19 recovery diets authored by medical professionals. These suggestions should not be considered effective at preventing infection, however. While a link may exist between low blood levels of potassium and severe COVID cases, this fact should not be viewed as evidence that increased potassium uptake could be effective in preventing COVID-19. The copypasta post asserts that people recovering from COVID-19 should not drink dairy or eat pork. This information is not supported by any reputable source. In terms of dairy, it is contradicted by several reputable sources that explicitly recommend dairy products, among many other foods, during COVID-19 recovery. There has been, since long before COVID, a misconception that dairy products create more phlegm in the lungs. While it's possible dairy products make existing phlegm thicker and feel more irritating, it does not actively contribute to production. In terms of pork, we are unclear what exactly the author of the viral post is referring to. There is a belief held by some practitioners of alternative medicine that pork can contribute to "dampness" and phlegm, but this is not supported by peer-reviewed science. While several processed pork products may be counterproductive in terms of health, a ban on pork as a source of protein does not seem to be supported by any COVID-19 related medical advice. The Hospital for Special Surgeries in New York recommends pork chops as a source of meat that contains zinc, for example. Speaking of Zinc, the viral copypasta recommends "Vitamin’s D3, C, B, Zinc" as well as daily probiotics. In terms of recovery following COVID-19 infection, this advice is not at all controversial, though any dietary changes made during recovery from COVID-19 should be assessed by a medical professional. This advice is, however, problematic if interpreted to be a way to "boost" your immune system in a way that could prevent infection from COVID-19. This notion relies on a flawed understanding of how the immune system functions. According to Amesh Adalja, a senior scholar at Johns Hopkins Center for Health Security, “There is no evidence that you can boost your immune system by ... taking specific vitamins or supplements.” The post also makes a series of recommendations regarding over the counter drugs: Tylenol for fever. Mucinex, or Mucinex DM for drainage, plus helps the cough. Pepcid helps for cramps in your legs. One baby aspirin everyday can help prevent getting a blood clot, which can occur from low activity. Any use of drugs, including over-the-counter ones, should be informed by recommendations made by a doctor, nurse, or pharmacist, not online posts — even this one. Both Tylenol, which reduces fevers, and Mucinex, which reduces phlegm, are commonly used to treat symptoms associated with a variety of viral or bacterial infections. However, the use of Pepcid (an antacid used to treat heartburn-related diseases) for leg cramps is unsupported by any research that we are aware of, and the drug is not approved for that purpose. In terms of aspirin, evidence does suggest that COVID-19 patients clot more easily. Hopkins' Adalja, quoted on the Johns Hopkins School of Public Health website, said that, "People with coronavirus have the ability to form clots more easily." In terms of using aspirin to prevent complications from clotting, limited evidence suggests that it may reduce mortality in severe COVID cases that require hospitalization. Evidence for use in milder cases or in non-hospital recovery settings is currently lacking, however. As always, talk to a doctor before starting a regular aspirin regimen for any purpose, as it could lead to other complications. If we interpret the post as presenting recommendations made for people who were hospitalized with COVID-19 and sent home for further recovery, the post misses the mark in several cases described above. If, however, the post is interpreted as ways to keep people safe at home without going to the hospital, the post is dangerous, as it encourages notions that could prolong the decision to seek medical care in urgent situations. All told, it's a good reminder to not get medical advice from posts that end in "copy paste and share." Alex Kasprak is an investigative journalist and science writer reporting on scientific misinformation, online fraud, and financial crime.  Company Navigate Sections Account © 1995 - 2024  by Snopes Media Group Inc. This material may not be reproduced without permission. Snopes and the Snopes.com logo are registered service marks of Snopes.com,
https://www.factcheck.org/2020/11/danish-study-doesnt-prove-masks-dont-work-against-the-coronavirus/, By Jessica McDonald Posted on November 25, 2020 Q: Did a recent study in Denmark show that face masks are useless for COVID-19? A: No. The study found that face masks did not have a large protective effect for wearers — not that masks provide no protection at all or don’t offer benefits to others.   Are masks proven to be useless for COVID-19? News of the results of a recent randomized controlled trial in Denmark testing a face mask intervention has led some to conclude that masks are ineffective against the coronavirus, or SARS-CoV-2.  But scientists say that’s the wrong takeaway — and even the authors of the study say the results shouldn’t be interpreted to mean masks shouldn’t be worn. The trial evaluated whether giving free surgical masks to volunteers and recommending their use safeguarded wearers from infection with the coronavirus, in addition to other public health recommendations. The study didn’t identify a statistically significant protective effect for wearers, but the trial was only designed to detect a large effect of 50% or more. And the study didn’t weigh in on the ability of masks to prevent spread of the virus from wearers to others, or what’s known as source control, which is thought to be the primary way that masks work. As a result, the most that can be said is that this particular study, under the conditions at the time in Denmark, didn’t find that the face mask intervention had a large protective effect for wearers — not that masks provide no protection at all or don’t offer benefits to others.  Social media posts nevertheless latched onto the study to claim that the trial “proves masks offer NO protection from COVID” or that masks “don’t work,” as several posts claimed. Another post inaccurately described the results as “conclusive,” despite the fact that the authors specifically wrote that their findings were “inconclusive.” Other articles shared on Facebook failed to provide sufficient context for the study, with one headline from the Ron Paul Institute for Peace and Prosperity reading, “Your Face Mask Is Not Protecting You.” Yet another from Sharyl Attkisson, who has previously spread misinformation about vaccines, misleadingly states that there was “no statistically significant difference when it comes to wearing a mask or not outside the home to prevent Covid-19 spread.” Again, the study only assessed the personal protective effect of a mask intervention, not the potential for masks to hamper spread of the virus to others. The Danish trial, known as the Danish Study to Assess Face Masks for the Protection Against COVID-19 Infection, or DANMASK-19, was published in Annals of Internal Medicine on Nov. 18 along with two editorials to provide more context to the findings. It’s the first randomized controlled trial involving face masks and COVID-19 to report results. Around 6,000 people who left their homes for at least three hours a day participated, with approximately half being given a box of 50 surgical masks and being told to wear a mask whenever outside of their homes, while the other half was not given masks or such a mask recommendation. The study was conducted at a time when Danish authorities were not recommending masks to the general public, so most people both groups would encounter were not likely to be masked. Both groups were told to follow national public health guidance, which included physical distancing, avoiding crowds and washing hands. After a month, 42 people in the mask group, or 1.8%, had been infected with SARS-CoV-2, as measured by at-home finger-prick antibody tests, a positive PCR test result or a COVID-19 diagnosis, compared with 53 people, or 2.1%, in the control group. While fewer people in the masked group became infected — equivalent to an 18% reduction in risk — the difference was not statistically significant, meaning the result may have come about by chance. Given the observed number of infections in each group, the plausible effect of the mask intervention ranged all the way from a 46% decrease in infection to a 23% increase. It’s this negative result that some have interpreted to mean that masks are ineffective. But that’s not how the authors frame their findings. Bundgaard, et al.: Our results suggest that the recommendation to wear a surgical mask when outside the home among others did not reduce, at conventional levels of statistical significance, the incidence of SARS-CoV-2 infection in mask wearers in a setting where social distancing and other public health measures were in effect, mask recommendations were not among those measures, and community use of masks was uncommon. Yet, the findings were inconclusive and cannot definitively exclude a 46% reduction to a 23% increase in infection of mask wearers in such a setting. It is important to emphasize that this trial did not address the effects of masks as source control or as protection in settings where social distancing and other public health measures are not in effect. Elsewhere, the authors noted that the data were “compatible” with a less than 50% degree of self-protection and emphasized that their results “should not be used to conclude that a recommendation for everyone to wear masks in the community would not be effective in reducing SARS-CoV-2 infections, because the trial did not test the role of masks in source control of SARS-CoV-2 infection.” University of Hong Kong infectious disease epidemiologist and mask researcher Benjamin Cowling told us he was not surprised by the findings and said it was important to distinguish between an absence of evidence and evidence of absence on the utility of masks. “In the Danish mask study, their results are consistent with maybe 20% protection conferred by face masks, which is in line with my estimates for influenza,” he said in an email.  “While some readers seem to conclude from the Danish study that masks are not effective, I would only conclude from the Danish study that masks are not /highly effective/, which we already suspected,” he continued, adding that it does not mean that masks are ineffective. “Even 20% protection would be very valuable when we are trying very hard to slow down COVID transmission as much as we can with a range of public health measures.” The paper’s lead author, Dr. Henning Bundgaard of the specialty hospital Rigshospitalet and Copenhagen University Hospital, told Forbes much the same. “Even a small degree of protection is worth using the face masks,” he said, “because you are protecting yourself against a potentially life-threatening disease.” An accompanying editorial penned by the editor-in-chief of the journal and colleagues explained that while the study suggests that the personal protective effect of masks is “likely to be small,” the study “does not disprove the effectiveness of widespread mask wearing.” On the contrary, the editorial argues that together with the other existing data in support of masks, the “results of this trial should motivate widespread mask wearing to protect our communities and thereby ourselves while we await more definitive evidence during this pandemic.” The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention issued an updated scientific brief earlier this month that for the first time emphasized the ability of masks to protect wearers, based on lab studies that find masks can block virus particles and some observational and epidemiology studies. The other editorial — by experts with the public health initiative Resolve to Save Lives, including former CDC director Dr. Thomas Frieden — highlighted several limitations of the study. For one, the trial was done in April and May when there was relatively little virus circulating in Denmark, which might have made it more difficult to pick up a protective effect of mask wearing. Not everyone in the mask group followed through on the advice to wear a mask, either, with 46% of people self-reporting that they wore the masks “as recommended”; 47% “predominantly as recommended”; and 7% “not as recommended.” Most critically, Frieden and colleagues suggested that the antibody tests used to diagnose SARS-CoV-2 infection could have led to a fair number of false positives, especially given the low prevalence of the coronavirus at the time. Even with those false positives evenly distributed between the two groups, that would have biased the result to be negative. Other scientists at Stanford University and George Washington University previously expressed concern with the study design, including the fact that the study was not large enough to identify protective effects less than a 50% reduction in risk, and the likelihood that any results would be misinterpreted. The takeaway about masks, then, is still quite similar to the earlier public health advice, which is that people should wear them, but not assume that they will be protected. That means continuing to follow all public health guidelines, including washing hands and staying physically apart from other people whenever possible. Editor’s note: FactCheck.org does not accept advertising. We rely on grants and individual donations from people like you. Please consider a donation. Credit card donations may be made through our “Donate” page. If you prefer to give by check, send to: FactCheck.org, Annenberg Public Policy Center, 202 S. 36th St., Philadelphia, PA 19104.  Bundgaard, Henning et al. “Effectiveness of Adding a Mask Recommendation to Other Public Health Measures to Prevent SARS-CoV-2 Infection in Danish Mask Wearers: A Randomized Controlled Trial.” Annals of Internal Medicine. 18 Nov 2020. CDC. “Scientific Brief: Community Use of Cloth Masks to Control the Spread of SARS-CoV-2.” Updated 20 Nov 2020. Laine, Christine et al. “The Role of Masks in Mitigating the SARS-CoV-2 Pandemic: Another Piece of the Puzzle.” Annals of Internal Medicine. 18 Nov 2020. Frieden, Thomas R. and Shama Cash-Goldwasser. “Of Masks and Methods.” Annals of Internal Medicine. 18 Nov 2020. Cowling, Benjamin. Professor and Division Head, Division of Epidemiology and Biostatistics, University of Hong Kong. Email to FactCheck.org. 20 Nov 2020. Rosenbaum, Leah. “Lead Researcher Behind Controversial Danish Study Says You Should Still Wear A Mask.” Forbes. 18 Nov 2020. Godoy, Maria. “Wear Masks To Protect Yourself From The Coronavirus, Not Only Others, CDC Stresses.” NPR. 11 Nov 2020. Haber, Noah et al. PubPeer comment on “Face masks for the prevention of COVID-19 – Rationale and design of the randomised controlled trial DANMASK-19.” 8 Sep 2020. McDonald, Jessica. “COVID-19 Face Mask Advice, Explained.” FactCheck.org. 6 Apr 2020. CDC. “Coronavirus Disease 2020 (COVID-19): How to Protect Yourself & Others.” Updated 4 Nov 2020. Q: Is one day isolation sufficient to stop forward transmission of COVID-19?  A: People with COVID-19 could potentially transmit it to others well beyond a day after developing symptoms or testing positive. New guidance from the CDC advises people to isolate until they have been fever-free and with symptoms improving for at least 24 hours, and then take precautions for five days, which covers the period when “most people are still infectious.”,
https://www.factcheck.org/2020/11/paul-misleads-on-natural-infection-and-covid-19-vaccines/, By Jessica McDonald Posted on November 19, 2020 In a tweet, Sen. Rand Paul misleadingly suggested that immunity from “[n]aturally acquired” COVID-19 was better than that from a vaccine. But it’s not known how immunity from the two sources compares — and the entire point of a vaccine is to offer immunity without the risk of getting sick. Paul made his claim in a Nov. 17 tweet in which he listed interim efficacy figures from two ongoing vaccine clinical trials and then provided his own calculation of the “effectiveness” of natural infection with the coronavirus. Great news! – Pfizer vaccine 90% effective– Moderna vaccine 94.5% effective – Naturally acquired COVID-19  99.9982% percent effective*  * (estimating 200 reinfections out of 11 million Americans, which is likely an overestimation of actual reinfections) — Rand Paul (@RandPaul) November 17, 2020  In a follow-up tweet, the Kentucky Republican shared a link to a New York Times article about a new unpublished study that found evidence of some immunity to the coronavirus in most people for at least six months. He commented: “Why does the left accept immune theory when it comes to vaccines, but not when discussing naturally acquired immunity?” Paul, who has previously spread misinformation about childhood vaccines, has inaccurately argued during the COVID-19 pandemic that parts of the U.S. have reached herd, or community, immunity because of preexisting immunity to other coronaviruses. Herd immunity is when enough people in a population are immune to prevent spread of the disease. Public health experts, however, have said that threshold is still a ways off — and that allowing the virus to spread uncontrolled would lead to many needless deaths. A better approach, they say, is to stave off the spread of the virus until a vaccine is widely available. A Paul spokesperson told us that the senator was not suggesting that immunity through natural infection with COVID-19 is better than getting immunity from a vaccine, but rather, “highlighting research that says immunity is real.” We were directed to subsequent tweets, including one in which Paul said he was not “arguing against vaccines” but that COVID-19 patients “can celebrate immunity if lucky enough to survive,” as well as Paul’s support for alternative options to speed along access to COVID-19 vaccines. Still, the efficacy figure Paul provides for natural COVID-19 infection isn’t accurate. And the juxtaposition of the numbers implies a kind of superiority of natural infection over vaccination — a dangerous notion, given that contracting the virus poses a serious risk. As University of Florida biostatistician Natalie Dean pointed out in response to Paul’s tweet, “The key distinction is that vaccines are a SAFE way to achieve immunity. Getting sick with COVID-19 is inherently unsafe. We would never ever tolerate a vaccine that carried even a fraction of the risks of natural infection.” While Paul purports to offer a precise percentage for how “effective” natural infection is relative to vaccines, experts told us that the comparison is premature and faulty.  The efficacy figures for the vaccines come from interim results released in press releases by the two companies, Pfizer and Moderna, and refer to the ability of the vaccines to prevent symptomatic COVID-19 infection in phase 3 trials. (The day after Paul’s tweet, Pfizer announced additional data reflective of the full trial, which showed 95% efficacy.) But the number for natural infection is a broad-strokes calculation Paul made based on reinfections. “We don’t really know how many reinfections there have been,” virologist Angela Rasmussen said in a phone interview, adding that many reinfections have not been confirmed and that efficacy of naturally-acquired immunity “isn’t a thing.” “It’s just really ridiculous to try to use the way that efficacy is calculated in clinical trials for vaccines and apply that to epi[demiologic] data across the entire population,” she said. Dr. Paul Offit, director of the Vaccine Education Center at the Children’s Hospital of Philadelphia and a member of the Food and Drug Administration’s Vaccines and Related Biological Products Advisory Committee, agreed. “Clearly, there are people who can be reinfected. As a general rule, it’s usually more mild reinfection,” he told us. But, he added, “most people aren’t tested, so you don’t really know who’s getting reinfected and who isn’t.” It’s true that reinfections so far appear to be rare, which bodes well both for a vaccine and for people who may have immunity as a result of infection. But no one knows yet how the immunity from each will compare. Most vaccines do not offer quite as good protection from a pathogen as a natural infection will — but of course, a person has to survive or suffer through the infection to get that future protection, sidestepping the entire function of a vaccine. It’s therefore largely irrelevant whether or not vaccine immunity is superior to that from natural infection. There are some instances in which a vaccine does elicit a better immune response. That’s the case for vaccines against human papillomavirus, or HPV; tetanus; Haemophilus influenzae type b; and pneumococcus. Whether COVID-19 will be one of them remains to be seen. Rasmussen said it was possible, but still hypothetical at this point. “We don’t really know. We only know that these vaccines typically induce levels of neutralizing antibody that are comparable to the higher levels of neutralizing antibody that’s been observed in convalescent patients,” she said, referring to the type of antibody that can prevent cells from becoming infected with the virus. Based on the performance of the shingles vaccine, Offit speculated that some of the later-arriving vaccine candidates that include powerful adjuvants, or chemicals that are added to vaccines to boost the immune response, such as those from Sanofi-GSK or Novavax, might be better than natural infection. For both the vaccine and natural infection, important questions about COVID-19 immunity remain. “We do know that most people who get COVID-19 do develop some kind of measurable antibody response, but we don’t know what that really means in terms of protection against either reinfection or whether you will mount protective immune responses upon a re-exposure,” said Rasmussen. As a result, public health officials have cautioned that for now, even if people have previously contracted COVID-19, individuals should still follow the standard recommendations.  The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, for example, advises all people, including those who have recovered from COVID-19, to continue to physically distance, wear masks, wash their hands and avoid crowds. Similarly, the CDC notes that it doesn’t yet know “if or when” it will stop recommending masks or physical distancing after vaccination. This is in contrast to Paul’s assertion that people “can celebrate immunity.” In a Nov. 12 interview on Fox News, Paul used similar language and advocated that people drop these precautions.  “We have 11 million people in our country who’ve already had COVID. We should tell them to celebrate,” he said. “We should tell them to throw away their masks, go to restaurants, live again, because these people are now immune.” A huge question is how durable immunity will be. Although the study Paul highlighted suggests that most people will be protected for at least six months — and might mean they are protected against severe disease for many years — it’s still not definitive, and doesn’t mean that those timeframes will apply to everyone. Shane Crotty, an immunologist at the La Jolla Institute for Immunology and one of the senior authors of the paper, noted on Twitter that the team observed a wide range of immune responses in people, including a lack of a measurable response in some people.  “That led us to speculate,” he said, quoting his manuscript, that “‘it may be expected that at least a fraction of the SARS-CoV-2-infected population with particularly low immune memory would be susceptible to re-infection relatively quickly.’” The CDC, notably, has said that people who have had COVID-19 may still benefit from a coronavirus vaccine. And some experts envision a future in which multiple vaccines are on the table for everyone.  “It strikes me as not unlikely that we will learn what the duration of protection is and people will need — whether naturally infected or vaccinated — to have booster shots over some period of time, once a year, once every two years, once every five years,” Barry Bloom, an immunologist and global health expert at Harvard’s T.H. Chan School of Public Health, said in a press call. In his tweet about the new immunity study, Paul also suggested that Democrats were somehow denying realities about immunity from natural infection. “Why does the left accept immune theory when it comes to vaccines, but not when discussing naturally acquired immunity?” he asked. Scientists, however, objected to Paul’s characterization. “I don’t think anybody’s dismissing [immunity following natural infection]. I think what people are saying is, it’s a bad idea as a strategy for dealing with infection,” said Offit, who noted that 30% to 40% of the population could be considered at high risk for COVID-19. Both Offit and Rasmussen also pointed out that historically, there isn’t a lot of precedent for building herd immunity through natural infection. “People were getting smallpox for millennia,” Rasmussen said, and “the herd immunity threshold was never really reached.” The much safer way of getting to herd immunity is to use a vaccine instead, especially when multiple candidates are on the horizon. “Trying to achieve herd immunity [without a vaccine] would result in hundreds of thousands more — if not millions — of unnecessary deaths and debilitating illness for millions more,” Rasmussen said. “So I think it’s not really right to talk about vaccine-induced herd immunity versus naturally-acquired herd immunity without mentioning the fact that one of them has a very, very large price tag in human lives and quality of life attached to it.” Editor’s note: FactCheck.org does not accept advertising. We rely on grants and individual donations from people like you. Please consider a donation. Credit card donations may be made through our “Donate” page. If you prefer to give by check, send to: FactCheck.org, Annenberg Public Policy Center, 202 S. 36th St., Philadelphia, PA 19104.  Q: Is one day isolation sufficient to stop forward transmission of COVID-19?  A: People with COVID-19 could potentially transmit it to others well beyond a day after developing symptoms or testing positive. New guidance from the CDC advises people to isolate until they have been fever-free and with symptoms improving for at least 24 hours, and then take precautions for five days, which covers the period when “most people are still infectious.”,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/dec/18/facebook-posts/no-new-coronavirus-vaccines-are-not-more-dangerous/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 The ingredient list for the vaccines does not include any of the "toxic" contents listed in the post. The leading vaccines — which have been tested for several months in thousands of people — can cause mild or moderate short-term reactions that resolve without complication. They are not more dangerous than the virus, which has killed over 300,000 Americans and more than 1.6 million people worldwide. A lengthy and popular Facebook post attributed to an alternative medical doctor makes several misleading claims about the new coronavirus vaccines.  Among them: that the new mRNA vaccines can alter human DNA (that’s Pants on Fire); that we don’t need a vaccine because we’ve reached significant herd immunity (we haven’t); and that anyone who has had COVID-19 would not benefit from the vaccine (not true).  The post also erroneously claims that the vaccine contains toxic ingredients like aluminum, mercury "and possibly formaldehyde," and then concludes that, ultimately, receiving the shot is more harmful than contracting the disease itself. "Here’s my bottom line: I would much rather get a COVID infection than get a COVID vaccine," reads the post, which accompanies an image of a man wearing a white physician’s coat. "That would be safer and more effective." Two problems: The list of ingredients cited in the post appears to be pulled from thin air. And a mountain of evidence shows that getting infected with the virus is far more dangerous than the vaccines. The vaccines have been studied for months and have been proven to be safe and effective in tens of thousands of people. COVID-19, by contrast, has killed over 1.6 million people around the world. The post was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.)  When the Pfizer-BioNTech COVID-19 vaccine received emergency use authorization from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration on Dec. 11, its ingredient list was published online in a fact sheet for recipients and caregivers. The list includes mRNA, lipids, salts, sugar and saline solution.  None of the supposedly toxic ingredients listed in the Facebook post appears in the list.  The mRNA used in the Pfizer and Moderna vaccines represent a new vaccine technology, but the research behind it has been underway for some time.   "It's not a novel strategy," said Dr. Paul Offit, director of the Vaccine Education Center at Children’s Hospital of Philadelphia. "This particular notion of using messenger RNA in a vaccine has been around for 20 years. This is just the first product to get above the water to become a commercial project." Traditional vaccines introduce an inactivated or weakened version of a virus for the body to fight against. By contrast, Pfizer and Moderna’s COVID-19 vaccines use messenger RNA, which is a fragment of the virus’ genetic material.  It works by giving the body instructions to produce copies of the protein present on the surface of the coronavirus, without causing sickness from the disease. The immune system then learns to recognize the protein and produce antibodies against it. As for the rest of the ingredients, the lipids are nanoparticles used to encase the RNA, the salts help keep the pH, or acidity, of the vaccine close to that of a person’s body; and the sugar safeguards the nanoparticles when they’re frozen and stops them from sticking together, according to MIT’s Technology Review, which spoke with experts to help decode the contents.  Before injection, the vaccine is mixed with the saline solution, just as many intravenously delivered medicines are, the report said. Moderna also released a similar list of ingredients through the FDA, with a slight difference that may explain the different storage needs for each. The Pfizer vaccine needs to be kept at minus 70 degrees Celsius, while the Moderna vaccine can be shipped at minus 20 degrees Celsius and can be stored in a refrigerator for up to 30 days after that. K. "Vish" Viswanath, a professor of health communication at Harvard’s School of Public Health, told PolitiFact that the post uses common anti-vaccine tactics, such as using what he calls "scientistic" language, as he calls it, and claiming it comes from someone credible.  "This kind of tactic to list ingredients that may or may not be there is not new. Anti-vaccine groups have always used a list of ingredients even after ingredients have been eliminated from vaccines," Viswanath said. "They misinterpret and distort scientific data to advance their agenda." Some people who get vaccinated may develop mild or moderate symptoms as their immune system responds, including headache, soreness or fever, but these side effects are short-lived and not considered serious or life-threatening.  Some skeptics of the vaccine have pointed to the high survival rates for some groups of people who contract COVID-19. But the vaccine isn’t intended just to prevent deaths, health experts note. It’s also about preventing the spread of the virus and infections that could lead to significant long-term health issues.  While the vaccines were developed in record time, they went through rigorous review processes before they were deemed suitable for public use.  For example, the vaccine developed by Pfizer-BioNTech has been studied in clinical trials involving about 44,000 people, with half receiving the vaccine, and the other half receiving a placebo. To receive emergency use authorization from the FDA, the manufacturers had to follow at least half of the participants for at least two months after their vaccinations, and the vaccine had to be proven safe and effective in that population. An FDA analysis of that vaccine’s data found "no specific safety concerns" that would rule out using it for people aged 16 and older.  For Moderna, 30,000 participants have been studied in its trial, with half receiving the vaccine and half receiving a placebo. An interim review of the data found that the vaccine was safe and well-tolerated, with an efficacy rate of 94.5%. Akiko Iwasaki, an immunologist at Yale University, called the post irresponsible. "Where is the data? How can they claim that the vaccines are contaminated with these agents?" Iwasaki wrote in an email. "Getting the vaccine is absolutely not more dangerous than contracting the disease. "The safety of both Pfizer and Moderna mRNA vaccines have been rigorously tested with no serious concerns. COVID-19 has (a) case fatality rate of 2.3%. Vaccine, zero." The U.S. has not reached herd immunity that would significantly hinder the spread of the disease, as the post suggests. In a recent interview with NPR, Dr. Anthony Fauci, the director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases and a member of the White House Coronavirus Task Force, predicted the country could begin to achieve early stages of herd immunity by late spring or summer if people get vaccinated. "I would say 50% would have to get vaccinated before you start to see an impact," Fauci told the outlet. "But I would say 75% to 85% would have to get vaccinated if you want to have that blanket of herd immunity." People not needing to get vaccinated because they already had COVID-19, also doesn’t wash. There isn’t enough information yet to say if or for how long someone is protected after they recover from the disease. Some early evidence suggests that natural immunity may not last very long, but more studies are still needed. The vaccine is expected to provide stronger and likely longer-lasting immunity. In its recently released vaccine recommendations, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention said that vaccination should be offered regardless of whether a person has had a prior infection.   A Facebook post that makes several unsubstantiated claims about the new coronavirus vaccines says the shots contain toxic ingredients and are more dangerous than getting COVID-19. This is bogus. The ingredient lists for the vaccines do not include any of the "toxic" contents listed in the post, and the leading vaccines — which have been tested for several months in thousands of people — are not more dangerous than the virus, which has killed over 300,000 Americans and more than 1.6 million people worldwide. Pants on Fire. 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 Facebook post, Dec. 15, 2020  U.S. Food and Drug Administration, FACT SHEET FOR RECIPIENTS AND CAREGIVERS, accessed Dec. 18, 2020  Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, Understanding and Explaining mRNA COVID-19 Vaccines, Nov. 24, 2020  Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, Use of Pfizer-BioNTech COVID-19 Vaccine: Clinical Considerations, Dec. 12, 2020 Poynter.org, Reporting on the COVID-19 Vaccines, Dec. 14, 2020 MIT Technology Review, What are the ingredients of Pfizer’s covid-19 vaccine?, Dec. 9, 2020  Moderna, Moderna’s COVID-19 Vaccine Candidate Meets its Primary Efficacy Endpoint in the First Interim Analysis of the Phase 3 COVE Study, Nov. 16, 2020  Pfizer, PFIZER AND BIONTECH ANNOUNCE PUBLICATION OF RESULTS FROM LANDMARK PHASE 3 TRIAL OF BNT162B2 COVID-19 VACCINE CANDIDATE IN THE NEW ENGLAND JOURNAL OF MEDICINE, Dec. 10, 2020 Prevention, What’s in the Pfizer and Moderna COVID-19 Vaccines? Experts Explain the Ingredients, Dec. 17, 2020 U.S. Food and Drug Administration, Vaccines and Related Biological Products Advisory Committee Meeting, Dec. 17, 2020 PolitiFact, Ask PolitiFact: Do you have to get the vaccine if you’ve had COVID-19?, Dec. 7, 2020  NPR, Fauci Predicts U.S. Could See Signs Of Herd Immunity By Late March Or Early April, Dec. 15, 2020  New York Times, Officials Stress That the Pandemic ‘Is Not Over Yet’ as U.S. Vaccinations Begin, Dec. 17, 2020  Mayo Clinic, COVID-19 vaccine myths debunked, Dec. 14, 2020 Email interview, Akiko Iwasaki, immunologist at Yale University, Dec. 17, 2020 Phone interview, K. "Vish" Viswanath, professor of health communications at Harvard’s School of Public Health, Dec. 18, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/dec/16/rush-limbaugh/no-american-medical-association-didnt-rescind-stat/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 
A bottle of hydroxychloroquine tablets in Texas City, Texas, on April 7, 2020. (AP/Phillip)
 The American Medical Association never took back its March statement concerning hydroxychloroquine. The group tweeted that Rush Limbaugh’s claim is wrong. The AMA considered a resolution to rescind a previous statement on the drug when the group’s policymaking body met in November. But it ultimately rejected the resolution. The website Limbaugh cited has corrected its story. Conservative radio host Rush Limbaugh falsely claimed that the American Medical Association rescinded a previous statement and came out in support of hydroxychloroquine, the drug pushed by President Donald Trump for months as a potential treatment for COVID-19. "Now all of a sudden the AMA (said) — although very quietly — that hydroxychloroquine is okay," Limbaugh said Dec. 15, telling his millions of listeners that the group’s past statements were meant to hurt Trump. "It’s perfectly fine. Go ahead and use it if you want. It can be helpful." Limbaugh read from an article in the Published Reporter, a website based in South Florida. The website wrote that the AMA "rescinded" a statement related to hydroxychloroquine.  Limbaugh accused the AMA of "knowingly lying about hydroxychloroquine." But as the Poynter Institute reported, the AMA never retracted its statement on the drug. The Published Reporter and other websites that spread similar claims have walked back their reports, and the AMA addressed the matter on Twitter. "In March, AMA urged caution about prescribing hydroxychloroquine off-label to treat #COVID19," the AMA wrote, with a link to Poynter’s Covering COVID-19 newsletter by Al Tompkins. "Our position remains unchanged. Evidence-based #science & practice must guide these determinations."   In March, AMA urged caution about prescribing hydroxychloroquine off-label to treat #COVID19. Our position remains unchanged. Evidence-based #science & practice must guide these determinations. Thank you @Poynter for the #FactCheck to set record straight https://t.co/hz1j1Xz2St pic.twitter.com/2qfUdFqdRk Several inaccurate social media posts from Limbaugh and others accounts were flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.) Some were shared by prominent figures, such as actress Kirstie Alley, who tweeted a since-corrected story calling the AMA "soulless hacks." Limbaugh did not respond to a request for comment.  The AMA’s March 25 statement, issued jointly with pharmacists’ groups and updated in April, signaled opposition to doctors prescribing hydroxychloroquine as a coronavirus treatment or preventative measure, and to facilities ordering the drug in excessive amounts.  The statement cautioned that "no medication has been FDA-approved for use in COVID-19 patients" and warned of supply-chain disruptions for patients who rely on hydroxychloroquine for other chronic conditions, such as rheumatoid arthritis and lupus.  The statement also said "novel off-label use of FDA-approved medications is a matter for the physician’s or other prescriber’s professional judgment." It encouraged "patient-centered care decisions" but said "evidence-based science and practice must guide these determinations." The U.S. Food and Drug Administration in June revoked its emergency use authorization for use of hydroxychloroquine as a COVID-19 therapy. The agency later cautioned against the drug’s use for the virus outside of the hospital setting after a review of safety issues. There is little sign that hydroxychloroquine is effective for coronavirus patients. A resolution submitted ahead of a November meeting of the AMA’s policymaking body proposed that the group retract the March statement. The resolution called for an updated statement "notifying patients that further studies are ongoing" and supporting physicians’ use of judgment to prescribe the drug off-label to patients with early COVID-19 symptoms. The resolution was not adopted, however. The vote against the measure followed "fierce opposition," MedPage Today reported. The Published Reporter has amended the story Limbaugh cited with a correction in bolded font that said the resolution "was not accepted." Lead Stories also debunked the false claims. We rate Limbaugh’s claim False. 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 The Rush Limbaugh Show, "The AMA Quietly Admits They Lied About Hydroxychloroquine," Dec. 15, 2020 American Medical Association on Twitter, Dec. 16, 2020 The Poynter Institute, "When you lie about pandemics and public health, people die," Dec. 16, 2020 Lead Stories, "Fact Check: The American Medical Association Did NOT Rescind Its Original Guidance On Hydroxychloroquine," Dec. 16, 2020 The Published Reporter, "UPDATE: American Medical Association Considers Resolution On Statement Against Prescription Of Hydroxychloroquine For COVID-19 Patients," (archived original), Dec. 11, 2020 The Gateway Pundit, "American Medical Association Votes on Hydroxychloroquine Prevention Order, Keeps it in Place — How Many People Have Died Because of These Soulless Hacks?" (archived original), Dec. 15, 2020 Tweets, Dec. 15, 2020 Blog post, Dec. 14, 2020 American Medical Association, "Proceedings of the November 2020 Special Meeting of the American Medical Association House of Delegates," November 2020 American Medical Association, "AMERICAN MEDICAL ASSOCIATION HOUSE OF DELEGATES (November 2020 Meeting) Report of Reference Committee E," November 2020 MedPage Today, "AMA Policy Throws Shade on Diehard HCQ Docs," Nov. 16, 2020 American Medical Association, "Handbook Addendum - Supplemental Business and Information," Oct. 30, 2020 U.S. Food and Drug Administration, "FDA cautions against use of hydroxychloroquine or chloroquine for COVID-19 outside of the hospital setting or a clinical trial due to risk of heart rhythm problems," July 1, 2020 American Medical Association, "Joint statement on ordering, prescribing or dispensing COVID-19 medications," April 17, 2020 American Medical Association, "AMA, APhA, ASHP issue joint statement about COVID-19 medications," March 15, 2020 PolitiFact, "Lie of the Year: Coronavirus downplay and denial," Dec. 16, 2020 PolitiFact, "Yes, at least five randomized controlled studies say hydroxychloroquine doesn’t help," Aug. 5, 2020 Email correspondence with the American Medical Association, Dec. 16, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/dec/18/ted-cruz/mask-guidance-vaccinated-people-based-science/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 
Sen. Ted Cruz, R-Texas, at the Senate Judiciary Committee's confirmation hearing for Supreme Court nominee Amy Coney Barrett on Oct. 15, 2020, on Capitol Hill in Washington. (AP/Moneymaker)
 U.S. Sen. Ted Cruz, R-Texas, took to Twitter Tuesday to challenge the latest coronavirus guidance as vaccines were being distributed around the country. Cruz responded specifically to Dr. Vin Gupta, a lung and intensive care unit doctor who appeared on MSNBC to caution vaccine recipients against abandoning the kinds of preventative measures public health experts have been emphasizing all year.   "This is one of the misperceptions here: just because you get vaccinated with a second dose, it does not mean you should be participating in things like traveling in the middle of an out-of-control pandemic or that you’re liberated from masks," Gupta told MSNBC’s Chuck Todd. "Everything still applies until all of us get the two-dose regimen, and we don’t think that’s going to happen until June or July."  Many unknowns surround the COVID-19 vaccines from Pfizer and Moderna. For instance, it’s unclear if vaccinations strictly protect infected people from serious illness, or if they also prevent people from getting infected, Gupta said. "Don’t let your guard down just because you got vaccinated," he said. "You might be able to get infected by the virus and pass it on to others." The comment was enough to peeve Cruz, who has previously criticized guidance to wear masks and other measures to prevent the spread of COVID-19. "This is a bizarre, lunatic, totalitarian cult," Cruz said in a tweet responsive to Gupta’s mask-wearing advice. "It’s not about vaccines or protecting people’s lives — it is instead profoundly anti-science, and is only focused on absolute govt control of every aspect of our lives." In July, Cruz faced criticism after he was photographed maskless on an American Airlines flight one month after the airline required passengers to wear face masks while onboard planes. Cruz stirred controversy again when he called Sen. Sherrod Brown, D-Ohio, "a complete ass" for asking a fellow senator to wear a mask while speaking. And in November, as Texas public health officials urged people to avoid large holiday gatherings as daily case numbers reached record highs, Cruz tweeted a graphic with the words "Come and take it" beneath a Thanksgiving turkey. So is the latest round of COVID-19 guidance — urging continued mask-wearing and discouraging travel — "profoundly anti-science" as Cruz claims? "I think [Cruz] is talking beyond his knowledge," said Dr. Jaquelin Dudley, professor of molecular biosciences and associate director of the LaMontagne Center for Infectious Disease at the University of Texas. "This whole thing about mask-wearing, taking a vaccine and social distancing has somehow become a political football instead of, let's just talk about what we know and what we don't know," she said. Cruz’s office did not respond to a request for clarification on precisely what the senator meant by "anti-science." And a spokesperson for the Institute for Health Metrics and Evaluation, the organization for which Gupta works, declined to address Cruz’s comments in an effort to remain apolitical. ("With the issue at hand — responding to comments by a U.S. senator stating that protective measures against COVID-19 constitute "bizarre, lunatic, totalitarian cult" — it would be impossible to make this apolitical," a spokesperson said.) But the guidance highlighted by Gupta is the same messaging that has come from the very top level of the U.S. coronavirus response apparatus. On Monday, Dr. Anthony Fauci, President Donald Trump’s top adviser on the coronavirus crisis, spoke before an online audience and gave the same cautionary advice. "It’s not going to be like turning a light switch on and off. It’s not going to be overnight. It’s going to be gradual. ... I don’t believe we’re going to be able to throw the masks away and forget about physical separation and congregant settings for a while, probably likely until we get into the late fall and early next winter, but I think we can do it," he said. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention also advises that there is not enough information "to say if or when CDC will stop recommending that people wear masks and avoid close contact with others," suggesting that more time is needed for experts to understand how the virus will respond to vaccinated persons. According to Dr. Jonathan Temte of the University of Wisconsin School of Medicine and Public Health, the clinical trials of the vaccine have only looked at how the vaccine prevents illness. Those trials didn’t provide any information on transmission, meaning that vaccinated people could still carry and spread the virus. It takes repeat exposures for the immune system to learn how to best fight off a virus, which is why COVID-19 vaccinations require two doses about three weeks apart, according to the CDC. Clinical trials through the National Institutes of Health tell us that the immune system begins to create a beta version of antibodies after a person receives the first dose of the vaccine. These are the body’s least optimal version of these antibodies. Phase III trials — which test for vaccine efficacy — indicate these initial antibodies are capable of fighting off severe illness caused by the virus, but may be less capable of preventing the virus’ spread.  A second dose of the vaccine helps the body create a new version of antibodies more honed in on fighting COVID-19. A person’s immune system is most capable of fighting off COVID-19 about one month after the initial dose of vaccine.  "Your body learns. You can’t assume that on day one after the vaccine you’re going to be protected and you’re not going to be able to spread the infection," Dudley said. "We don’t have that data yet. There’s been so many things to learn," she said. This is one of the primary sources of uncertainty surrounding the vaccine: whether vaccinated people can be contagious. If vaccinations protect only against illness and not transmissions, achieving herd immunity through vaccination becomes more difficult, according to the peer-reviewed medical journal The Lancet. "Pfizer and Moderna together project that there will be enough vaccines for 35 million individuals in 2020, and perhaps up to 1 billion in 2021," The Lancet wrote. "As a result, many millions of people at high risk of disease will not be immunized any time soon, necessitating the continued use of non-pharmaceutical interventions." Furthermore, it’s also unknown how long immunity will last in a vaccinated person, or how effective vaccination will be in older people or those with underlying comorbidities. The guidance issued by the CDC that urges vaccinated people to continue wearing masks and avoid travel was described by Cruz as "profoundly anti-science." The emerging vaccines each were placed through months of clinical trials that tested for their efficacy in preventing illness. Their efficacy in preventing transmission was not part of the trials and is not yet known. The guidance issued by the public health community is borne out of science’s blind spots in regard to transmission and the gradual pace of vaccine distribution. We rate this claim Pants on Fire. 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 Tweet, Dec. 15, 2020 Austin American-Statesman, American Airlines reaches out to remind Sen. Ted Cruz about face mask use amid coronavirus pandemic, Jul. 14, 2020 CNN, Ted Cruz calls Democratic senator an 'ass' following Senate floor mask dispute, Nov. 17, 2020 Tweet, Nov. 21, 2020 Center for Strategic and International Studies, Online Event: Year-End Reflections on 2020 with Dr. Anthony Fauci, Dec. 14, 2020 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, Frequently Asked Questions about COVID-19 Vaccination, updated Dec. 13, 2020 University of Wisconsin Madison, COVID questions: Transmission after vaccine, face mask effectiveness, Dec. 3, 2020 New York Times, Pfizer’s Covid Vaccine: 11 Things You Need to Know, Dec. 8, 2020 New York Times, Here’s Why Vaccinated People Still Need to Wear a Mask, Dec. 8, 2020 Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory, Systemic and mucosal antibody secretion specific to SARS-CoV-2 during mild versus severe COVID-19, May 23, 2020 The Lancet, COVID-19 vaccines: no time for complacency, Nov. 21, 2020 National Institutes of Health, Investigational COVID-19 therapeutics to be evaluated in large clinical trials, Dec. 17, 2020 Interview, Jaquelin Dudley, professor of molecular biosciences and associate director of the LaMontagne Center for Infectious Disease at the University of Texas, Dec. 17, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/dec/02/blog-posting/former-pfizer-employee-wrong-coronavirus-pandemic-/,
Two workers wave from a window at Pfizer Manufacturing in Puurs, Belgium, on Dec. 2, 2020. (AP/Mayo)
 The coronavirus pandemic is not "effectively over" in the United Kingdom, and it was not nearing its end point in October when a former Pfizer employee claimed it was.  New cases have surged in the U.K. over the last several months. The U.K. recently became the first country to approve the Pfizer coronavirus vaccine for distribution. The U.K. and other countries remain a long way from achieving herd immunity without a vaccine, experts said. It’s wrong to say there’s "no need for vaccines." As Pfizer landed approval to begin distributing its COVID-19 vaccine in the United Kingdom, a former company employee’s wrong claims downplaying the pandemic recirculated online. The social media posts rely on statements made by Michael Yeadon, who argued in an Oct. 16 blog post that the coronavirus pandemic is "effectively over" in the U.K., and that "there is absolutely no need for vaccines to extinguish the pandemic." The posts suggest that Yeadon’s connection to Pfizer makes his views on the pandemic and vaccines credible.  "This is a factual article from a factual publication by a factual doctor who happens to be one of the utmost leading expert(s) on vaccines in the world," one Instagram post said. "Here we have it," another post on Facebook said. "The company making the vaccine saying the pandemic is over and healthy people do not need a vaccine." But Yeadon hasn’t worked for Pfizer in nine years, according to the Associated Press and his LinkedIn profile. He was formerly the chief scientific officer of allergy and respiratory research, his profile says. And his claims are wrong, experts told PolitiFact. So are the social media posts that spread them. The posts were flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.)  The coronavirus pandemic is far from over in the U.K. and in other countries, as case spikes in recent months have shown. A widespread vaccine could prevent future waves, experts said. The Associated Press also debunked Yeadon’s statements. Fact-checkers with Lead Stories and Health Feedback previously addressed similarly inaccurate claims he made in a separate blog post and in an interview with a talk radio host in the U.K. PolitiFact’s efforts to contact Yeadon were unsuccessful.  Yeadon’s claim that the pandemic is "effectively over" is at odds with data showing that the U.K. was among the many countries where cases rose over the last several months.  The U.K. saw a sharp surge in daily confirmed cases between September and mid-November, when the numbers began to fall again as stricter restrictions were introduced. The country is still reporting tens of thousands of new cases each day, along with hundreds of deaths daily.  In total, the coronavirus has infected more than 1.6 million people in the U.K. to date, according to Johns Hopkins University data. It has killed nearly 60,000. "If Dr. Yeadon’s claim were true that the pandemic is effectively over, then the number of cases in various countries should be leveling off or dropping," said Richard Watanabe, a professor of preventive medicine at the University of Southern California.  Days before Yeadon published his blog post on Oct. 16, the U.K.’s deputy chief medical officer warned in an op-ed that the nation was "at a tipping point similar to where we were in March." Indeed, confirmed cases in the U.K. were already "on the upswing" in mid-October, said Emily Bruce, a faculty scientist in medicine at the University of Vermont’s Larner College of Medicine. They have increased substantially in the roughly six weeks since, Bruce said. Many other countries have experienced similar trends as colder weather has sent more people indoors. The U.S. reported over 1 million new cases in the first 10 days of November.  Yeadon’s claim about vaccines is also wrong. "There is definitely still a need for vaccines," said Brooke Nichols, an assistant professor of global health at Boston University.  In his blog post, Yeadon argued that more people are immune to COVID-19 than the U.K.’s scientists recognize, because many were previously infected with other coronaviruses that commonly circulate among humans and cause mild illness, like the common cold. That, he insisted, meant both the U.K. and the world are close to achieving herd immunity. Herd immunity occurs when enough people are immune to a virus to limit new infections and spread.  But experts told PolitiFact that Yeadon was leaping to conclusions. "Whether prior infection with a seasonal coronavirus confers protection from SARS-CoV-2 is still not a settled question," Bruce said. "While recent work indicates that it is possible that some cross protection (particularly from T cells) exists, this is not yet fully understood." "The immune system tends to be very specific, so exposure to related viruses does not necessarily result in protection from all of those related viruses," Watanabe added. Herd immunity generally requires greater than 70% of a population to be immune, Watanabe said. But experts agreed that’s a long way away without a vaccine. What we know about current case trends and the number of people who have been infected suggests that "vaccination would be required to prevent future waves," Nichols said.  Even if herd immunity were reached without widespread vaccination, she said, anyone who has not been infected would remain susceptible to the virus unless they got a vaccine.  RELATED: What we know about COVID-19 and immunity In a blog post that has sparked several widespread social media posts, Yeadon claimed the pandemic is "effectively over" in the U.K. and "there is absolutely no need for vaccines." Both points are inaccurate and at odds with the realities of the pandemic, which has upended lives and killed over 1.4 million people globally. Confirmed daily case counts were rising in the U.K. at the time of Yeadon’s claim and remain in the tens of thousands. People are still dying. Experts said that COVID-19 infections, hospitalizations and deaths will continue to mount in the absence of widespread mitigation measures until a vaccine is distributed. We rate Yeadon’s claim Pants on Fire! 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 Facebook and Instagram posts, accessed Dec. 1, 2020 United Kingdom Government, "Coronavirus (COVID-19) in the UK," accessed Dec. 1, 2020 Our World in Data, "Coronavirus Pandemic (COVID-19)," accessed Dec. 1, 2020 Johns Hopkins University, "Coronavirus Resource Center," accessed Dec. 1, 2020 BBC, "Covid-19: Pfizer/BioNTech vaccine judged safe for use in UK from next week," Dec. 2, 2020 Shane Crotty on Twitter, Nov. 27, 2020 Health Feedback, "A rise in the number of COVID-19 cases and deaths starting in September 2020 contradicts the claim by Michael Yeadon that 'the pandemic is fundamentally over in the U.K.,'" Nov. 10, 2020 TalkRADIO on YouTube, "‘It’s a massive claim; I think the pandemic is fundamentally over,'" Oct. 16, 2020 Lockdown Skeptics, "What SAGE Has Got Wrong," Oct. 16, 2020 Lead Stories, "Fact Check: Former Pfizer Scientist NOT Correct Saying 'Second Wave' Based on False-Positive COVID Tests, 'Pandemic is Over,'" Oct. 14, 2020 United Kingdom Government, "Deputy Chief Medical Officer Professor Jonathan Van-Tam's Op-Ed," Oct. 11, 2020 PolitiFact, "Hartzler’s claim isn’t close: We’re a long way away from herd immunity," Oct. 23, 2020 PolitiFact, "What we know about COVID-19 and immunity," Oct. 9, 2020 PolitiFact, "Fact-checking Rush Limbaugh’s misleading claim that the new coronavirus is 'the common cold,'" Feb. 27, 2020 Email interview with Richard M. Watanabe, professor of preventive medicine and associate dean for health and population science programs at the University of Southern California’s Kent School of Medicine, Dec. 1, 2020 Email interview with Emily Bruce, faculty scientist in medicine at the University of Vermont’s Larner College of Medicine, Dec. 1, 2020 Email interview with Brooke Nichols, assistant professor of global health at Boston University’s School of Public Health, Dec. 1, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/dec/10/facebook-posts/fact-checking-facebook-post-comparing-covid-19-vac/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 
United Parcel Service President of Global Healthcare Wesley Wheeler holds an example of the vial that will be used to transport the Pfizer COVID-19 vaccine as he speaks at a Senate Transportation subcommittee hearing Dec. 10, 2020. (AP)
 Despite decades of research, there is no vaccine against HIV given unique challenges the virus poses, such as rapid mutations that are difficult for the immune system to adapt to.  There are some vaccines to prevent and even treat some cancers, but not all cancers are caused by a virus.  There are many different rhinoviruses that can cause the common cold. That makes it difficult for researchers to create a vaccine that can address them all. Governments around the world have invested in companies to help speed up a COVID-19 vaccine. COVID-19 vaccines up for FDA evaluation have characteristics that allow them to be produced faster than other commonly known vaccines.  It typically takes years to develop and approve vaccines, yet for COVID-19, first reported in late 2019, federal regulators are already reviewing vaccines that researchers say are more than 94% effective. The speed of the vaccines' development has some people on social media questioning their safety. "So let me get this straight," says a Dec. 6 Facebook post. "40 years of research, and no vaccine for HIV. At least 100 years of research and no vaccine for cancer. Ongoing research, and no vaccine for the common cold. Now in less than a year, there's a vaccine for COVID-19??? Nah I think I’ll pass on that shot!!!" The post was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.) The facts show that what accounts for the disparity is not undue haste with the COVID-19 vaccine, but rather important differences between the illnesses highlighted in the post, and a new approach to vaccine development. For example, there are many types of cancers, and only a few are known to be caused by viruses. "So a universal vaccine to prevent ‘cancer’ is not something that is possible or pursued," said Jan Carette, an associate professor of microbiology and immunology at Stanford University School of Medicine. "For specific viruses that cause specific forms of cancer, vaccines have been developed."  The post also ignores unique medical challenges in creating vaccines against HIV and the common cold. The COVID-19 vaccines from Moderna and Pfizer that are up for review by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration are a type called "mRNA." Researchers have been studying this type of vaccine technology for decades. Most vaccines trigger an immune response by introducing weakened or inactivated versions of the disease-causing pathogen (such as a virus or bacterium) into the body. The mRNA vaccines, by contrast, use a genetic messenger to teach cells in the body how to make a protein — or even just a piece of a protein — to trigger an immune response. (The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention has more information on how COVID-19 mRNA vaccines work.) An mRNA vaccine has shorter manufacturing times and can be developed in labs using readily available materials. "This means the process can be standardized and scaled up, making vaccine development faster than traditional methods," according to the CDC. Health officials have said that COVID-19 mRNA vaccines are being held to the same rigorous safety and effectiveness standards as all other types of vaccines allowed in the United States. The Trump administration's Operation Warp Speed, an initiative to help speed up the development, manufacturing and distribution of COVID-19 vaccines and other therapeutics, has also played a significant role in getting the vaccines to market. The federal government has made vaccine deals totaling more than $9 billion with multiple private companies. The deals vary in scope; some are only for the purchase of vaccines, other agreements provide funding for the research and manufacturing of vaccines. The CDC says there are seven types of coronaviruses that can infect people. One of them is the new virus that causes COVID-19, SARS-CoV-2. A study published in November by researchers at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill said that vaccines may be more effective on a current and common strain of SARS-CoV-2, compared with a previous strain of the virus. Common cold: Around 80% of common cold cases are caused by rhinoviruses — of which there are over 100 different types, many circulating at the same time, said Carette, the Stanford researcher. The common cold can also be caused by many different respiratory viruses, making it difficult for a single vaccine to target all varieties of the cold. The possibility of a vaccine composed of 50, 100 or more distinct human rhinovirus antigens "has been viewed as formidable or impossible and has discouraged many vaccine makers," Carette said. HIV: A vaccine against the human immunodeficiency virus, which causes AIDS, has proved especially challenging because the immune system responds to HIV differently from other viruses. While all viruses change, HIV mutates rapidly and has unique ways of evading the immune system. "There are no documented cases of a person living with HIV developing an immune response that cleared the infection," says the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases. In clinical trials, inactivated HIV has not been effective at eliciting immune responses and, a live form of HIV is too dangerous to use, according to the institute. Research on an HIV vaccine has been going on since the 1980s. Cancer: There are vaccines available to help prevent human papillomavirus infections, and some strains of HPV have been linked to some cancers. Most cervical cancers are caused by infection with HPV, according to the American Cancer Society.  The American Cancer Society also says that people who have long-term infections with the hepatitis B virus are at higher risk for liver cancer, and getting a hepatitis B vaccine may lower some people’s risk of getting liver cancer. There are also vaccines to treat certain types of cancers; these vaccines are intended to work against cancer cells, not against something that causes cancer.  "Sometimes a patient’s own immune cells are removed and exposed to these substances in the lab to create the vaccine," the cancer society says. "Once the vaccine is ready, it’s injected into the body to increase the immune response against cancer cells." A Facebook post claimed, "40 years of research, and no vaccine for HIV. At least 100 years of research and no vaccine for cancer. Ongoing research and no vaccine for the common cold. Now in less than a year, there's a vaccine for COVID-19?" The post questions the safety of the COVID-19 vaccines on that basis. Vaccines for COVID-19 were poised to be evaluated by regulators about a year after the virus was discovered. But the post goes too far in drawing conclusions about the vaccines’ safety based on how quickly they were developed compared with efforts to fight other illnesses. It ignores important differences in the development process, and characteristics of the illnesses that make them not directly comparable to COVID-19. Health officials have said that COVID-19 mRNA vaccines are being held to the same rigorous safety and effectiveness standards as all other types of vaccines allowed in the United States.   The post contains elements of truth, but ignores critical facts that would give a different impression.  We rate the post Mostly False. 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 Facebook post, Dec. 6, 2020 Email interview, Jan Carette, an associate professor of microbiology and immunology at Stanford University School of Medicine, Dec. 7, 2020 Moderna, Moderna Announces Primary Efficacy Analysis in Phase 3 COVE Study for Its COVID-19 Vaccine Candidate and Filing Today with U.S. FDA for Emergency Use Authorization, Nov. 30, 2020 Pfizer, Pfizer and BioNTech to Submit Emergency Use Authorization Request Today to the U.S. FDA for COVID-19 Vaccine, Nov. 20, 2020 National Institutes of Health, What Is Cancer?, updated Feb. 9, 2015; Cancer Treatment Vaccines, posted Sept. 24, 2019 FDA.gov, Studying how pathogens cause disease, last updated Dec. 2, 2016 CDC.gov, mRNA vaccine; types of coronaviruses; rhinoviruses PolitiFact, How Pfizer's and Moderna's COVID-19 vaccines are tied to Operation Warp Speed, Nov. 19, 2020 World Health Organization, Naming the coronavirus disease (COVID-19) and the virus that causes it Sciencemag.org, SARS-CoV-2 D614G variant exhibits efficient replication ex vivo and transmission in vivo, Nov. 12, 2020 University of North Carolina, Common SARS-CoV-2 mutation may be more susceptible to vaccine, Nov. 12, 2020 National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, Progress toward an HIV vaccine Cancer.org, Cancer Vaccines and Their Side Effects   
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/dec/10/blog-posting/no-pfizers-head-research-didnt-say-covid-19-vaccin/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 As people start to receive Pfizer’s COVID-19 vaccine, social media users continue to share misinformation about the injection.  "Head of Pfizer Research: Covid vaccine is female sterilization," reads an inaccurate headline on a blog called "Health and Money News." This post was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.)  While the headline refers to sterilization, the post uses softer language, referring to the possibility of infertility caused by the COVID-19 vaccine. Even so, it draws a misleading conclusion from the claims made by the doctors it cites — claims that Pfizer and other experts dispute. The post claims the vaccine contains a spike protein called syncytin-1, "vital for the formation of human placenta in women," that could be targeted by the body’s immune system.  "If the vaccine works so that we form an immune response AGAINST the spike protein, we are also training the female body to attack syncytin-1, which could lead to infertility in women of an unspecified duration," the post says.  The blog cites "ex-Pfizer head of respiratory research Dr. Michael Yeadon and the lung specialist and former head of the public health department Dr. Wolfgang Wodarg." Wodarg is a German physician, and Yeadon hasn’t worked for Pfizer in nine years, according to the Associated Press. Yeadon’s LinkedIn profile says he was formerly the chief scientific officer of allergy and respiratory research. PolitiFact tried to reach him without success.  The post links to a Dec. 1 letter from the men to the European Medicines Agency seeking to stop clinical trials of the Pfizer vaccine in the European Union. "Several vaccine candidates are expected to induce the formation of humoral antibodies against spike proteins of SARS-CoV-2," the letter says. "Syncytin-1… which is derived from human endogenous retroviruses … and is responsible for the development of a placenta in mammals and humans and is therefore an essential prerequisite for a successful pregnancy, is also found in homologous form in the spike proteins of SARS viruses. There is no indication whether antibodies against spike proteins of SARS viruses would also act like anti-Syncytin-1 antibodies. However, if this were to be the case, this would then prevent the formation of a placenta which would result in vaccinated women essentially becoming infertile." Brent Stockwell, a professor studying disease networks and chemical and biological tools at Columbia University, told us that the claim that the COVID-19 vaccines cause infertility isn’t true.  Humans do have a protein called syncytin-1, which is critical in developing the placenta during pregnancy, Stockwell said in an email. "Theoretically, an immune response against this protein could cause increased risk of a failed pregnancy." But if the claims in the blog post were accurate, that would mean that pregnant women who catch COVID-19 would also become infertile, he said. No increased infertility or pregnancy loss has been observed in women with COVID-19.  "Any hint of similarity between syncytin-1 and the SARS-CoV-2 spike protein (which is used as part of the vaccine) is extremely remote," he said. "There are hardly any parts of the two proteins that are even vaguely similar, and they are far more distinct than would be needed for cross-reactivity of immune responses." In short, he said there’s no chance that the COVID-19 vaccine would train the immune system to accidentally recognize and fight syncytin-1.  Pfizer told us in a statement that there’s no data to suggest that the company’s vaccine candidate causes infertility.  Experts interviewed by The Associated Press, which also looked into this post, corroborated this.  Our ruling The blog post says: "Head of Pfizer research: Covid vaccine is female sterilization."  The head of Pfizer research didn’t say this. A doctor whose LinkedIn profile says he worked at Pfizer nine years ago as a chief scientific officer has raised concerns that a COVID-19 vaccine could make women infertile if their immune systems target a certain protein. But experts say that even the rationale behind that idea is wrong. If a COVID-19 vaccine could cause infertility in the way the post describes, so would having COVID-19 itself, and there’s been no evidence for that so far. We rate this blog post False. 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 Blog post, Dec. 2, 2020 BBC, COVID-19 vaccine: First person receives Pfizer jab in UK, Dec. 8, 2020 Wolfgang Wodarg and Michael Yeardon letter to EMA, Dec. 1, 2020 PolitiFact, Former Pfizer employee wrong that coronavirus pandemic is ‘effectively over’ in UK, Dec. 2, 2020 Email interview with Brent Stockwell, professor, Columbia University, Dec. 9, 2020 Statement from Pfizer, Dec. 8, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/sep/18/youtube-videos/youtube-video-takes-bill-gates-out-context-coronav/,• Video cuts out the question Gates was responding to and the first part of his answer to make it seem as if he supports mandatory coronavirus vaccinations. ​ According to the internet, Microsoft co-founder and philanthropist Bill Gates thinks you don’t have a choice about being vaccinated. A YouTube video even shows him saying so in his very own words. Here’s why you shouldn’t believe this claim: The video, titled "Bill Gates says you don't have a choice to be vaccinated or not," takes Gates’ comments during an interview with the Financial Times out of context by eliminating the question he was answering and the first part of his response.  "You don’t have a choice," Gates says in the clip, which has been viewed almost 100,000 times. "People act like you have a choice. People don't feel like going to the stadium when they might get infected. You know, it's not the government who's saying OK, just ignore this disease, and people are deeply affected by seeing these deaths, by knowing they could be part of the transmission chain, and old people, their parents, their grandparents could be affected by this. And so you don't get to say, ignore what's going on here. There will be the ability, particularly in rich countries, to open up if things are done well over the next few months. But for the world at large, normalcy only returns when we've largely vaccinated the entire global population."  The video was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.) That's because the video ignores the fact that Gates was responding to a question about how he would weigh the economic costs of lockdown with the public health risks of reopening businesses during the early months of the pandemic.  Here’s a transcript of the relevant passage from the Financial Times interview, complete with the question that Gates was answering when he made his "you won’t have a choice" comment.  Interviewer: "And what about that trade-off? You just mentioned, obviously, the economic pain. What do you think the right balance is between the trade-off of protecting people's lives and the economic hit? Do you see a situation where the global economy could be virtually at a standstill for a year or even more?"  Gates: "Well, it won't go to zero, but it will shrink. Global GDP is going to take probably the biggest hit ever. Maybe the Depression was worse or 1873, I don't know. But in my lifetime this will be the greatest economic hit. But you don't have a choice. People act like you have a choice. People don't feel like going to the stadium when they might get infected. You know, it's not the government who's saying OK, just ignore this disease, and people are deeply affected by seeing these deaths, by knowing they could be part of the transmission chain, and old people, their parents, their grandparents could be affected by this. And so you don't get to say, ignore what's going on here. There will be the ability, particularly in rich countries, to open up if things are done well over the next few months. But for the world at large, normalcy only returns when we've largely vaccinated the entire global population. And so although there's a lot of work on testing, a lot of work on drugs that we’re involved with, trying to achieve that ambitious goal, which has never been done for the vaccine, that rises to the top of the list." In context, Gates is saying that governments won’t be able to avoid taking an economic hit from the pandemic, because he believes that people won’t want to frequent businesses when there’s a chance that they’ll become "part of the transmission chain."  Gates does say that he believes that normalcy will only return after the entire global population is vaccinated from the coronavirus. But at no point does he say that people "won’t have a choice" about whether or not they’ll be vaccinated.  We reached out to the Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation, asking whether Gates believes that coronavirus vaccinations should be mandatory. In reply, spokespeople from the foundation wrote that "national governments will make the ultimate decision about how vaccines will be distributed in their own borders." We should note that Gates has become a frequent target for disinformation about the coronavirus pandemic. Conspiracy theorists have falsely claimed he is planning to use coronavirus vaccines to implant tracking devices in people, that he and Dr. Anthony Fauci are colluding to ruin the economy, and that he stands to reap enormous profits from the virus.   A YouTube video appears to show Bill Gates saying that people "don’t have a choice" about whether they’ll receive a COVID-19 vaccination. The video takes Gates out of context. He was actually saying that governments won’t be able to escape the economic impacts of the pandemic, even if they decide to reopen businesses before a vaccine is available.  We rate this video False. ​ 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 CNBC, "Bill Gates denies conspiracy theories that say he wants to use coronavirus vaccines to implant tracking devices," Jul. 22, 2020 Financial Times, "Transcript: Bill Gates speaks to the FT about the global fight against coronavirus," Apr. 9, 2020 PolitiFact, "Fact-checking a Facebook conspiracy about Bill Gates, Dr. Fauci and COVID-19," Apr. 14, 2020 PolitiFact, "The Gates Foundation does not have a patent for the coronavirus," Apr. 23, 2020 YouTube video, "Bill Gates says you don't have a choice to be vaccinated or not," Jul. 2, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/sep/03/donald-trump/trump-repeats-false-claim-about-covid-19-deaths-fo/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 
President Donald Trump speaks during an interview with Laura Ingraham on Fox News on Sept. 1, 2020. (Screenshot from YouTube)
 In an interview with Fox News’ Laura Ingraham, Trump misconstrued data on coronavirus deaths. As of Sept. 3, 185,092 Americans had died due to COVID-19. A CDC report found that 6% of people who died from COVID-19 only had the virus. The majority had other conditions as well, but that doesn’t mean COVID-19 wasn’t to blame. The National Center for Health Statistics told us that COVID-19 was responsible for nearly all of the deaths involving the virus. In the past week, President Donald Trump has repeatedly spread a false claim that COVID-19 is not as deadly as his own public health agencies have reported. He retweeted a now-deleted post that alleged the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention "quietly updated" the number of coronavirus deaths. He shared another tweet from a senior legal adviser for his reelection campaign that linked to an article whose headline said "only 9,210 Americans died from COVID-19 alone." And, in a Sept. 1 interview with Fox News’ Laura Ingraham, Trump said it himself: "I saw a statistic come out the other day, talking about only 6% of the people actually died from COVID, which is a very interesting — that they died from other reasons." "Well, they had comorbidities, which you’ve gotten criticized for," Ingraham responded. She’s right — the president misconstrued data on coronavirus deaths. As of Sept. 3, CDC data show 185,092 Americans had died due to COVID-19, and some estimates put the death toll higher. Trump’s claim traces back to a report from the National Center for Health Statistics (NCHS), which is part of the CDC. Each Wednesday, the agency releases new provisional death counts for the coronavirus. The data is based on death certificates.  In that report, the NCHS notes in a section titled "Comorbidities" that, "for 6% of the deaths, COVID-19 was the only cause mentioned." "For deaths with conditions or causes in addition to COVID-19, on average, there were 2.6 additional conditions or causes per death," the report says. Those lines have inspired a rash of claims on social media, including those retweeted by the president, that say the CDC "adjusted" its coronavirus death counts and the disease is not as deadly as previously thought. Those assertions are false — we rated a related Facebook post Pants on Fire. Several other fact-checkers have also debunked them. Let’s recap why they’re wrong. Comorbidities are conditions that patients experience in tandem with a primary condition. Think of conditions like cancer or diabetes, which the CDC has said put people more at risk of death if they contract the coronavirus. The NCHS report shows that the vast majority of coronavirus-related deaths occur in patients with comorbidities. But that doesn’t mean COVID-19 was a non-factor. "The point that the CDC was trying to make was that a certain percentage of them had nothing else but just COVID-19," said Dr. Anthony Fauci, director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, in a Sept. 1 interview with "Good Morning America." "That does not mean that someone who has hypertension or diabetes who dies of COVID didn’t die of COVID-19 — they did." "The numbers that you’ve been hearing, the 180,000-plus deaths, are real deaths from COVID-19. Let there not be any confusion about that." So why do 94% of death certificates that mention COVID-19 also list other conditions?  When a coronavirus patient is admitted to the hospital, the virus is listed on their medical record. Since the coronavirus attacks the lungs, perhaps they develop respiratory failure, which would also be listed on their record. Unfortunately, they die after going into cardiac arrest, so doctors take note of that, too. RELATED: No, the CDC did not ‘quietly adjust’ US coronavirus deaths All three of those conditions would be listed on the patient’s death certificate, but COVID-19 started the process. "The people dying were not going to die but for the acquisition of COVID," said Dr. Myron Cohen, director of the Institute for Global Health and Infectious Diseases at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill. Jeff Lancashire, acting associate director for communications at the NCHS, told us in an email that 92% of the death certificates that mention the coronavirus state that COVID-19 was the "underlying cause of death." "The underlying cause of death is the condition that began the chain of events that ultimately led to the person’s death," Lancashire said.  We reached out to the White House and the Trump campaign for a comment, but we haven’t heard back. Trump’s claim is inaccurate and ridiculous. We rate it Pants on Fire! 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 Factba.se, accessed Sept. 3, 2020 PolitiFact, "No, the CDC did not ‘quietly adjust’ US coronavirus deaths," Aug. 31, 2020 YouTube video from Factbase Videos, Sept. 1, 2020 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, CDC COVID Data Tracker, accessed Sept. 3, 2020 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19): About CDC COVID-19 Data, July 13, 2020 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19): People with Certain Medical Conditions, Aug. 14, 2020 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19): Social Distancing, July 15, 2020 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, Instructions for Completing the Cause-of-Death Section of the Death Certificate, accessed Aug. 31, 2020 Email from Dr. Myron Cohen, director of the Institute for Global Health and Infectious Diseases at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, Aug. 31, 2020 Email from Jeff Lancashire, acting associate director for communications at the National Center for Health Statistics, Aug. 31, 2020 Facebook post from Dr. Mark Halstead, Aug. 30, 2020 The Gateway Pundit, "SHOCK REPORT: This Week CDC Quietly Updated COVID-19 Numbers – Only 9,210 Americans Died From COVID-19 Alone – Rest Had Different Other Serious Illnesses," Aug. 29, 2020 National Center for Health Statistics, Provisional Death Counts for Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19), Sept. 2, 2020 The New York Times, "The True Coronavirus Toll in the U.S. Has Already Surpassed 200,000," Aug. 13, 2020 Tweeted video from "Good Morning America," Sept. 1, 2020 Factcheck.org, "CDC Did Not ‘Admit Only 6%’ of Recorded Deaths from COVID-19," Sept. 1, 2020 Snopes, "Did CDC ‘Quietly Update’ COVID-19 Deaths To Say Only 6% Are Legitimate?" Sept. 3, 2020 Health Feedback, "False claim shared by President Trump that only 6% of CDC-reported deaths are from COVID-19 is based on flawed reasoning," Aug. 31, 2020 Check Your Fact, "FACT CHECK: DID THE CDC REVISE ITS COVID-19 DEATH COUNT TO SHOW THAT ONLY 9,210 PEOPLE ‘ACTUALLY DIED’ FROM COVID-19?" Aug. 31, 2020 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://www.politifact.com/factchecks/2020/sep/03/roy-cooper/cooper-overstates-ventilator-access-problem/,
Our only agenda is to publish the truth so you can be an informed participant in democracy.
We need your help.
 
More Info
 
North Carolina Gov. Roy Cooper speaks during a press conference on Aug. 13, 2020.
 North Carolina Governor Roy Cooper says one of his goals is to prevent hospitals from becoming overwhelmed.  While that may be a noble cause, Republicans are questioning a claim he made during a recent briefing. "In some of these other states, some of their deaths can be attributable to the fact that they were having a hard time getting an ICU bed or a ventilator to a patient," Cooper said during a press conference on Aug. 13. Is it true that some people have died because they had trouble accessing a ventilator, or a bed in the intensive care unit? It’s true that more patients die at hospitals that are overwhelmed, as studies demonstrated even before the onset of the current pandemic. The Cooper administration also cited news articles where doctors said they worried about having enough resources to provide optimum levels of care. But there’s little documentation of COVID-19 patients dying specifically because they couldn’t access a ventilator or ICU bed. At the onset of the pandemic, medical experts worried that there wouldn’t be enough ventilators to save patients who had severe symptoms of COVID-19. The virus primarily affects the lungs and ventilators are designed to help patients breathe. The availability of ventilators became a political issue, with some governors saying the Trump administration didn’t provide their states with enough of the machines. PolitiFact investigated the issue of ventilator access, finding in late April that it hadn’t become the nationwide problem health experts and medical professionals feared. Officials from 30 states told PolitiFact that they weren’t aware of any cases where their hospitals couldn’t provide ventilators to COVID-19 patients. At the time, a spokesman for the American Hospital Association said the organization wasn’t aware of any patient dying because they couldn’t access a ventilator.  Presented with Cooper’s quote from August, the AHA spokesman said nothing has changed. "To the best of our knowledge, a ventilator has been available for every patient that needed one. So nothing has changed since we said the same thing in April," AHA spokesman Colin Milligan said. PolitiFact North Carolina reached out to other experts quoted in the April fact check. Eric Toner is a senior scholar of internal and emergency medicine at the Johns Hopkins Center for Health Security. He previously said he "would not be surprised if we find out later that some tragic triage choices had to be made." We contacted Toner again and asked if he’s aware of anyone who died because they couldn’t access a ventilator. "I do not," he said. "There are hushed rumors but nothing that I can cite or that anyone will openly admit to." Matthew Wynia, director of the Center for Bioethics and Humanities at the University of Colorado, was also quoted in PolitiFact’s April article. He told us that any evidence of such deaths are likely to be anecdotal, and not necessarily something that’s documented. "If your ICU is full, you’re going to try to make the best of it. You’re likely going to try to treat them in a step-down unit," Wynia said. "You’re not going to find anyone who says we openly discussed this with the family and says ‘I’m sorry, we’re out of beds and ventilators.’" Low resources can affect a patient’s level of care, he added. "It’s something that no one wants to say, and for good reason. The reality is when a healthcare system is completely overrun, it’s not able to deliver services at its normal quality." When contacted by PolitiFact, the Cooper administration provided links to news stories where hospital officials worried about resources running out. They also provided links to studies that tied resource shortages to mortality rates. A study in the Journal of the American Medical Association found that COVID-19 patients had higher survival rates at bigger hospitals, which tend to have more resources than small hospitals. Dr. David Leaf, who works in Harvard Medical School and Brigham and Women’s Hospital, explained the findings to WBUR in Boston: "Patients who were admitted to hospitals with fewer than 50 ICU beds— so, smaller hospitals — had a more than threefold higher risk of death than patients admitted to larger hospitals." A study of patient outcomes in Wuhan, China, found that the availability of intensive care unit (ICU) rooms had a significant impact on how long a patient lived, according to Contagion: Infectious Diseases Today. A July story in the Harvard Business Review used data from Germany and Italy to emphasize the need to relocate patients when ICU’s reach full capacity. Despite what the studies say, we struggled to find news stories about specific people who died waiting for an ICU bed or a ventilator. A March New York Times story reported that some have died inside the emergency room while waiting for a bed. Doctors told the Times that some patients were found dead in their rooms while doctors were busy helping others. A Buzzfeed article from April quoted several doctors who attributed deaths to a lack of resources. "There’s a list about six [types of] patients that do not get put on a vent. ‘It makes no sense, they’re going to die soon anyway, so let them die’ — like that’s the crazy thought process," one doctor said. In July, Newsweek reported that a 70-year-old woman died less than a week after allegedly being turned away from two Florida hospitals. Also in July, CBS reported on a judge in Starr County, Texas, who said on Facebook that a lack of resources left a local hospital with the responsibility of choosing to help and "who is sent home to die." Cooper said "in some of these other states, some of their deaths can be attributable to the fact that they were having a hard time getting an ICU bed or a ventilator to a patient." Cooper was trying to make a point that it’s important to protect hospitals from becoming overwhelmed. That’s a valid concern, given studies show mortality rates can rise when hospitals are overwhelmed. Some news articles have also alluded to these problems. However, Cooper goes too far in saying some deaths have been attributed to a lack of ICU and ventilator access. The American Hospital Association, along with experts who have tracked resource availability during the pandemic, say they’re unaware of any specific cases where someone died specifically because they couldn’t access a ventilator or ICU bed. Cooper didn't cite, and PolitiFact couldn't find, enough evidence to support the claim. Cooper’s statement contains an element of truth, but doesn’t account for critical facts that would give a different impression. We rate it Mostly False. 

The Principles of the Truth-O-Meter

 Youtube video of North Carolina Gov. Roy Cooper speaking at a press conference on Aug. 13, 2020. Email correspondence with Sadie Weiner, spokeswoman for North Carolina Gov. Roy Cooper. Email interview with Colin Milligan, spokesman for the American Hospital Association. Email correspondence with Eric Toner, senior scholar of internal and emergency medicine at the Johns Hopkins Center for Health Security. Telephone interview with Matthew Wynia, director of the Center for Bioethics and Humanities at the University of Colorado. PolitiFact story, "Can anyone who needs a ventilator get one? So far, it looks like it," published April 24, 2020. New York Times story, "13 Deaths in a Day: An ‘Apocalyptic’ Coronavirus Surge at an N.Y.C. Hospital," published March 25, 2020. Buzzfeed story, "Doctors without enough ventilators are being told whom to save during the coronavirus pandemic," published April 4, 2020. Newsweek story, "Florida coronavirus patient dies after two hospitals turn her away," published July 7, 2020. CBS News story, "A Texas county's only hospital forced to choose ‘who is sent home to die’ as ICU beds near capacity," published July 23, 2020. Study in the Journal of the American Medical Association, "Factors associated with death in critically ill patients with coronavirus disease 2019 in the US," published July 15, 2020. WBUR story, "In smaller hospitals, COVID-19 patients at triple the risk of dying, national study finds," published July 15, 2020. Study in the American Thoracic Society, "Hospitalization and critical care of 109 decedents with COVID-19 pneumonia in Wuhan, China," published in July 2020. Story in Contagion: Infectious Diseases Today, "Limited ICU space played a role in COVID-19 deaths in Wuhan," published April 13, 2020. 
In a world of wild talk and fake news, help us stand up for the facts.

 

Sign me up

 

District of Columbia


1800 I Street NW
Washington, DC
20006
 

Florida

801 3rd St. S
St. Petersburg, FL
33701727-821-9494
,
https://leadstories.com/hoax-alert/2020/12/fact-check-mthfr-gene-variants-rarely-causes-disease-not-harmful-for-those-receiving-vaccines.html,Do variants of the MTHFR gene cause disease and increase the likelihood of vaccine reactions? No, that's not true: In rare circumstances, a MTHFR (methylenetetrahydrofolate reductase) gene variant causes neural tube defects in newborn babies. Other times, it can cause elevelated levels of homocysteine, which can lead to blood clots. Otherwise, there are no scientific studies linking MTHFR gene variants, often called mutations, to any diseases or vaccine reaction. And certainly no relation has been found to the skin conditions shown in the photos, which are relatively common and benign. The claim appeared in a post (archived here) published on Facebook on November 13, 2018. It opened: "Take a look at these pictures. Have you or your child ever had any of these marks?" It continued: This is what the post looked like on Facebook at the time of writing:   (Source: Facebook screenshot taken on Wed Dec 23 14:22:55 2020 UTC) Before starting to explain what the MTHFR gene and its variants are and what they do and don't do, it's necessary to point out that the skin conditions shown in the photographs -- stork bite, sugar bug and sacral dimple -- are all common and harmless. None of them have been linked in scientific studies to an MTHFR gene mutation. Here's a quick overview: On stork bites, the Healthline website explains that: The web site what to expect details what sugar bugs are: About sacral dimples, Healthline says: Dr. Justin Smith, a pediatrician and the Medical Advisor for Digital Health for Cook Children's in Fort Worth, Texas, wrote in a blog posting on February 14, 2020:  I have searched the literature for any connected between these findings and MTHFR mutations. No studies exist. Nor are there any studies substantiating any connections between MTHFR gene variants and adverse health effects in relation to vaccinations. Here's what we know: Everyone has two copies of the MTHFR gene, one inherited from the mother, the other from the father. The National Institute of Health explains in a publication updated August 18, 2020 that: The MTHFR gene provides instructions for making an enzyme called methylenetetrahydrofolate reductase. This enzyme plays a role in processing amino acids, the building blocks of proteins. The NIH further spells out in another publication updated January 25, 2018: As is true for any gene, the DNA code of the MTHFR gene can vary. When we identify a part of the sequence that varies, we call it a "variant." Genetic research aims to identify specific variants that cause harm or benefit to health.There are two MTHFR gene variants, called C677T and A1298C, that have been an active area of study. These variants are common. In America, about 25% of people who are Hispanic, and 10-15% of people who are Caucasian have two copies of C677T.Studies have found that women with two C677T gene variants have an increased risk for having a child with a neural tube defect. Studies have also found that men and women with two C677T gene variants and elevated homocysteine levels may be at a mild increased risk for blood clots (venous thromboembolism). The CDC explains that the changes in the MTHFR gene are variants, not mutations: Gene variants are common and normal. In fact, there are more people in the United States who have one or two copies of the MTHFR C677T variant than people who do not have it. Variants in genes are what make us unique. They cause differences, such as eye color, hair color, and blood type. You may have seen the MTHFR C677T variant referred to as a "gene mutation;" however, the word, 'mutation,' usually refers to a change in the gene that is much less common. It is more accurate to refer to MTHFR C677T as a "gene variant." The Facebook posting is correct that MTHFR is involved in methylation. But it draws a faulty conclusion as to how MTHFR variants might affect methylation. Psychiatrist Judy Tsafrir details it in the November 22, 2017 issue of Psychology Today: Methylation is a vital foundational biochemical process in the body, involved with the detoxification of heavy metals, regulation of gene expression and protein function, and central to the synthesis of neurotransmitters, the chemical messengers which mediate mental and emotional states. Imbalances in methylation status result from genetic defects in the enzymes which regulate the process of methylation. In the past few years there has been a great deal of interest in genetic testing, and in particular, the role of the MTHFR gene. A genetic defect of the MTHFR gene can result in a malfunctioning MTHFR enzyme, which can affect methylation. 
      See who is sharing it (it might even be your friends...) and leave the link in the comments.:
     Lead Stories is working with the CoronaVirusFacts/DatosCoronaVirus Alliance, a coalition of more than 100 fact-checkers who are fighting misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic. Learn more about the alliance here. Arthur Brice is a fact checker at Lead Stories. He has been a journalist for more than 40 years, nearly 30 of them in newspapers. Brice was a national desk editor and reporter at The Atlanta Journal-Constitution for nearly 20 years. Previously, he was political editor at The Tampa Tribune and also worked for three other Florida newspapers. He spent 11 Years as an executive editor and executive producer at CNN.  
    Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
      
    Spotted something? Let us know!.
     Please select all the ways you would like to hear from Lead Stories LLC: You can unsubscribe at any time by clicking the link in the footer of our emails. For information about our privacy practices, please visit our website. We use Mailchimp as our marketing platform. By clicking below to subscribe, you acknowledge that your information will be transferred to Mailchimp for processing. Learn more about Mailchimp's privacy practices here. 
       Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
        
        Spotted something?  Let us know!.
      ,
https://leadstories.com/hoax-alert/2020/12/fact-check-post-thanksgiving-covid19-surge-is-not-a-no-show-numbers-increased.html,STORY UPDATED: check for updates below. Did the post-Thanksgiving surge in COVID-19 cases after people traveled and gathered in groups -- which was predicted by Dr. Anthony Fauci and other health officials had warned would happen -- end up being a 'no-show'? No, that's not entirely true if you look at the absolute numbers: 70% of states set new peaks for cases of the novel coronavirus in early December 2020, Dr. Mark Cameron, an associate professor in the Department of Population and Quantitative Health Sciences at the Case Western Reserve University School of Medicine in Cleveland, told Lead Stories. He said the remaining states reached their peaks before Thanksgiving. However if you look at relative numbers a case can indeed be made that the increase in average daily new cases didn't accelerate much after Thanksgiving compared to the period before it, meaning the holiday may not have been much of a factor in the current runaway growth nationally. But several experts have pointed to local surges that can be tied to Thanksgiving. The claim about the "no show" appeared in a Daily Caller article (archived here but later substantially updated with data that does show there were some local surges; the Daily Caller informed us it was a draft that accidentally went up early) published on dailycaller.com on December 16, 2020 under the title " After Weeks Of Holier Than Thou Howling, The 'Thanksgiving Surge' Is A No Show. ". It opened: This is what the article looked like at the time of writing:  (Source:dailycaller.com screenshot taken on Fri Dec 18 00:09:00 2020 UTC) The original article attempted to prove Fauci, director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, and other health officials were wrong about their fears of an increase in COVID-19 infection if people didn't follow the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's recommendations regarding travel and group gatherings. On Thanksgiving Day, November 26, 2020, the national 7-day moving average for new cases was 168,064, according to the CDC COVID Data Tracker. Cases decreased in late November before steadily climbing again in December. By December 17, 2020, the 7-day moving average was 216,159. That lag-time is consistent with the incubation period observed thus far: it takes 2-14 days after infection to develop symptoms.  (Source: CDC COVID Data Tracker. Blue bars: new cases. Red line = 7-day rolling average. Red arrow = Thanksgiving.) Lead Stories downloaded the data the graph was based on and calculated the daily change in the rolling average, expressed as a percentage of the day before. This basically tells you how steeply the red line in the previous graph is increasing or decreasing.  The graph shows the relative rise in average new daily cases wasn't markedly faster in the weeks before or after Thanksgiving on a national level, meaning individual infected people were each roughly infecting the same number of new people (there just were more infected individuals around to spread the virus). So there was a surge in absolute number of infections, but not much of a surge in relative increase. The data, however, prove that the fears and warnings of Fauci and other were correct at least in some places. Fauci himself told BuzzFeed in an article about the apparent lack of an "additional" surge post-Tranksgiving: The data shows a lag in reporting of cases and deaths over the Thanksgiving break, then a catchup in the next week or so, followed by a return to roughly the same trajectory as before. If there was a Thanksgiving surge, it is hard to see against the tidal wave of coronavirus cases that was already breaking over the nation. "I was concerned about just continuing to go up and up and up," Fauci said. But Fauci argued that the holiday likely did spur additional spread of the virus, at least in some regions. "If you and I were having this conversation and we said the United States is California, you would say absolutely California is having a post-Thanksgiving surge," Fauci said. "But then you look at another part of the country and you say, wait a minute, not only are you not having a surge, you're actually going down." NPR also reported there were reports of a Thanksgiving surge in some states: Three weeks later, many places are now contending with a wave of infections that local health authorities say were fueled by the Thanksgiving holiday, although some regions appear to have evaded a dramatic rise, at least so far. "We are seeing a tremendous surge in cases in many locations around the United States that are associated with the Thanksgiving dinners, family get-togethers and social events," says Michael Osterholm, an epidemiologist and director of the Center for Infectious Disease Research and Policy at the University of Minnesota. Much of the evidence comes from health departments that are tracing clusters of cases, but Osterholm suspects that hospitalizations and deaths -- "lagging indicators" -- will reveal the full impact in a few more weeks. Dr. Mark Cameron analyzed state data on the Johns Hopkins Coronavirus Resource Center website, which includes CDC and other public data. This is what he said in an email to Lead Stories: I use the Johns Hopkins site for trends over the last two weeks while showing their place in the long term epidemiological curves. If you look at the 14-day trend in new cases, the majority of states have indeed come down in the two weeks following Thanksgiving. However, most dashboards only show the last 7 to 14 days in their case trends, which may lead to misunderstandings. If you dig deeper, you find that only 15 states experienced peak case numbers prior to Thanksgiving, with the rest setting new peaks in early December. Also, of those 15 states, only 3, Minnesota, South Dakota and Wyoming, avoided an arguable uptick in cases following Thanksgiving. Cameron said the number of coronavirus cases may still rise:  [W]e know that it can take 3 or 4 weeks for new outbreaks to show up in the trends following a holiday, for example, the spikes following Memorial Day and Labor Day. All states are still accumulating cases, and very few (Vermont, DC and Hawaii) are below the WHO's [World Health Organization's] 5% test positivity threshold for recovery Many measures, including an analysis of vehicle travel during the Thanksgiving holiday, done for the Associated Press, showed that people were more on the move than they had been earlier in the month. A December 3, 2020 AP article states: Vehicle travel in early November was as much as 20% lower than a year earlier, but it surged around the holiday and peaked on Thanksgiving Day at only about 5% less than the pandemic-free period in 2019, according to StreetLight Data, which provided an analysis to The Associated Press. Does Cameron see a link between the increase in coronavirus cases and other data mentioned in the article pointing to increased travel during the holiday? "Objectively yes. Vehicle, flight-related, and cell phone data showed a peak in travel before Thanksgiving." The CDC has issued similar recommendations to Thanksgiving for travel and group gatherings during Christmas, New Year's and other holiday celebrations: Celebrating virtually or with members of your own household (who are consistently taking measures to reduce the spread of COVID-19) poses the lowest risk for spread. Your household is anyone who currently lives and shares common spaces in your housing unit (such as your house or apartment). This can include family members, as well as roommates or people who are unrelated to you. People who do not currently live in your housing unit, such as college students who are returning home from school for the holidays, should be considered part of different households. In-person gatherings that bring together family members or friends from different households, including college students returning home, pose varying levels of risk. 
      See who is sharing it (it might even be your friends...) and leave the link in the comments.:
     Lead Stories is working with the CoronaVirusFacts/DatosCoronaVirus Alliance, a coalition of more than 100 fact-checkers who are fighting misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic. Learn more about the alliance here. Olivera Perkins is a veteran journalist and fact checker at Lead Stories, who has covered a variety of beats, including labor, employment and workforce issues for several years at The Plain Dealer in Cleveland. Olivera has received state and national awards for her coverage, including those from the Society for Advancing Business Editing and Writing (SABEW). She was a Nieman Fellow at Harvard University. 
    Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
      
    Spotted something? Let us know!.
     Please select all the ways you would like to hear from Lead Stories LLC: You can unsubscribe at any time by clicking the link in the footer of our emails. For information about our privacy practices, please visit our website. We use Mailchimp as our marketing platform. By clicking below to subscribe, you acknowledge that your information will be transferred to Mailchimp for processing. Learn more about Mailchimp's privacy practices here. 
       Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
        
        Spotted something?  Let us know!.
      ,
https://leadstories.com/hoax-alert/2020/12/fact-check-challenges-around-developing-vaccines-for-HIV-cancer-the-common-cold-and-COVID-19-are-distinct.html,Did researchers develop a vaccine for COVID-19 in a year, while vaccines for HIV, cancer and the common cold remain elusive? Yes, but it's not an apples-to-apples comparison. The diseases are different from one another, which means that the challenges around creating vaccines for them are distinct. HIV mutates faster than coronaviruses do; many forms of cancer aren't caused by a virus, and there are -- in fact -- vaccines for some viruses that can lead to cancer; while colds aren't caused by a single virus, complicating efforts to develop an effective vaccine. The claim appeared in an Instagram post (archived here) on November 30, 2020. The post read: This is what users saw on social media: A post shared by Boyce Watkins (@therealboycewatkins) 
 The post included a screenshot of a news article announcing a new COVID-19 vaccine. A user's comment was posted underneath and circled in red. The comment read: 40 years worth of research...no vaccine for HIV At least 100 years research...no vaccine for cancer Ongoing research...no vaccine for the common cold Less than a year for a covid vaccine? Thanks but a hard pass on that shot... The post is missing important context because it fails to consider the important differences between those diseases. HIV, for example, presents challenges that are distinct from those presented by SARS-CoV-2, the virus behind COVID-19. STAT News explained: SARS-CoV-2 causes an acute disease, Covid-19. It's an infection that most people will clear on their own, which means there's a vanquishing immune response that a vaccine can aim to induce in order to protect people. That's not true for something like HIV, a virus for which there is no vaccine despite decades of research. HIV causes a chronic infection and integrates itself into people's genomes; there's no natural immune response that eliminates the virus that a vaccine can mimic. HIV also mutates much faster than coronaviruses do, meaning it's more difficult to rally a lasting defense. Similarly, cancer and COVID-19 present very differently. There are many different types of cancer, and a lot of them aren't caused by a virus. However, some viruses can lead to cancer, and there are vaccines for some of those viruses. For example, human papillomaviruses, or HPVs, can cause cervical and other cancers. The hepatitis B virus can also increase the risk of cancer, specifically liver cancer. Both HPV and hepatitis B vaccines are available. Lastly, the post mentioned the common cold, asking why there's not a vaccine for the disease, despite years of research. The answer is twofold. First, it's usually a mild illness and researchers generally focus their energy on diseases that are lethal. Second, some 200 different varieties of viruses can cause colds, complicating efforts to develop an effective vaccine. In sum, there are countless differences between COVID-19 and HIV, cancer and the common cold. Although vaccines typically take years to develop, it's not impossible or unreasonable that researchers were able to develop a vaccine for COVID-19 in record time, while other vaccines remain in the works. Every disease is unique. The path to understanding each and developing vaccines is distinct, too. 
      See who is sharing it (it might even be your friends...) and leave the link in the comments.:
     Lead Stories is working with the CoronaVirusFacts/DatosCoronaVirus Alliance, a coalition of more than 100 fact-checkers who are fighting misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic. Learn more about the alliance here. Dana Ford is an Atlanta-based reporter and editor. She previously worked as a senior editor at Atlanta Magazine Custom Media and as a writer/ editor for CNN Digital. Ford has more than a decade of news experience, including several years spent working in Latin America. 
    Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
      
    Spotted something? Let us know!.
     Please select all the ways you would like to hear from Lead Stories LLC: You can unsubscribe at any time by clicking the link in the footer of our emails. For information about our privacy practices, please visit our website. We use Mailchimp as our marketing platform. By clicking below to subscribe, you acknowledge that your information will be transferred to Mailchimp for processing. Learn more about Mailchimp's privacy practices here. 
       Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
        
        Spotted something?  Let us know!.
      ,
https://leadstories.com/hoax-alert/2020/11/fact-check-masks-gloves-vaccines-and-synthetic-hand-soap-do-not-suppress-our-immune-systems.html,Do masks, gloves, vaccines, and synthetic handsoaps suppress human immune systems? No, that's not true: Public health experts and medical research say the opposite is the case and the claims were made with no evidence in a meme that spread to hundreds of thousands of Instagram users in the midst of a COVID-19 surge that saw more than 160,000 new cases per day. The claims appeared in a meme (archived here) shared on Instagram on November 17, 2020 under the title "THINGS THAT SUPPRESS OUR IMMUNE SYSTEMS". It opened: THINGS THAT SUPPRESS OUR IMMUNE SYSTEMS MASKS GLOVES NO SUN FEAR VACCINES WASHING HANDS W/SYNTHETIC SOAPS AT LEAST THE GOVERNMENT HAS BEEN CONSISTENT IN ALWAYS GIVING US THE WORST HEALTH INFO This is what the post looked like on Instagram: A post shared by Wokebreed 🕳🐇 🙏🏻🙏🏼🙏🏽🙏🏾🙏🏿 (@wokebreed) 
 Since the fatality rate of COVID-19 is about 1%, there could be 1,600 new deaths from each day's new infections during the Thanksgiving Week surge of 2020. Here is what medical researchers and public health experts say about the claims in the meme. "Wearing a mask will not affect your immune system in the least. Your body will continue to work as it's meant to," Jennifer Burgess, D.O., a family medicine physician with Henry Ford Health System says in an article entitled "Debunking Covid-19 mask myths." Burgess continues: Another rumor I've heard is that wearing a mask will prevent your body from building immunity to colds or viruses, and that is absolutely not true. Lead Stories has debunked other masks-are-unhealthy claims in past articles, including: Test Does NOT Show Face Masks Cause Oxygen Levels To Drop Into The 'Danger Zone' PTFE Sprayed on Blue Masks Does Not Cause Symptoms Similar To COVID-19 No Evidence That Face Masks Cause Staph Infections Robert Redfield, Director of the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention says wearing a mask is the most important weapon against coronavirus infection. Public health officials urged Americans not to travel, not to gather indoors in large groups and to stay home until surge of Fall 2020 slows. Here is Redfield discussing the importance of masks in prevention of COVID-19: 
 The idea that exposure to dirt and germs strengthens our immune system ignores the science, says Dr. Carl Lauter, an allergist and immunologist at Beaumont Health, a major Michigan healthcare system. In an article on Beaumont's website, Lauter points out that while studies show exposure to germs and dirt and other environmental influences can have a positive effect on children's immune systems, that effect dissipates and adults can't change their immune system by seeking exposure to pathogens, bacteria and viruses: You shouldn't avoid basic precautions like wearing a mask, cleaning regularly and practicing proper hygiene because you think they are somehow harmful to your immune system," he said. "Doing those things is our best defense against COVID-19. Lead Stories searched unsuccessfully for peer-reviewed professional scientific reports on the impact of gloves on immune systems. The whole point of vaccination is to stimulate the immune system with a small exposure, "training" it to recognize a harmful bacteria or virus so that when a bigger infection hits, the immune system is ready. In its explanation of vaccinology, the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention describes the process like this: The first time the body encounters a germ, it can take several days to make and use all the germ-fighting tools needed to get over the infection. After the infection, the immune system remembers what it learned about how to protect the body against that disease. Lead Stories searched unsuccessfully for peer-reviewed professional scientific reports that found vaccination weakens human immune systems. More than a dozen serious diseases have been wiped out through vaccination programs in the U.S. and elsewhere, including fatal and life-altering diseases like Polio, Hepatitis A and B, Rubella, Measles and Mumps. In a fact-sheet for doctors and nurses on the importance of keeping hands clean, the CDC dispels a variety of myths, including the idea that hand sanitizers make you more prone to bacterial and viral infections: Using alcohol-based hand sanitizer does NOT cause antibiotic resistance.Alcohol-based hand sanitizers kill germs quick and in a different way than antibiotics. Alcohol-based hand sanitizers kill germs quick and in a different way than antibiotics. There is no chance for the germs to adapt or develop resistance. A 2016 paper in Biomedical Research International urged further research into the question: "The impact of low levels of UV exposure on the immune system has not been fully reported yet, but it bears interesting differences with the suppressive effect of high levels of UV radiation, as shown by some recent studies." A World Health Organization overview of the question said research had indicated exposure to sunlight could reduce immune response. https://web.archive.org/web/20200715205154/https://www.who.int/uv/health/uv_health2/en/index3.htmlSeveral studies have demonstrated that exposure to environmental levels of UV radiation alters the activity and distribution of some of the cells responsible for triggering immune responses in humans. Consequently, sun exposure may enhance the risk of infection with viral, bacterial, parasitic or fungal infections, which has been demonstrated in a variety of animal models. Lead Stories searched for scientific papers regarding the impact of fear on human immune systems but did not find adequate material to determine if the claim is supported or not.  
      See who is sharing it (it might even be your friends...) and leave the link in the comments.:
     Lead Stories is working with the CoronaVirusFacts/DatosCoronaVirus Alliance, a coalition of more than 100 fact-checkers who are fighting misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic. Learn more about the alliance here. Lead Stories Managing Editor Dean Miller has edited daily and weekly newspapers, worked as a reporter for more than a decade and is co-author of two non-fiction books. After a Harvard Nieman Fellowship, he served as Director of Stony Brook University's Center for News Literacy for six years, then as Senior Vice President/Content at Connecticut Public Broadcasting. Most recently, he wrote the twice-weekly "Save the Free Press" column for The Seattle Times.  
    Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
      
    Spotted something? Let us know!.
     Please select all the ways you would like to hear from Lead Stories LLC: You can unsubscribe at any time by clicking the link in the footer of our emails. For information about our privacy practices, please visit our website. We use Mailchimp as our marketing platform. By clicking below to subscribe, you acknowledge that your information will be transferred to Mailchimp for processing. Learn more about Mailchimp's privacy practices here. 
       Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
        
        Spotted something?  Let us know!.
      ,
https://leadstories.com/hoax-alert/2020/11/fact-check-medical-research-has-not-shown-distance-does-not-matter-in-covid19-transmission.html,Does medical research show COVID-19 is not transmitted in the air and that infection risk is unaffected by distance? No, neither claim is true: The claims ignore the accumulating recent evidence that airborne coronavirus is the major mode of infection. The claims ignore scientists' peer-reviewed conclusions -- which are based on what the full universe of study data show -- in order to focus on a single data point that supports the claim. Called "cherry-picking," this kind of mis-interpretation takes advantage of the scientific tradition of disclosing data outliers in the interest of transparency. The U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention have reiterated guidance that people can reduce their risk of infection through social distancing, avoiding crowds in enclosed spaces and by wearing masks to prevent spreading or breathing in coronavirus. The claim appeared in a video (archived here) published on Instagram on November 13, 2020 under the title "Contradictions in the airborne spread of SARS-CoV-2.". The text introduction reads: A post shared by Shawn Stevenson (@shawnmodel) 
 With a new disease such as COVID-19, which arose in December of 2019, evidence accumulates over time and early hypotheses are proven wrong, replaced by hypotheses that better describe the data. As more facts become known, they make self-evident truths more obvious. Shawn Stevenson of The Model Health Show argues in the Instagram video that there are contradictions in the research on aerosol spread of COVID-19. That he was able to read studies and pluck out individual anecdotes that cut against the grain of overall findings disproves his claim that "clinical evidence that goes against the popular narrative continues to be suppressed." In his 6-minute video on Instagram, Stevenson selectively highlights outdated data and only presents one side of the argument -- that, for the most part, COVID-19 is not spread by proximity and through the air. Although the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) and the World Health Organization (WHO) were slow to cite airborne transmission, particularly aerosol transmission, studies in the past couple of months have shown that aerosol transmission is viable. Stevenson, who apparently doesn't see it that way, cites five studies done this year to make his point. The first one he cites offers a good example of how he chooses some data, but ignores plainly stated contradictory information. So, for example, he points out that the results of a study published by the Lancet on June 27, 2020 says: SARS-CoV-2 spreads person-to-person through close contact and causes COVID-19. It has not been solved if SARS-CoV-2 might spread through aerosols from respiratory droplets; so far, air sampling has found virus RNA in some studies but not in others. But he neglects to quote the next two sentences: However, finding RNA virus is not necessarily indicative of replication-competent and infection-competent (viable) virus that could be transmissible. The distance from a patient that the virus is infective, and the optimum person-to-person physical distance, is uncertain. And he fails to quote other segments of the study that refute that distance does not matter. A section labeled "Findings" makes the following points: Transmission of viruses was lower with physical distancing of 1 m or more, compared with a distance of less than 1 m ... ; protection was increased as distance was lengthened ... . Face mask use could result in a large reduction in risk of infection ... with stronger associations with N95 or similar respirators compared with disposable surgical masks or similar ... . Eye protection also was associated with less infection ... The study circles back to reiterate the points about distance and masks: From a policy and public health perspective, current policies of at least 1 m physical distancing seem to be strongly associated with a large protective effect, and distances of 2 m could be more effective. ... For the general public, evidence shows that physical distancing of more than 1 m is highly effective and that face masks are associated with protection, even in non-health-care settings ... The second academic paper he cites was published by the CDC on March 2, 2020, in the early days of the COVID-19 epidemic, when not as much was known compared with today. The test subject was a hospital in China, and the study was financially supported by the National Major Research & Development Program. From that paper, Stevenson says: Virus was widely distributed on floors, computer mice, trash cans, and sickbed handrails and was detected in air ≈4 m from patients. And then he adds that in studying aerosol transmission in the hospital's ICU and the general ward (GW) the scientists: obtained positive test results for 35% (14 samples positive/40 samples tested) of ICU samples and 12.5% (2/16) of GW samples. But he neglects to cite the last sentence in the same paragraph, which says: These results confirm that SARS-CoV-2 aerosol exposure poses risks. He also failed to mention two of the conclusions the paper's authors penned: And finally, he doesn't cite the study's final conclusion, which highlights the prevalence of aerosol transmission: Overall, we found that the air and object surfaces in COVID-19 wards were widely contaminated by SARS-CoV-2. The third study Stevenson cites was published by Cambridge University Press on March 5, 2020, still in the early days of the pademic. That study looked at infection control among health care workers (HCW) in Hong Kong during the first 42 days of 2020. Stevenson cited two passages: Of 413 HCWs caring for these confirmed cases, 11 (2.7%) had unprotected exposure requiring quarantine for 14 days. None of these was infected, and nosocomial transmission of SARS-CoV-2 was not observed. ... not in 8 air samples collected at a distance of 10 cm from the patient's chin with or without wearing a surgical mask. At that point, he asks viewers: "Why aren't they finding it in the air?" But the study states plainly in its Conclusion: Appropriate hospital infection control measures was able to prevent nosocomial transmission of SARS-CoV-2. The fourth paper he cited was published on April 4, 2020 and was titled: "Risk of nosocomial transmission of coronavirys disease 2019: an experience in a general ward setting in Hong Kong." Stevenson quotes the study's Conclusion: Our findings suggest that SARS-CoV-2 is not spread by an airborne route, and nosocomial transmissions can be prevented through vigilant basic infection control measures, including wearing of surgical masks, hand and environmental hygiene. He uses this statement to qualify saying: But he neglected to mention the last sentence in the study: Vigilance with basic infection control measures, including wearing of surgical masks, hand hygiene and environmental hygiene continues to remain fundamental and essential in the prevention of human-to-human transmissions of SARS-CoV-2. The final paper Stevenson cited was published July 10, 2020 in the Science of the Total Environment journal and looked at indoor air measurement of COVID-2 patient rooms in the largest hospital in Iran. He cited this sentence toward the end of the article: in this study all air samples which were collected 2 to 5 m from the patients' beds with confirmed COVID-19 were negative. But Stevenson leaves out the next sentence: Despite we indicated [sic] that all air samples were negative, however, we suggest further in vivo experiments should be conducted using actual patient cough, sneeze and breath aerosols in order to show the possibility of generation of the airborne size carrier aerosols and the viability fraction of the embedded virus in those carrier aerosols. Scientists distinguish between droplet and aerosol (or airborne) transmission. The CDC explains it this way: Droplet transmission consists of exposure to larger droplets, smaller droplets, and particles when a person is close to an infected person. Airborne transmission consists of exposure to smaller droplets and particles at greater distances or over longer times. And the World Health Organization characterizes it this way: The virus can spread from an infected person's mouth or nose in small liquid particles when they cough, sneeze, speak, sing or breathe heavily. These liquid particles are different sizes, ranging from larger 'respiratory droplets' to smaller 'aerosols'. The question of aerosol transmission was not well-understood in the early months of the pandemic, when much was made of the coronavirus ability to survive on surfaces, where it was thought people were picking it up and becoming infected. As evidence of air transmission accumulated, the WHO came under strong criticism during the summer from scientists who believed the agency was not leading the charge. NBC News published a story on July 6, 2020 noting that 239 scientists had written to the WHO asking the agency to step up its efforts. The headline: Hundreds of scientists claim WHO is downplaying risk of airborne spread of corona virus The New York Times had broken the story on July 4, 2020 with headlines that said: 239 Experts With One Big Claim: The Coronavirus Is Airborne. The W.H.O. has resisted mounting evidence that viral particles floating indoors are infectious, some scientists say. The agency maintains the research is still inconclusive. The CDC also seemed to fumble on aerosol transmission of the virus. The BMJ, a 180-year-old international research journal, reported: On Friday 18 September the CDC posted information on its website that for the first time said covid-19 could be spread through "respiratory droplets or small particles, such as those in aerosols, produced when an infected person coughs, sneezes, sings, talks, or breathes. These particles can be inhaled into the nose, mouth, airways, and lungs and cause infection. This is thought to be the main way the virus spreads." It added, "There is growing evidence that droplets and airborne particles can remain suspended in the air and be breathed in by others and travel distances beyond 6 feet (for example, during choir practice, in restaurants, or in fitness classes). In general, indoor environments without good ventilation increase this risk." On Monday 21 September the CDC removed the information about aerosols and distances greater than 6 feet (1.8 m) and replaced it with previous information that warned only about droplets and advised people to stay 6 feet apart.1 The CDC said that a draft version of proposed changes had been posted in error. The agency said it was updating information about airborne transmission of covid-19 and would post the new information once the review was completed. Some observers said the CDC had bowed to political pressure from the White House. The Philadephia Inquirer published a story on September 25, 2020 with the headline: As CDC reverses itself on COVID-19, Americans are losing trust, warn public-health veterans. Then on October 5, 2020, the CDC reversed itself again, saying in a daily report: The principal mode by which people are infected with SARS-CoV-2 (the virus that causes COVID-19) is through exposure to respiratory droplets carrying infectious virus. 
      See who is sharing it (it might even be your friends...) and leave the link in the comments.:
     Lead Stories is working with the CoronaVirusFacts/DatosCoronaVirus Alliance, a coalition of more than 100 fact-checkers who are fighting misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic. Learn more about the alliance here. Arthur Brice is a fact checker at Lead Stories. He has been a journalist for more than 40 years, nearly 30 of them in newspapers. Brice was a national desk editor and reporter at The Atlanta Journal-Constitution for nearly 20 years. Previously, he was political editor at The Tampa Tribune and also worked for three other Florida newspapers. He spent 11 Years as an executive editor and executive producer at CNN.  
    Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
      
    Spotted something? Let us know!.
     Please select all the ways you would like to hear from Lead Stories LLC: You can unsubscribe at any time by clicking the link in the footer of our emails. For information about our privacy practices, please visit our website. We use Mailchimp as our marketing platform. By clicking below to subscribe, you acknowledge that your information will be transferred to Mailchimp for processing. Learn more about Mailchimp's privacy practices here. 
       Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
        
        Spotted something?  Let us know!.
      ,
https://leadstories.com/hoax-alert/2020/11/fact-check-pfizers-covid19-vaccine-candidate-does-not-contain-nanoparticles-never-used-before-in-vaccines-ingredients-are-not-lethal.html,Is it true that Pfizer's vaccine candidate to battle COVID-19 is made and stored in such a way that scores of people could be severely sickened or even killed by its use? No, that is a conspiracy theory not supported by scientific studies. According to vaccine experts and literature, the use of PEG -- polyethylene glycol --- in Pfizer's potential vaccine is routine.  The claims can be found in an article (archived here) published by Distributed News on November 18, 2020, titled "The shocking reason why Pfizer's coronavirus vaccine requires storage at -70C ... because it contains experimental nanotech components that have NEVER been used in vaccines before." The story opened: Users on social media only saw this title, description and thumbnail: The shocking reason why Pfizer's coronavirus vaccine requires storage at -70C ... because it contains experimental nanotech components that have NEVER been used in vaccines before Claims making the rounds that it is potentially lethal are "lies" and "conspiracies," said Dr. John Swartzberg, a vaccine specialist from the University of California at Berkeley. The claims have run on dozens of sites, many of them anti-vaccination sites, as well as social media. Here is a tweet containing the claim: The Shocking Reason Why Pfizer's Coronavirus Vaccine Requires Storage at -70C ... Because it contains experimental nanotech components that have NEVER been used in vaccines before -- Christian Research Service https://t.co/vqWRz7MEih 
 Peer-reviewed professional scientists have not supported those claims, says Swartzberg, of Berkeley's School of Public Health's Division of Infectious Diseases and Vaccinology. Sent the article by Lead Stories and asked about the claims, he said, "It's an article full of lies and scare tactics." The article appears to be referring to ethylene glycol, which is dangerous. According to healthychildren.org, on the question of whether vaccines contain antifreeze: No. Antifreeze is typically made of ethylene glycol, which is unsafe. Confusion has arisen, because polyethylene glycol (a chemical used in antifreeze and personal care products like skin creams and toothpaste) is used in vaccines and is safe. It is used to inactivate the influenza virus in some influenza vaccines. It is also used to purify other vaccines." There are four main claims in the Distributed News article, some of which is drawn from anti-vaccination champion Robert F. Kennedy, Jr.'s Children's Health Defense: - Nanotech components are used to develop the vaccine candidate, and that they've never been used in vaccines before; - Lipid nanoparticles cause hyperinflammatory responses in the body, leading to severe reactions, hospitalization and potentially death; - The UK government is prepared for a vaccine death wave; - Coronavirus vaccine-caused deaths will be categorized as COVID-19 deaths to keep the scam going. On the first claim -- that the nanotech components (PEG) have never been used in vaccines -- Swartzberg said: "I don't know what they're talking about. PEG has been used in vaccines before." On the second claim -- that severe reactions, even death, would result from the vaccine due to PEG -- Swartzberg said: "There is no scientific basis for making this claim...There's no evidence that these particles in the vaccine can do any of those things." As for the third -- that the UK is preparing for a vaccine death wave -- Swartzberg said: "That's a conspiracy theory." He had the same answer -- "conspiracy theory" -- for the last claim: that that vaccination deaths would be reported as COVID-19 deaths "to keep the scam going." The Distributed News article's title specifies Pfizer, which has announced that its candidate was roughly 95% effective against the novel coronavirus in trials recently concluded. But the article also mentions Moderna, which also announced its vaccine has scored about 95% effective. The author of the article, Mike Adams, who writes as HEALTHRANGER, included this audio to support what Swartzberg said are baseless claims: 
 Last, Swartzberg added: Sure, if we drank a whole bottle of it [PEG], we could hurt ourselves or die. But there's a very small amount of this ingredient in vaccines. And it causes no harm, and there is evidence that it actually helps the vaccines work."  NewsGuard, a company that uses trained journalist to rank the reliability of websites, describes DistributedNews.com as: According to NewsGuard the site does not maintain basic standards of accuracy and accountability. Read their full assessment here. 
      See who is sharing it (it might even be your friends...) and leave the link in the comments.:
     Lead Stories is working with the CoronaVirusFacts/DatosCoronaVirus Alliance, a coalition of more than 100 fact-checkers who are fighting misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic. Learn more about the alliance here. Eric Ferkenhoff has been a reporter, editor and professor for 27 years, working chiefly out of the Midwest and now the South. Focusing on the criminal and juvenile justice systems, education and politics, Ferkenhoff has won several journalistic and academic awards and helped start a fact-checking project at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, where he continues to teach advanced reporting. Ferkenhoff also writes and edits for the juvenile justice site JJIE.org.   
    Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
      
    Spotted something? Let us know!.
     Please select all the ways you would like to hear from Lead Stories LLC: You can unsubscribe at any time by clicking the link in the footer of our emails. For information about our privacy practices, please visit our website. We use Mailchimp as our marketing platform. By clicking below to subscribe, you acknowledge that your information will be transferred to Mailchimp for processing. Learn more about Mailchimp's privacy practices here. 
       Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
        
        Spotted something?  Let us know!.
      ,
https://leadstories.com/hoax-alert/2020/10/fact-check-ptfe-sprayed-on-blue-masks-does-not-cause-symptoms-similar-to-covid19.html,Do blue masks cause symptoms similar to COVID-19 because they are sprayed with PTFE (polytetrafluoroethylene)? No, that's not true: Medical experts said only some masks are sprayed with PTFE, but those that are would not be a concern at temperatures below 300 degrees. Meat begins to denature above 105 degrees. Mask wearers would suffer bodily tissue degradation, similar to cooking, well before PTFE might become a concern. The claim appeared as a post (archived here) where it was published by Dr. Chad Hawk on Facebook on October 10, 2020. It opened: This is what the post looked like on Facebook at the time of writing:   (Source: Facebook screenshot taken on Fri Oct 30 19:08:48 2020 UTC) Dr. Adrian Cotton, MD and Chief of Medical Operations, LLUH Hospitals told Lead Stories the while some masks do have PTFE sprayed on, the majority of them are made out of polypropylene. Possible symptoms or side effects wouldn't be caused unless the temperature of the PTFE mask was "over 300 plus degrees, so it's not a concern." The entire caption on the post with a photograph of a woman wearing a blue mask read: The blue masks that you buy or stores hand you are sprayed with PTFE (Polytetrafluoroethylene). That is synthetic fluoride found in Teflon. Here are some of the possible symptoms/side effects: Fever between 100 & 104 degreesChest TightnessShortness of BreathHeadacheCoughChillsSore Throat  A Tineye.com search for the photograph Dr. Hawk posted of the woman in the mask notes the photograph appeared in 2015 on the website Alibaba.com, a Chinese e-commerce site. The name of the file for the photograph is "polypropylene face masks," and not PTFE or Polytetrafluoroethylene, "Filename: Polypropylene-Face-Masks.jpg_200x200.jpg(200 x 200, 10.4 KB."  The image used on the Facebook post is from an advertisement on the website Wasserstrom.com, a restaurant supply company. The mask is currently unavailable on their website.  Here are examples of Polytetrafluoroethylene masks and Polypropylene masks available on Amazon.com. The Centers for Disease Control recommends wearing a mask to prevent the spread of coronavirus. The CDC recommends Americans wear a mask that has two or more layers of washable, breathable fabric. The CDC recommends Americans do not wear an N95 or surgical masks as they are intended to healthcare workers."  The list of symptoms the post claims that are caused by masks are similar to the COVID-19 symptoms described by the CDC: People with COVID-19 have had a wide range of symptoms reported - ranging from mild symptoms to severe illness. Symptoms may appear 2-14 days after exposure to the virus. People with these symptoms may have COVID-19:Fever or chillsCoughShortness of breath or difficulty breathingFatigueMuscle or body achesHeadacheNew loss of taste or smellSore throatCongestion or runny noseNausea or vomitingDiarrheaThis list does not include all possible symptoms. CDC will continue to update this list as we learn more about COVID-19.  
      See who is sharing it (it might even be your friends...) and leave the link in the comments.:
     Lead Stories is working with the CoronaVirusFacts/DatosCoronaVirus Alliance, a coalition of more than 100 fact-checkers who are fighting misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic. Learn more about the alliance here. Alexis Tereszcuk is a writer and fact checker at Lead Stories and an award-winning journalist who spent over a decade breaking hard news and celebrity scoop with RadarOnline and Us Weekly.As the Entertainment Editor, she investigated Hollywood stories and conducted interviews with A-list celebrities and reality stars.  Alexis’ crime reporting earned her spots as a contributor on the Nancy Grace show, CNN, Fox News and Entertainment Tonight, among others. 
    Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
      
    Spotted something? Let us know!.
     Please select all the ways you would like to hear from Lead Stories LLC: You can unsubscribe at any time by clicking the link in the footer of our emails. For information about our privacy practices, please visit our website. We use Mailchimp as our marketing platform. By clicking below to subscribe, you acknowledge that your information will be transferred to Mailchimp for processing. Learn more about Mailchimp's privacy practices here. 
       Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
        
        Spotted something?  Let us know!.
      ,
https://leadstories.com/hoax-alert/2020/09/fact-check-covid-19-will-not-go-away-if-you-stop-getting-tested.html,Does not getting tested for Covid 19 make the disease disappear? Are the elderly the only people dying? Are Democratic governors intentionally infecting them? No, no and no. Those are not true: You will have the disease regardless of whether you get tested. You just won't have an official diagnosis that you have it. All age groups are dying from the disease, although the elderly are among the hardest hit. Democratic governors are not intentionally infecting anyone, elderly or otherwise. The claim appeared in a post (archived here) on Facebook on September 26, 2020. It opened: This is what the post looked like on Facebook at the time of writing:   (Source: Facebook screenshot taken on Tue Sep 29 16:57:47 2020 UTC) This posting contains several misunderstandings and outright falsehoods. Let's examine them one by one. 1) The assertion that the number of cases would decrease if the United States tested fewer people defies logic. Cases of Covid 19 exist regardless of whether they are detected by tests. If police departments stopped tracking the number of homicides, does that mean that people would not be getting killed nonetheless? President Donald Trump started making this claim on June 15, when he tweeted that "(w)ithout testing, or weak testing, we would be showing almost no cases." On June 20, he told a crowd in Tulsa, Oklahoma, that he wanted fewer tests: "So I told my people, slow the testing down, please." Trump made that point repeatedly over the summer, including in an interview on Fox News on July 19, 2020. But health officials dispute the president's assertion. 0n June 17, 2020, Kaiser Health News asserted: Testing doesn't create the virus. Even without diagnostics, COVID-19 would still pose a problem. We just would know less about it. In that same posting, KHN quoted Dr. Joshua Sharfstein, vice dean for public health practice and community engagement at the Johns Hopkins Bloomberg School of Public Health in Baltimore, as saying: 'The implication that not testing makes the problem go away is completely false. It could not be more false.' In a September 4, 2020, article titled "Why Covid-19 testing is the key to getting normal," the National Institutes of Health asserts that testing saves lives. Testing of all people for SARS-CoV-2, including those who have no symptoms, who show symptoms of infection such as trouble breathing, fever, sore throat or loss of the sense of smell and taste, and who may have been exposed to the virus will help prevent the spread of COVID-19 by identifying people who are in need of care in a timely fashion. A positive test early in the course of the illness enables individuals to isolate themselves - reducing the chances that they will infect others and allowing them to seek treatment earlier, likely reducing disease severity and the risk of long-term disability, or death. Testing of people who have been in contact with others who have a documented infection is also important. A negative test doesn't mean you're in the clear; you could become infectious later. Therefore, even if you test negative, you need to continue to protect yourself and others by washing your hands frequently, physically distancing, and wearing a face mask. A positive test makes it clear that you have to isolate yourself, and that others with whom you have been in contact since the time of your exposure should also get tested. Since it is recognized that nearly half of all SARS-CoV-2 infections are transmitted by people who are not showing any symptoms, identifying infected individuals while they are presymptomatic, as well as those who are asymptomatic, will play a major role in stopping the pandemic. 2. Saying that "the only thing that matters is deaths" is a value judgment not shared by the medical community. 'Death is not the only outcome that matters,' said Dr. Eduardo Franco, the director of the Division of Cancer Epidemiology and the chairman of the Department of Oncology at McGill University in Canada. 'There is considerable suffering and risk of long-term sequelae if one is hospitalized because of COVID-19. Being hospitalized is a reflection of the severity of the infection. Being moved to an ICU is an even more ominous indication of severity.' 3. It is true that the elderly have a greater proportion of fatalities than younger patients. The CDC notes that: Older adults (especially those aged 50 years and older) are more likely than younger people to get very sick from COVID-19. The risk increases with age. This means they are more likely to need hospitalization, intensive care, or a ventilator to help them breathe, or they could die. Most COVID-19 deaths occur in people older than 65. The CDC has determined that compared with a control group of 18-29 year olds, patients 65-74 years old have a 90 times greater likelihood of dying, 75-84 year olds have 220 times more likelihood and people older than 85 have a 630 times greater likelihood. But age is not the only determinant, the CDC says: There are also other factors that can increase your risk for severe illness, such as having underlying medical conditions. People of any age with the following conditions are at increased risk of severe illness, the federal agency said: Minorities of any age also have suffered a disproportionate rate of deaths from Covid 19, the CDC has found. Long-standing systemic health and social inequities have put many people from racial and ethnic minority groups at increased risk of getting sick and dying from COVID-19. The term "racial and ethnic minority groups" includes people of color with a wide variety of backgrounds and experiences. But some experiences are common to many people within these groups, and social determinants of health have historically prevented them from having fair opportunities for economic, physical, and emotional health. A viral swab from an external skin lesion or mucosal surface can detect: In addition, a viral swab from oral skin mucosa can detect: 
      See who is sharing it (it might even be your friends...) and leave the link in the comments.:
     Lead Stories is working with the CoronaVirusFacts/DatosCoronaVirus Alliance, a coalition of more than 100 fact-checkers who are fighting misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic. Learn more about the alliance here. Arthur Brice is a fact checker at Lead Stories. He has been a journalist for more than 40 years, nearly 30 of them in newspapers. Brice was a national desk editor and reporter at The Atlanta Journal-Constitution for nearly 20 years. Previously, he was political editor at The Tampa Tribune and also worked for three other Florida newspapers. He spent 11 Years as an executive editor and executive producer at CNN.  
    Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
      
    Spotted something? Let us know!.
     Please select all the ways you would like to hear from Lead Stories LLC: You can unsubscribe at any time by clicking the link in the footer of our emails. For information about our privacy practices, please visit our website. We use Mailchimp as our marketing platform. By clicking below to subscribe, you acknowledge that your information will be transferred to Mailchimp for processing. Learn more about Mailchimp's privacy practices here. 
       Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
        
        Spotted something?  Let us know!.
      ,
https://leadstories.com/hoax-alert/2020/09/fact-check-pcr-covid-test-not-reporting-false-positive-cases.html,Has the widely-used PCR test for COVID-19 returned false positive results, exaggerating the number of Americans infected? No, that's not true: The test accurately determines whether patients' nasal swabs show infection. But anti-quarantine-and-mask activists, who did none of their own reporting, have misused the results of a reporter's recent analysis of testing: it shows many who are infected may not be infectious. That's not the same thing as a false positive. The claim originated in a Steve Deace Show video (archived here) published by Blaze Media on Sept. 1, 2020 on its Facebook page with the following text: This is what the post looked like on Facebook at the time of writing:  (Source: Facebook screenshot taken on Tue Sep 15 19:36 2020 UTC) Deace writes: the way we're testing for the presence of the virus could be artificially amplified by as much as 90%! In the video, Deace says: It is possible we've overestimated our count by 90%. Liz Wheeler made similar claims on One America News Network in a video entitled: 90% of COVID-19 Tests Should Be Negative:  (Source: Facebook screenshot taken on Tue Sep 15 22:25 2020 UTC) The title of Wheeler's piece, "90% OF POSITIVE COVID-19 TESTS SHOULD BE NEGATIVE" misuses Apoorva Mandavilli's reporting in the Aug. 29, 2020, edition of The New York Times. Wheeler, who has a bachelor's degree in political science; and Deace, who told the New York Times he did not complete college, took their information from a report by Mandavilli: "Your Coronavirus Test Is Positive. Maybe It Shouldn't Be." In that story, Mandavilli, who has a master of science degree in biochemistry, distills for readers the argument in the scientific community over use of high-sensitivity "polymerase chain reaction" testing merely to answer a yes/no question: "Has this person been infected?" Instead, some scientists argue, using a richer PCR test can show not only presence of the infection, but how much virus material is present. To illustrate the debate, Mandavilli looked at data compiled by officials in Massachusetts, New York and Nevada that included the viral load each positive patient carried. Up to 90% of people testing positive carried barely any virus, The Times found. They were still infected, but whether very early or very late in their infection, they were unlikely to be contagious. After anti-quarantine-and-mask activists like Deace and Wheeler used the Times' reporting to claim U.S. case data is inflated by false positives, Mandavilli took to Twitter to call attention to the difference between infection and infectious. "A big NOPE," she wrote in a Sept. 3, 2020 series of Tweets, shown here.  Declaring the COVID-19 pandemic overblown, Deace cited as proof of a conspiracy to ramp up COVID-19 fears the controversy over a research paper by hydroxychloroquine advocate Dr. Didier Raoult, whose work influenced President Donald Trump's early cheerleading for the drug. But Raoult's April paper -- in addition to advocating use of the anti-malarial drug the U.S. Food and Drug Administration decided does more harm than good -- makes one of the same points Mandavilli was careful to explain in her New York Times piece, which Deace and Wheeler did not: "...patients with Ct above 33-34 using our RT-PCR system are not contagious and thus can be discharged from hospital care or strict confinement for non-hospitalized patients." In other words, PCR testing can be used to measure infectiousness as well as simple infection and the difference is useful in clinical settings.  Also available to Deace and Wheeler was the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention web page explaining the value of data collected on each infection, which is the reason the tally of confirmed cases is important. Laboratory confirmation of cases, regardless of severity, is used to map the spread so that state and local public health officials can see trends and respond. On its website, the CDC says tests that confirm infection help state and local public health officials see trends in demographics, exposures and outcomes, which helps identify those groups most at risk and take steps to protect health care workers, racial/ethnic minorities, older adults, and people with underlying health conditions. Those data help the CDC write guidelines for the public and for healthcare providers. For readers interested in how PCR tests amplify genetic samples to make them easier for machines to measure, here is a Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory video on the topic. 
      See who is sharing it (it might even be your friends...) and leave the link in the comments.:
     Lead Stories is working with the CoronaVirusFacts/DatosCoronaVirus Alliance, a coalition of more than 100 fact-checkers who are fighting misinformation related to the COVID-19 pandemic. Learn more about the alliance here. Lead Stories Managing Editor Dean Miller has edited daily and weekly newspapers, worked as a reporter for more than a decade and is co-author of two non-fiction books. After a Harvard Nieman Fellowship, he served as Director of Stony Brook University's Center for News Literacy for six years, then as Senior Vice President/Content at Connecticut Public Broadcasting. Most recently, he wrote the twice-weekly "Save the Free Press" column for The Seattle Times.  
    Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
      
    Spotted something? Let us know!.
     Please select all the ways you would like to hear from Lead Stories LLC: You can unsubscribe at any time by clicking the link in the footer of our emails. For information about our privacy practices, please visit our website. We use Mailchimp as our marketing platform. By clicking below to subscribe, you acknowledge that your information will be transferred to Mailchimp for processing. Learn more about Mailchimp's privacy practices here. 
       Lead Stories is a fact checking website that is always looking for the latest false, misleading, deceptive or inaccurate stories, videos or images going viral on the internet.
        
        Spotted something?  Let us know!.
      ,
